Apparently Prides Osteria had a rough summer as evidenced by the almost empty dining room at 6:30 on a Friday night. However new blood in the kitchen seems to have revitalized the food from other customers recent visits. Waitstaff was warm but unobtrusive. By 8 pm or so when we left the bar was full and the dining room was much more lively than it had been. Perhaps Beverly residents prefer a later seating.   After reading the mixed reviews of late I was a little tentative over our choice but luckily there was nothing to worry about in the food department. We started with the fried dough, burrata and prosciutto which were all lovely. Then although they don't offer half portions of pasta we each ordered the entree size and split them. We chose the tagliatelle bolognese and a four cheese filled pasta in a creamy sauce with bacon, asparagus and grana frita. Both were very good. We split a secondi which was the special Berkshire pork secreto, which was described as a pork skirt steak with garlic potato purée and romanesco broccoli (incorrectly described as a romanesco sauce). Some tables received bread before the meal but for some reason we did not.   Management also seems capable for when the tenants in the apartment above began playing basketball she intervened and also comped the tables a dessert. We ordered the apple dumpling with gelato and it was also quite tasty. Portions are not huge which I particularly like because I prefer to order courses. If you are someone who orders just a meal you may leave hungry depending on you appetite. Dining room was mostly younger crowd while the bar was definitely the over 40 set. Would recommend that the naysayers return to see the improvement although I personally don't know the former glory to be able to compare. Easy access to downtown Salem without the crowds on this month of October.
This store is pretty good. Not as great as Walmart (or my preferred, Milford Target), but closer and in a easier area to get to.   The store itself is pretty clean and organized, the staff are friendly (most of the time), and BEST of all is the Self Checkout this store has!  Great clearance sections throughout, and great prices on everything in the store, in general (they pricematch too!).  Christian, Debbie, Jen and Hanna are all very friendly, helpful, sensitive to all customer needs. Definitely one of the better Target locations in the area, and they do a GREAT job assisting customers for being such a busy store. Located directly in the Framingham Mall on Cochituate Rd / Route 30. 4 stars.
I called WVM on the recommendation of a couple of friends who had used them in the past and thought they did a nice job. I'm a fan now, too.  Evan and Cody showed up right on time for my move this past weekend. They were friendly and energetic, working quickly but carefully to get all my things moved out of the old place and into the new one in less than 2.5 hours. All of my (heavy) furniture arrived in perfect condition, and they took extra care not to scratch the wood floors in the process.  I hope not to move again anytime soon, but next time I do, I'll be calling WVM.
The food is always great here. The service from both the manager as well as the staff is super. Only draw back of this restaurant is it's super loud. If you can, snag a patio table!
Probably one of the better breakfast sandwiches I've ever had. I had the EGGMEATMUFFIN, the bread was toasted perfectly and the bacon was a real thick cut. Not that lame bacon we are more familiar with at your conventional breakfast diner. In addition, the place was clean and the staff was very helpful. The butcher had several different cuts available and was knowledgable as well as friendly. I left with some cuts of pork and beef and am excited to come back!
I am definitely a fan of Sports Authority.  This particular location has a good check in deal.  We came here near Christmas time to buy some presents and we had a good experience.  The staff members were very friendly and they helped us find what we were looking for.  We got some golf stuff, two pairs of shoes, a tennis racket bag, and some bicycle accessories.  The store was clean and well organized.  They have everything from apparel to basketballs and everything in between.  Good spot to buy athletic merchandise.
I work in the Pru and this is the most affordable and tasty place in the food court.  deals where a meal is $5-$7 and the chicken pesto is really good.   I am not a chowda person but all there soups I have had are pretty damn good.  Broccoli chicken is my favorite.  Also, probably the most personable Food court staff I have ever had the pleasure of ordering from.
I have been here twice and have had really good food and service both times. I got a burger with caramelized onions, a red wine sauce and I believe blue cheese the first time. It was excellent and just the right size for me. I hate going out and ordering a burger that is bigger than my head that I can't even finish half of! Flip's burgers are about the same size I would make for myself at home.  The second time I went I had a limited time seasonal offering which was a venison burger with pea shoots, some kind of cheese that reminded me of brie, and a very sweet syrupy sauce which I could have done without, but overall it was very good. I also had onion rings and they were possibly the best onion rings I've had ever.  The only thing I don't really like about Flip is the atmosphere and layout of the tables. I guess they were going for trendy upscale or whatever, but it makes me feel as if I am in a school cafeteria back in high school. I don't like it. There are long white tables shoved up against each other with uncomfortable modern looking plastic chairs that kind of look like they came from Ikea. It's also pretty loud in there because there is nothing to absorb the sound, like a school cafeteria.  The last time I was in there there were a couple of women with small children. I have no idea why someone would bring a child to Flip unless that child was a very adventerous eater. They don't make anything plain. Everything on the menu has some pretty exotic ingredients. It's also very pricy for burgers. This is the last place on Earth I would bring kids to eat. Burger King is right down the street.
This is a five-star restaurant if ever I have seen one! Maurice, one of the owners, met us at the front door, Daniel a seasoned waiter from Hawaii, took care of us and the food was over-the-top delicious. This is not just a restaurant, it is an experience!  My son recommended this to us and we are glad that we took his advice. I had the rack of lamb and my wife had the grouper with crab. Save room for dessert! We live in Tallahassee but the next time we are in Orlando it's back to Chatham's!
Quickly stopped in for a UFC fight. I sat down at the bar while my boyfriend parked the car. Although the restaurant/bar was packed and LOUD, the bartender  (Vanessa) came over within a minute. Prompt service with a smile. When my boyfriend arrived a few minutes later, we didn't see Vanessa behind the bar so we tried to flag down her male coworker. He was caught up watching the fight and it took a few minutes to get his attention - which is fine. Not fine, however, is that after I ordered a beer, he stood and texted for a few minutes before getting my beer and held his arm up to shield his texting from management lol.   Vanessa, however, is an excellent bartender!! As loud as it is in this place, she continually scanned the bar looking for people attempting to make eye contact with her for service. I watched her work (my boyfriend and I have thirty years of food and beverage experience between the two of us) and she was focused and productive, but most importantly, she was ATTENTIVE! Give this girl a raise!!
I loved everything about this place. I've only been once but I keep meaning to go back as it was so great (just a bit out of my way).   I went with a fairly large group so we'd all ordered something different (back when it was $6 for everything, it looks like they've changed that now). At the time I got the chickpea fries, which were delicious but watch out for the fiber because I had to sit out of an entire board game. The board game selection was great, and I love that they serve mead (though I didn't get any at 12 pm haha).  The molten lava chocolate cake was so, so good. Seriously.  The real topping to the experience (other than the great service and the fact that they put lemons in their complimentary ice water) was that they were playing Siouxsie and the Banshees in the background! That + board games + good food + mead = I'm a fan forever.
Nothing special but good enough.  I like another one much better in Dorchester, but hardly get to that area, so Le's is my goto place for Pho
Definitely 5 stars for the donuts.  Our family has been coming to Dandy Donuts for years!  Their donuts can't be beat and are a must-try.   The same Cambodian family has owned this shop for years. They are kind, hard-working folks that put out a consistently fresh and delicious line of donuts as well as croissants and apple fritters their customers love.     Subs are also good.   I notice they've added a new low-price lunch special of hot dog, chips and drink.  The surroundings are definitely "hole-in-the-wall", but go and try the donuts.
I think their rice dishes are way better than their Pho's. Also I really like their sandwiches and spring rolls. I took a friend who haven't had viennese food ever. He absolutely love it.
Best station to fill up around in my opinion. Attendants are super friendly. They also carry bio diesel! Been running this in my Dodge for couple years w/o any issues. With Safeway right on same corner, the rewards really make this a favorite gas stop. Thanks!
Ordered the original tonkotsu base ramen and a char siu don for my 2 year old.  Loved the soup base but especially loved the size of the bowl...unlike most ramen place, the size of the bowl reflected the quantity of the content in it.  Totally looking forward to going back so I can customize my next bowl of ramen...will select thicker noodle for sure and perhaps add more ramen! Fabulous service and loved that they had a sign advising ppl to come in, write down name then wait outside, so not to clog the entrance/exit.  Great ramen place, but won't go with a group larger than 4 ppl.  Heads up, there was only one high chair.
I just had my lasik done last week and I am really happy with my results. The staff were all extremely nice, remembered me like I was an old friend, and generally made me feel very comfortable. It's also great that they have Saturday appointments. The evaluation, as with most lasik places, was complementary and all followup exams and treatments are included.  These exams are generally about 10 minutes.  The pre-surgery paperwork and going over post-op details, etc took about 30 minutes and the surgery itself (both eyes) took 25 minutes. Numbing drops are applied, so there is no pain, but while the flap is being created, there is an intense feeling of pressure from the suction that holds your eye still. I hated that. Afterward, the only pain I experienced was similar to getting soap in my eye, a kind of stinging. I went home and slept all night and woke up the next morning for my first followup and I could see! And had no more burning! I had some broken blood vessels from the suction used to hold my eye in place, but no pain all week, just dry eyes. The week following, you must avoid swimming, exercise, eye makeup, and have to sleep with goggles (so you don't rub your eyes) and apply drops almost constantly.   I believe I've made a great investment. I still can't believe I'm going to see this well FOREVER! :-)   My only complaint was that they didn't administer a sedative or anything to help me relax during the surgery (and maybe a pain Rx for after?) I didn't feel nervous before it started, but a little panic hit me when my eye was being held open and I was asked to keep my eye very still.  Oh, and they charge $2100 per eye for the all-laser lasik.
I had a 1 hour massage tonight with Barbara. LITERALLY best massage I've had, and I've gotten plenty of massages around the globe. First off, let me say that when Barb asks you the simple questions, she follows through as you please. I hate when I request soft-medium and it's totally opposite. I received a free foot salt scrub due to a scheduling issue, not bad! When a company offers you something in addition due to a mistake on their part, take it! That's their way of apologizing indirectly! Awesome massage even without the add on! Cannot wait to book my next massage with her!
Erika was amazing! After months of trying to find a place on my own, she swooped right in and helped me find the perfect home in a couple of weeks! I couldn't be more excited or grateful!  thanks Erika!
This place is truly a hidden gem (literally hidden as you have to walk through a Chinese restaurant to get there).  The place is small, cozy, and charming inside.  And the food is better than what you might find in the north end.  The service is great and the servers do a great job at pronouncing the specials to you like a true Italian! Make sure you make a reservation as it does book up rather quickly.
Am I crazy for giving anything MBTA-related four stars? Maybe.  Rating the red line against other public transit services I've used in the US and abroad, no, it can't hold a candle to anything in Japan or some of the better Metro lines in Paris. But those lines are well-funded. That's simply not the case anywhere in the US.  Simply because the T shuts down at night, it's cleaner than anything in NYC. Sure, it's not as fast, but Boston's not nearly as big as NYC, so it's fast enough.  Compared to any other public transit in the US, the red line is awesome.   Look, all of the MBTA -- the trains, the busses, the stops -- they are all showing signs of neglect. It's in debt by several billion dollars. So they're not going to add any fancy new features or do any serious upgrading until they have money to pay for it.  So knowing all this, I'm still really quite happy with the red line.
First time being here and I'm not going anywhere else for my truck needs from now on.  Right when I feel like customer service is lacking in my day to day dealings, Miguel and the crew at Lambs turned all that around in a few minutes.  These guys got me in late in the day after work, gave me great advice about my truck without trying to pitch anything, took care of my tire quickly and had me on my way.  This place definitely stands out and I'm for sure coming back for an oil change, rotation, and whatever else I need in the future.  Thanks guys I really appreciate it.
This place has some of the BEST chinese take-out in Portland. Don't let the inside-a-bar vibe scare you away. WE LOVE HAPPY FORTUNE. Just thinking about it makes me want to go there right now. Plus.. they have great prices.   Here's some of our favorites over the years: General Tso's (nice and spicy), the crab puffs, lo-mein.   The service is great -- cheap drinks, while you're waiting, from plucky, yet-very-nice bartenders. Interesting people watching, but make sure to order from the bar-side of the place for that.
Overall Recommendation:  If you like fried chicken, you should definitely check this place out.  Be forewarned that it's not a nice restaurant like the Flying Biscuit or Mary Macs so adjust your expectations for decor and service.  My husband and I are not from the South but as we ate our way through Atlanta, the Busy Bee Cafe ranked #1 on both our lists.  Pros   - BEST FRIED CHICKEN WE'VE EVER HAD...perfectly crispy skin with      great flavor. It seriously makes me not very excited to eat fried chicken      anytime soon because I know anywhere I go in Boston won't be as      good.   - Ribs with a nice, smokey taste   - Super mac n' cheese made with real cheese   - Dang good corn muffins you can munch on before your food arrives.  Cons   - Very busy so be prepared to wait (and you should because it's worth it)   - No air conditioning so in the summer it can get pretty toasty.  We were      there at the end of June and even with the fans going, it was warm.   - Sweet tea is too sweet for me  **Note: There's a small parking lot as well as street parking.  However if you park on the street, the meters are really expensive...something crazy like $2 an hour.
best pizza on a busy street! my kids love it. i've been recommending to everyone who has a birthday party in that area to order from pizzapalooza and they are not disappointed. the pizza is thick, square and yummY! so many varieties, i love their pasta with meatball too! They also serve ice cream. This is a good value comfort food place for me and my family.
So sad to learn they are demolishing this. Always loved coming here and seeing all the graffiti art work.
Incredible donuts. Sometimes you have to go early to have the full selection but the donuts never disappoint.
New owner is raising the bar with designer womens clothing.
Kudos to AutoNation! We had an oil change done at another franchise and found our Toyota leaking oil the next day. We took it back to said business and they came up with all kinds of reasons that they weren't at fault. We brought the car to AutoNation, and in less than an hour we were shown that the first place used the wrong type of oil filter. Bravo! faced with the evidence the first place gave us the refund we requested.  The indoor theater and popcorn are a nice touch too! :D
Dont bother going to voodoo, just come here instead. They have such unique flavors and everything is so fresh. Oh, and try their cold brew too!
It's a pleasure doing business with them. Very good service and hospitable staff.
This a great place to go to be social with a group.  I went yesterday and had to wait in line ten minutes just to get in, but no big deal, as the newest addition to Kendall Square the "new" factor of State Park delivers on the hype and is worth the wait!  The place was packed but it somehow did not feel crowded and while we were only there for drinks I will be back for the southern food.   The bar tenders kept everyone happy in the crowded restaurant and with good Juke Box tunes, fun shuffle board and great decor all of the ingredients were primed for a fun fueled night.   Kudos to the female bartender for making me and my friends 8  Moscow Mules and one great dirty Vodka Martini.  The group all agreed - delicious, 8 for 8!   A raucous good time in the always fun and classy Kendall Square.  If you're bar hopping near Inman and Kendall save yourself the walk to Central and crash the party at State Park.
This place has everything-I finally found Dogfish 120m IPA! If they don't have it the store, ask if they have it in the back.
"Even the mad Captain Ahab is touched by Starbuck's goodness..."   Herman Melville   The drive-thru was jammed with vehicles when I pulled up, so I opted to park and go to the walk-up window.   The staff were super friendly! More then a few of them said hello to me while I ordered. Even though they were busy, they were all genuinely smiling. They look like they enjoy their job. Great teamwork!  I think this is the friendliest Starbucks I've ever visited.   The building is architecturally pleasing to me so it catches my eye every time I've driven past it. I'm glad I stopped this time.  It's close to my freeway entrance so I'll be making this a regular stop from now on. If you're in the area, you should too!
We had lunch there on a Sunday afternoon and it was great.  We ordered 2 gluten free pizzas and both were uniquely delicious!  The service was great and it was an overall fantastic experience.  Will definitely be back.
Amazing Service!!! Very professional & courteous staff!! The best way to deliver excellent customer service is by following up with your customers and keeping your word helping them. Tine Hopson and Stephen Cimino provided excellent customer service by following up with me all the time and keeping their word :)  Thank you both of you being so awesome!!!
Seriously, why aren't you at Comfort?  Tonight was a special occasion, and we wanted to try something new.  Yelp led us to Comfort.   So worth it!  This is a new place, and I guess Watertown is giving them a hard time about signs, as they don't have one yet.  To get there, find the Persian restaurant below and head up the stairs.  There's a small bar (with a large TV) that opens into a lovely, warm dining room.  The ceiling is high and sloped, the exposed brick adorned with a small, gold threaded tapestry.  We were the only ones there, and got to sit by the window.  We were served by the owner, who was super nice and very attentive.  He really cared that we enjoyed our food, and seemed like an all around nice guy.  I tried the mac and cheese, which was rich, flavorful and wonderful.  The green beans that accompanied it were cooked and seasoned well.  My cohort ordered buffalo wings and a salad.  I was able to try the latter, and was impressed at how fresh everything was.  He enjoyed his wings, which says a lot as he's from Buffalo and is impossible to please when it comes to these things.  I was able to sample the blue cheese that came with the wings and was really impressed.  It wasn't just blue cheese - I could distinctly taste gorgonzola in there.  I asked the owner about it, and he confirmed it.  He then added that pretty much everything (including said dressing) was made on site.  That says a lot, if you ask me.  Oh, and I'd like to thank the bartender for leaving off the sugar on my martini glass.  Sugar is like an unnecessary set of very sticky training wheels.  Three cheers for a decent lemon martini.  We were the only ones in the dining room tonight.  Don't get me wrong, I loved the privacy and quiet of the empty room, but something tells me Comfort shouldn't remain a secret.  Get thee to Comfort.  And while you're at it, bring me back some of that blue cheese / gorgonzola yumminess.
its the best pizza hut i'v found in florida always got great deals & offers the staff are very friendly & make you feel welcome and if you have children with you they make them feel extra special & welcome them in a huge way too
I'm having trouble deciding how to rate Tomatillos, because certain things were definitely five star, and other things were kinda meh. However, I have to give them props because it seems like they're using Yelp in the right way - they're using it to get a consensus and improve on things. I read about tomatillos a while ago online, and since then I've been curious to try it. After a productive study session, I went with a friend here for lunch. Their special sounded tempting, but after having seen their menu online, I've been dying to try their potato and green chile burrito, so that's what I ordered. Since we were there for lunch, the guy at the counter told me they actually had a lunch special where for $8 you could get a burrito, chips and a drink. Sounded like a pretty good deal, so I got it. This is where I hand it to them. I assumed that all the extra toppings cost, well, extra, but there was no longer a price written next to them like there was on the menu I saw online. I then found out that they aren't, so I also got roasted corn and avocado added to my burrito (I didn't want to add too much and have the burrito be untenably huge!). My friend ordered a shrimp quesadilla and had like four extra toppings added to his.  There were a couple of minor things that bothered me. After ordering at the counter, I wasn't sure if I was supposed to go up and get my burrito once they called it out, or if I was supposed to wait for someone to bring it to me. There's nothing stated anywhere, and they surely didn't say anything, so I just went up and got it. But then a couple after us had their food brought to them by the guy at the counter. Hmm. Odd. I was also kinda "meh" on the salsa at the table, and the chips that came with my lunch special. The chips tasted a little greasy to me, and the salsas just weren't that great. I was expecting the tomatillo salsa to be amazing, considering the name of the restaurant was called tomatillos. Instead, it just tasted like they added waaaaaaaaay too much lime juice to me. I cannot remember a single thing about the red salsa, which just is a bad sign, considering I ate there like 3 hours ago.  I will say though, that the potato and green chile was AMAZING. Definitely the best parts of the burrito were the very nicely seasoned potatoes, and the absolutely delicious blend of cheese they used inside. Pinto beans were nicely cooked, too. I'm kind of meh on the roasted corn, but since I didn't pay extra, that wasn't really a deal breaker for me.  I definitely will be coming back here. They have ample parking, the space is really nice, and I really appreciate the fact that they seem to be doing their homework and improving what they can. I really think if they continue the way that they are, that this place will just get better with time.
It's crazy how establishments on the west coast have so many more yelp reviews than places on the east coast.  I find this extremely fascinating and I wish more people would be as passionate as the west coast has proven to me.  It was recommended that we go here for brunch...needless to say whomever told me this, is a genius.  Fresh brunch food, delicious infused vodka's, awesome buttermilk biscuits.  I ordered the "roll over"  two potato cakes that had a egg scramble with delicious sausage that wasn't gross and covered in grease and then all of this was topped with your choice of a bacon gravy or a mushroom and rosemary gravy.  Personally, I chose the mushroom rosemary gravy and I think that it was hands down the best gravy I had ever tried.  I might has well licked the entire plate because it looked like it when I was finished.  The flavors were just right and I was shocked at the lack of greasiness that usual breakfast foods come with and their perfectly prepared dishes were done to my liking!  Lastly, make sure you order the biscuit too because it's heaven baked in the oven for your enjoyment.  Take care & savor it up!
Perfect spices, nice atmosphere & music, great lighting and decor. Even the restroom area is pretty cool.  Will definitely come again.
5 stars for the location, it's absolutely wonderful. I ordered the shamrock bubble tea, which was one of the best I've ever had. I am subtracting a star for service however.  It was the barista that was so put out by waiting on us and then the 10-15 minutes it took to make the bubble tea... That's a bit long for a drink.
I come here to have my hair done by the amazing Elizabeth Eisenstein. She's here until March 2016. So get here while she's cheap!! Not only have I been very impressed with the quality of service I have received from Elizabeth, I am very happy with the instructors involvement to ensure perfection. I have curly hair which I am very particular about and the instructors have been very good at listening to my needs and my concerns as well as understanding how I prefer to style my hair.  I am a fan of this place. I plan on coming back for facials with my mother next month.
Located in the German Village, this Cup o Joe is the best in the chain, in my opinion.  A huge dessert selection and drink menu ensure that there's something for everyone's taste.  The atmosphere is casual, comfortable, and relaxing.  Free WiFi and a location right next to the Book Loft ensure that this place will always be doing business, despite the Starbucks across the street.
Falafel wrap - falafel with greens, pickles, and hummus in  a toasted wrap. I wonder why the reviews were so low. I entered without looking at yelp initially but then after checking in and seeing the amount of stars I kind of grew the assumption that it wasn't going to be good.  But it was really good. This was probably the best falafel wrap I ever had. They pressed the wrap too so it has a nice crunch but still soft to chew. The falafels weren't bland and each bite tasted the same, which makes wraps great, since it's evenly disturbed.   They are far from cheap on the stuffing so eat up! The wait time wasn't long during their busy time and it's a good portion for a hungry person, so I suggest checking this place out.
That was very gratifying!  Sometimes, I just crave a really good burger and fries with a coke.  PDX Sliders delivered without the guilt. Their sliders are about three inches across, small, but packs a lot of flavor and satisfying.  My sister order the Morrison which was an herb-marinated chicken with bacon, pesto, baby arugula, and aioli on Ciabatta.  I ordered two, the Sellwood and Hawthorne--one to split with her.  The Sellwood consisted of a beef, patty, bacon, aged sheddar, caramelized onions, butter lettuce, aioli and the Hawthorne had a beef patty, bacon, goat cheese, strawberry preserves on Brioche.  Of course, she wanted to share the Hawthorne.  I took a bite of the Hawthorne first and didn't want to give the rest to her.  It was so succulent!  The sweetness of the preserves with the tang of the goat cheese complimented the medium-rare beef patty well.  My sister didn't care for the Morrison, she felt that it was something that she could've made at home and the Sellwood was delicious but very typical burger flavors.  Love that their truffle fries are super crispy!  I think there will be more Hawthorne burgers in my future. While sitting at the benches eating, I was surprise that they get a lot weird people constantly walking by for that area.
My husband and I have done business with Beaverton Toyota 3 times and each time, they've blown me away at the service they've provided (I mean that in a good way). We've had the following salesman help us over the years - Mo Jafari, Salah Husein, and Drew (can't remember his last name)....and we can't forget the one who has always been the one to 'make it all happen' - Josh Ford ( who was once the Sales Manager and now is a one of the Finance Managers). Each time we've gone in there, we presented them with some pretty tough challenges as to what we want to get out of and get in to, the negative equity that always seems to be involved, and the little down payment we never seem to have. But no matter how impossible our requests have seemed, they have always welcomed the challenges and have gone above and beyond to 'make it happen' for us and make sure we leave their lot a happy (and returning) customer. Just to share an example: My husband wanted a car on a Subaru lot really bad! But that dealership wouldn't give him the amount he wanted for his trade-in, so the numbers didn't work, which means he couldn't get the car. Well, when we told Beaverton Toyota about it, they went over to that Subaru lot, bought the car, brought it back to their lot, gave my husband what he was asking for his trade-in, and sold him the Subaru themselves! We were in shock and awe at how above and beyond they went. They don't try to convince you to 'settle for something else' because what you really want is too much of a challenge in making the numbers work. Their attitudes are 'BRING IT!' When it comes to the sales part of their jobs, they aren't pushy at all, annoying, or smothering, which I for one can highly appreciate as I HATE the car buying process (despite the fact that I've traded a car in almost every year for the past few years)! They show and express that they really care about what it is YOU want and also show that your safety and comfort (and that of your passengers) is important to them as well. They are always very patient (I speak from experience as I am not the easiest person to do business with), respectful, professional, and relaxed. If I ever had an issue with a car after purchasing it (which is rare), they are all over taking care of it like white on rice!  I brag about these guys to everyone I know. They deserve it. I've been to so many other dealerships and I've never have had the kind of experience with them that I do with Beaverton Toyota. I think, given all the cars I've had over the past few years, and the fact that I LOVE the Toyota they put me in to recently, it will be a long while before I do any car shopping. But if and when I decide to car shop again, I won't be going anywhere else but there.
What a gorgeous restaurant ! Three very different rooms to dine from three different parts of the world . Wow I am impressed, the food was amazing . Animal kingdom is just getting better and better by adding this gem. Avatar (pandora ) is set to open in May, can't wait!
I have been going to "Awesome Tan" since I moved to Brookline in 1998 It has been 16 years and I love the place They have always take an excellent care of me and they make me feel special when I'm there There are even a couple of the same girls who've worked there since the day I started going I think that says a lot about the owners and the coworker relationships The girls are always very polite and they will take care of all your needs The place is very clean and the prices are reasonable My favorite part is Maria's gorgeous flower arrangements.
Snap is my go-to lunch spot nearly every day! The variety is endless and they are constantly adding new menu items. The Snap team is super friendly and helpful. Almost every time I ask them how a certain item is that I haven't tried yet, they offer to buy it for me so I can try it risk-free. Their food is fresh, delicious, healthy, and easy. What more can you ask for!? Snap for President. Tip: Anytime I eat these at home (instead of work) I heat them up in a skillet on the stovetop. It's tasty, microwave-free AND it feels home-cooked. :)
Jacks is the place to be.  The food is exceptional, I recommend the calzones! Or one of their funky pizza slice creations (hotdog pizza ect)! They have some good alcohol prices and a good atmosphere. During dinner it's always packed though so be prepared to sit out back!
This restaurant is delicious! I've had Ethiopian in DC (which is the best I've tried) but this place is a close runner up.  The boyfriend and I came in on a Wednesday night and were seated immediately. We first got the honey wine which was really sweet and syrupy. It reminded me of mead. Then we got the meat combo and everything was tender, delicious and flavorful. They certainly don't skip on the injera here.   My favorite part about this place specifically is that they serve the food traditional style in colorful baskets! I've never seen that before and it made the experience that much better :)
My favorite hangout, great music, unpretentious cool people and cheep PBR. Besides the concerts, The most fun nights are "Heroes"(80ies Party) and "xMortis"(Goth)
Joey is the best and my cut grows out evenly and each day is like a new style.  Highly recommend him!
This Chicken Express has been doing it right for years now. I've never had a problem, the service is always top notch, and the place is always squeaky clean - dining area, exterior, bathrooms, even the kitchen appears much cleaner than other fast food place from what I can see. I love their fried chicken liver and the manager told me that because they make each batch fresh that they are happy to take my order over the phone if I call ahead so that I don't have to wait at the restaurant for the 6 minutes or so that it takes to cook. I live just down the street and I have taken them up on this offer several times. Even if it's just one order of 6 chicken livers, they are happy to cook them up fresh so they are ready when I arrive. Now THAT is exceptional customer service. Thanks Chicken E!
Something about this place made me feel like a smart, cool, hip, 30 something as soon as I walked in the door. The ambiance is dark and inviting at the same time. The tables are large and seat multiple parties together at each table, so it feels like you're at a party -- a party for awesome people.   The menu is small, which is nice for the indecisive. We got a few things to share, starting with the cottage fries, which are basically thickly sliced potato chips. We got the beet salad which wasn't bad, but wasn't my favorite. They did marinate the beets in strawberry juice, which I've never seen done before.   For the entrée, we got the shrimp and grits, and it was incredible. The grits were creamy and dreamy on their own, but with the other ingredients including a poached egg, I could not stop eating even if I tried.  We also shared the chicken sausage, which was surprisingly very flavorful for what I was expecting. Do not get the bok choy as your vegetable side however - it was not cooked very well and I could not appreciate the flavors of garlic and lemon.   Definitely a cool place to eat and greet, I can't wait to come back to try more things on the menu.
I was in Austin recently and searched for a place to eat on this fine website called Yelp. We were looking for hard tacos and came upon Evita's Botanitas and the menu looked pretty great. So we GPS'd ourselves there and found ourselves in a small strip mall, nothing fancy. And the food did not disappoint!!  First of all, the salsa they give you is above and beyond. They bring a two-tiered production with a basket of fresh tortilla chips and 5 or 6 different salsas, all of which were delicious and not at all 'omg my mouth, it's on fire'  I ordered a house margarita (rocks with salt please!) which was ass kicking in a good way. For my dinner I ordered the vegetarian quesadillas, which I admit were served to me in a unfamilliar way. Maybe I was just Dumb White Girl but when they brought my food I thought they brought soft tacos instead of a quesadilla. Granted, I'd ordered the corn tortillas rather than flour, and it looked like a plate with several soft tacos. And oh man, were those some seriously delicious quesadillas! I don't care what they looked like, they tasted like heaven.  Our waitress was really friendly and I would highly recommend eating here. I will make it a point to come back the next time I'm in town.
We ended up staying here for a trade show, and I shared a gigantic room with my coworker. Service is excellent in the lobby. Smiles on their faces like they really want to be there. They were dressed nicely and showed us where the restroom was and the plugs at the table in case we had to wait for someone. Also, they provide free water bottles, which helped when I had a hangover the next morning on our way out.   My room had 2 full size beds in it and a bathroom that connected to the bedroom as well as a door that led to the main room. The place was absolutely clean- bedrooms, bathrooms, kitchen, living room. My supervisor's bathroom had a huge tub in it. Also, the coffee and tea was Starbucks, so that was a big plus.   I love this place so much. It was safe at night, the bartenders were cool and friendly. They directed us to places to check out as well as noted the vibe. (Half the group wanted a ratchet time while the other half wanted a chill, "shoot pool" time.) The pool was also pretty nice, but when we stayed, it was pretty cold to be swimming.   I would love to come back and hope to organize a squad trip for my Potterhead friends. It was super nice and not far from the places to see.
Came here for a friends birthday and was impressed! The service was wonderful! Everyone is so friendly and helpful, the chef even came over and said hi. I ordered the duck, it was delicious, very flavorful! The only complaint I had was that it was just duck, no side. Although it was good it was a little weird to eat just duck for dinner.
I ate here recently on the recommendations of some Muslim brothers at the Islamic Society of Boston (beautiful masjid). They said it was halal and the Arab owners confirmed that it was. This is a nice, downtown spot across the street from the park and right next to the Park Street subway station.  We enjoyed the chicken kabob and baked haddock dinners, which both came with rice and salad. Very enjoyable, hot and fresh food. When I went to buy some rice pudding for dessert, the owner gave it to us for free. What a nice touch. InshaAllah my wife and I will return soon.
Soooo good!  Amazing biscuits, awesome jelly and perfect for a quick breakfast. I'll try the donuts next time. The biscuits are large, thick and not too salty. Up there on the best biscuit list in Austin.
Great place... delicious tapas and very nice wine list... I didnt try any of the specialty cocktails but I'll in my next visit!
I have been taking aerial classes at Aircraft for about a year, and it is my favorite thing I have ever done (and I've done a lot!). NOTHING takes priority over my aerial class, (seriously, just ask my husband). I look forward to it every single week. The instructors are fantastic, supportive, funny, positive, motivating, and excellent at explaining the various skills. I gained strength very quickly, even going just once a week, but the biggest benefit I have found is that my 75-minute class is the ONLY time in my entire week that I can honestly say my mind is 100% in the present moment. When I'm at aerial practice I don't think about anything else in my life except exactly what I'm doing. I'm concentrating, getting a workout and laughing so hard every single class. It is the best therapy out there, I swear. The groups in each class are small enough to get lots of individual attention from the instructors, so you learn something new every time, and we all support and encourage one another as we're attempting new, challenging skills. I can't say enough positive things about this place...you just HAVE to try it!
I am in Atlanta on business, and one of my coworkers said he knows someone who owns an Italian joint, so this is where we ended up. I had no expectations whatsoever. Never heard of the place, never even been in the area before. Yes, the food was somewhat pricey. Everything we had was great. And for the decor, some say tacky, but this is part of what makes this place special. I stepped outside with my coffee to catch a quick smoke, and when I re-entered the restaurant, there was fog, colored lights, a variety of hats came off the walls onto children's heads,and some faster faced music was pumping. Again, this is what makes this restaurant unique.  All in all, I liked this place. Has some character and if I visit the area again with a craving for Italian, I will try to revisit.
This place really hits the spot after a long day of shopping on Newbury st.  I finally get to sit down after walking for hours, eat some good sushi , drink some good miso soup and re-energize for more shopping.  Even though the sushi men at this place can be a little creepy, I love this place and it will forever be my lunch spot when i'm shopping in the area  xo Alena
Realize this is a small cafe local hang out.  But wow the food was a big surprise. Lots of flavor and tons of quality and great value to boot. Everything is made from scratch. Simple awesome and a place I will run back to.
We've been big fans of Occidental and Urban German and couldn't wait for this to open. It didn't disappoint! The schnitzel was amazing and we can't wait to go back for the spätzle...it was already sold out! Bridge views make this place over the top! So glad this is in St Johns and can't wait to go back!
All 5 of these stars are for my friend Bobby. He showed excellent customer service and executed his job flawlessly. He also seemed to be an honest guy. Not just jiffy lube, but the world needs more people like Bobby. Thanks for helping me out with my tires man
Stopped in for lunch, was pleasantly surprised! We ordered garlic cheese bread, the pizza lovers flatbread and chicken piccata. All were very delicious. The service was great, the food was great, the music makes you feel like you are in Italy. We will be back for sure!
The cost isn't expensive and it is very good. For me, places like Voodoo is too sweet for me, but it is not the case for Donut Palace. The donut itself is very airy and absolutely delicious when bitten down. I have only been there once, but I'm already enjoying it a lot!
The dishes were executed flawlessly and they were presented beautifully. Minus a star for the seemingly rushed service. Our server breezed through the description of the dishes.   All in all, it was a great dining experience. (Had the 14 course meal with pairing.)
Never in years of Legal Seafood dedication have I had a bad meal here, EVER. A crab roll comes on a buttered & grilled roll so light it's almost ethereal. Really it's an amazing roll and just amplifies the quality of the crabmeat.   The salads are terrific but the best part might be the servers. Warm, attentive and helpful, just trust me- you'll eat here every chance you get!
Still an exceptional restaurant with several new menu items including a gimmicky (and tasty) "sorta-Asian" fried chicken and waffles.  I'm a spicy food fan with a fire resistant pallete, but the hot sauce with the otherwise-excellent chicken wings was WAY over applied and actually ruined my whole dinner.  Service has gotten slow, forgetful and a little too cool for school (second time we've noticed this...).
Love this place! Their food and drink menus are both very creative, which is perfect for me.   The Pumpkin Martini is delicious (ask for it with a cinnamon sugar rim). The Keylime Pie Martini is also amazing. They have a lengthy beer list as well.  As far as food is concerned, the mac and cheese is scrumtrulescent (half portion is definitely sufficient). Also, the Rialto is lovely, and the bread pudding is heaven (generous portion, good to share).  The service is generally phenomenal. The waitresses are really sweet and easy going, which makes the experience that much better. I've only experienced poor service here once. The girl had a pissy attitude and was simply unpleasant, but don't let that detour you from going to Parish; I'd give it 10 stars if that was an option.
Wow. Thank you, Yelp. I am SO glad I found this place tonight. It definetely stands out among all the sub-par Indian food in the Boston/Allston area. For about $26 I have an entree (chicken tikka masala, my favorite), an appetizer sample platter (non-vegetarian, fyi), and onion pratha, a thick chewy slice of whole wheat bread with onions. Enough to last me for three meals, provided I stuff my self silly.   So I may not know authenticity but I've had enough Chicken Tikka Masala to know good from bad. This was goooood... The mild spice level had plenty of flavor and kick. It was slightly creamy but moreso heavy on bold tomato flavor. Amazing. Finally something that doesn't taste like a school cafeteria's interpretation. The appetizers were surprisingly good, they lost their crunchiness because it was delivery but a few minutes in the stove took care of that. The vegetable pakora seriously made my knees wobble it was that good. The only (barely) low point was the bread tasting a little more bland than I was expecting. I'm not sure how onion pratha is supposed to taste, but I enjoyed it anyway.  AND to top it off, the delivery guy walked the food up to my door, was polite, friendly, and wished me a good night. Love this place.
Been here a few times.  One of the better individual hotpot places around the lower mainland. Portions are good. Price is decent considering you are cooking your own food. I always leave full. Light years better then firepot in burnaby. Definitely a try if you like hotpot
This place is just plain great. Food is great and very unique. Service is impeccable. The Vodka cocktail is a must try if you like vodka. I ended  my dining experience with a chocolate pudding...I am in heaven. If you are in the area please do not miss this place. Cheers!!!
My friend and I came to Austin in July. We both needed a little pampering and boy did we get it! Wonderful spa and a great massage! I can't wait to go back and visit again!
Nice music, excellent service, reasonable prices. The staff is super friendly and food is delicious and fairly priced. Potstickers and Mac and cheese were amazing. The bacon jam burger is my favorite. I love this place. You should go!
This is the best place specially during summer evenings . They do provide outer dining area , which is really beautiful . Staff is very friendly .food and drinks are good
Had a few delicious things here: Arroz con Camarones (Shrimp Rice), Tostones, Maduros, Bistec Merengue. Also the Queso y Salami Frito app was perfect. As a side, do yourself a favor and get the Rice and Beans. It's a staple and its prepared perfectly.   A few things were not as good as I expected: Sangria (Margarita was better but still low on alcohol), Chicharrones (very tough, if you like hard meat they are for you), Yuca Frita (they look like mozzarella sticks, quite odd), Mofongo was weak too.  The drinks we tried were not very alcoholic and excessively sweet so I would just stick to a beer (Corona) unless you just love sugary drinks. The last complaint I have is that the temperature on a Fri afternoon was surprisingly low in there. It was as though they didn't want to turn on the heat which is a real drag in Boston. This was our second time there and we didn't have that issue the first time (fri night) so perhaps it was just a strange oddity.
Wow!!! Absolutely the BEST donuts I've EVER had!!! Tried old fashion glazed, Mexican hot chocolate (favorite!!!) & apple fritters...and no kidding...BEST EVER!!! Dense, moist & DEEEEE-lightful!!! A must if you're in the area!!! Yummmmmmm!!!
We ate at this place all three mornings we were in Orlando this past weekend. The food was awesome and the servings were large! The first and third day we had breakfast there the service was so amazing! The two different ladies were very attentive and super friendly. The second day (different lady) was not as great but she was busy and alone so I will give her that. The place was very clean and a great atmosphere. Definitely recommended!
On a lark (which is a bird according to wikipedia and doesn't really make a whole lot of sense used in the phrase 'on a lark') we decided to try something different for dinner and went to Cafe Josie.  This was  an excellent decision (and no larks were harmed in the process).  The restaurant is hidden behind 6th St. and is in a quiet area, contrasting with the typical douche parade on other parts of 6th.  The interior is spartan but breezy and the detail is placed on the presentation and preparation of the food, which is, to me, more important than trying to make a place look fancy but serving crapy food.  We had the grilled lobster cakes as an appetizer.  They were cooked well and the cilantro and chipotle aioli complimented them well.  For dinner my girlfriend had the green chile polenta, which she enjoyed, while I had the pepita redfish.  I've eaten redfish cooked a variety of ways across the gulf coast but the spiced crust and habenro butter made it very exotic and thoroughly enjoyable.    I'd reccomend this place to anyone who's never had cuisine from the tropics, or to anyone who wanted to get some great food at a reasonable price.
It was my very first visit  the service was awesome and they assured me that I would love the food. And guess what I definitely  love the food  hands down. It was very clean and also a nice bar you can even set outside for that summer  fun. Try them for yourself. I'll  be a regular ....
Great spot. Comfortable little joint smack dab in the middle of Harvard Square. Drop in on a hot day and grab a bubble tea while shootin' the breeze with the staff. You can also challenge Harvard students to a game of Street Fighter 2 if you feel the need, but personally I like to just relax and keep the peace.   The only place that rivals this is a bubble tea shop in Calgary that I walked into awkwardly while they were still under construction. They told me to come back in and gave me a free bubble tea though so they are scoring points stricly on being nice and not charging anything (I still tipped though, I'm not a scumbag.)   Boston Tea Stop (clever name especially with the MBTA map on the wall) is a valuable addition to the ever diminishing Harvard Square area. Pretty soon that neighborhood will be nothing but boring chain restaurants and mediocre bars so try and support the little guys while you can.   Also the staff deserves a shout-out. They can talk about the Rival Mob with the best of them.
Best theater ever.  Great seats great service.  You gonna spend some money but it's worth it if your a movie buff.  Got to go
Out if the three burrito places on Huntington by Northeastern, this "fast food" is my favorite. They have pretty high quality amazing-tasting food, and always change up their menu so you aren't always ordering a normal burrito. I love the burrito bowls, personally.
Point #1 - Haggle Free?  Now if you know anything about the East Coast, you know that EVERYTHING gets haggled and negotiated.  I have this down to a science.  I am the chick that all sales reps eventually cower in fear from and pour themselves a stiff whiskey after selling | not selling me a car | truck | couch | designer purse | [insert purchasable item here].  Imagine my surprise when I move out here that in addition to no Dunkin Donuts and Chinese Food delivery at 3AM, Honda is a HAGGLE FREE ZONE. Simply unacceptable.    I pleaded with them to REDUCE THEIR PRICE.  Of course, there is HIDDEN MARKUP and stuff.  Take it down.  Do it NOW.  I NEED the satisfaction of knowing that I beat my sales rep to a quivering pulp of low price jelly with elaborate tactical accuracy..  Winning is what fuels me.   Instead, they offered me this non-negotiable price.  I tried everything I could.  I plead.  I whined.  I walked out the door (and then I came back).  Nothing worked.  Negotiation, haggling and bargaining is my life.  My soul.  Conclusion:  I don't like non-negotiable pricing.  Bleh.   Point #2 - Prices are insane??  Once upon a time in a land far far away (New Jersey), I bought a Toyota from a dealership.   Somewhere in that dealership there is a photo of me standing in front of a Toyota 4 Runner. Now I was not exactly photogenic for that photo (chubby, yet adorably cute.  A big shout out to Toyota and Weight Watchers!!!  Now buying a car from them was a BIG DEAL!!!  In addition to taking my picture at deal end, I was treated like a princess descended from elite royalty.  I was provided the finest of coffee and offered sugary confections whilst we negotiated.  My salesman was well schooled in fueling grandiose delusions of carefully coiffured women.  He played the game well.   I am also quite sure that I received a steak dinner out of the deal as well.  Kudos to you Toyota Salesman of Yonder Years in the Kingdom of New Jersey....    Now I think it's clear what's important when you buy a car.  Price, honesty, integrity and all that.   However, when you're middle aged and have binged on all available episodes of Brady Bunch | Fantasy Island | Love Boat and have grown weary of the young with all their Twittering, Blogging, Vee-logging and self-gratification, there isn't much to look forward to other than going to bed before 9PM, Channel 12 news and Geritol mixed with prune juice. If you're going to take away haggling and negotiation, please replace it with a special room for those over 40 including video games | trivia | improv | snacks | 80's one hit wonders | high quality beverages (preferably alcoholic) and karaoke.    This was my second time at this dealership. The Salespeople were efficient but I need more than that.  I need entertainment and a feeling of victory when I purchase things in this price bracket.  I crave these things, like people crave sugar and that feeling of fullness after stuffing oneself at the annual turkey dinner.  I need to wave my keys around and strut... because I bought this car.  Finally after years of denying myself the luxury of heated seats, I have given in.  I am one with the universe now...  I am a diva and my bottom is warmed... all because of my new Honda.  There needs to be much celebration.  So sadly no disco dancing can be had here.  The showroom is pretty elaborate, lots of mirrors, people wearing suits/dresses and a fancy shmancy staircase that looked like the ballroom in the catering hall where I had my wedding back when grunge was king (ew).  All that was missing was a huge table of fresh pastries and a DJ playing that awful macarana coordinated dance crap that I was forced to participate in.  I felt just a tad out of place in my torn jeans, high topped converse sneakers and unicorn cat t-shirt.  I think there was some grandiose plumbing fixtures in the ladies room that reminded me of those high priced remodeling jobs you see on HGTV.  Yes I do wish I had a miniature waterfall in my apartment bathroom.  I really do.  Anyway, it's rather nice, so you might want to dress up a little before your visit.  A tiara should do nicely.  Summary  Despite my ranting above about things that only matter to high-maintenance middle aged women transplanted from NYC,this experience went well for me.  If you want to buy a car without hassle (cool) or no negotiations (ew), from well-versed, experienced and pleasant, sales (peoples) who briskly handshake and get the job done quickly, please feel free to buy a vehicle from them.    My name is VixenZilla and I endorse Beaverton Honda...
This is a place to be in the morning while visiting Portland!  Blue Star donuts have incredible sweets and savory delights to choose from. The donuts here are just mouth watering and glorious to look at while being in line because for one they are moist and not overall sweet for anyone who may be a sweet tooth.  Great thing to know is that the lines aren't too long which you may have imaged and I have to say its not like Voodoo donuts and that's for sure.
Delicious shirini (sweets) and the best napoleans in the northeast!
If you haven't been to, eaten, or heard of Tiff's Treats you are missing out on the sugary glory of amazingly soft warm as good as homemade cookie amazing ness. I am a long time lover and consumer of Tiff's Treats. This location happens to be closest to my house and my work so it is the most convenient one for me which means it's probably the only one I've been too.   The negatives: if you're visiting in person, the parking is abysmal. Prepare to walk from the next parking lot over, but after some fatty cookie or brownie deliciousness that may not be the worst thing. I have visited this location on many many occasions and I have never seen one employee behind the counter waiting to great customers. 99% of their business is probably delivery but every time they are in the back talking completely unaware that you have walked in and can hear them.  The positives: The chocolate chip, the sugar, and the snickerdoodle obviously! Outside of their very few and easily fixed negatives, Tiff's Treats cannot be beat when it comes to warm cookies on demand. They even have milk and ice cream to go with it if you so desire.
To say that I am in love with Thaitation is...quite possibly an understatement.  I have always loved Thai food and was a fan of Brown Sugar while in college.  When I moved to Fenway and heard that Thaitation was related to Brown Sugar..I was skeptical.  Brown Sugar, in my opinon, had fallen a bit so I was not sure how great Thaitation would be.  I was wrong.  Thaitation is just delicious.  Brown Sugar is no longer a place in my go to restaurants and I have convinced all of my college friends that it is no longer worth the trip and Thaitation is the place to be!  Pad thai, broccoli with tofu and mushrooms, wonton soup, mango curry...I could go on for days!  I also love that I can usually get two meals out of an entree so the prices don't seem too steep.  Great Quality, Quantity...what more could you ask for?!
I loved the tuna tacos...deep fried rolled in corn tortilla..mmmmmmmm. Great with guac. And the migas were so yummy! My daughter always loves the breakfast tacos. On special occasions, I will get the chicken with mole sauce. SOOO good!!! Salsa is good too, fresh ingredients. I love all the fresh fruit drinks (frescas). My favorite is the white one (rice drink)...probably the worst for me.  Great service, always friendly. I don't mind the cheap prices either. I love the atmosphere here, cool and hip. If you're traveling down Congress, find this place!... It's a diamond in the rough!  Austinite now transpotted in FL but make going to Nueva Onda a priority every time I come home to visit.
I took my husband here last night for his birthday.  When I made the reservation they asked if it was for a special occasion and I told them it was for a birthday.  Everyone who came to our table knew and made sure to wish him a happy birthday.  We ordered the special appetizer which was a nice assortment of scallops, shrimp, mussels, and some sort of white fish in a tomato sauce.  He got the skate fish and I ordered the halibut.  Both were impressive and were lightly seasoned so that you could taste the natural flavor.    The reason we are giving this place 5 stars is because of the service.  It was remarkable.  The waiter accidentally spilled my water and you would have thought there was a fire by how many of the staff responded.  The manager also came over to apologize.  The waiter was very knowledgeable about the fish selection as well as the wine.  They even gave us pistachio ice cream, baklava, and homemade donuts as a birthday dessert.
My husband and I tried to get in before they were open and the chef jumped out of the car to keep us from walking away. He unlocked the door and let us sit in the cool air and truly could not have been more welcoming. The bartender took over and was so friendly and helpful and wasn't even slightly upset to be asked to start early. I'm so glad we stayed. The avocado toast was different and amazing with a great citrus twist and the 106 burger was amazing and huge!  We are excited to Go back and try brunch.
The best sushi at Orlando. Excellent service and great ambience to enjoy the food and relax.
Listen....landscapers are a dime a dozen so how do you know whom to trust.? Let James Sierra and Sierra Out Door Living change your mind the way he has changed mine. The usual stuff sure but.......replacement of dead Mexican palm trees, powerwashing, irrigation installation and repair and metal fencing are just a few of the things he is great at. I have even referred him to my Homeowners Association and they report the same as I have described. If you are a property owner or are a property manager give him a try!
My preferred Austin area restaurant. Quality food & servce.  Great value. Consider spliting a meail to engae the Gumbo & dessert. Best in Austin.  Check hours for lunch & dinner.
I highly recommend TLC Laser for anyone looking into LASIK or PRK surgery. The free consult was informative and trustworthy. Just had my actual procedure yesterday and the whole process from start to finish was seamless. I'm 39 years old and have struggled with contacts and glasses for years and years. I only wish I had opted for Laser much sooner. TLC is definitely a reputable center with a reputable surgeon and trained support staff. The overall cost seems pricey compared to other offers, but well worth the peace of mind and care provided.
I had so much fun walking up and down the aisle's of this store. There was so much variety of products and so many neat (and super cute) things for great prices. I ended up buying way more than I needed, but it was so worth the price and I can't wait to come back here!!!
My first day. Had a hungry three year old. Ate in the lobby. They forgot our order. We waited over an hour. What a painful memory. This was right off the plane. Meal comped but that doesn't take it away. Hope that they aren't like this to others. Not like they were nasty or malicious. And the shuttle? Great but not great if you are leaving late. If you leave first thing in the morning it's good. Otherwise great hotel very well maintained.
Cheap glass without being a pain in the ass... Great service!!!! Hope I don't need another windshield any time soon- but if I did I would go right back to these guys!
Eating healthy I had the turkey burger it was great. No fries and water w lemon. #JackLimeTeam had a great time. #Anchorman2
Channing is a photo ninja.  My parents told me a horror story about their friends' wedding photographer, who insisted on always getting the shot he wanted.  The end of their friends' ceremony: couple has their first kiss, crowd cheers, photographer calls a halt to their walk back up the aisle so he can get a better angle.  That wasn't acceptable, and we weren't keen on having a lens constantly in our faces either.  So, one of our priorities was to find someone who could capture the day while still being unobtrusive.  Channing was perfect.  He documented all the moments we remember, as well as many that we wouldn't have seen without him.  Yet, other than when we were taking portraits, he flew under the radar, never interrupting the flow of the evening or getting in the way of our guests.  And the photos!  Our gallery has over 700 images -- every one looks crisp and professional, and many are downright stunning.  He has an amazing eye for expressions: emotions and reactions come through so vividly that we feel like we're reliving parts of the celebration.  He's also willing to go the extra mile to get different perspectives.  During the first five minutes of our ceremony, he somehow managed to get across the building, up to a balcony, and back; he took beautiful photos of the unveiling and gorgeous panoramas showing all of our guests, and he returned before our officiant's welcome was over.  We got a glimpse of how he did it from a video of our recessional, in which he silently sprints along the side of the building to get both our first kiss and our walk up the aisle.  It couldn't have been more different from my parents' horror story, and we couldn't imagine better photographs.  Seeing his site (http://www.channingjohnsonblog.com) is probably more convincing than reading this review.  We were swayed both by the impressive portfolio and by our first meeting with him, and we liked him so much that we decided to do an engagement session as well.  During that session, he set two nervous subjects at ease, and we ended up with a spectacular set of photos.  We gave them to our parents and grandparents at the wedding, and they were thrilled.  Finally, working with Channing is a joy.  He is incredibly responsive and endlessly thoughtful, and he clearly cares about what he does.  He listened closely to all of our requests and concerns, and he dealt tactfully with a couple of our friends and family who insisted that he ought to take a particular picture in a particular way.  Our engagement and wedding photos came promptly, with the files mailed on disc and loaded on an online gallery.  So yes, Channing is a ninja.  He is everywhere and seems to be nowhere; he has consummate skill in his art; he is awesome.
STUDY THIS STORE PICTURE CLOSELY SOUTHERN WEST COASTERS! Why the hell we dont have stores like these is totally beyond me. They have giant floor scales that are zeroed out to the weight of a cart and then you just kinda go from the price per pound list. Never in my life have i been anywhere where clothing leather and basically anything material for your home was sold in such huge quantity.  Theyve got it all and ya its in different price ranges (glass 59 cents a pound, cloth 20 (DATED so dont take my word for it) but who gives a rats? This place is awesome. nuff said.
Super fan of this spot in downtown! Came out for a lunch meeting and was surprised at how good it truly was.  Ordered the Lamb Gyro platter with side of Hummus and Babaghanoush. Platter has a good portion of lamb on top of a small amount of rice... served with pita and pita chips.   Great Lunch spot. My new fav Mediterranean food place in Orlando!
I was surprised when I read the reviews of MM, but after using them for my initial CPAP experience and then follow on visits, I learned a lot. When I was first looking for a provider, I was determined to get one that took all of our insurance. I started cross walking providers and finally hit MM. Obtaining approvals was a snap. Equipment and supplies delivered promptly and I made a point of stopping by for small adjustments or advice. I only have used the Manchaca location. Initially, phone calls were routed to the Stafford call center (outside of Houston I believe), and messages that were left were apparently not being forwarded to this location and there were email issues (thank you YELP reviewers for the head's up). I originally made an appointment at this location for a face to face and to confirm all insurance info. I was quite pleased, learned a lot, and prepped myself about equipment for meeting with the doctor and discussing the prescription. I always made an appointment, just to keep things easy. Now they have a new phone system installed which goes directly to that small office or if they are tied up with an appointment it goes to the north office. This has been a major factor in my rating as it is much easier to contact the specific person i want. Since this is a very small office they prioritize. Appointments first, walk-ins second. Since supplies come out of the Houston area warehouse I anticipated long delays. It appears that they are addressing warehouse issues down there, but I still maintain contact only with the Manchaca location. I am quite surprised to have a good experience so far as I was dreading dealing with this issue. I will try to update this after a few more months to see I continue to be pleased.  I did a lot of checking on providers and came up with a lot of bad ones. However, those that appear to have good ratings, may not take your insurance. The highest rated one took none of ours. That would mean everything out of pocket.
Really tasty and very fresh food. We ordered a salad, a gyro, hummus and baklava and everything was delicious and really fresh. Only subtracted one star because they need a water filter on their drinks. They all have a funky taste. I will def be back often and just buy the Mexican cokes to go with.
This place is good! You have to stop and try if your in Austin. I had the Raspberry white chocolate shake and a burger. Best burger place in Austin.
Neil England is a true "Ink God". I Googled best cover up tattoo artists in New England and his name popped up! I checked out his Web page, followed him on Facebook, and called to snag my appointment.  He had a 3 month waiting list which I gladly accepted for quality work.   Let's start with what I had. ...I had what is coined as "a nightmare tattoo". It was a dragon which I had done circa 1997/1998 by a now well known tattoo artist.  A friend of mine stenciled a dragon on me, and instead of removing it I had to worked over. It was fine and barely visible until touched by then known as "Naton" of Dark wave Dermagraphics  located in his loft at Dudley Station in Boston, when tattooing was illegal.   I left with a horrible tattoo. A marriage of pain and torment which I lived in.  I had tried endless times to have it redone and was always told it couldn't be done,  until Neil came along....  About Empire Tattoo....it stepped in to seal the deal, and get a brutal, bloody, long overdue divorce from this tattoo.  I sat in an ultra cushiony soft leather sofa which immediately made me sleepy.  The studio was clean,  spacious, and all employees friendly.    About Neil....HE IS THE REAL DEAL. He takes time to analyze your existing tattoo and discusses the options.  He is a real artist.  His work space was awesome.  He calmed me with movies, we watched Push, and Casino Jack.  He has outlets to charge your cell phone,  art everywhere,  and is not only am awesome tattoo artist but a great person. He is a family man and proud of his wife, who is a true artist also.   The vibe in the studio is awesome,  positive energy and even the owner is very cool! When done, Neil sealed the deal and filed my tattoo nightmare divorce by wrapping me up in Saran wrap. I am sooooo happy, I cried out of happiness and also pain, lol. When done I got a care package of tattoo balm which increased my healing time and a cool t-shirt which I wear often with pride.   Go with cash, I had to use an atm across the street, no biggie, but we all know cash is king!! Have cash to tip also, these people are artists and cash tips are necessary!  Lastly there is ample parking across the street adjacent to advance auto. Do not park in advances' parking lot, park on the public street or risk being towed!!!  I look forward to rebooking with Neil.  Follow him on Facebook and instagram to see if he has cancelations. His appointments are COVETED,  do not rush him and do not miss your appointment.  Empire tattoo is clean,  friendly and professional.   I have been in a few places and left running...Empire IS THE ONLY PLACE YOU NEED TO GO FOR A TATTOO  and I highly recommend Neil. The other artists seemed great too, but it's the work of NEIL ENGLAND,  that I wear with pride...thanks Neil....
A violent vomiting session, cold sweats, and a general blue-ish white skin color had us changing our plans from heading to the airport to heading to the nearest urgent care facility. All these one star reviews had me worried, but not as worried as I was about getting my husband some help ASAP.   When we got in they told us they could see him right away, but if it wasn't an emergency he'd be sent outside to wait for a while. It didn't take long for them to realize it was an emergency. And from that moment on he was treated with the best care. The nurses were all really sweet and had great bedside manner, distracting my husband while giving him an injection, and one even brought us a snack (we had planned to eat breakfast at the airport). The front desk guy, who was struggling with our health care information, was nice as he could be about it. And the doctor was better than most primary care physicians I've had -- very patient, forthcoming with all information, and seemed genuinely concerned for his wellbeing.   We left with a less-dying husband, feeling perfectly cared for, and with TWO doctors notes that will help us get a refund on our missed flights.   Thanks, team! Hopefully we'll never need to see you again, but if we get sick on the way to the airport again, we know where to go!
Great photo op if you ever find yourself in the city of Austin Texas.  Upon googling things to visit in Austin,  this spot always popped up which sparked my curiosity.  Dont expect anything fancy though when you come.  This place is just raw art that anyone can contribute to.  Bring your spraypaint and mark your place in history.  I was advised by the locals here that this place may no longer be here in the near future.  Just like all the other spots in Austin, this is prime location for building other types of establishments.  I love that there are no frills here.  If you want to take a picture and get as close to the wall as possible, you will have to walk through some dirt,  climb up some broken concrete, and cross over some bums, homeless people, or freelance hipster artists trying to make a name for themselves.  Just do it, its worth it.  I wish i did.  But I was peer pressured by my friends to hurry up and take my selfie.  I would love to come back and climb that wall all the way to the top.  Hopefully its still there at that time.
Now, I have written on the subject of shabu shabu before- and there is not question that it is my personal favorite and Kaze Shabu Shabu is and always will be the tastiest and best quality hot pot that I have ever had- but Hot Pot Buffet is a really great way for hot pot newbies to experience a wide rang of ingredients for one low price.  You can keep eating for hours if you want, and they just keep on refilling your broth and items if you ask them for it.  They don't exactly offer to bring you things without you asking, but they were not the least bit rude about giving us another check off sheet.   We had the chef's special broth and it was extremely bland, but the dipping sauce (satay and soy based) was not too bad.  I would try a different broth with a little more flavor next time.  We had a ton of stuff, but our favorites were the kobe beef, the scallion dumplings, the taro root, the salmon, and the absolutely delicious crab legs- we got two orders!!    Really you can't go wrong here- unless you are bothered by the slightly fishy smell when you first walk in.  But you get used to it!  For $20.00 this is about the best deal in China Town.
We had such an amazing experience with Hillarry!  She photographed our baby Maxwell from newborn to 1 year and we love all of our pictures!  She is so easy to work with and is very creative with everything she does.  I can't say enough great things about her:)  We will definitely be using Hillarry again when we have another little one.
I found this Thai restaurant at yelp!  Small, cozy restaurant. Service was good. Food was excellent!! Will visit again.
Blood Orange Creamsicle you guys! Do I need to say anything else? My husband and I tried this place on a whim, we are devout Salt & Straw lovers but we were in the area and were feeling adventurous. We sampled a few flavors and I immediately settled on the blood orange creamsicle, it was a little tart with all the creamy dreamy goodness you want in a creamsicle. My husband got a hot fudge sundae. The sundae was a little unorthodox, chock full of crunchy and dark cocoa nibs, but he seemed to enjoy it.   A couple weeks later my friends were visiting and I knew one of them would just die for the blood orange creamsicle. We happened to find ourselves in the neighborhood so we stopped. 3 scoops of creamsicle later and we were all happy campers.   Pro-tip they also have a mini scoop, in case you want to indulge, but not too much!  The point? Order the blood orange creamsicle you guys!
Excellent subs at a reasonable price. A huge variety too for those picky eaters that can't decide on what to settle for. Come with an empty stomach and enjoy a great turkey and ranch or one of their other 100 subs!
We have stayed here the last 4 years for a event in Disney and it has been great !   The furnishings are lovely and the design very different ! The service has been very good . My only complaint is the restaurant upstairs in the lobby "Blu" is overpriced . We could not get a reservation till quite late , but we ate  down at the Tesoro cove and it was excellent . Farm to table... fresh pasta all the salad you can eat was very reasonable . Breakfast there was excellent also . We had a wonderful visit !
Amazing.   Tasty food, good waiter recommendations, good service, fair prices.  If you're in JP and craving Indian - come here. Or if you're in Brookline, Cambridge, Somerville...jump on the 39 and get over here.   Get the chicken curry.  Another recommendation is the duck on the chef's special list.
If you have driven past this place several times, you have missed a great opportunity for Costa Rican food those same several times. The food is good, fresh, and it feels homemade. Check it out, and make sure to try things that are from Costa Rica, not just your comfortable Mexican fare. Family-run, small location, super tasty.
First time here the staff was wonderful and the food was very well prepared and tasty. I am very particular about Italian restaurants and this one is very good. We will be back often I am sure. The only problem I see is they might need more room very quickly
Always look forward to getting my teeth cleaned, Jerri is a hoot!!!!!! the dental office is really starting to shape up. everyone is so pleasant to talk to. Dr. Daby you have something special going on at your practice!
The Barking Crab was a family tradition for us for years before I moved to Boston. Once a summer, when visiting our family in the city, we would go to the Barking Crab for some decent food and wonderful atmosphere. Sadly, once I became vegetarian, the menu became extremely limited for me, which made it much less appealing. But still, many happy memories from the Barking Crab! Great family place!
Meatloaf was very good ....I had a very good meal here. Staff was very friendly as well. Place was quiet and was very relaxing. Prices are fair. Something for everyone on the menu and breakfast all day. I'll be back.
I LOVE THE WOLF.  I have been living in Salem for four years and this place and 62 on the Wharf are my two favorites by FAR. I work in the restaurant scene in Boston and frequently dine at excellent places, but I keep coming back to the Wolf for my casual night out.   Quest is MAGIC  Howling Wolf Burrito - why do i EVER let myself get anything else??? ( because I want to try everything, that's why). It's just SO perfect. Try it. Just do it. You'll die.   I also love the chorizo papusa appetizer. Little spice, complimented by a vinegary slaw of come sort. Fish taco is phenomenal as well.   Service is fine. Bar can be understaffed at times (one on doing the whole bar plus service) which creates a slower-than-desired experience.   After I finally move out of Salem into Boston, I will be at the Wolf whenever I come up here to visit friends.
I would definitely stay here again.   Some of the reviews are a bit harsh.. and I'm not sure why. If you're a hotel/motel snob, then this probably isn't the place for you. However, if you want a comfortable, clean, affordable place to rest your head, with speedy shuttle service and decent cafeteria food within walking distance, than this is your place!   The property is huge, so like the parks, be prepared to do a bit of walking! The nice thing about this, however, is that the various paths and trees and walking trails really scatter the guests throughout the resort so that everyone isn't right on top of each other. I also like the designated smoking areas which keep the cigarette smoke away from your room. My boyfriend is a smoker and he didn't mind walking to the benches to have a smoke before bed.   The rooms are a bit small, but it was only two of us so it wasn't cramped and we were in the room so little it didn't matter anyway! I would suggest if you're a family of 4 or more to get an additional room that's adjacent. They have doors between so you can keep all your family together with side by side rooms.   The food in the lobby is actually pretty good, despite it being a cafeteria. I don't know if we were just starving when we got back from the parks, but the Chicken Parmesan was pretty outstanding. They also have overpriced beer in the coolers if you're feeling tense. ;)
I've always liked Flip (I've been to both the Buckhead and Howell Mill locations several times over the past few years), but of the two Richard Blais conceptions - Flip Burger and HD1, HD1 was my favorite; so I was quite saddened  when I learned they were turning this location into a Flip.   This past Sunday was my first visit since Flip Burger opened, the space is fairly identical with the exception of additional seating (two large booths on either end of the restaurant). I had previously heard that management was planning on keeping a few of HD1's mainstays on the menu, but unfortunately only the 'Haute Dog' made it.   No biggie, the BF and I both decided on burger options; he had the "Oaxaca Burger"  (beef patty topped with sliced avocado, pico de gallo, and smoked mayo). I was a litle hesitant trying it -  it sounded much too spicy for my wimpy taste buds - but the spice was surprisingly mild. Good news for me, but bad news if you're looking for some kick. The burger itself was well-cooked, very tender, and the toppings were a very refreshing contrast to the beef.  I chose their special of the day: the "Surf and Turf" Burger (beef patty, topped with sauteed lobster knuckles, "garlic herb white wine butter", pea shoots, and green goddess dressing) which came with a side of seasoned fries - served with mayo and ketchup ($16). The adjectives were just too much for me to resist, I had to have it. I wasn't disappointed it was quite tasty, it was the same beef patty of the 'Oaxaca' - the lobster was buttery and well cooked, also more plentiful than I thought there'd be. Always a plus!  We finished our meal by sharing the Pistachio "Liquid Nitrogen" milkshake. No surprise, I loved it. I really like that the milkshakes have a more complex sweetness to them, there's a muti flavor component to them as well.   The service was excellent, our server was friendly and attentive. There was a slight delay in our entrees coming out - but the manger came out straightaway and apologized profusely.  My one tiny complaint/tip regarding Flip (all locations) - the burgers are quite small - hella tasty and gourmet - but small. Just having a burger will leave you still a bit hungry, definitely go for an app, a side - and how could you resist one of their milkshakes?
Sooooo happy we found this place. I have been wanting to go for awhile but Husband (never having had tapas) was resistant (although he loves seafood, rice and ham - go figure!). Thanks goodness for the power outage last week! I convinced him to go here ("like dim sum honey- only Spanish food...you know, like jamon???!!!"). From the phone call to see if they were open to the moment we walked in, we felt welcomed and the friendliness was obviously sincere. The place does look like a veritable tapas bar (memories of Spain). The menu was everything I had hoped. Fortunately Karly (or Carly?) was very helpful and we managed to choose some top notch tapas (although I can't imagine anything here not being delish). After our meal, Pepe suggested a sherry for desert and he was spot on. He chatted with us for awhile and it was most enjoyable. Cannot wait to go back! Pros: everything Cons: need more friends so we can order more variety :)
Hard to find good interior Mexican food around here. I had the pescado yucatano. So delicious. Everyone else enjoyed their tex mex. Reasonable prices, too!
Super fun bar with great beer and a lively atmosphere. I went on a Friday night with friends and saw multiple live music performances. We had to wait in line for a little while but the man at the front made it go by quicker by asking us trivia questions. There was a fair amount of seating and my group of 6 didn't have trouble finding a table. I got the sour guava for my first drink which I enjoyed. The second I had was their milk stout. It was fine but I can say I've had better. I really liked their 'bevi' station with sparkling and still water with different flavors, it was a nice touch. Some things I didn't take advantage of was the chocolate bar, the arcade games, or the tasting room restaurant in the back, but definitely things I want to try next time I'm there!
Top notch service! Very attentive and anticipated all our needs. We had the recommended lava bread with babaganoush (to die for!) for an appetizer and then the recommended mixed platter for two for $35. We got a side of cucumber/garlic tzatziki and the savory iskander tomato sauce. Simply amazing and still leftovers! You have to get the kunefe dessert with some Turkish coffee (watch out for the 1/4 cup of coffee grinds at the bottoml lol). For the chocolate lovers, the chocolate hazelnut baklava is delectable and rich. The best time would be to go during happy hour with half off drinks. Fantastic!
A good place for a break from the dining hall fare I usually deal with @ Wellesley.... I prefer Cambridge One for the same feel - gourmet pizzas and salads. It is a nice casual dinner - in addition, it is one of the few places in Wellesley (a dry town) that has a license to serve mixed drinks and they are good.   The spicy chicken sausage pizza or blanco is the way to go.
The food was good and the service was exceptional.  There were a couple of snafus - my soup was taken to the wrong table - which the wait staff made up for with cups of another soup to tide me over.  Staff was also very sensitive to my food allergies, and made sure there was no cross contamination in the kitchen.   I was pleasantly surprised at how well children are accommodated.  There's a dedicated child's menu with low cost (around $5) entrees, and crayons for coloring.  (The kids' food was great, too.)
I'm going up update my review to 5 stars.  The restaurant has updated the menu and it is the best of both worlds- more like the old Castle Hill with a lot of the new favorites still on the menu.  The service is excellent with experienced professional servers.  The food is always consistent.
We went there for restaurant week and had an amazing experience. The service was among the best I've ever experienced and the food was also incredible. They were able to accommodate many allergies and food preferences at my table without any problems.
This is my new cleaner. My old cleaner started out with one day turn around, then it became three, they lost things and ruined things.  I found this new cleaner through Yelp friends.   They are fast, polite. They have coupons discount for first second and third time customers through their website. (though the website part through Qwest has been flaky)   They continue to delight me with their service: "Do you have a substitute for the plastic bags covering the newly cleaned clothes?" (they do). "I lost some __, do you know where I can buy some in town?" "We have them, how many do you need?" All above and beyond!  The traffic flow in the area is tricky, suggest approaching them from Broadway and PSU.  Good service!
Finally, a non-threatening and reasonably priced Brazilian BBQ!  You have two options here: all-you-can-eat for $12 and change or pay by the pound.  The unlimited option was definitely the way to go.  Now, buffets can be tempting, but keep in mind that the best stuff comes right to your table ON A SWORD.  We filled up our plates with samplings from the buffet, from various salads (the potato salad was my favorite), rice and beans, and a gigantic french fry.  The fun begins when the skewers of meat begin to arrive, ranging from chicken wrapped in bacon to pork ribs, chicken sausage, and top sirloin.  There's a definite joy in grabbing the meat as it falls off from being cut and tasting as much as possible.    Be sure to pace yourself; this place is extremely laid back, there's no card to flip over to tell them to bring meat and they'll keep serving you for as long as you'd like.  A special bonus was the live music on Friday night -- a singer with a beautiful voice and a talented guitar player -- offering up traditional songs, as well as their gorgeous arrangements of pop songs like Rock with You, Come Away With Me, and Hotel California.  Highlight of the evening was absolutely Tears in Heaven.  There's ample parking behind the restaurant and it's located conveniently in downtown Everett.  The value is tremendous here for the amount of succulent meat and I've paid four times as much for less of an experience.  I will definitely be back.
I mostly eat here at lunch, for the tremendous buffet. I don't have another benchmark for Tibetan cuisine so my raking is based on the comparison to the other lunch staple in Central Square: the ubiquitous Indian buffets. I admit to a fanatical love of cilantro and it is featured in many of the dishes. The dumplings are my fav(Tsel Momo, Langsha Momo), and I always start with those. I also like the noodle dishes(Chow Chow). The vegetables are always fresh and crisp(Tsel Tomma, Tsel Tofu). I would recommend this place for vegetarian meals alone, but the beef(Langsha Tsel Nesom), pork(Phaksha Solo) and chicken(Chhasha Curry) dishes are very good too. If you like nan try the breads.
This place is amazing. From the staff, to the food, and the decor. Went during lunch and the food options are amazing. The bakery goods look so delicious. Order the artichoke eggs Benedict. Every bite was worth it. The wait staff is great. Very helpful and friendly. Worth the stop.
Precision Moving Company did an amazing job moving our belongings from Brookline to Cambridge last week. Jeff and Kevin showed up on time and did a one minute scan of our stuff, coming up with a mental plan for how to pack the truck in the most efficient way. They cleaned everything out in record time, and were flexible when we uncovered and threw some extra stuff at them at the last minute. The approach to our new apartment is challenging, with multiple sets of stairs and gravel to deal with. They handled these with ease. The trickiest part was our giant overstuffed leather couch which was actually bigger than the door or the stairway. Although they weren't 100% sure it would fit, they gave it a shot and through a series of clever maneuvers they got it up the stairs and into place. The best testament to their professionalism is that as they were headed back to the truck after spending 15 minutes muscling our couch up a pretty insane set of stairs, they weren't complaining, they were complimenting each other on a tough problem well solved. They obviously take pride in their work and we'll never use a different moving company again!
The staff is amazingly attentive and maybe just a bit overbearing. They earn commission so be prepared to be treated like royalty. Every staff member seem to know the people walking in, and remembers what colors they like, what type of shoes they prefer...etc.   The quality of Ferragamo is top-notch, paired with elegant design in handbags to shoes (super comfortable). The quality is certainly reflected in the price. Though I don't shop here often, I always feel like I'm in Handbag-Heaven when I walk in!   I wish Toronto had their own Ferragamo boutique shop, instead of just the varieties available at Holts. So, this place is a must visit when visiting Vancouver!
Went here with my family and friends (4 adults 2 young children). The hostess and waiter were incredibly accommodating and kind to us. The service was fantastic and the  food was delicious and fresh! We all had a special pesto linguini with seafood (lobster, jumbo shrimp, and scallops). It was out of this world!  We will definitely be coming back many times!! Totally recommend if you are looking for great food, great atmosphere, and amazing service!
we really enjoyed our tasty and cozy meal here.  We ordered three small plates: yak momo, calamari and green beans. All were lovely, and there was quite a bit left over for two of us. I also especially appreciate the very reasonable glasses of wine to enjoy along with the food.  Ambiance is cozy, quiet.  A great date night and some tasty treats (for those not familiar with Himalayan food, there is a bit of something for everyone, curries and things that sounds like what you might find at Indian restaurants, to other things that are quiet apart). We didnt try the green papaya salad on the menu but that also sounded yummy
JEREMY ROCKS!! I am completely bowled over that this rockin' haircut only cost $12. Went to Avenue Five for the first time after reading all these reviews. Had an appt with another stylist, but she was running late so I was put with JEREMY. Thank you, God! He is AMAZING and I'm thrilled to get in on the beginning of what will be his amazing career. He is an ARTIST. I brought pictures in to show him what I was going for, talked about how my thick straight hair lays flat on my head like a dead raccoon in the hot/humid summer, asked if he could please cut it (and show me how to style it) so that it doesn't do that. He did some amazing techniques (which my previous $90 stylist had never done), and my haircut is AMAZING. He explained everything, from how to blow dry to how to use the products to get the look I wanted. He was extremely professional, fun to talk to, and most importantly, extremely talented. He took his time to make my cut perfect (he says he's a little OCD, which I think is a good thing when it comes to haircuts) and while the cut took quite a while, it's PERFECT. My hair is adorable. I feel beautiful! Am going to take a picture today to post with this review.
Great comfortable place for wings and a beer. Staff is super friendly and the whole place has a good vibe. All walks of life are welcomed here and fit in seamlessly. Wish this chain existed in Cincy.
My husband and I were referred to Sean by a friend who used him as a realtor a few years ago. Sean really knows the Austin (and surrounding area) market and was able to give us great insight. He is very down to earth and told us his honest opinions, and he is super knowledgeable about what pitfalls to look for and if you need to worry about this or that. He really helped guide us through the process as first time homebuyers. He has great recommendations for Home Inspectors, repair guys, and mortgage lenders if you need it.
Best black 'n bleu cheese burger I ever did have! Cozy too!
Excellent view. Nice pub menu. The Cuban was excellent. You order at the bar and are given a buzzer to pick up your food. I like that they serve the food as it's ready, and do not wait for everything to be ready to call you up. The beer menu was extensive, but the tap water tasted funny. Stick with bottled water!
Best pedicure I've had in a very long time! Definitely going back. My manicurist took her time and gave me the royal treatment. I highly recommend.
Very profession insanely cheap compared to others I called and it didn't take very long. They actually wanted to help more than make money.
Super cute retro-chic sewing shop! It has a small but compelling selection of patterns, fabric and notions. Shopkeeper was nice and laid back, offered us hot tea. I wish I lived in the South End so I could take sewing classes here!
Went to Haru with a bunch of old and new friends last night. it was part of my "get me the f outta here" regimen. By soaking myself in sushi goodness, I might forget that I have to pack still, have 10,000 emails that piled up during my 5 days of death by powerpoint.  Anyway, the sushi here was tremendous. The edamame was HUGE but could have used a little more salt on the top and a little less on the bottom (suggesting that it sat f or a while?) but overall - the food here was fantastic.  We had a big party, split the tables and the other side had food coming all night long. We opted for a bit more conservative approach, ordering a big tray of about 5 rolls (including the Bostonian[?] - which was FANTASTIC). There really wasn't anything there that wasn't really quite delicious.  Try the Kiss of Fire - but I have to warn you, there's a fuse on that fire. It hits you about your third piece in...  The service was great. We ran that poor girl's legs completely off. But again, order a Diet Coke and you'll get "is Diet Pepsi ok?". My typical response is, "well, is paying in Chinese Yen ok?"... you get the idea.  All in all, good friends, good times, good sushi. A solid 4.
I can't thank Michael enough for his amazing service! I just moved back to the area and need a new stylist. I came in with *orange* hair, trying to lift from years of boxed black (I know, I know) after having been told by more than one stylist that I had to settle. My experience with Michael confirmed that sometimes other stylists don't have the interest or investment in their craft to actually be the creative artist that they signed up to be. Michael gave my hair the time and attention it has desperately needed for a long time, with a set of amazingly bright, light highlights, the kind my other stylists could not deliver. I also requested a challenging cut, going from kind of long blah to an "a line" bob which is also amazing. I am *really* happy with the outstanding, attentive service that I received and I am happy to have a stylist whose work I really love!
I went to comedor with my boyfriend for date night. I'm a huge fan of small plates, and comedor is the perfect place for a unique and eclectic blend. The food was DELICIOUS, but what was even more awesome was the ambiance. The place is small, dimly lit, but very lively. Tables were full, but we were able to immediately sit at the bar. I'm happy we did, because that's where all the magic happens! The chefs cook right behind the bar. Admittedly, I drooled the entire time while waiting for our food. They do give complimentary bread to start, so I didn't drool for too long. :-) Overall, this is a cozy spot for an intimate date night.
Consistently good mexican food. Not a super diverse menu, but not just a taco or burrito only menu either. Decent prices and friendly service.
Still a fan of the maki and the specials, but I've decided that everyone should pass on the margaritas.  I've tried several of their unique margaritas, which sound fun but taste awful.  I had the watermelon one last night and couldn't take more than 2 sips because it was so sour.  Stick with their beer or saki.
Stayed there for business the other day. Checked in Sunday night at the tail end of ACL. The staff was very attentive, and helpful. I use to live, and work in Hostels in different parts of the world, and in the U.S., and the Firehouse is a damn good one. The lounge on the first floor is a great little Austin haunt full of that famous Austin uniqueness that facilitates great adventures. The prices are really good considering the location, and the selection is also above average. Bathrooms very clean, and common areas are not neglected. People staying there are nice, and no donkeys that I could I see. A place that I will be going to again. Didn't wake up for the free breakfast, but I'm sure I'm not the first. Smelled good though.
I went with a group of 25 for a fun Sunday afternoon activity and we all had such a great time! Making reservations was easy and I love that they allow people to pay individually (which made planning so much easier) AND you can bring in your own food/drink!  We brought in pizzas from Dante's and they were nice enough to set up a small fold-out table to help keep us organized.  The staff were so kind and accommodating to our group - from explaining how the painting worked to answering questions and giving tips throughout our time there (ie. "You'll want another layer of paint on that") to engaging in fun conversation with people.  They let us stay longer than the 2-hour time frame and only asked to rearrange us a bit.  They had a great assortment of pieces to paint - from practical to decorative.  Price ranged from about $8-$30.  Stencils are also available for the artistically challenged!  All in all, a really fun activity and a great option if you're looking for a group activity. They were wonderful hosts and looked to please their patrons.  PS - You don't have to pay if you don't finish but can return at any time to complete it.
Fabulous!! We had dinner delivered, a gift for travelers!!! The food was incredible!! And the price was very reasonable! Thanks! And the service, the delivery man, SO nice!! The wait, was long, but worth it!!!
After hearing great things for months, I decided to finally try Bambolina only just a couple weeks ago but I've already been back several times. It's so good I just can't keep away! All of the pizzas are out of this world from the classic Margherita to The Farmers Market which is a pesto masterpiece topped with folded zucchini, chopped asparagus and snow peas and finished with a soft egg! My favorites though are the Sopressato and the Mushroom. The salads are delicious as well and very beautiful! My favorite appetizer is the Burrata Caprese which I think is best in town. I haven't tried any of the entrees or deserts yet but I may need to because I have yet to be disappointed.
We stopped by here on a Saturday night, and the place was full (small restaurant). Luckily, we made reservations and were seated right away. The place doesn't look like much from the outside (off the main No. 3 road area of Richmond), but the inside is nicely decorated. We ordered:  Salmon tartar ($9): this came in a martini glass with nori wrappers on the side. I liked the combination of the chopped salmon, salmon roe, avocado and mango in a soy dressing.  Black cod miso ($14): this was really good, not too overpowered by the miso, but the slice of black cod was pretty small. However, I would order it again since it tasted good.  Sushi set ($20): this came with a California roll and various pieces of sushi. They use real crab in the roll, and it tasted pretty good.  Assorted tempura dinner set $14): the tempura was nice and lightly fried. The dinner set came with miso soup, rice, sunonomo, and spinach.  We were getting full by this point, so we didn't order the famed crème brulee, so we'll have to make sure to save room for dessert next time. This is probably the best sushi restaurant that I have tried in the Richmond area: make reservations and try them out.
Enjoyed the food, just not so much the ordering style. Basically you order as if you are in a sushi joint. You check off what you'd like. But, there were quite a few options, more than I would like to see when I'm hungry.   With that said, the food was good, the server was very nice and helpful (albeit very quite/low voice), and I would definitely go back!
I'm giving this place a 3.75.  The only thing that wasn't too great was that if you left the window open it can be quite loud.  The inn is right beside the road and people may walk by throughout the night.  The room we had was on the lower floor and it was extremely clean and nice.  My experience here was quite interesting.  We woke up in the middle of the night to a lady that was drunk singing loudly.  A staff member came out and told her to stop singing and she simply replied, "Ok ok I'll go to sleep." and left.  Oddest thing ever!   The staff is friendly and there is complimentary coffee, tea and cocoa at the front desk.  The airport shuttle leaves every hour.
I found them with yelp when I was in search of Stone Vertical Epic 080808. This is a long story about their Staff and Service.  I had a very odd request- I just wanted to bottle (08/08/08 is my anniversary). I was so happy I found a place that still had this beer. I was even more ecstatic that they were so willing to help me get it. However, they couldn't ship it to CA with the beer. ( I wanted the bottle more than the beer) After many calls back and forth- I awaited an email to complete the transaction/arrangement. Just when I was about to call again and check up again on the bottle- there it was IN THE MAIL!!!!  When we end up in MA- WE will come by and buy the crew drinks =)  Super helpful! Great communication! There should be more business like this one!
We recently moved & started using their delivery service.  Has been great!!! With two young kids (both under 3), it's just so much easier to have the clothes come to me.  Everything comes back clean & ironed perfectly.
I've used BungoBox for 3 moves now, once for an office move and twice for personal moves, and it is a game-changer. It's a huge upgrade to go from spending piles of money on flimsy cardboard boxes that you're just going to throw away as soon as you move to using super sturdy reusable plastic crates that get delivered to your door and picked up at your new place after your move! Your movers (or the friends helping you move) will thank you too because  the BungoBoxes have strong handles and included rollers that make them a breeze to move. Two weeks is the standard rental term and it worked perfectly for me... I scheduled it so I had more time to pack than to unpack and the boxes having a firm return date provided great motivation to get unpacked once I got to my new place. On top of it all, the BungoBox employees are amazingly nice and helpful. I recommend using BungoBox to everyone I know! Try it once and you'll be a convert too!
I absolutely love this restaurant. I've been coming to Brasserie for a few years now, and have had the chance to visit for brunch, lunch and dinner (and have enjoyed several of their desserts as well!).   When my family visit, especially if it's for a special occasion, this is our go-to place to celebrate. Their bloody mary's in the morning go great with all of their brunch items: from the Simple Salad, to the Bordeaux Scramble and beyond. My husband goes crazy for the Croque Madame - he's had it at other places in Vegas and even Paris, and still feels they couldn't touch the one served here!   All of their salads, les frites, les moules au pistou, le saumon, I could go on and on. I've never been disappointed here - everything is absolutely delicious. Their daily specials are always a delight as well! Don't forget to try one of their cocktails or have a glass of wine off of their great list.   Bon appetit!
LOVE THIS PLACE!! A true Foodie Favorite!!!!Always creative, always consistent! Great food indeed!! The only reason I gave it 4 stars and not 5 is because of the servers. Some servers are very knowledgable and helpful about the ever changing menu items, while others are lacking and not service oriented. I know good help is hard to find, but this is something they can work on to help with the dining experience. Despite that minor tweak, LOVE this place!!!!
This place is great! A very basic menu, which makes sense considering they started out as a good truck. I got the veggie burger because the description sounded unique- and it did not disappoint! The fries were hot, salty and delicious, and I enjoyed dipping them in the ketchup, which almost tasted like it had some BBQ sauce mixed into it! I was tempted by the milkshake menu, but saved my dessert splurge for another place. Super easy to just sit at the counter and get served, even on a crazy Saturday night in summer when Ponce City Market was packed.
We were so pleased with everything here.  The reception was pleasant, and the drink list was appealing.  Most importantly, the menu was appetizing and everything we got exceeded our expectations.  The gouda appetizer was a revelation.  The beef skewers appetizer and the lamb picadillo were both amazing!  We can't wait to come back.  The service was incredibly pleasant. If we hadn't been so full, we would have tried the dessert.  I think this place was a winner, can't understand why it wasn't more crowded.
As many people before have said I shall too say these are some of the best Persian kabobs you can get in the city! Truly juicy koobideh. The owner is so humble and says "oh I just thought I would try cooking for more than my family" but I can't imagine him not having thought that because where would we downtown Portlander's be without his delicious Persian food?!?!  He gives you healthy portion, accepts credit cards or cash and conveniently stays open until 4 o'clock which is later than a lot of the other food carts in the area.    It's quickly become such a downtown staple. Plus the owner is so adorable and lovable that he was even featured in a local commercial, that's pretty cool.
I've been in Austin for two years and at some point I met total despair that I'd never find a bar that comes close to bars is Beirut. I wanted a place that played good music - not so loud that your head hurt and your vocal cords strained - an outdoor seating area, and obviously well priced, generous drinks. After I went to Mohawk the first time a few weeks back (to watch Yann Tiersen play!) I haven't stopped raving about the place. It's my new favorite bar in Austin and it definitely exceeded my expectations. There're three decks outside, equipped with an outdoor bar to keep traffic from building up at the indoor bar, which is brilliant for show nights when it gets crowded. I definitely plan to make regular visits down there now that summer vacation's begun!
Simple menu, reasonable prices.  Delicious bacon, and the banana pancakes are awesome too. It's a great go-to breakfast/brunch joint with the kind of atmosphere you appreciate on a very lazy Sunday morning.   Simple, straight forward breakfast option for anyone who lives in the area. I'll be back.
Overall I had a good experience at Empire.  I came here on a Wednesday for a drink with some friends.  The hostess and server were both quite nice and service overall was spot on (checked in on just often enough).  The drinks were creative and got some good reviews and my scotch was neat!
Clean, comfortable hotel, with good breakfast buffet included. Convenient to the airport, Florida Realtors, and Semoran. Good value for the price. Spacious lobby, and they provide "snack" bags at the front desk with fruit and a granola bar or cookie. At time of this stay major road work was being done on TG Lee & other side streets.
At at this place for the first time today. I was in early. Coffee was perked...and tasty. Breakfast was very good. Had standard... eggs, bacon, hash browns and French toast.  With coffee, still less than $10.  Staff was attentive even though they were busy.  Coffee never ran out on me.  My friend had the eggs Benedict. Well done, particularly for a diner. Hollandaise was homemade...not Sysco.  Looking forward to going back.  If u are at a swim meet at Harvard U...park the car and walk here...5 minutes away.
Got a medium birthday cake with vanilla ice cream and devoured it. Could've eaten a large it was so good. Tried Mango too and it was awesome. Reminds me of Jerry's in Memphis. Definitely going to come back here every time I visit Austin.
Great stay. Very clean and friendly staff. Love the tv in the bathroom mirror.   The rooms are spacious,  the only negative is that their hallways are not decorated.  Makes it feel not fancy as the rest of the place.
Great burgers and vibes. The staff is always friendly and ready to assist however they can. The food is the real star of this place. I've thoroughly enjoyed the Lamb burger and the ribs so if you'd like some great flavor start there.
After reading the reviews, I was worried to use this office. I almost called my doctor and asked her to switch me elsewhere. I am SO glad, however, that I decided to give this location a try. The office took me a bit to find (inaccurate navigation system), but once I noticed that the clinic was in the Westover Shopping Center, it was easy peasy. If you like *clean* parking lots, *clean* clinics, and *clean* enjoyable areas, I suggest giving this location a try.   The staff was kind and helpful, as well as willing to answer my quick questions about the bloodwork. I showed up as a walk-in and was in and out within 20 minutes. The phlebotomist who took my blood samples was professional, quick, accurate, and curteous.   In order to keep my wait time down (being a walk-in), I got there as close to opening as possible. From there, the 15-minute wait was no issue whatsoever.   Lastly, there's a Pharmaca in the same shopping center if you need to fill a prescription or would like to browse a decent selection of natural/organic/non-GMO/etc. supplements and toiletries.
Delish.  The only downside is that it is downtown. ;)   If I didn't hate to be around people so much, I'd definitely be back - regularly.   Spot on chicken deliciousness.   It (dare I say it?) may be better than Lucy's. (Shhh don't tell on me!).
What an awesome job Justin did on our garage cabinets and master bedroom cabinets.  He is meticulous.  The design and installation went without a flaw. He is a man of his word as well.  He had to return to replace a defective part and did so the next day.  We live in Scio, an hour or more away from his location. Didn't matter.  He returned on time with the part and completed the job.  Justin doesn't rush his work.  He was here longer than he expected, due to the removal of some old cabinets, and never complained, never gave us an attitude, always did more than expected.  You will not be disappointed.  His work, professionalism and expertise is outstanding.  We are very happy and can't say enough.
Wow, i finally get to go to one of my favorite bbq places from ohio, but here in Atlanta! There pork is always  juicy and the brisket(rare in Georgia) ia always good too. Be sure to ask for a free side of bark, if you like the burnt crusty outside of the meat.
Affordable prices and really good food!! What else can I ask more?? Even tho I saw one guy taking care of the tables (it was lunch time so it was kind of busy) he came often to ask if I wanted something else and how I was doing.. Service is rely good he even recommended a desert.. Going back for sure and bringing some friends!!  I highly recommend this place.. Do yourself a favor and check it out.. I had Lomo saltado Btw..
IMPRESSED!! What a neat experience, easy to work and communicate with. Here's what takes the cake in the honesty/integrity dept.  Brought my truck in with a starting problem, left it with them and said if it's $300.00 or less just fix it otherwise call me..... They called 30 min later to say everything is fine and it's ready to go, just a quick adjustment.  :))))) I might be still writing a 5 star review had they done whatever and charged me $299.00 I was expecting to pay at least that.  So in my book that in itself deserves loyalty to which this mechanic has from me. THANK YOU!!!!!
This is definitely a unique restaurant! We were here on a Friday night and were surprised to find people literally dancing on their tables with a DJ playing a mix of dance music and what I imagine was Greek pop music. The atmosphere was very loud but overall the food was great and the service was excellent. Worth checking out!
I really like all of the Buckhead life restaurants. When you go to one you know you will get a consistently good experience. Their "summer dine around" program is ingenious. Great marketing - give the person who thought of it a raise. It keeps me in their restaurants once a month and I spend a lot of $$$$ each time.   At kyma we started with the grilled octopus and all the reviews are true - it's awesome. So tender. Calamari was good too but grilled octopus is still my favorite.   For dinner I had the sea bream. Excellent. With white bean salad (I recommend). Eggplant side was also great.   For dessert I had the chocolate lava cake with warm sauce inside. If you love chocolate, get this. It was great. I had the 'nut' ice cream. Forgot exact name. It was just ok. My friends ice cream was creamier and better. The nuts made it too lumpy. Wasn't too bad - I still ate it. Hehe
I think they opened one month ago (July 2014). Excellent Lebanese food at very reasonable prices. Not a fancy place, simple. If you want fancy, go to Al-Wadi, but you will pay double the price for food that you can get here. Easy to get to from Dedham and Rt. 1. Very good!
Dr. Sabrina Marcus is caring, intuitive, passionate and competent. I see her for general health maintenance and upkeep and I send my clients her way as well. She gets right in there and works things out so I can leave feeling better and more relaxed. I recommend you see her, you won't be disappointed!
I was having a problem with a plug receptacle I had just replaced tripping the breaker so I figured it's time to call the electrician. I called and the technician I spoke to actually helped me troubleshoot the problem over the phone and saved me a trip charge that would have taken him 5 minutes to do and saved me the 1 hour minimum. THANK YOU for being honest and not taking advantage of do it yourselfers!!!!
I finally decided to treat myself to some skivvies that were not made in Sri Lanka, Macau, or other places unknown.  The shop is nicely organized, and the lady working there was very friendly without crossing over into a hard sell.  They have a wonderful selection of all sizes/shapes/colors/styles of bras & panties made in Italy, Belgium and France.  I knew the prices were going to be high before I set foot in the store (based on the lingerie lines they carry & other yelp reviews).  I have a weakness for matching bra/underwear sets and they had a lot of those both in stock - and what they don't have they can order.  If you have something ordered, they can have it there within a week - pretty speedy turnaround.  I'll be back to pick up the lacy bits I ordered - and then I can see making regular trips here to see what's new in stock!
This is a pretty cool, newer trailer on North Loop right before it merges into the asphalt of Airport Boulevard. You might be tired of fusion tacos, but this is still worth a visit. I've had: - The Texican. Fried chicken and avocado, pretty good.  - The Baja Fry. Tilapia and avocado, an excellent taco even with with Quality Seafood's offerings looming just down the street. - The Pineapple Pork. Pork carnitas and pineapple with scallions, also pretty good. - The Kim Lee BBQ. Korean BBQ pork with kimchi and scallions, on 2 toasted Hawaiian sweet rolls. This was amazing, a perfect blend of sweetness from the rolls and savory from everything else. It was like the ultimate stoner food (not a bad consideration keeping in mind the neighborhood around it, especially considering that they apparently deliver nearby until 10pm most nights. Hmm....).  Most tacos are $3.75, with the exception of the larger items like the Kim Lee, which is $5.75 and deserves every penny of its price tag. This trailer seems to prefer corn tortillas for the tacos, which is fine with me. Next time I'll probably check out the Mexican Bun Dog, which puts sausage and bacon on the Hawaiian sweet rolls, and sounds too good to pass up.
As a Nepali person, I get asked the difference between Nepali and Indian food a lot. It is a subtle difference for the most part, but as a native or an enthusiast, not a very difficult one to grasp. Something to keep in mind is the geographic diversity of Nepal, it deserve a write up, that I my not be entirely ready for just now.   Traditionally, Nepali food is less intense in terms of spices and sweetness. A lot of "Nepali" restaurants actually try to imitate Indian food to cater to a larger clientele. Honestly, I believe this is where most Nepali restaurants fail to deliver.   Tibetan/Himalayan,  Newari,  Indian/Madeshi  alongwith regional fares (I would be hard press to express this entirely) is what makes Nepali food. The curries, dumplings and noodles are all there, but they are different. This restaurant does it the best in Boston area.
Server was absolutely amazing tonight. Food and drink was amazing. Outshined our lousy shitty dinner at Bar Louie.
SiP is one of my favorite spots in Boulder. The owners are two of the friendliest people I've ever met and the service couldn't be better. It's a great spot to stop and have a coffee or drink with friends. The flatbread pizzas are fantastic as well! SiP has a fun, laid back atmosphere that is perfect for just about every occasion. I highly recommend to anyone nearby!
I had the pan friend noodles with beef today for lunch. The noodles are made in house and are so delicious! $7.95 special for lunch and you get a huge bowl of noodles. Give this place a try. You won't be disappointed!
I absolutely adore Fishbones!  I haven't eaten at the tourist I-Drive location, but I've heard it sucks compared to the Lake Mary location.  Everything here is excellent and it had some of the freshest seafood available.  The sushi is pretty awesome, but I definitely suggest trying their oyster sampler appetizer.  My favorite entree is the seared Ahi tuna.  But definitely check out their daily specials.  Sometimes they get in gigantic stone crab claws.  The wine selection is great and they poor stiff drinks.  Always a plus.  The food is pricey but it's excellent as well as the service.   The decor is great too.  My favorite is the outdoor patio and the bar that's plastered with oyster shells.
Wow loved the food here! The spring rolls were divine. The raspberry lychee drink was sweet and flavorful. The Vietnamese eggplant was delightful. Very lively friendly environment. The waitress was knowledgeable and helpful. Definitely visit again.
They are great ! They have everything you can think of. They always give the kids free hot dogs. They are well priced and I always get the family pack bundles. They not only have friendly workers they work hard to get everyone in and out with a smile and a speedy pace. On another note it smells AMAZING inside.
Wine tastings have a lot of sweet white and reds.  I wish they had more dry options but overall this place is awesome for drinks, apps, and full courses.  I havent had dessert just yet but that just gives me another excuse to go back :).
This is my "go to" nail salon.  I get a pedicure and powder nails there once a month, and I am very pleased with them.  The salon is always noticeably clean & pleasant.  The service is great!  They always offer you a drink, and they are sweet gentle people!  Also get a brow wax there occasionally, and take my teen there for a brow wax once in a while. I have used many nail salons locally in South Austin, and this is my favorite and has been for a year or so.  I appreciate the gentleness!  It helps to tell them what you want early on, as is the case any where.
My favorite bar in Columbus.  A friend recently reminded me of how it used to smell on our walk home from class (like the aftermath of a big house party) and it made me really sad and nostalgic.  It's great when it's crowded in the spring and everyone is packed into the back patio, and it's great at slower times when you can sprawl out with pitchers and chat with friends.  It's fun to shoot pool upstairs even when the tables eat your money.  I don't remember them ever having much exciting on tap, but I could always get something that I wanted in a bottle.  There's pizza right next door.  It's chill and comfortable.  Crown jewel of the college life.
I used Precision through my insurance for windshield replacement.Andrew was still quick, friendly and communicative. I was given a four-hour window for the replacement, and Precision showed up only 90 minutes into that block. If I ever need another windshield replacement, this will be my preferred go-to.
I came here after a bruins game, loved it. Poutine is one of my all time favorite foods and this is the best I have had in Boston. They have a decent beer selection as well. Only complaint would have been the poutine could have used a little more gravy, was dry once I got to the bottom.
Mike was recommended by our agent and did not disappoint. He was professional, timely and very knowledgeable. I would recommend him to anyone in need of a home inspector!
Try the grilled tips, turkey or steak. The char on them is awesome. The wings are better than average and the service is top notch.
My husband is from Bolivia - and needless to say - he doesn't get very many opportunities to have the food he grew up on here in Boston.  We've found a few places here and there ... a place in San Francisco (which has since closed down) and a good place in Miami - but we had pretty much given up hope around here.    Enter (of all places...) Que Padre.  When I first told him that it opened and that they had bolivian food he laughed because he thought I was kidding ("A Mexican place.... reallyy??).... But we went and met the owner and then downed a good 7-9 beef saltenas hot and fresh out of the oven.  I'm no expert - but I think they're the best ones I've ever had... but the honey was so happy... and for that alone - we will be back many many more times.    Perfect crust.  So hot and juicy.  A little hot sauce... and magic happens.  :)
By popular demand and (for science!) my beer list, I made a special visit to Grape Vine Market today.  I must say, I was by no means disappointed in what they had to offer!  Thanks for the suggestions, everyone!  One of the first things I noticed upon perusing the beer selection is the availability of Real Ale Fireman's #4 in bottles.  Whoo hoo!  Real Ale has only recently began to bottle this fabulous, light beer...one of my Austin favs.  The beer variety is phenomenal, I was astounded, almost to the point of tears upon exploring the aisle.  The beers are arranged by location, it seems.  There's an Austin/Texas area, moving into a US microbrew-ish area.  Across the aisle are the imports from Italy, Canada, Holland, Germany, and the like.  The Asian beers were off in another aisle, across from the oh-so-yucky Anheiser-Busch products and the like.  There was also a somewhat impressive selection of Mexican beers.  I was overwhelmed by the wine selections.  They have everything that your oenophile heart could ever desire.  Since I was looking for nothing specific, I had no reason to ask help of any of the associates.  Come to think of it, I didn't really see any associates, save for the registers and at the deli.  There is also a section of finer foods and libation accessories.  Briefly looking through them, I was impressed by the wine selection of wine racks (I wish I would've known about this place when I bought mine) and candies.  Yum!    Unfortunately, but my liver probably thanks me, I was financially unable to purchase anything.  I will definately be back soon, perhaps even the day I get paid next!
I moved to the Pearl about 2 months ago and I love living at the Louisa.  I can walk to work and everywhere else I need to go.  I didn't even bring a car up from Arizona. The concierge desk/doorman makes living and being on the go super convenient -- and Whole Foods is right next door.
This place is great! The coffee is strong, the owner is friendly, and the decor is really cute. So glad I found it!
Stay at Drury Inn whenever I can. The place is spotless. I read the review about the maid service and all I can say is they weren't at any Drury I have ever stayed at. I judge hotels by their guest bathrooms. You know those by the dining room. You can eat off the floor in these. That's just a comment, I wouldn't eat off the floor, but they serve breakfast, dinner and drinks!  Parking is free and the staff was wonderful. I really don't know what bad to say except...  Here goes...NO USB ports in the rooms!  A millennial nightmare. Course, I'm not a millennial, but those little plugs would top off an otherwise perfect experience.   When you have an Iphone, an Iwatch and a Macbook, cords can begin to get you down..  Would it cause me to rate it one drop lower...not a chance.
I'm not a huge fan of chains but I actually enjoy this one. The salad selection is always fresh and sometimes new.   (I did finally have to admit I don't care for quinoa after this visit but it was of no fault of the restaurant.) Each time I've been in the staff and been very friendly and helpful. I try to make it here at least once a month.
Good experience at Barista: nice ambiance, good service. However, the coffee was a bit underwhelming and in my opinion a bit overpriced for the quality.
The food is amazing. Try the mixed grill with the yogurt garlic sauce. And you must get the hot puffed bread and hummus. We always have great food when we eat here and even though we live in Sarasota, we always make a point to eat here when we're in town.   I gave 4 stars because everything is great, food and service, but the restaurant really needs to be dusted. The dusty mirror and shelves were in great need of a thorough cleaning.
In the crazy weather of today (lower 50's with wind and rain), omg... This stuff definitely hit the spot. =)  It was amazing... and i always forget how much i can actually eat until I come here.  YUM!  It's only a bit expensive for my taste... however, it was worth every single penny, especially on a day like today.
The dance floor is kind of small, but this place is great to go to if you feel like getting a little dressed up and mingling with good looking people.  Sometimes the DJ spins house, which is the best.
Tuesday morning was pretty cool went shopping with a friend there's not very many items of the same choice that you want so if you see something you want you better grab it you better buy it. especially if there's a markdown price or it's on sale.  last week I got a killer deal on some glitter glue for our project I've been working on. Only paid 74 cents each and they were larger than normal size bottles
I'd heard of Warby Parker and liked the frame options and price point, but I'd never seen one of their stores and I didn't think it would go so well to order glasses purely online. (OK, to tell you the truth it seemed like a hassle to be sent sample frames, send them back etc.) But while on vacation in Austin 2 weeks ago, I noticed this huge Warby Parker store downtown and figured it couldn't hurt to see if I could at least pick out frames there and then order online. Well, turns out it was MUCH easier than that; in fact, I never had to go online at all! I picked out beautiful trendy frames and a salesperson measured my face in about 5 seconds using this thing that looks like a simple cardboard box. When I told her that my prescription was pretty strong (around a -5.5), they said no problem. They took my optometrist's phone number, swiped my card, got my email address and -POOF- the next day I got an email saying they'd gotten my prescription from the optometrist. One week later, my gorgeous new glasses came in the mail! Please understand that I know what good glasses are and how they should fit. I've been in glasses forever and have bought just about every designer at one point or another. And these really are GREAT glasses. I was skeptical at best, I mean I'm used to spending 400-500 bucks on new glasses, and these were only 125. But they are made beautifully. And they fit PERFECTLY, and they don't even fog in the cold. I even went running in them this morning. So comfortable! I'm truly thrilled with the service I received at this store, their attention to the nuances of fit, and with the company in general. They make a wonderful product at a great price, and they're charitable to boot. What else can you ask for?!
Great quick service despite the fact that every table was full, some with large groups.  Huge portions, so be prepared to eat! Really good food, good coffee. Hash browns are really crispy on top, just the way I like them.
I'm giving this 5 stars based on the fact that they do what they do very well. They have a lean toward punk. Pop, grind, thrash, classic, etc... They have a very solid stock of the genre, and a VERY friendly and knowledgeable. Also the pricing hasn't seemed to all be eBay checked.   They also seem to stock the recent releases from most noise, art, and indy genres. Mostly Midheaven/Revolver distro type stuff it seems.  The reason why this place makes my list though is that there is a small section of used stock up the stairs; as I'm not really looking for punk records most of the time. The selection is random as hell, but updated frequently. I have found some GREAT used things here (Barton Smith 1 & 2, Tree People, Amon Duul, etc..).   One of those spots that takes frequent stops to pay off, but it's got a great vibe to it.  And I love to support these folks, as they seem like great folks.
Phenomenal German cuisine! Best German food in central Florida hands down. Try the German potato salad. You will not regret it.
Phenomenal, is the only word I can use to describe the food here. The ambiance, decor, beer and even service could be at its bottom and I would still drive through a Zombie Apocalypse to get here. However, everything is at epic proportions. Why is there not a line out the door at all times? I thank everyone's hard work in making this one of my favourite restaurants I have been to. If you have not been here you must, the culinary expertise and beer mastery is a thing of beauty.
I HAD ZERO CLUE!!! OMG!!! I could only fit in a 30 minute deep tissue.  I walked in crooked, and walked out STRAIGHT as an arrow.  The tiny little thing jumped on the table and used her knees to unravel my lower back and hips - GET OUT OF TOWN.  I was skeptical, but walked out a believer.
Wanted to check out this establishment last Friday afternoon,  as I live fairly close in Medford and it had descent reviews. Well I was quite pleased! Loved the variations on menu, prices were reasonable, food was tasty! They were very kid friendly as I was with my active 2 year old it helps they have TVS by each booth. The ambiance very cool and sophisticated yet comfy. Bar scene was seemed fun professional and locals that were friendly having great time. We truly enjoyed our food. Loved the pulled pork sandwich and the nachos were fabulous! Will definitely come back! Our server Mark and the rest of the staff worked well together as a team! Thank you for a great time!
For my 900th review - Damien S.' review brought this spot onto my radar several months ago, but I'm not from the neighborhood, so I bookmarked it for the future.  The future came, but we were relaxing on Nantasket beach just beyond the Nantasket Beach Resort, a bit over 1/2 a mile away.  Fortunately a friend was still on the way, and accepted our telephoned request to please pick up some food on her way over.  Marvel's Lunch Box accepts credit cards, which was great since I figured our friend would not have enough cash on hand to pay for our order.  When she arrived with two bags in hand, we took account, and discovered that the fried clams were sadly MIA.  She headed right back, got the clams, an apology, and a two courtesy bowls of soups for our trouble.  For herself, she got the Crab Roll $13.95 - Sweet lump and back fin meat, lightly dressed with mayonnaise, a touch of diced celery, and a subtle spice blend, placed on a bed of romaine lettuce, and served on a toasted brioche roll / includes coleslaw.  The portion of meat was okay, and the meat fresh, but she felt the bread to meat ratio was just too high and the bun quite filling.  The rest of us shared two ¼ Lb Lobster Roll $18.95 (Made to order, select claw and knuckle meat, lightly dressed with mayonnaise, a touch of diced celery, and a subtle spice blend, placed on a bed of romaine lettuce, and served on a toasted brioche roll / includes coleslaw.), the Pint Ipswich Clams $17.95 (Sweet small-bellied clams prepared in our house batter / includes tartar sauce and lemon.) and a large order of Onion Rings $5.50.  I liked the onion rings because the crisp batter enclosed thick rings of onions, and the whole fried clams had a satisfying crispness as well, though they were not the best of the season for me, as that accolade went to a spot up in Maine and has yet to be dethroned.  The lobster roll was too light on the lobster for the price, but the beautiful brioche roll was generously buttered and toasted quite well.  Too much grease for the health conscious, but go big or go home!  We enjoyed the clam chowder - both the surprise and the taste of it - and were pleased to find corn kernels amidst the clams and the potato cubes.  The other soup looked like minestrone till we discovered a slice of kielbasa here and an oyster there.  Good, but my preference was towards the chowder.  Though we ordered 4 items, they gave us 5 cole slaws so we could each have one, and we shared the 3 tartar sauces, which was plenty for the job.  They were generous with wet naps and packaged salt and pepper, and we had enough utensils.  3.5 stars, rounded up for their making amends.  They are open daily, and close at 8pm.
Great food and service. Had the lobster and wife had the scallops. Both were very delicious. The dessert was the banana foster which was outstanding.  Our sides were spinach and broccoli which was ok. Hard to give 5 stars but really great.
I really wanted to give this place five stars, but coming on a  Wednesday night and the place being empty, I was hoping that the girl behind the counter would explain the process a little better.  Aside from this awkward encounter, the ice cream and taiyaki were absolutely delicious! I got the almond ice cream made with whole milk and nutella taiyaki. My boyfriend got the bavarian creme with banana ice cream also made with whole milk. Wow. The flavors were unbelievable! Definitely a must try! I really hope this place stays since it's right across from my house!  They also do a deal Thursday-Sunday for 15% off your ice cream if you went to the movies beforehand and have a ticket stub. Cute date night idea!
This place is really good. Service was fast and efficient. No people screaming from the back which made our dine in experience even better. The food was delicious and the prices were favorable. I would definitely recommend the sesame chicken and orange chicken when they have it.  The inside of the restraunt was very calm, well lit and clean. Give these guys a visit.
Been eating here since it opened. The thrill is now gone but the food is still good and very affordable. Like that I can hit Lee's and Com in one trip for a great selection of international treats.
The only problem with Flip Burger Boutique is that Richard Blais isn't cooking your burger.  I have no doubt if he or someone with a similar skill set was in the kitchen, Flip Burger would be 5 stars.  You are giving 5 star ingredients to a burger flipper, which isn't quite going to cut it.  We started off with the poutine appetizer.  Poutine is popping up everywhere lately.  This version was underwhelming.  There really wasn't any meat in this dish.  The fries are cooked in beef fat and the gravy is chorizo based, but I couldn't find much chorizo in it.  It should also have cheese curds, but those were absent as well.  What we had here was a savory creamy sauce poured over french fries, topped with two fried eggs.  Unfortunately the egg whites were still runny, which I'm not a fan of.  It's amazing that it's so hard for a cook to get the yolks runny and the whites cooked.  There was plenty of fries so my buddy and I kind of just left the ones that were touched by the clear uncooked egg white.  2 stars  http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/flip-burger-boutique-atlanta?select=nxZc_vqqUeAxzWFcWMhzXQ  I was very excited to try a Milkshake here, specifically the Krispy Kreme shake.  I don't know if they blend up an whole Krispy Kreme glazed donut in there, but it sure tasted exactly like drinking one.  It was delicious.  My only disappointment was at the use of the liquid nitrogen.  Of course if you've watched Richard Blais on Top Chef, you know he enjoys using it.  So these shakes have Liquid Nitrogen added to them.  Unfortunately this molecular gastronomy technique was left to our server/ hostess.  It consisted of her pouring a little bit of liquid nitrogen over the top of the milkshake, which made it smoke a little bit.  This can't be what Blais intends here, as it added nothing but a little flair.  I've had ice cream blasted with liquid nitrogen before and it's usually used to get a crunchy outer shell, which would have offered an interesting texture.  It also can be added to the process of making ice cream which lends itself to smaller crystals, thus giving it a smoother texture.  This was a pretty smooth creamy shake, so perhaps that's what's going on here.  The top of my shake that had the liquid nitrogen poured on it was a goopy mess.  4 stars  http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/flip-burger-boutique-atlanta?select=V7XgrE_YOV-BkIJe2xLdXg  As for the burger, I went with the Earth & Turf Burger.  This patty is a blend of ground beef and ground mushrooms, and I loved the blend.  It was topped with caramelized onions, sautéed mushrooms, gruyere cheese, pickles, and a delicious mushroom mayo.  Lots of little chopped up pieces of mushrooms were mixed in with the mayo.  If you love mushrooms, this is your burger.  I ordered it medium rare.  From the first bite, I thought this is a 5 star burger and outstanding.  Unfortunately the burger flipper, didn't give me a medium rare burger, or even a medium burger.  It was closer to medium well, and fully cooked all the way through.  Now the quality of the beef saved it.  It was still very juicy and I enjoyed every bite.  However, the burger flipper's job is to do one thing, and that's pretty much cook a burger correctly.  A real chef wouldn't have messed that up.  Even still I'm giving this burger 4.5 stars.  http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/flip-burger-boutique-atlanta?select=YAVwD_oolsY8kSVS4LAnhQ  My buddy also enjoyed his burger, but it was also medium well, rather than the medium rare he ordered.  We were the first diners of the day and ours were the only burgers the cook had to pay attention to, so it's not like he lost track of them.  Oh well, that's the problem with a chain style restaurant where the Top Chef is absent.  And lack of execution keeps Flip Burger from getting 5 stars from me.  But I'll be happy to eat that over cooked mushroom burger anytime.  *Also of note, they say they are open until 11pm, but we were turned away at 10:45 pm, which we weren't too happy about.  If you don't want to take customers up until your closing time, then change your closing time to when you do want to take them.  10:30 or whatever.  But to turn someone away while you are technically still open, only ticks off the customer.  We almost didn't return the next day after being treated like that.  Most people wouldn't have.
I ate there on a Wednesday for lunch. I had the Miso soup, which was excellent. I had the Japanese Bento Box "Chilean Bass". Every component was perfectly prepared. The service was quick and friendly. Our waitress was excellent. I would definitely visit this restaurant again.
Consistently my favorite place in Vancouver for breakfast. The prices are great and the portions are intense. Always busy, but never the ridiculous waits you get for popular breakfast places in Portland.
Brunch here has some really deliciously overwhelming and satisfying options.  This is one of those places that has so much great stuff, and varying menus for brunch, lunch and dinner, that I just couldn't decide on when to come and what to get. I eventually went for the awesome looking brunch menu and ordered way too much for two people:  - Pulled Pork Corn Muffin ($6) This is listed under sides, but it came out first and was a really delicious start to the meal. It's less like a corn muffin, and more like just a ton of pork with some guacamole on delicious bread.  - Sunrise Poutine ($15) I told myself that this was a starter, so I wouldn't feel horrendous for ordering three entrees. This is way more than an appetizer and is a meal on its own. This consists of a hot pile of fries covered in scrambled eggs, gravy, cheese curds and Canadian bacon. I often regret ordering poutine when I'm left with half a plate of pure mush and sogginess, but that was not the case here at all - this was some of the best poutine I've ever had, as the fries remained super crispy throughout and were incredibly good combined with the salty Canadian bacon and the fluffy eggs.  - Sunnyside Burger ($15) As if we didn't get enough bacon, egg and cheese with the poutine, we also had this excellent burger with plenty more of the same piled on top of it. This was a really outstanding burger. The sunnyside egg on top was nice and runny and was just perfect with the bacon and American cheese.  - Southern Belle French Toast ($12) Another really excellent choice, this french toast came with two huge, juicy chicken breasts on top of it. The jalapeno jelly was a little strange, but aside from that, the chicken and french toast combo was just as good, if not better than the standard chicken and waffles.  It's a pretty hipstery crowd with hipstery, slightly lazy service. It's a fun, energetic atmosphere though, which combined with all that delicious  food makes you look past these slight flaws and yearn to return to try more great stuff.
This a great hidden gem in Kerrsdale  That amazing speciality rolls and one of my favourite sushi places in town and ice tried alms or every place   Must haves are   Red and white tuna stack with quail egg on top Sesame crusted tuna steak House special sumo mono    One thing like most Japanese run places in town the the service is slow - no idea why but Japanese run small sushi places the waitresses  are so slow a  But the food is worth coming here for sure and worth the absent minded Japanese waitresses m  The chef here is one of the best sushi chefs in town  A must place for any sushi lover
**Update - this place is closed now - bummer.  Dinner - 3/5/16  Had dinner at the Chef's "table" - A bar that over looks the kitchen and a great place to see them work.  Like the one at Emmer and Rye.  Very good service and they selected a good wine to go with the food.  Food - We stayed away from mammal food and decided on veggies and seafood. - Potato Puffs were as good as advertised - Anything on the open fire wood grill is solid - we had Broccolini and Shrimp - Risotto was the star  They have Valet parking and the company which they outsource to is top notch.  Very professional.  Only draw back was the dessert which was just ok compared to the rest.  Tip - make reservations - the room is not very big and the bar is reserved as well for seating for dinner - when we went it was a three hour wait to eat at the bar.  You also cannot walk up and order a drink at the bar since it is reserved for seating.
Really really good restaurant in many different aspects. Have now been there twice, first time for beer and apps, second time with coworkers for a full dinner and beers.  The beers are beyond good, their IPA is fantastic and one of the best IPAs around. First time I was there, they had Bodhi, and Bodhi is my favorite IPA...period. Also, they have a great selection of guest taps, which it seems they are very picky about, and they pull together some great other Ohio brews.  Ordered the Beer battered Asparagus as an appetizer, and Buffalo BBQ Chicken sandwich with garlic fries and extra side of fried plantains. Well, it was all absolutely fantastic. The appetizer was very enjoyable, my only complaint is that the asparagus would pull out of the breading fairly easily. The sandwich was absolutely perfect, the fries were amazing and the fried plantains were just icing on the cake. I think I will be ordering this combo again and again. This restaurant surprised me greatly and will be returning soon.
I'm always down to try out a new taco place, and I was feeling adventurous ,so I went on fellow yelpers to see what taco shop I haven't tried,saw cilantro on few reviews ,and here iam,I'm  usually more impressed with the hole in the wall authentic taqueria.... The location definitely fits the bill, I think this is the first place I've been to that was across in between,gives you Homestyle service feel,as for the tacos...fish tacos was pretty good,the al pastor was a little to the dry side,but pretty flavorful,grilled shrimp taco salad was tasty,I'm not sure if I like their take on horchata, a little too much with that fresh cinnamon powder,but overall one of the better  taquerias By downtown Orlando.
This place is fantastic. Everything I've tried is delicious, and it's all you can eat, brought to the table. Don't expect a menu - there isn't one. The owner is a little bizarre, but every time I bring someone new to this place, they're addicted.
Almost always busy, always fantastic and worth the wait. The meat is high quality, the bread is delicious, the condiments are homemade, and the cocktails are classic but imaginative. Always a great place to go for a greater burger.
Love their calzones. Eggplant parm is my favorite and also like buffalo chicken calzone. Generous size and delicious with extra sauce. For take out for a nice treat it is fast and easy. I don't eat meat but my friend loves their steak bomb sub. Every town needs a reliable Italian shop like this.
This is my fav pizza place. I always eat here after I smoke or when I'm hungover and it is heaven on earth sister. A little pricey but I guess it's fine because I recently got a merit increase   I love it tho
If you are bored of the parks, you got to take a class here! It was a little scary at the beginning but totally worth it! It was a birthday present and im definitely coming back with my friends.. Highly recommend it, but is not for everyone.. You have to be a little crazy hehe
I love the low-key vibe of this place.  The staff is great, there aren't any attitudes, and they have a good mix of regulars and first timers that are sure to come back.  It's pretty big, which is great for groups and on busy nights.  There's a large patio out back, and a little nook full of couches inside.  Good beer selection, great prices.
"I overheard you are out of the roast beef, right?"  "Yes, but we can still make another sandwich."  "What do you have?"  "Salami and cheese."  "OK, sounds good, I'm easy to please."  "Do you want mustard?"  "No, but do you have mayo?"  "Yes.  Do you want any greens?"  "Sure, give me some green stuff on it.  And I need something cold to drink."  "We have lemonade, iced coffee..."  "I'll take Lala's Lavender Lemonade.  Hold the alliteration."  Best damn lunch I've ever had from a cargo container.
I love this damn place.  It's hard not to feel like Norm from Cheers after you've been in a few times, between Joe, Suzanna, Potter and Corey your drink is in front of you before you have to order it (as long as you aren't one of those Taco Mac around the world types) and there's always a genuine "how are ya" behind it.   The later it gets, the smokier it gets, and you'll never go home in a condition that allows you the privilege of smelling your own perfume/cologne, but in the summer months this can be a saving grace.  No patio = less hipsters invading, just a bunch of neighborhood guys and gals out for a low key evening with a couple of pints.  Did I mention I love this damn place?
I love this place. Everyone is so nice. I can't remember the guy's name who helped me out, but he has helped me multiple times with all my dumb questions. Thanks dude.
I've spent 20 years performing in or attending the Orlando International Fringe Festival. It's absolutely a fabulous time. TONS of great shows and wonderful social time at the beer tent. I highly recommend!
I really enjoy IKEA. You can make of it what you want. I usually only come if I know EXACTLY what I need. Otherwise I get completely overwhelmed. Do your research, prepare for crowds, and get a good deal. also, become a free member. There are lots of great perks, such as free coffee or tea and extra time for your kids in the play area (which according to my 6 year old niece and 8 year old nephew, is REALLY COOL.) lol.
Very helpful staff who will listen to what your needs are and offer advice. When you visit, they'll have sample stamps to look at and example fonts printed up so you know exactly what to expect.   I thought a little local spot like this would be too pricy for our non-profit, but I got a better deal than what I could find on-line. So worth it! Quick turn-around, too.
I am delighted to be the first to review the Wave.  The Wave Restaurant opened in June 2008 in the Contemporary Resort at Walt Disney World.  The restaurant is on the lobby level and features space for a couple hundred restaurant guests and a FANTASTIC 40-person bar with small side rooms off the main bar that are cool, blue, hip and excellent.  The biggest key unique selling point here is the menu and the amazing food.  The food was based on a background of restaurants in the pacific northwest for inspiration.  In Oregon and Washington, sustainable eating is a bigger movement, and here at the Wave the focus is on fresh, seasonal food with huge flavor frequent organic influences...and the like.  Yes...I am writing this about the food at a major restaurant inside one of the icons of Walt Disney World.  This place is a massive departure from what you would expect.  No fries, no fried food.  But don't think it's all healthy in a dull way.  There's an amazing pork tenderloin, freshly crafted creamy soups, excellent desserts, and...for my money...the single best margarita I have ever consumed.  The fresh fish with edamame salsa and the citrus and avocado salad made me come back for a second visit.  I ate there 4 times in a week at Disney.  Not only is the food wonderful and the bar very attainable for dinner seating, but the prices are especially fair in the theme park context. They'd be fair in any context, in any city, on any block.  This place is a serious contender for best food at WDW in my 8 day stay.
Would I drive hours for this pizza? Probably not. But if you are in the area- get it. It is not earth shattering, but just a very good pizza. Good sauce, great cheese and a nice crust. That's it. A place that does one thing very very well.
I was getting my hair cut across the street when she told me a BBQ place had just opened up across the street. It literally opened at 11a today. A guy came in and said they have a special going on, $6 gets you a pulled pork or chicken sandwich, fries and a drink. It was about lunch and this guy just so happened to be hungry so I made my way over to check them out.   Don't sleep on this place. I got their $6 pulled pork sandwich lunch special, comes with fries and it was off the chain good! Service is fast and friendly. It's a small place with super limited seating. The place seats maybe 15 people total. It's owned by Snoop Dog's uncle which is pretty cool. Hoping to see him in here one day. That would be cool
Super friendly service, easy place to bring the kids, very tasty coffee (americano was great) and the Diablo was awesome, best breakfast I've had in a long time!  Highly recommend.
Enjoyed a great lunch with colleagues this afternoon. The service was awesome as well as the food. I will definitely be back.
Words and yelp reviews can't describe the absolutely amazing atmosphere. There are books EVERYWHERE. I am a bookie but I believe anyone would enjoy a visit here( maybe not the claustrophobic ).  Sadly the renowned basement section wasn't available for browsing but only for certain searches. The staff is extremely knowledgeable and somehow can recall their entire inventory. I personally recommend coming here to browse rather than looking for a certain novel but if you are, the staff can help! I'll be back here before long!
Enjoyed the fried chicken and sides. Chicken had a little kick but was lightly battered and the sides were delicious, would definitely go back.
Needed meat for a Sunday meal while on our biannual Tour de Glutton. My guide for the day said he knew just the place. What a great shop. Old school Butchers like Gartner's are a rare breed these days. Plenty of quality Pork, Beef, and Chicken product proudly displayed their chilled cases. A little bit of Salmon, various sausages, deli meats, and treats were also offered. A steady flow of customers were handled in a professional and friendly manner. We opted for: Pork Spareribs, some headcheese (just for giggles), two kinds of jerky, ham, and bacon.  The result was a great rib dinner with fixins and money left in the old wallet. Will definitely return to this place to try out their marinated products, the pickled herring, and some sausages. My only regret is that they did not have pork belly on that day :(
Great company.  I've had a lot of trees cut down. These guys had the best prices by far and timeliest response. Did an outstanding job hauling away and stumping. Cleaned the area completely when finished.  Like the tree never existed. Prices and service were so good I referred them to my HOA who also said the had the lowest bid.
Ordered from here yesterday and loved their chicken tikka masala! Definitely one of the best in the Boston area! delivery took about an hour which is pretty standard for most places in my area. Looking forward to trying more of their dishes!
Amazing supply store. They have all sorts of stuff from fabric to wigs to chocolates.   Upstairs house a majority of the fabrics. The area in front of the door has costume supplies and more stock comes out for Halloween and holidays.  Downstairs: yarn, remnant fabrics, discoloured, discontinued fabrics and NOTIONS, NOTIONS, NOTIONS (that's thread, zippers, trims, pins, etc.).  I bought my halloween wig there for $12.99! I was also able to find fabrics that I couldn't find anywhere...for $2/yard.  I may be wrong but it seems their trimmings dept have shrunk just a bit. For about $60, I was able to get material for my headboard, curtains, partitioning curtains along with pom pom trim for my NY apt.   Just remember to bring cash or debit because they don't accept credit. There is a debit machine across the street but it's dodgy.
Finally made it down to this Alamo and we are really glad we did.   I was a ding dong and not only ordered 3 tickets online (we only needed 2) but I also bought them for the wrong day.  The lady who assisted me was so friendly and helpful and was great.  I feel a lot of times Alamo employees can have a terrible attitude but I was so pleasantly surprised here.  Nooooow, the courtesy did not spread to the server but you know you can't win them all!
Excellent service. I was able to schedule a move on fairly short notice, and Drew and Chris were quick, friendly, and professional. They finished up well within the time estimate l had been given.
My favourite lunch place in the area. Big portions, good prices, and extremely friendly staff. This is where I was first introduced to Filipino food, and it made a good impression. The menu is huge, and a lot of the dishes are best shared so go with friends.
Charming atmosphere in this hidden gem. Would really like to give 4.5 stars due to comment below but definitely deserves more than 4 stars. Courteous service. Loved the look and California feel of inside being open to the "patio" area. Good all excellently prepared. Charcuterie plate was fun to explore. Yellow gazpacho was delicious although it's smoothness isn't what I know if as gazpacho. Duck entree perfectly cooked and tender. Swordfish great but the thick piece I was served seemed a little under done in center but outside edges not dry so understand the cost/ benefit. Only downside: three entrees served simultaneously but fourth (beet/ goat cheese ravioli) was 2-3 minutes later which allowed my accompaniments (delicious creamy polenta) to cool off to much. Delay was noticeable enough that a little mention/apology would  have been nice. Definitely worth going to and would return.
Chex Machin was a wonderful French restaurant I would recommend to anyone. This cozy little spot definitely reminded me of a French Bistro. The food was amazing, my husband ordered a delicious salad, and I had clam linguine with French onion soup. Also add a cup of coffee... the best coffee I've received at a restaurant in a long time! The waiter Arthur was impressive as he easily handled the entire restaurant! Great place!
Slides, Slides, Slides  and the pool was heated! They have an arcade room and pizza hut right next to it. They even have a margaritaville! Room was spacious and parking was close to the room. Beds are ok. Only complaint would be that my room key didn't work the first day, I went to the front desk to change it and the next day it stopped working again. Other than that Great Experience! Coming back soon!
Great Cleaning service. They were able to come in on extremely short notice. I contacted them on Thursday and needed my house cleaned that weekend for a move in. They were able to come by Saturday and get the whole house done in a few hours. It was also a great job too!. I would recommend Steve for any cleaning jobs I have in the future and have him cleaning my condo as well!
Went here last Sunday for brunch with a group of 4 and was able to get right in, even though I had heard reviews of groups waiting up to an hour for a table. I ordered the Eggs Benny and added the heirloom tomato slice which was an additional $2 fucking dollars. I thought it was an above average eggs benny, not the best I've ever had but not bad by any means. The potatoes that came with it were really well seasoned and crispy.  I also shared the burger, which was really good and had Laurelhurst Market bacon, pickled zucchini, and heirloom tomatoes on it. The burger was good, but the bacon and veggies were what really made it. My only qualm was that the bun was way to big proportionally to the burger inside.  The atmosphere was pretty cool, it was kind of industrial with brick walls and in a partial basement. Service was good overall but I couldn't hear the server at all, I just kind of nodded through our entire interaction until I left.
Very happy with my experience here! After calling nearly 5 different business searching for a rug cleaning, I came upon Yayla. Quick turnaround, reasonable price, and my rug looks fantastic!! Definitely recommend.
What's not to love? Great food, no grease, clean dining room, friendly staff, wel priced.  Has the feel of a locals-only diner without the attitude. You'll love it!
Amazing!!!  My love got a medium strawberry banana Italian ice with soft serve vanilla ($5). I got a small blue raspberry ($3). It was awesome. It's about a block down from the sixth street chaos but worth it for the cold ice on a warm evening. The flavor is powerful but beware, blue raspberry will dye you mouth and lips blue.
I can't say enough about this place. We went there twice. The drinks were fantastic. We had a Vieux Carre and it was so good we had two! I had the French kiss pizza the first time. It was very good. But the best meal was definitely the meatloaf mountain. I can't say enough about this dish. It was delicious. The meatloaf was tender and juicy, the mashed potatoes were so flavorful and the mushroom gravy and fried onions only made it better. The service was amazing as well. It felt like we were waited on by every server in the house. If one of them walked by and thought we needed something, they stopped and took care of us. Definitely felt the love and highly recommend this one.
About a month after visiting Israel I got hit with a falafel craving and had the excuse to finally try this place out. I'm no culinary expert but the food is great for the value (seriously $5 falafel).   I went on a Saturday night and it was busy but not crowded...interestingly enough they were playing some super-geeky dubstep which I was fine with but I'm not sure about everyone else, haha. Decor is modern, well-lit, place was clean and staff was friendly. Order was up in like 2 minutes, like, QSR fast.   Plus I got a big spoonful of tzatziki sauce at no extra charge...mmmm.  They also have some unique desserts like fruit tarts.   A nice alternative on a Saturday night to the normal Norwood townie-infested bars! :)
I've always loved yogen fruz, but since my most recent visit (being Saturday), a friend and I were contemplating where to get a sweet treat after a fattening dinner.  I starting naming off a bunch that were available all along Robson as we were driving up.  She was intrigued with Yogen Fruz, so we parked and wandered in.  The place was getting packed.  It was easy to see why.  They jumped on that Pinkberry-Menchi-Qoola-bandwagon and had their own version of fill and pay flavours.  After sampling a bunch, I picked the pistachio, but I secretly wished I had a classic strawberry froyo.  I made the best of it, pistachio, a small squidge of coffee, mangoes, kiwi, strawberries and mochi balls and $7.80 later with an upstairs view of Robson street.  I was content.  I'm not going to lie, if I go back again, I will go for the strawberry hand blended froyo and leave the premixed to Pinkberry.
I love Octane, pretty much all their locations, but Grant Park is my favourite.  I love the  light filled room the relaxed atmosphere, the Coffee, the cocktails, the pastries and the people who work there.   After 6 the no laptop rule on the bar is great as it gives some room to sit and drink great cocktails.  Plus I hate to worry I am going to knock someone's books, laptop and ruin their whole life.   I recommend the flat white, rooibos tea, and all the pastries!
Finally got a chance to check this place out.  Decided to check out the happy hour.  I was very happy to hear they have both drink and food specials including a ladies night on Thursday.    The food and wait staff was great, i tried the tuna flat bread.  Everything seemed very fresh.  I will definitely be back.  I do see the trouble with noise on real busy nights, but i wasn't effected while on my visit.
I was craving waffles and decided to try Theo's given the yelp photos and ratings. On a Friday mid morning I walked into this cozy restaurant that's owned and managed by Theo and his wife.   What made this place special were the regulars who greeted each other by name from 3 year olds to 70 year olds. In addition to Italian, there were other languages spoken by patrons as well.  I gave Theo's 4 stars mainly for how welcoming and down to earth it is. The waffle with strawberries were pretty in appearance but a bit rubbery. Other customers had combos with eggs and they looked like better choices.
Always a delightful experience.  Staff is attentive and helpful and the food excellent.  We always look forward to eating at Gran Gusto when we're in Cambridge.
Wahlburgers is easily located in the new mixed use complex of Hingham Shipyard.  Easy to find parking and the place is for a quick bite to eat so don't set yourself with high expectations it's a Michelin Award restaurant.    My fave things that set out from all the burger joints popping up are the tater tots (regular or sweet potato) and the homemade buns (not THE Actual Wahlberg buns).  Simple setup inside with hints of Dorchester and all the famous Wahlberg Movies and photos to make it a la Planet Hollywood.  To the left, a full service restaurant and then to the right, quick take out.  Simple layout of a menu, choose your meat, toppings and side.    I had the BBQ Bacon Burger Turkey style - hellz yeah it was delicious!  Jalapenos and bbq sauce dripping from the homemade potato bread like bun.  then who doesn't love crispy bacon and to make yourself feel better about your health, a nice thick cut of avocado.  It was good and set my expectations.  Then the tater tots - crispy and salty but you do get a small size.  I would go here again if I'm in the area and everyone has to try it once to reduce your stalking obsession over the brothers :)
Strong diner food with particularly fun and spunky service. The woman who took my order was super nice and when I asked her what to get, she said either the turkey club or tuna melt. These just happen to the the two things I almost always get at diners so I was really stuck at a crossroads. But I ordered the club and never looked back. Well toasted bread, good ingredient ratio, and i left real satisfied.  Should i return, the tuna melt is in my crosshairs.
I can't speak for much here because I don't like Thai food (mostly the curries and coconut) but I had the pad thai here and it was AMAZING.  I'm telling you, it was fantastic.
Everything we had was phenomenal. I had the scallops with pumpkin risotto. They were buttery and flavorful! The blood orange margarita was DELICIOUS. I have been very disappointed with almost all Disney dining options, but flying fish was well worth the trip to the boardwalk.
Very professional and efficient. Federico, Alberto and Alejandro arrived right on time and started immediately. We had to make an extra stop OTP which went smoothly. No damages to where I moved into or out of or to my stuff. No hidden expenses, I ended up paying exactly what I thought I would be charged. Would definitely use this company again.
I've eaten here more than a dozen times. The food is delicious and the service is great. I love the Lava Noodles and the Pad Thai.
I have lived in ATL for 11 yrs now. I had "heard " about Jacks pizza from friends. They would have these looks of they feel sorry for me on their faces. I wouldn't think anything of it. But last nite. My life was changed.  This is the diriest crazy good. Keep talking about how good it is while you eat it. Wish you had more room cause u greedy and you want more good pizza !!! Are they slow? Its not so much slow as this pizza takes a while to cook. But nobody is really "hustling " in the joint. But man. Who cares...the pizza was worth it! Get some of the siracha candied bacon. Personally I feel like they should give you more for 2.99...but hey its tasty!!!
My best friend and I came here for her birthday brunch and we had a pretty great experience. We both got mimosas, I got the migas (with a side of bacon) and she got the traditional eggs Benedict and gumpo soup for an appetizer. Everything was so tasty, even right down to the little cornbread they serve at the beginning. The waiters were extremely nice. In fact, we were about to forget our things we bought at Uncommon Objects and one of the waiters was quick to tell us we almost forget our bags! The wait was 45 minutes long but it was a Sunday on South Congress at 1:30 PM so it's understandable. The prices weren't bad and the portions were pretty big, so we'd definitely come back again.
My Fave ramen restaurant downtown!  Food You get 3 basic ramen choices, soy sauce, miso and spicy miso for around $8. I don't know if it's their special miso, pork or their brilliant soup staff, their broth is by far one of the best I have ever had the honour tasting. I would order take-out just because of the soup!  Service & atmosphere It gets loud, the servers were shouting orders over each other.  It is a tiny nook, it's design resembles a bento box, woody, dark and crammed.   Recommendation I am a huge believer! Once you try their broth everything else is inconsequential.
First off go to the original off East 6th in Austin.  I like a place with character and as soon as you walk in provides a good vibe that is warm, inviting, and just the right size.    I love to start off my meal with the empanadas which are great.  I have tried them all, but my favorite is probably carne picante.  If you are looking for something light the mixed green salad is good too. As far and the main course goes my favorite dish hands down is the GNOCCHI QUARTET. It is AMAZING!!!  Order this and you will leave happier and full.    Definitely check this place out if you haven't.  There are so many unique places in Austin and this is one of my favorites to go to.
I agree with a lot of what's already been written here. The service people were very nice, they did a great job on cleaning my car (inside and out), and the prices were a bit high but not too extreme. The place was moderately crowded when I went, but they cleaned my car rather quickly, which was nice. The waiting area (only for people getting their car detailed or getting the Full Service interior cleaning) is nice, clean, has coffee, and nice bathrooms. However, the communication from the workers was non-existent or confusing and driving around the huge complex is a bit overwhelming. It was fairly easy to find the automatic washer, but trying to choose the wash, plus the interior clean, plus pay for it all was extremely complicated and involved the big machine by the automatic washing area, plus a worker with an iPad, and her "magic card", plus my credit card, which I then had to swipe again after my car was done being cleaned. Then, when I got out of the automatic washer, there were 5 people wiping my car down, none of which told me where to go to get the interior cleaned, even though it was plainly marked on my window that I wanted the interior cleaning as well. So, I left the washer, drove through the gas station parking lot next door, back out onto Brodie Lane, back into the huge complex for Palms and wandered a bit until I found an area marked Full Service and Detailing. Then I pulled into an empty stall, got out, and just stood there until one of the other workers came up to me asked what I was doing. So that was odd and confusing, but the people were nice and they did a good job in the end. Overall I'm very happy with their work and the price so I'll certainly come back regularly, especially now that I know where to go in the maze that is Palms at each step of the car washing process!
This place accommodated our party of 6 adults, 1 child, and 3 toddlers without incident (with advance reservations).  CJ has a robust an diverse menu with reasonably priced entrees.  CJ also has sports on TVs visible from the dining area without feeling like you are eating at a "sports bar".  They accommodate children unlike any place we have dined by offering complimentary meals for toddlers.  A pleasant dining experience!
That bar is in a brilliant location.  It offers a convenient spot not only for its patrons, but also passers-by who walk around the Mall and in fact some walk by the opposing balcony by the escalator where there is clear view of the huge wall projector screen, therefore, a perfect viewing angle from EVERY angle during a game.  Also good for hotel guests, train commuters who cut through the mall to catch the Orange Line, etc.    Champions had been renovated a few years back and their bar especially offers colorful and vibe and atmosphere to their patrons.  The several TVs, their wall projector add to the excitement during a game.    Their food is mediocre, but the food presentation was beautiful.  Staff was courteous but service not prompt enough.    Overall, I like this bar and will return.
Very good food!! I am glad it's close to home!!
You must try the Smokey Portobello Soup!!! This is the best soup I have ever had in my life. I'm going to Artist Point again for dinner next month...I may see what I can do about taking some to go or finding out the recipe or something...I somehow need to find a way to have this besides my annual trip to Disney World. I can't believe no pictures of it are posted on yelp yet-posting one now. Anyways, I'ma big mushroom fan so I may be biased but I swear the seasoning with this soup...hands down...best---evahhhh!  The rest of my meal was fantastic but I just kept daydreaming about my portobello soup. When will I be able to eat it again? What's in it? How can I recreate that at home? Okay, anyways, on to the rest of my food! I had the Cedar Plank Roasted Wild King Salmon with spring vegetables, Citrus-Miso Buerre Blanc, and parsley oil. It came out perfectly cooked, perfectly seasoned. One of the best salmons I've ever put in my belly! I can't remember what dessert I had...but it was just meh. I'm a huge chocolate dessert fan and they didn't have anything super duper chocolatey the way I like it. The meal was pricey---so be prepared. We were on the Disney Dining Plan so didn't mind the money...it's 2 Table Service credits on the Dining Plan.  Service was excellent and it was smack dab in the middle of the Wilderness Lodge which is absolutely gorgeous! The decor reminded me very much of Frank Lloyd Wright with the lines & nature. I'm a huge FLW fan so I loved it! Take a stroll outside after dinner to watch the geyser and then hop on the boat back to Magic Kingdom!
Found this here on Yelp in looking for a place to meet a friend near her place.   If this was my neighborhood I would be a regular.  The sushi was great.  Fresh fish, good rice, and excellent miso.  The service was good.   Pricing was good.  We ordered three rolls. miso, and edamame for $24.    Also liked they had some rolls out of the ordinary rather than the typical combos that you find at many places.  A few notes having read some other reviews....One review talks about the fish being frozen, he must not know much about sushi fish as all sushi fish is frozen as a way to kill any parasites the fish might have.    Size,  the place is small.  There are only 7 seats at the sushi bar and one table.  On a Thruseday evening at 7:30 not a problem.   Additional options is you can order sushi at Roscoes bar next door.  Roscoes provides the liquor service for the Miyamoto sushi.  So if the place is full simply sit next door.  Definitely worth checking out.
Tasty grilled chicken sandwich similar to Chik fil-a. Fries were like PTerrys but less greasy. Croissant bites were overcooked and not very sweet.  The best thing was the fresh lemonade and the Honey Dijon sauce was one of the best I've ever tasted.   Great ice tea!  Most places are pretty bad.
Best prices for emissions test w/o skimping on service. Wait was a bit long,  but papi who did my car was funny and very nice. I brought my other car the the next day.
The margaritas at Tico are extremely tasty and VERY strong! Two of these and you'll be feelin' fine! The food was delicious, but the portions are rather tiny and not very filling. Their mac and cheese, and their pork and the fried chicken tacos, were very good. Good place for drinks and an appetizer of two, can't say I'd recommend it for a while dinner unless you're willing to spend some major cash!
Stayed here for the Labor Day weekend and was impressed. The staff was very courteous and knowledgeable. The Japanese garden on the 6th floor was a pleasant touch. The pool temperature is DIVINE and the convenience of the poolside bar and snack offerings were delightful. Parking is expensive, but you can park across the street at the Embassy Suites for free . This location is in close proximity to the Lennox Square Mall, walking distance even. I recommend this location to anyone who'd like great service and luxury outside of midtown Atlanta.
Bloody Mary for the win! After a stint in Milwaukee this Bloody Mary can hold its own. Strong and spicy!  As for the brunch we had the omelette, frittata and Caesar salad ( with limoncello vinegarette). The lemon dressing was awesome. Portions were big and good solid flavors.   Pretty good value for the area with quantity and quality.
We have always loved Finz (same owner)so we were not surprised at the delicious food here at Sea Level the oysters were fresh local and delicious  The view of Salem harbor and the Friendship is sensational.The drinks were very good with quite a creative cocktail menu.They were so patient with us as we had a rowdy one year old on our party We were happy with everything the owner came over and introduced himself always a special touch. I am so happy to see this building with the quality restaurant it deserves to be  inside it.
At first i was looking at this dish strange and it turned it to be delicious. Next time you are in the neighborhood try the Singapore Noodles and of course have the best California Rolls
Such a cozy, warm spot with a great menu of offerings. Shared a pizza, salad, and app with the hubs and it was all great, including excellent service by maitre d.
Consistently great and an unbeatable price. Can't go wrong with Chicken and waffles or sausage and biscuits!
So, I really love turkey burgers and this was probably one of the biggest, most flavorful, juicy turkey burgers I've had from a quick dining establishment. No really... you have to try one. Oh and let's not forget the fries, I ate them before I got down the street. I'll most def be back to try some other items on the menu (or get the turkey burger again). The customer service was great as well. They're super friendly!!! I wish I had a picture to post but I ate it all in the car.
I've been getting my hair did from the beautiful and talented Kellie at Ritual Salon for about 5 years. I've changed my hairstyle several times and she consistently works magic on my head. From bringing in a picture to just needing a change but not knowing exactly what I want, she nails it every time. She did my hair and makeup for my wedding and I couldn't have been more pleased. I genuinely feel well taken care of at Ritual. Kellie has a creative eye and keeps my hairs lookin' fresh. Money well spent. Tip: Schedule your appointment late in the day, arrive early and sip some wine while you wait.
Everything we ordered was so flavorful and perfectly prepared. We had the calamari, chicken croquette, patatas bravas, montaditos, and grilled peach salad along with queso and cured meat to start. The peach wasn't in season but that is my only complaint. Cocktails were tasty as well. I recommend the lemongrass Collins. Service was very attentive and pricing was totally reasonable for the quality.
This was truly my best first best cuban-food experience. Their ropa vieja was wonderful!
The food here is amazing... they have wicked fast carryout and if you order to pick up, the food is hot and fresh.
After having breakfast at some of the top rated breakfast restaurants in Vancouve and being very disappointed, this was a pleasant surprise.  Great breakfast and service.
I have gone to Jaho many times. It is a great spot to stop for a vanilla chai latte. Also, to do some homework or just meet and chat with a friend. I'm not a huge fan of their bigger selection of foods. I like to stick to the smaller snacks when I go there. The renovation is an A+ it looks a lot more like a café I would go to. It is also in the heart of downtown so it is a easy walk for some fresh air
They staff was great and were really quick.  I rented a 5x8 trailer and needed it a few hours early and it was no problem.  I'm surprised by the low ratings because they got me in and out really quickly.  If i need a trailer again, I will definitely use this location again!
JRA has a great selection of rare-er protective gear and apparel than any place I've seen.  They also stock a good amount of high end mountain bikes and twenty-niners, which is pretty cool.  I haven't used their mechanics but their staff was so friendly and helpful to me that I felt compelled to post a review and recommend them to my friends.  It's just a shame they're so far from me now, as I can't justify going so often.
Came here again last night. I foresee many visits in the future.   We ordered:  Lamb Hot Pot/Stew (small): The broth was fantastic! The lamb chunks were super tender. Highly recommend!   Beef rolls: Tasty!  Bangkok fried chicken: Delicious! Chicken was crispy and juicy.   Although line ups are inevitable, the workers are very efficient at seating you. Also, the food comes in less than 5 mins! Thank you Myst  for offering tasty Asian food in my neighborhood at an affordable price in a modern ambiance! :)
The Regents team is incredible. Although I couldn't proceed in living there, I can vouch that their staff is INCREDIBLY kind, dedicated and concerned about your experience. They probably have the most attentive leasing team that I've ever seen.
This place has fresh, authentic food. It's always very clean, and the people are really nice. If you live near them like I do, you'll see that they get daily shipments of fresh food, all of which go straight into proper storage.   Also one time I forgot my debit card and they gave me a free burrito.
Went to another dealership and had a horrible experience. We decided to head over to CarMax because of the large selection. Ended up working with Omar and the intimidating experience was surprisingly delightful. He was so patient and showed us 10+ cars in 40 degree weather! We were being picky . Found us the PERFECT car for our needs and we couldn't be happier. Thank you!
I really like this place. I used to order delivery all the time and then they stopped delivery to my neighborhood. Food is fresh tasting and not as greasy as most Chinese.
Update: I looked at the slip I kept in my car and the gentleman I dealt with directly is named Austin Slagle. Read this entire post to understand this update.   I usually do not write reviews for places right away, unless they go above and beyond, and do something great in customer service.   Okay folks listen up. I went in to get my tire fixed. I ran over a pretty big nail at some point and had been riding on a spare for a day. I met with the customer service man and he inspected my tire, and all the others, to see what level they're at. I already knew I am going to need new ones, but they had to see if they could even fix it, because once a tire reaches a certain level of tread, they can no longer repair holes. Luckily they did not try to lie and tell me that I needed to get new tires. I was at just the right amount to get it plugged, which is good because I am not ready this month financially to get a new set all around.   They guy I spoke with, which his name seems to escape me now, so please forgive me. I know I should have memorized his name since I am so impressed and all, but I am the worst for names. Anywho, this guy did show me that even with his higher end tire, it would still be cheaper for me to purchase a set there versus the dealership I got my new car from. The lowest end was 50 dollars a tire, and guaranteed for 35,000 miles. That's pretty good.   Here's why I will go back. They took my car in and fixed it in under 20 minutes. The guy who did the repair, a different gentleman, came out and informed me he would be pulling it up front for me, nice. Then I turn to the guy who I gave all my info to and asked what the total damage was, and you know what he says. "You don't owe us anything Chad, it's free tire repair here." Yeah he called me by my name, lol. That wasn't what impressed me though. He wants my business, so he just did that for me. I was already going to come back in a month to get new tires, before I trade in my car for a Jeep, because it was a good deal for the set of tires. Now though, they have a customer for life, and that I can guarantee.   Oh, and one more thing. The rims they have there are so nice and moderately priced too. There was this sick gunmetal black rim I loved, but I don't want to invest in my car I am trading up, that ran for 99 dollars each, and another which was chrome and black for like 109 dollars each. That's awesome! Just saying folks, do yourself a favor and at least go hear what they have to offer, if that's something you're going to need soon.
The Ice Box is where Johnny's used to be, right next to the Clam Box. Yummy flavors, good portion sizes, and happy staff! *hint* if you eat at the Clam Box ask them for $1 kids cone cards. When youre done eating head next door to get your $1 cone!
Soooo good!  See the thing is, there's lots of places to get fancy ice cream, but most froyo is mediocre flavors with processed toppings.  NOT THIS PLACE  It's amazing, seriously good ingredients and everything looks and tastes fresh.  I got the doughnut flavor with rhubarb sauce and ginger, it was simply divine.  I absolutely cannot wait to come back and share with friends while I try more flavors and combinations!
We thought about going over to Brodie Oaks to see if the new Bombay Bistro was open.  I called and found out it's opening 10/8/10, or thereabouts.  The folks I was in the car with then say "hey, let's go up north to the other location!"  I wasn't excited to make a journey north of the river for a place I was not convinced was worth a drive. I was SO WRONG.  Bombay Bistro's lunch buffet was Indian buffet heaven!  There wasn't a dud dish on the line.  The spices were just right, the soups were tasty, and the naan was wonderful.  I was almost shocked it was so good.  Definitely could be some of the best Indian in Travis County. Why didn't they get five stars?  Tea service at the table was slow (my glass was empty more than full) and I did not like the dessert they had out.  Pretty picky, but I'm picky like that.  I need more tea! The line for the buffet was constant too.  They have it up against a wall, and while there's an obvious flow, you feel slightly obliged to stand in line, waiting for everyone in front of you to shuffle through.  I little better set up here might be good.  The food is worth standing there drooling on yourself.
Even if you are not Greek, Taverna Opa is a great dining choice if you are in the Orlando area. The ambiance was great; there is a lot of noise but the dining experience is interactive. The servers greek dance with the whole restaurant, there are belly dancers, dancing on the tables, and instead of throwing plates, they throw napkins. Taverna Opa has a large menu. The kabobs were cooked to perfection and the portions are very large. Before you dine, sign up for the Taverna Opa V.I.P. card and they will provide a free cold appetizer. The only slight downfall would be the service. The server forgot a couple items we ordered and forgot the modifications on the items. Overall, it was a great dining experience and would be recommended.
Sampling Lab is in a nice space.  It is a ways for me, but I think I will go when I am in the neighborhood.  As it is there are several places I like in the area so I will go again.  When I was there they had a range of food item from single serve Ketchup packages to small coffee creamers to heat and serve meals.  There is seating though I do not know what for (maybe on future visits I will) but everything is well laid out.  One thing to note,  they are changing their hours and will no longer be open on Sundays.  I have seen survey people standing in malls etc trying to get you to try something but not like this.   Here come in find something you want from a selection and you decide what you want to try for free and review it.  The survey was quick and easy.  I hope they get busier then when I was there,  I had the place to myself and I want them to do well!  I had signed up online but it had not processed but they could just sign me up there.
Clean and modernized since the renovation! The ideal rest stop on the turnpike- it offers multiple restaurants, food court style, for whoever is on your car. Currently,  it boasts a KFC, Natures Table, Wendy's, and a Dunkin Donuts. Restrooms are clean. The convenience store inside has cold drinks, snack and souvenirs. It is extremely child-friendly, with clean high chairs and a kiddie eating area, with small table and chair sets and hands on games. With FHP HQ here, it is extremely safe and well-lit, even at night. This is our stop every time we hit the road to Grandma's house!
Stopped in after seeing live music was playing and we were glad we did. Band brought the funk, and service and drinks were great. Free pool table in the other room (not sure if thats every day but it seemed like it was) was cool too.  Will definitely be back and hope the tunes are still funky!
Once upon a time there was a tiny hole in the wall restaurant called Bonzai on the drag/ut-ish area that was awesome, but alas it was swallowed up by craptastic Diesel. Several years later, while cruising down Lamar, I spot a simliarly named restaurant and my groupie hopes and dreams were answered, seeing as how I'd rediscovered my beloved restaurant. Now, they could be totally unrelated, but don't rain on my parade.   This place is a definite go to for delicious food. I've never had anything I didn't like, and the servers are always funny and chatty. If you're a fat kid at heart (like me) you'll enjoy their Bento boxes, which I lovingly refer to as a "buffet in my lap." Chicken Terriyaki is good, portion could be a bit bigger, perhaps they just cook with skinny chickens. The Sumo roll is melt in your mouth delicious, and the BF is a fan of the Katsu Don.
The food here is delicious and fast! Shrimp tacos are the best item on the menu. I've had the shrimp blackened, fried and grilled and either way they are superb!  This locally, family owned restaurant is my favorite in Apopka.
The new vet is wonderful and the service remains top-notch.  Unfortunately one of my cats had to be euthanized due to a combination of factors, and the staff really helped me come to a decision and go through the process (for both me and my kitty) as sympathetically as possible.  I can't recommend them enough.
Hi Hat Public House was awesome! The pub opened up in our building not to long ago and we were very curious about the place. When we finally went, I was very impressed with the selection of craft beers. William, the bar manager, was extremely knowledgeable, friendly, and attentive! He recommended some great brews and also provided information about all of them. I was also impressed to learn that hi hat was the only place in austin where some beers could be found. My fiance is not much of a beer drinker, but was very happy to find a decent wine selection as well as domestics she could enjoy. We will definitely be going back, in fact we are leaving right now for live jazz (every sunday 2-4). CHEERS!
Finally, made it out to Cafe Medina and will be sure to go back. I had the lovely lavender latte. A waffle with white chocolate pistachio rosewater sauce. Delicious! And a side order of andouille sausage. I really liked the food but thought it was on the pricey side for what you get. But, for a treat I would definitely come back. I would come back to try a larger breakfast and also the other sauces for the waffle since the white chocolate one was so fantastic. Can't wait to treat myself again. Mmm I love pistachio and rosewater.
If I could give 3.5, I would.  I loved the theater itself. Rolling back in a lounge chair recliner made it feel like I was back home enjoying a movie and popcorn with my sweetheart. The service was excellent and non intrusive, perfect for a theater.  My only hesitation to going back would be the obvious need to gel my hair and do fist pumps upon entering the establishment. Walking through the lobby felt like an episode of Jersey Shore, and the prices matched as well (it is in the Domain after all).  Overall, great experience and would go back for another date night.
We used Brooke for our wedding flowers and I cannot say enough good things about her and her work. She completely understood what I was going for and created bouquets that were better than I could have imagined. Every flower arrangement was bountiful and unique, without breaking the bank.
If you have curly hair - especially if you want a short cut - go see Meg. I've been going to her for 5 or 6 years now and she's so good that I refuse to let anyone else cut my hair. She's a rare unicorn of a hairstylist in that she truly gets how curls work and how to make them look awesome. I've actually been stopped by strangers multiple times before and asked where I get my hair cut! Meg will gladly give me whatever cut I like, but she also gives great advice on what's likely to work well. In my experience, that advice has always been right. If you're desperately looking for that one hairstylist who won't accidentally give you a 'fro, give Meg a try!
Yummmmy. I've been there twice and it's been delicious both times. We had the O-Ring Shorty for appetizer, Oh WOW!!!! I had the turkey burger and was phenomenal. My kids love the gourmet cheeseburger and arctic cod fish & chips.
Nice unpretentious.  My son loved his steak tips   My pizza without cheese and veggies was perfect. He also raved about his cheese pizza.
I had a great experience at this Dominican restaurant! I don't speak or understand Spanish but the menu was very clear, easy to follow and had English translations. I ordered the pork chops, spanish rice, and sweet plantain and it was DELICIOUS! The empanadas were also very good. My friend ordered a beef dish, white rice and bean sauce and was very satisfied with her meal as well. The serving of food was very generous for the price. I was so full! Despite it being busy, our food came out in a reasonable amount of time. The waitresses were all very nice and approachable. Our waitress could've been a bit more attentive to our table though. The music and the ambiance was great overall. I'll be coming back to this place for sure!
They offer free use of computers Free printing Free wifi Free work space  Dvd rentals for cheap.  Free Recycling stickers  Quiet place to get some work and printing done.
The staff is super friendly and drinks are usually cold and properly made and reasonably priced! Great beer selection and wonderful gals behind the bar!! Just what bee cave needs!!!
This place was great! I wish they had more room because we were eating on the way back to Houston and it would have been nice to sit and enjoy the biscuits!
East Van hole-in-the-wall in the style of all classic hole-in-the-walls: tasty food + questionable cleanliness + rock bottom prices.  Friends speak well of their Adobo Chicken, went for that and added Pancit Bihon (fried noodles with shredded chicken & veg). Hoped it would be enough for two hungry humans. Silly us, these two dishes were enough to feed 3 or 4 normal Vancouverites.   The food was good - nothing amazing, just solid homestyle cooking reminiscent of meals made by my Filipino friends' parents back in the day. We'll definitely be back.  Pro tip: 2015 Entertainment Book nets $8 off a two entree order, it was so inexpensive for what we got that we actually felt kind of guilty about it.
Smaller place in the area. You may overlook it because it is on the side street.  However,  nice pub with great service.  Be sure to try the fried Avacado... It was super yummy!
Santarpio's is not just about the pie and bbq, it's about the whole experience. The neighborhood,the line, the rec room decor, the locals, and the throw back waiters all rolled into one of best classic pizza joints in Boston. The pizza itself is thin crust (corn meal on bottom) plain sauce, and the usual cast of toppings. The pies are on the small size, but very inexpensive. Not New Haven good but pretty good for Boston. Go on summer night throw back a few cold beers with a garlic and onion pizza with some friends and call it a night.
Best place for wings and beer! Service is always great and food is always fresh. My 5 year old daughter loves the chicken tenders and frys's.
I usually wash my car when I go home to Houston but the few times I have needed to wash my car I have been going to this location. Even though I live in central Austin, I come all the way down to this side of town for this place. I like that this  carwash is cheap, quick, does the job, and has free vacuums (actually, I love the free vacuums...). There are guys who scrub the tough spots that the machine wouldn't be able to get on its own before you enter the wash, which is nice. I normally get the cheapest or middle option, but I've gotten great service every time I've been here. The last time I was here they let me go through the machine twice because my car wasn't clean enough - thank you. Today when I visited again, the attendant by the pay station asked me when was the last time I treated myself to a $13 wash, to which I responded with silence and a half-grin, and Roland, the manager, gave me a complimentary $13 wash!! Shout out to Palms because I used that money to go towards my dinner tonight  See you guys next time!
We picked a crowded Sunday to check out the aquarium.  It had some great exhibits both inside and outside.    I enjoyed the beluga whale exhibit you can view them from both the inside and outside.  As well as the otter exhibit.  The otter exhibit, those little guys like the attention and they are real cute.  There was a frog exhibit inside that was interesting as well as informative.  Some of them are going instinct, which is a good indication of change in the ecosystem.  Interesting information on the north pole as well.    All in all informative but try to avoid the weekends if you can as they are jam packed.  We found using our credit card out at the kiosk outside was quicker for ingress than waiting in line to pay in person which we would have paid via credit card anyway so that just made the process quicker.  Also, there is an aquarium employee outside by the kiosk on this particular weekend in case you have any difficulties.  I loved the soda and water machines that took credit cards.  Canada has it all over the US in that regard as anyone with a credit card can buy a soda and not worry about exact change or which currency you were carrying.  I'd visit this place again.
Great staff, wonderful service. The wine list is top notch, and the wine by the bottle prices are pretty good as well.  The steaks were amazing, perfectly cooked and the side dishes were done well too. I highly recommend the Boulder Cork
I've been going here for 7 years since moving to Newton and really can't imagine a better barbershop.  Tony, Greg and their dad all do a great job and the feel of the place is very relaxed and welcoming - some of the people clearly have known each other for many years, others are brand new.  They're also great with boys, and the fact that my wife enjoys taking our two sons (3 and 9) says a lot.
Definitely sweet, and definitely rich, but also definitely the freshest donuts I've ever had. Our table got the Black Betty (blackberry, cream cheese, cinnamon, and honey) and Dirty Harry (donut holes with chocolate and coconut). I personally preferred the Betty because the fruit cut through the sugar, though the Harry makes for a better photoshoot with its little cauldron bowl. I don't know if I'm ready for donut burgers, but the desserts are an experience!
Dude, dude... dude! This place is awesome and by awesome, I mean totally surreal. A ghetto little gym in SE that fulfills it's functional and pragmatic purpose. You can go there and lift weights or run on a treadmill, but the real value lies in the totally old school atmosphere and the happiness such atmosphere affords. The walls are lined with old pictures of weight lifting dudes, the place is filled with regular joes in cut off sweat pants and the equipment is ancient.
Last week, I had a brilliant cup of Costa Rican coffee here.  It was medium-bodied, smooth and lacked the awful, acid inducing heartburn found in $4 cups of Starbucks.    {However, one should expect brilliant coffee from George Howell, one of the most recognized and respected names in coffee.  He's the owner of Terroir (served at True Grounds) and former owner of the once adored Coffee Connection, which used to be sprinkled throughout the Boston area before Starbucks bought them out.}   This morning, a blueberry scone delighted the palette and made me wish I'd bought one more for later.  It was so good, it's hard to believe the English invented it.   Oh, and to the calm, cheery people working the counter at 8 am, thanks so much.  You were so pleasant, for a few moments, I thought I was in sunny California.
The first time I went here they would have gotten one star. Their food and service quality has gone up. They have really good pizza, really good wings and good burgers. And really yummy alcohol. Sometimes it gets crowded.
Great service. The place looked clean and tidy. I did not have to wait long for take out. I ordered the roast lamb and Kalamari dinner. The roast lamb was flavourful and tender. The Kalamari was done to perfection - very crispy and tender when I got it home. The container holding the Kalamari had a hole on top already to prevent it from getting soggy. It was more than enough for the 2 of us. We had leftovers for the next day.
I ordered a large order from here via foodler for a work related program and they were timely with the delivery. The food was delicious and was enjoyed by everyone. I particularly enjoyed the palak paneer. A quick note about the portions: I ordered from the catering menu and the size large pan, though stated that it's for 10 people, can definitely feed 20! We had so much leftover. Will be ordering from here again in the future.
I wish Menchie's had more flavors. There are roughly a dozen choices versus 30-40 at local ice cream shops. Their pineapple is my favorite but they just Introduced Keylime which is also excellent. The variety of toppings is their strength but their product is a little expensive. For two cups of yogurt we never escape for under $15. When John Travolta whined about the cost of a shake in Pulp Fiction he was astonished to pay five dollars for an Ice cream drink. If he came here, he might tear off his hair piece in frustration. So unless you are a cost-conscious Scientologist, you will likely enjoy Menchie's.
Paid $32 for a complete wash, and was happy with the results. I typically go to a MooMoo or some other automatic wash, but this is MUCH better because the "finishers" (guys who wipe down the car) get all the spots the machines missed.
Kate is a wonderful young woman to work with- professional, kind, and generous with her time.  If the lighting changes just at the end of a shoot, she'll stick it out to help you get the perfect shot.  Skip the studio style photos and go for natural light with Kate.  In addition, she does wonderful editing and will work with whatever needs or aesthetic vision you might have in mind.  Although she has done a large amount of musician headshots and family photos, she is great for fitness/yoga/pilates teachers and couples.  Book her, stat!
Went here for my husbands holiday party a few nights ago, the inside is cute, funky and eclectic. Love the comic strip type art in the bathroom.   On to the food, we had a set menu with three courses, first course was tapa dishes, which we had about 7 of. My favorite was the ceviche although the octopus was a bit over cooked it was delicious , with the most perfectly cooked scallop to top it. Everything was tasty and unique.   Second course was the paella, the squid ink one was amazing, squid ink doesn't have a strong taste, I can just say it's savory I guess, the saffron one took second, giant full shrimps topped which we all fought for, so so good.   Third course was desert, I have a sweet tooth so I was excited for this part.  We had creme brûlée, the top so perfectly crisp and the custard had the perfect amount of lemon, very good. We also got what I think was a cheese cake with goat cheese ice cream. Let me tell you I'm not a fan of cheesecake but the crust alone was soo yummy and the cheese part wasn't too cheesy which was perfect!   This place is so good, so good that it will be a top choice for when we have friends and family visit!  Now let me tell you also, we had a few friends at dinner who had food allergies, Barlata went above and beyond with separate menus which were also full of flavor and uniquely put together. It was great!So many times I've seen my friends get served plates of boiled veggies because of their allergies but they felt very included here. Nice job Barlata!
I give four stars for the Manager and the food..Service was horrible, food was amazing and manager John is very experienced with guest recovery. Great ambiance and still kinks to be worked out.  Would advise you to go at a slow hour for your first experience. Have faith it will improve.
I'm really not a Jamaican food eater; however this food was banging.  I ate it cold so I could imagine what it would taste like hot.  I  encourage all that can and will try Dat Fire Jerk Chicken.
Delish! Stopped in on a random Sunday and so glad I did. Normally when eating healthy I have found making good choices while eating out can be hard. But here the options are endless and sound so good. I got the Bombay bowl which was so filling and my sister got the avocado crunch wrap which she said she loved. All in all customer service was fabulous, food was fresh and totally tasty.
I enjoy living at Avana! The complex is in a great location convenient to shopping, restaurants, and the interstate. The office staff (Brittni, Dereck, and Antwoin) are all super nice and professional. They do a great job with planning resident appreciation events and they respond promptly to inquiries. The maintenance crew is also very nice and responsive. I would recommend this property to anyone looking to make Atlanta their home!
This has got the be the busiest Wawa in Orlando! Stopped on my way to work to get a bacon egg cheese croissant. i had to wait five minutes as they were cooking, The store on crowded as everyone was buying breakfast and/or lunch.  My sandwich was crispy on the outside and soft on the inside. The bacon was crispy and it was just GOOD when I bit into it. Love this breakfast sandwich.  The coffee fresh, hot and just darn good!  This place is like a DRUG and the addiction has begun!!!
Definitely one of my favorite places for vietnamese grub! Very authentic and although they hardly speak english, the people here are really nice. Will always recommend others to try it.
great lunch special $5.50 - chicken teriyaki and soda.  clean, nicely decorated establishment.  a good choice of sauces to douse with -  Load up the Siracha 'til my nose runs and runs
I love Retro game night!  This was my fourth time! And I signed up for an annual pass. Even more excited for their upcoming events and exhibits.  The history center has something for everyone! I love that they are in an old courthouse too. There are several floors and rooms to explore.  The staff has always been friendly,  knowledge and welcoming.
After only about a 20 minute wait on a busy weekend night, the friendly staff was able to get our party of 12 (8 kids!) seated and we were soon thoroughly enjoying a great Mexican dinner with nice portions.  This place will definitely be on our list each time we visit the Orlando area.
Great food & Service,glad i stopped in for the 1st time,may u all have a great 2018. buy local stay local,thank you
I had a piece of metal stuck in my tire so I went over to Leal's. They patched the tire in 15 minutes for $15 and I was on my way. The service was friendly, quick, and efficient.  Highly recommend!
Love this place!!  No matter what lady I get she always does a perfect job.  The service has always been quick and neat, and a mani/pedi is only $30.
Great value, lots of gluten free options and very nice staff.
I love this place! I have lost several inches all over since I started about a month ago. I've only been to Robert's class in the afternoon, but I hear the other instructors are awesome! Robert is very helpful and professional. The gym is clean with no weird gym smells.
Good quality, affordable, men's hair cuts.  What more can one ask for?
Nice place, good people, huge menu. Toast burned, but potatoes, poached egg and oatmeal were very good. I did not even ask for almond or soy milk for the coffee. Woburn is not progressive. Reasonable prices.
The best corned beef hash I have ever had on the north shore. Fast and polite service.
Been here twice. Both times had amazing (5 star) food. The first time around I had some delicious sushi and the second time I had the stir-fry oxtopus that was out of this world! Service been average both times. Will totally be back for some more of the yummy food!
I had a great experience at this pep boys and thought I would share.  My brakes started grinding last week so I got it in there as fast as I could.  This location is very convenient to where I work so I thought I would give them a try.  When I came in, I was greeted by Lawrence who was very friendly and told me he would call me as soon as he had a chance to look at them.  He called back around 30 min later to let me know both sets of brake pads needed to be replaced as well as the rotors on the back set.  Lawrence was willing to send me photos and  give me coupons to help with the price.  I would definitely bring my car here again for repairs and ask specifically for Lawrence.  I am glad I now have a go-to place that is also very convenient!
As they say, you get what you pay for. It could be true for some of the luxurious purchases we've had. Some just ride on their name but truly their quality is awful.   What made Tanner Goods stand out is they are local. They have excellent service and gives advice for people like me who needs advice in how to keep my denim well. Yes, besides leather goods they also sell clothes. A bit spendy than most generic stores that you might go like Macy's, Target, Fred Meyer but they all pale in comparison when you'll compare the details of merchandise they have.   Sure, I could use a nice pencil. Mind you, they are cute but not for $10. But there are items like shirts, key fobs, coasters that are also well made and could fit your budget.   This is the place if you're looking to give me a gift. Don't worry, I accept gifts for any occasion. I don't need to have a local and US made product all the time but when I can, I do it right. And this is the place for some of it.
I just discovered this gem yesterday when I was only seeking a brow wax. Jessica took such good care of me. It was the best chocolate wax ever!  I had to come back the very next day for the best facial. I'm super pleased. This is my new fave place for sure.
My girlfriend and I stopped by Retro Station after hearing that there were new owners. As soon as we walked in, we noticed the changes. The atmosphere is a fun, 50's theme. Very cool. We ordered the cheese garlic bread and a deep dish pizza. I must tell you, the garlic bread was exceptional and the pizza is one of the best I have tried in a long time. The service was awesome and the owners are the sweetest people. They have really turned the place around. They made us feel like very special customers and made sure that we enjoyed our night. We will definitely be going back!!
The best fried clams in the city (state? East coast?) are served at B&G, no question.  Add the freshly made tartar sauce and it's heavenly!  A good secret is that they take reservations on the day-of, after 11am.  Sometimes you'll get stuck at a table that's too small for your party, but if you improvise, share plates and get cozy, you'll have a great time!  Or sit at the bar and watch the chefs prepare each plate and shuck oyster after oyster - you'll even get to see Barbara in action every now and then. Try the rieslings that are on the wines-by-the-glass menu as a great complement to a salty, briny oyster plate.  And save room for dessert!!
I went there tonight for my second time. I just moved to Columbus within the last 4 months. The first time I went I ordered the Hoffbrau Schnitzel. It was really good. Cooked well and the mushroom gravy was delicious. I ordered it with a side of smashed potatoes and wow were they good. I tried the Sauerkraut and I wanted to like it, I just couldn't. Glad I tried it though.   I went again tonight and I went with the buffet. I was not disappointed at all. Ever kind of sausage was so good, especially when adding the spicy mustard that was on the table. I had to get the smashed potatoes again. Their green beans are some of the best I have ever had. though I did notice that the green beans in the buffet were different than the green beens my mom received with her meal. Thought that was strange. Definitely recommend this place as a "must go" if you have never been there before. Plan on waiting a while if you go during dinner time, but still worth the wait. It is kind of on the pricier side (above 12 dollars a person. The buffet is $15 a person)  They did have a live band start playing at 8:30 which made it really hard to talk to your table after that. Something I didn't really care for, but it may not bother everyone. Just a personal preference, so go earlier if you don't care for loud music. Still have yet to try their beer and will be going back to try that.  Oh and I have had their peanut butter fudge cream puff each time I have went with coffee. If you don't care for trying their dinner. Do yourself a favor and at least go for coffee and dessert. Great coffee and an amazing cream puff!
I cannot tell you if it is authentic Cuban food or not since I am not Cuban,but after eating so much Cuban food for a year in the Mecca of Cuban food in the country (Miami) I believe my review could be a helpful. I went here with a Groupon and wanted to give this place a try, third place trying Cuban food outside of Miami, I hoped this place wouldn't disappoint me like the others. I went with a friend who also had Cuban food in Miami before and also had high expectations. As I walked in, I saw (and heard!) a big group of Cuban people having lunch there (if Cubans eat there, that's a good sign!). The people there were friendly and we got sat down right away. I was very happy with the menu and was happy to find many of my favorites in there (tostones, yuca frita, ropa vieja, vaca drita, palomilla, cubano, etc). I went ahead and ordered yuca frita as an appetizer and ropa vieja with congris (arroz moro) and maduros. I was disappointed that the yuca frita came with refried beans type of sauce instead of cilantro garlic sauce, like it does in many Cuban restaurants. The yuca fritas were too fried, too hard. The ropa vieja was good, although a little too hard. The congris did not have a lot of flavor but I was satisfied anyway. Overall, it was a good place. Close to what I would consider authentic from Miami. I will definitely come back because I am sure this is as authentic as it will ever get in a town with a very very small Cuban population.
I just recently bought a 2017 Toyota Camry se and couldn't be more happy. The sales guy Mati was very professional and answered all my questions and was very nice. I traded in my 2014 Toyota Tacoma which had a salvaged title which I found out about two years later and they basically paid it off for me. Every other dealerships I went to didn't come close to what Beaverton Toyota offered me for Tacoma so I made right choice going back 2 days later.  Got a brand new car and happy to get out of my salvaged Tacoma. Mati was Outstanding and would definetly recommend this place to anyone who wants to purchase a vehicle.
I've been coming to Modern Pilates off and on for 2 years. I'm back on again and really a fan of their new studio space, which they've been in since sometime last year (2011).  Pilates gives me a different kind of weight training experience and has helped me keep my volleyball skills sharp as I get older. It also helps to reduce my back twinges and reduce, more importantly, the size of my stomach.  They really do have some of the best instructors in the city and I've enjoyed everyone whose class I've taken. They know their stuff and really do a great job of pinpointing my individual issues and isolating the movements so I can't cheat my way through a workout by using my stronger shoulders as opposed to my weaker abs.  If anything, I feel a bit like an outlier because I'm one of the few guys who takes classes there (which could be a positive or negative for you). It would be nice if the changing room was more than just a camouflaged utility closet, but it's better than nothing, I guess. The staff does a nice job with customer service as well, but sometimes last minute changes can be difficult.  Overall, I have no problem recommending this place for anyone who's looking for a great Pilates workout!
Excellent food and service.   I had Wonton soup and Szechuan Chicken, both tasted very good, and were presented well.   Several nice touches in the service, and a friendly and welcoming staff.  This is a hidden gem in Orlando.
There are so few coffee shop options up north beside the typical Starbucks chains, so I was pretty stoked to find this place by stumbling across their groupon deal.They always seem to have a living social or groupon online!  There's a limited amount of seating and plugs on the wall, but I haven't had any problems since I've only been here on a weekday. Great atmosphere to get some work done.  My favorite is the iced chai so far since I have a sweet tooth with my drinks and their menu definitely has a lot more of those for me to try. It also helps they have food on their menus in case you want to work through lunch and stays all day.
Never met a Cactus Club I didn't like!   Have eaten here twice in the last week, both times because this location tends to be less crowded than the other Cacti in Vancouver, and I'm always sure to get a booth here. The service leaves little room for fault-finding, and the food is standard Cactus fare -- i.e., predictably good (but not outstanding -- i.e., exactly what one comes to Cactus for).   The men's room is clean, spacious, and well appointed with couch and fireplace. Aaaaaand, the servers are good at, and seem to enjoy, their jobs, which makes all the difference in the dining experience.   For anyone seeking a very satisfying dinner for two for under $100, Cactus is a great go-to option.  Well deserved 5-stars.
I bought a groupon for two for $59.00 for the sushi making class. It was a really great deal when a regular class at full price is $60.00 each person.  The location is pretty nice. Brookline is very nice and fancy and despite not having a parking lot, there was a good amount of street parking to spare.   The actually restaurant was small.  Very small. I was quite surprised how small it was really. But when everyone spread out to all the available tables, there was enough room for you to make your delicious sushi creations.  This is only an exception for this particular class, but because there was a party that reserved the time spot after our class. Our class ended up being extremely over booked. It says online that the maximum is about 12 people. I think we had about 23. So this very small room because CRAMPED.  I went with my boyfriend an another couple. And we had to wait a while to get to the bar in order to get out ingredients. Then we were stuck in a  spot behind the counter, in the corner without a knife to cut our sushi.  There were a lot of ingredients. Crab, cucumber, spicy tuna, salmon, smoked salmon, regular tuna. It was a lot to work with, which was a lot of fun. I don't know much about Sushi though, so I was always wondering 'will this taste good together??'  So I wish they gave out a paper wither what some sushi has in it to mimic.   We ended up making about 4 rolls each because we were the only people not able to cut our Sushi and eat it like all the others.  The teacher was VERY nice and funny and I'm not sure if it was his wife that was helping or not, but she was very nice and fun too.   We took the C1 beginner's class and in the beginning we were given a sheet on how to make the perfect rice, which was really helpful and answered a good amount of questions.   All in all. I'd really like to go back and take a more accelerated course and just hope that the class isn't over booked that time.
Thank you for the beautiful work on my daughter's nails. This was a special treat for her birthday! Now my husband wants to come in for a massage.   Very clean salon and nice people.
Called these guys up at 11pm the other night to get some much needed group for my well-drank and poorly fed group. We ordered onion rings as an app (super oily and terrible for you but hey that means they actually taste good).   One guy somehow ordered more plates of food than would fit on the table and they were gone within 15 minutes. I would assume he liked his.  I ordered the meatloaf sandwich, which I've had many times and always love. The only issue with the sandwich is that it has the Captain Crunch effect on the roof of my mouth? Weird, but worth the trouble.  Anyways, it's quite nice that this place has a kitchen open til 1am. Seriously? I had no idea you could get good food like this that late. If you come for lunch or dinner, you may have to wait, but it's worth it.  This is also the place that I took my girlfriend on our first date. Since the food was really good and our mouths were always full, it cut back a bit on the awkwardness.
I'm a pretty health conscious guy who doesn't eat many donuts in a year, but when I do ..... it's going to be Blue Star or Pip's. Each Blue Star location has a unique selection of consistently high quality donuts that are just interesting and weird enough to make stopping in a treat. And unlike the pink-boxed donuts everyone lines up for, Blue Star's donuts aren't giant, obscenely sugary, relatively flavorless, or greasy. In fact, they're exactly the opposite: compact in size, strong in flavor, and fresh tasting.   When you want to break your diet or treat yourself, friends, and family, to foodie Portland, Blue Star is the place to go.
Great food. Recommend the grilled shrimp app, white bean soup, Brussels sprouts, risotto, and lamb. Great wine selection and interesting cocktail menu.   Good service. Friendly hostess and server. Good wine presentation. Nice outdoor seating.   The fire pits outside are fabulous and offer something different. Call ahead to reserve one. Upscale ambience.
Delicious crepes in a wide variety. I haven't been tempted to try anything other than the sweet crepes, but those are quite tasty.   The loyalty card is a good bargain too.
So delicious! Came here with a friend after taking a pole dancing class nearby. Good quality espresso and the salmon toast was delicious! I'm definitely coming back :)
I've had the pleasure of working with Mandy at a number of weddings and also being a part of the weddings & special events industry, I can see the difference between a quality planner and a hack in this saturated landscape.  Mandy is absolutely of the former, with the rare quality of being on top of her game -- yet is always calm and collected.  Never during the events I worked with her did I sense that she was overwhelmed and everything always went off smoothly and without a hitch!  A Planner's vibe sets the tone for the rest of the vendors working an event and if I had a Planner like Mandy to work with every weekend, I'd jump on the opportunity.
This might be the best Chinese buffet in Austin Texas. Clean, friendly, with good food as long as you go during lunch or dinner hours (it gets pretty stale during off hours, but that seems to be an issue with most buffet places). Their sushi bar is out of this world with freshness and selection. I've been going here for years, and I'd say 80% of my trips have been very satisfactory, with my only so-so experiences being when I've gone during off hours. The dessert bar is okay, but they have a ton of fresh fruit and their apple crisp is very good.
Great atmosphere and music! Food was awesome! Best Fish Tacos I've ever had! Jerk Chicken Pasta was even better!
Amazing family run northern Indian cuisine. The food is very authentic. It's just as good or if not better than one of the top ranked Indian restaurants in NYC off 53rd and 2nd. You can taste each spice in the chicken vindaloo. Beware ordering your dish spicy. It will make you sweat. Stick with medium. Two thumbs up!
My favorite pizza place in Portland. Great place to stop in for a slice. Crispy, thin crust with delicious ingredients. Also cool that the offer homemade sodas with unique flavors.
The Rosewood Chiropractic staff treated me kindly, and with care.  It was difficult to schedule an appointment online (within a two week range) for a male massage therapist.  However, the male that I was scheduled with was fantastic!  He listened and worked on problem areas. I highly recommend this facility to anyone looking for a massage that exceeds expectations!
As a celiac diner, I had an incredible experience at Pammy's for my anniversary dinner. Our waiter, Blake, was super knowledgeable and attentive, and asked the kitchen about anything that he wasn't 100% sure about. The food was delicious-- everything from the antipasti board to the asparagus to the gluten free pasta. Cool and inviting ambiance, lively without being too loud to talk, friendly staff, the full package. Definitely lived up to the hype.
I used this company to move from NW Portland to Vancouver. The two guys from Willamette Valley Moving did a great job. They were very efficient and quick. They basically started running the minute they pulled in to my driveway and didn't stop until the move was done. I had everything organized and packed up which helped with the efficiency. I had a simple move so the two hour minimum worked perfectly for me, and they certainly earned their tip!
This was my first time at Papi's and I fell in LOVE with it!! The ambience is very trendy with the perfect Latin flair to it. The food, so tasteful!! I loved how juicy my chicken was, and the seasoning was on point!!! The service there is also very friendly and helpful! I will most definitely be returning here. I was very impressed with the quality of the food and the pricing was very reasonable! Loved it here!!
I have been taking Pilates classes at Body Mechanics for the last two years.  They have changed everything about my body.  The level of care and quality of teaching is unparalleled.  The staff and members are like a family and everyone is welcomed and encouraged.  All of the teachers spend time with each student whether in an amazing individual session or in a class.  You are always shown the correct position and given modifications if you need them.  You can always find a class that fits your schedule and none will disappoint.  I really encourage everyone to take advantage of the private sessions as it will change your life.  You won't find a better Pilates studio in Portland.
I love Forest Park. I live in St. Johns and go there at least 3 times a week with my dog to wear her out. I spend most of my time on the Newton Road trailhead and have a few loops around there that I love to watch change with the seasons.   Confession: Forest Park has a strict leash requirement which I consistently break with my dog. I know this is bad and naughty. I do keep my dog under control and as a canine good citizen and wildlife conservation dog, she is very well trained.   That said, I have a big concern. The last time I was in the park, a park employee or volunteer was out spraying herbicides on the blackberries to get rid of them. They told me my dog should be on leash because, 1.) them's the rules and 2.) the herbicide can cause serious eye damage to animals that come in contact with it. As long as we stay on the trail, it should be fine, they told me. This concerned me greatly because, of course, I don't want my dog near any kind of herbicide that can make it go blind and more importantly, no one gave that memo to the wild birds, rodents and mammals that live in the park. Such a bummer! I'd happily thrown in extra time to help eradicate blackberries manually or contribute to a fund that would employ workers to tear out the blackberries in a way that doesn't involve dangerous poison.   Anyway. Yelp always filters my reviews, so this will probably never see the light of day, but thought park fans should know that there are dangerous herbicides being sprayed throughout the park and to be careful not to let your dog come into contact with them.
After searching for reasonably priced/good quality nail places in the tri-cities, I am happy to have for Elegancy Nail! Seriously awesome service, relaxing atmosphere and fantastic pricing. A lot of nail places you feel rushed through, but Elegancy gives you a true 'spa' like experience.  Furthermore, they gel colour polish manicure I did lasted 3 weeks! No chipping, no flaking.
I don't know why the other people have given them a bad review.  I ordered a lot of food last night for a birthday party.  Not only was the food FANTASTIC , the people were very helpful in determining how much food I would  need. The service was fast, the process was easy and they were very nice.  I will go back for sure and would tell my friends to do so as well!
Leaky Roof is one of our favorite places for date night.  You really can't beat the country fried chicken - I don't think I've ever had a better one.  Also, the shepherd's pie is great, and I also love the salads and burgers.  The fire is cozy, and it's often possible to get good deals through Groupon or their direct text deals.  There are a few dishes that I would not recommend - the salmon on the cedar plank was quite dry the one time I had it.  And the smoked platter was not my favorite.  That could be personal taste, though.  Great Happy Hour, but can be crowded unless you show up early...
Love RF - always dependable, always reliable.  Great bar, extensive, but reasonably priced wine list. Had one of my faves - pork carnitas.  Pull off chunks of nest, wrap them in melt in our mouth pillows of flour tortillas, and there isn't much better.
I recently had Texas Flooring install hardwoods in my house as well as carpet and they did a exceptional job. They came to my house with in 24 hours of taking my phone call to measure. They provided me with a very competitive quote compared to other companies I had already spoken to. Billy was very knowledgeable and answered all my questions. Texas Flooring even picked up and delivered my wood  free of charge. I would highly recommend them to anyone looking for great flooring and carpet installers.
I am known for being overly wordy.... so let me say at the start that I am stressed out about keeping this review brief!  There are just too many amazing things to share about WCA.  During the holidays I wanted to bring in a thank you gift but was unsure how to proceed... I'm not into baking... a card?  Needles?  What could express my gratitude?  Well, I got distracted so here I am writing a review to say thank you and save face.  Speaking of saving face... WCA actually SAVED MY FACE!!!!  I woke up with Bell's Palsy November 17th and made it into WCA four days later after a recommendation from a friend.  Bell's Palsy is a strange inflammation of the facial nerve where half your face becomes paralyzed.  Most people take about four months to recover from what I researched, but many people do not recover or only partially recover.  I could deal with looking "different" but the discomfort was really hard to ignore.  I wanted to get better.  Not having health insurance that covered acupuncture at the time, I was unsure how to proceed.  Most acupuncturists charge a minimum of $75 a visit in my experience.  This is a lot to take on for an acute condition that requires repeat visits.  I'd driven by WCA many times, as it is in my neighborhood, so I decided to stop in and see if it was "for real."  How could they charge a sliding scale of $15-$35 and stay in business?  The short answer is that unlike most Western acupuncture offices, WCA practices the community acupuncture model (which they developed).  Community acupuncture more closely resembles what you might find in places where acupuncture is more traditionally practiced.  There is a room with recliner chairs and blankets where many patients are seen at once.  In this way, the acupuncturist can see more patients in one day than a typical Western practitioner and the patients can gather in what becomes a true place of healing.  Business is better for acupuncturists in community acupuncture and patients get access to affordable health care.  Check out the documentary made about WCA and the growing co-op of community acupuncture clinics: http://workingclassacupuncture.org/?id=7  At this point you may have left the review... but I warned you I get wordy...!  Okay so I went to WCA for the first time and met Adrian, an acupuncturist beyond enthusiastic about her work.  She was so positive and caring and gave me a lot of hope.  She said I should try to come in as often as possible at the beginning -at least seven of the next ten days.  So, I did.  I went into WCA as my schedule permitted and stayed for an hour each time.  I was not particular about which acupuncturists I saw, as I knew each one would have his or her own style and method of treatment.  I appreciated each and every acupuncturist who helped me and felt their individual gifts as healers.  Some are deliberate and take their time, but most are lightning fast.  Before you know it, you have tons of needles working their magic all over.  Sometimes I'd wonder.. when did she even put that needle in?! All the acupuncturists offer you blankets and check on you often.  It's extremely comforting, relaxing, and restful.    The interior of WCA Cully has reminded me of a womb from the first day.  The ceiling, walls, chairs, etc., all look soft and comforting.  This might seem weird but I really think it taps into a nurturing that is very basic and relatable.  The acupuncture's efficacy is a mystery and this swaddled up atmosphere fits right in.  There is also just a wonderful and powerful communal sense of healing here.  So many people coming in to take care of themselves and be healthy.    WCA is relaxing, welcoming, comforting, but does it actually work?  YES.  My face began improving from the first visit!  I could feel immediate improvements!  Besides that, it just gave me such relief from the discomfort and pain involved with the Bell's Palsy.  I felt very cared for each and every time I visited and the acupuncturists were always congratulating me on the improvements in healing.  I feel very vulnerable when I sit down and begin talking to each acupuncturist.  It's not always easy to share what worries or troubles you. Some people are scared of the needles.  I recommend everyone give it a try if you are curious.  The acupuncturists will go at your speed and make sure you are always comfortable.    WCA wants everyone to feel empowered to take charge of their own health and have access to affordable care.  I am so appreciative and have recommended countless people visit.  It took me about 45 days to achieve almost full recovery of my facial paralysis.  This is SO fast compared to what I've seen and heard from others!!!  I am so appreciative and now 3 months later and with my face 99.9% functional, I find myself back at WCA for help with other issues.  Maybe I just like resting in the womb in a recliner with blankets.  But really, I know WCA is my best option for healthcare.  And how lucky am I to have them close by!
Very nice Ambience, Service was great and Food is Delicious! My husband and I love Indian food and this is our first time here and what a great first impression for this place! Love it and would definitely recommend!
Gorgeous resort.  My girlfriend got a great deal for a non-savanna view room.  Upon check in I asked if it was possible to get an upgrade.  They accommodated and gave us a room overlooking the savanna, near their farm.  What a great view!  Early in the morning it seemed like every animal on the property would flock here.  The resort itself is absolutely beautiful.  Each evening we would just wander around.  We ate at Sanaa and Boma.  Both were great, but after 2 nights, I was ready for some non-African food.  The only downside is that the resort is far from all the other resorts and parks (except Animal Kingdom) though taking the buses was convenient.
First time here at D'lites. I had the chocolate pretzel ice cream and my daughter had the title cheesecake ice cream. They were both very good. Flavors weren't very distinguishable but tasty in their own right. It was really just as good as many other soft serve ice creams i have had and at only 50 calories a serving and no sugar, I was impressed. There was a fun toy ice cream stand for my daughter to play with and a chalk board wall with chalk for her to draw on.  All in all a great no guilt treat, especially for the summertime. I'll be going back :)
Best lamb tips and BBQ sausage. Pizza is best around. It's a dive. But worth going to.
Delicious food, fun atmosphere, beautiful desserts. If you like Ethiopian food or want to try it, go here. :)
Delicious and nutritious!  Came here late Tuesday night and ordered the ceviche chalupa. Party in my mouth, seriously!  The chalupa stayed crunchy even though I dumped the whole side of salsa that it came with on it.  I loved how it was made. They did not skimp out on the ingredients.  I was full after one! I also had the black tea which was perfect on a TX summer night.  For the price, quality, and really the most important thing--the taste, I'm sold!   Bufalo Bob, I'll be back!
Great atmosphere. The staff is excellent and they have a deep knowledge of wine and food. It's a great place for special occasions and we saw several birthdays being celebrated. The food was good, but a few items were a bit bland for my taste. Be in no rush and bring several dollars, it isn't cheap nor would you expect it to be.
My visit from Vancouver, BC, was definitely worth the trip!!  Can't wait to drive back and try out the new gym when it opens across the river.
I just bought three bar chairs from here, and my sales rep, Ryan, was extremely friendly and professional. Great price and service.
Awesome family restaurant. The chicken and jellyfish salad with Chinese radish, cucumbers and carrots is SO tasty and perfect for the summer!! Also their Kung Pao chicken (diced chicken with chilies and peanuts) is the best I've ever had in Vancouver. Hits the spot.
I went to Bob's on Friday for some take out with my friends.   I walked inside and immediately noticed the small market charm along with a rich aroma of Italian food.   The staff was very nice and helpful. I ordered a jumbo chicken cutlet parm sandwich. The bread was soft and warm....it was also filled with a generous portion of meat, cheese, sauce etc. at an extremely low price. Overall.....delicious.  I wish I could give 4 1/2 stars instead of 4, but the only complaint I have that Bob's has a very small bakery selection. If ownership ever looks to expand, I would suggest having a full bakery counter with all sorts of Italian pastries. This would make Bob's untouchable!
I don't know a lot about bubble tea but I know I love what they are sellin' to be at Bubble World!  The prices are quite decent for bubble tea and I am not addicted to the Milky Mango Ice Cream Slush! It's like a milkshake with a super sweet fruity flavor, drools!  This location serves up food and apparently a lot of bad rap music. They have a decent amount of seating but it is almost always full, I find it too loud in there but it's perfect for grabbing a delicious beverage to go!
Food was great.  The pepper chicken is the best.  This place is neat and clean.  The staf  are sweet.  I recomend them to anyone !!
I always get Pad See Ew or the Pho and it is great the owner also lets me know he does not use MSG which is a plus! Though it is in a obscure location If you are traveling in Atlanta and know about this place it is a hidden gem with good service I would recomment it!
There are tons of froyo places in Austin, but this one is definitely noteworthy. The texture of the yogurt is perfect and the flavors are pretty diverse. They are pretty good about rotating flavors, but makes sure to keep the classics. They also do seasonal flavors which is really nice and during Christmas time introduced different flavors every week or so. I thought it was a nice touch to keep things different and add a little flare. It also kept me wanting to come back each time to try the new flavors! Toppings are also nice and fresh. The sizes are great, which I only point out after visiting another place and wishing I could cut the toppings in a quarter of their size. They also have a rewards program that gives you a few free ounces almost every other time you visit. It's worth looking into - the program even has an app!
My friends and I were in town at Universal and wanted to skip the chain restaurants and Theme Park food...we decided to try this place out and were not disappointed. Authentic Mexican food and friendly homey environment. Will definitely be back our next trip to Orlando.
Just call her angel of the hemming, AN-GEL Just take in my dress before I leave, BA-BY. Just call her angel of the hemming, AN-GEL then slowly turn away from me.  Ok, maybe she wasn't Chip Taylor's inspiration for Angel of the Morning, but I still get that song stuck in my head every time I drop stuff off to be altered.  Great service and great quality!  I have been coming here for a few years now, and have never been disappointed.  The owner is very warm and friendly and her prices are extremely reasonable.  She specializes in weddings and quinceaneras, and can do anything from intricate formalwear to hemming a pair of pants.  Every time I come in, I feel like I'm talking to a long lost friend.
Michael and company are fantastic! All the beer is tasty and fair prices on everything. All the comments on here about the hours and dogs. It's a functioning brewery first and foremost run mainly by Michael and his wife so the hours reflect that. I know some want to tear it up into the wee hours, but this place is what it is a brewery. And the rules about dogs aren't the owners rules they are the states so if you have an issue with that take it up with your state legislature.
Nice pub ambience, on the small side with just a few seats at the actual bar itself.  Comfortable booths, several tables and chairs.  We arrived at around 1:30 on drizzly Saturday afternoon and there was plenty of seating available, so we grabbed a booth.  Instantly attended to and the staff was super friendly and helpful.  I don't know what probs other reviewers had, but we had none.    We enjoyed the Proletariat Red, simply delicious and not too hoppy, not too sweet...just riiiiiight.     I had the chicken ciabatta club sandwich and Mother Mary was it delicious!  Thick salty bacon, freshly grilled & slightly smoky chicken breast, sliced red onion and all the fixings on a warm and chewy ciabatta roll - which was a carb lover's wet dream.   Chose the tomato soup (oh how I wanted those fries but alas, the starchy carbs of the ciabatta roll cancelled those out)....  My compadre enjoyed a Blue Cheese burger or something of that sort.  Had mushrooms and crumbled bleau cheese on his beef.     I know he thoroughly enjoyed it  because he had visible and audible Foodgasms -  moaned and groaned through his entire meal.   He then emailed me later to tell me how fantastic his food was and can we please go back there soon!?  If you're ambling around Westmoreland/Sellwood (this is not technically Sellwood - but whatever)  and you're hungry, stop in here for sure.  Great little neighborhood pub!
Always suspicious of getting royally screwed when it comes to household repair calls, but this company is perhaps the best we have ever dealt with.  Courteous phone staff who take the calls and promptly get a repairman out and the repairman was so great.  He quickly analyzed the problem with our dryer and soon had the part in and we were up and running with a reasonable service fee.  Couldn't recommend this company enough.  Big 5 stars.
Went here Monday with a Gilt city deal and ended up trying a whole lot more! The oysters and bottle of muscadet which was the deal were delightful. Next we ordered the plateau which was nothing short of magical and oustanding. The ceviche was on point, perfect level of acidity with sweet peppers and gorgeous fresh fish. Not a fan of the littleneck clams but that's just a personal preference, however, the shrimp cocktail was delicious, a classic and a goodie. The dressed lobster with loads of fresh herbs was heavenly and the char-grilled octopus with green chili's and blistered snow peas I could probably eat for the rest of my life. The octopus was so tender and rich and the peas and peppers added a necessary brightness that elevated the entire dish. The service was fantastic, very friendly, welcoming, quick and knowledgeable about the menu. No complaints about the automatically added 20% tip. If you don't like it, don't go out to eat! We would gladly return!
Best sushi place. Been a regular for years. Highly recommend the Chicken Kaarage Bowl
My favorite Vietnamese restaurant in town. I love the pho and the vermicelli bowls. I've tried many other places and none compare.
Worth a visit just for  the unparalleled view of Portland! $10/adult, you can do a self guided tour or have a guide. We didn't have much time so we went self-guided, the tidbits I overheard from a guide wee very interesting and added to the experience so I suggest doing a guided tour.  Be sure to stop by the rose garden near here as well.
Whenever I fly into Portland, I take the earliest flight and drive straight to the Tin Shed.   Delicious Blood Marys and very good food. Anything I've ordered has not disappointed.
"We'll cross that bridge when we get there." But what if we need to cross a bridge just to get there? I'd cross a mountain to get to Sapporo.   Momofuku and Baohaus have ruined Pork Buns for me, and I never thought I'd find decent ones in Boston. But at $5.50 for two, Sapporo's are a steal. And better than decent. Done deal. Miso has never been my favorite, but the Spicy Miso Ramen gives me a run for my money. Soft, dense grains of the white stuff glide down your throat, and if you add a red-hot kick of chili, you really start to taste the spicy ground pork. Yum. I've had no broth more perfect than the Kimchee Ramen with its chewy al dente noodles. The kimchee packs some punch, and an addition of spicy ground pork is just perfect.  I never want to go to Porter Square, but it takes about the same amount of time to get to as Allston's Super 88, the only food court that rival the Shops so if you say Sapporo I'll come running. So keep up the good work Sapporo, I think you also put Lesley University on the map.
Probably one of my favorite places, I loved the brunch so so good, the service was really good too, their bloody Mary's- amazing :) I had the Brie sandwich and means my friends shared the dynamite roll and the ahi poke as appetizers and it was delish! Highly recommend
Yes, it can be pricey.  However, if you watch the store flyer it actually has some pretty good sales (especially on coffee beans and seasonal fresh fruits).    The store has a nice bulk bin selection for nuts, dried fruit, snacks, and candy.  I am addicted to the flax-infused corn chips.  As a gourmet store, you will find interesting goods and high-quality produce.  The deli and cheese counter offer a wide array of delicious goods.  Always make sure to ask for a sample taste before buying.  The staff is friendly and helpful.  And for any potential shoplifters, be warned -- they do watch you.  On my last visit, the police were removing a cuffed offender from the store ;-)
This place is the best kept secret!  Do NOT try to do this at the Post Office.  The people here are super helpful and I literally didn't even sit down.  A huge thanks to the workers here.  Everyone is friendly and they do it with a smile.
We ended up here as sort of a company "after-party".  We had a great time.  The outside ambiance was really nice (although pretty dusty/dirty).  We had fun playing ping-pong and drinking.  The bartender was really nice and she had beers cracked and drinks poured amazingly fast.  Very cool place to sweat and drink.
This shop embodies what I love about Austin.  In one word:  original.  There is a pleasant variety of very unique items.  I've purchased jewelry, candles, cards and even a stuffed cat (not real) for my son.  Three cheers for Take Heart!
Definitely the best Indian food in town. I'm not used to Indian food costing more than $20 so the prices were quite shocking. I understand the dishes are unique and it's not your average Indian place. The menu was great, had a hard time choosing what to get. Good selection of drinks. Quite dim inside, good fast service.  I hate places that you can't make a reservation at. What I did like about Vij's is that there's a lounge you can order a drink in and wait at until a table is ready. In the lounge someone comes around every now and then with some small bites too. My drink took ages to come, by then I was seated in the main dining area. I was told it'll take 30 minutes for a table but the wait was under 20 minutes.   Tried the staff meal and got half order of Marinated duck breast in mango reduction and Kalonji curry. The half order comes with a whole bowl of rice and 2 pieces of naan bread. Half order is enough for one person. Duck was delicious! No complaints. The staff meal was a total rip off. Pork was delicious but beef and chicken and vegetables were just okay. The chicken was extremely spicy. Our server told us that most their dishes aren't spicy at all but it sure was!   Overall really good food and service. Wish I could choose the level of heat, make a reservation, and prices were slightly lower!
Probably one the best patio restaurant's in Atlanta. All of the gays and lesbians come out and drink til they are merry on this perfect patio in midtown; but don't let that deter you if you are straight, it is an equal mix of people, believe me! The restaurant is gay owned and operated, and definitely is a staple of gay Atlanta, so it is well worth mentioning. The food is pretty good (depending on what you get), and the service is always stellar. Some of those waiters have an attitude on them, but you just gotta snap those queens in their place! But seriously, it is all in good fun; I have never had a bad experience!!  The beer is cheap, and all the martini's are $5. There is regularly trivia, and there is always some reason to stop by Joe's. During the warm months, it is very hard not to just say, "why don't we meet at Joe's?", because it is the place to be. Parking can be tricky, there is a very small parking lot, but there is usually a place down the street or across the road, for pay. This is definitely a place that you will want to check out, for it's chilled atmosphere, the welcoming flair, and well, the whole package! You are bound to see me there, as we love to go to Joe's!
Chill spot.  Lax atmosphere.  It gets smokey...
Best in Boston is right! I love Le's.   Cheap pho (around $7/bowl) and such a great, chill environment. Service is spot on and super accommodating.The best part is that the pho comes out ridiculously fast. The broth is SO yummy and gives you that warm, fuzzy feeling in your tummy. Generous amount of tripe and meat!  The #14 bowl is massive. On most days I can share it with my roommate and still be full. On bad days (Saturday mornings), I can finish the #15, which is a big bowl in itself, but much smaller than the #14. My boyfriend finished the entire #14 bowl. If you have the appetite of a small bear like he does, I think coughing up an extra dollar for the extra big bowl is worth it.
Great cold brew iced coffee and tasty donuts.  The staff is very friendly and the expanded location is excellent for a quick bite or even a decent sit
Better than Voodoo. THERE I SAID IT.  As an Austinite I know I am expected to like Voodoo because of their location in Austin but they seem too gimmicky in my honest opinion. Blue Star is more subdued but still comes up with inventive flavors that do not have me thinking "what the hell did I just eat."  Great donuts, even greater line.
Received a box of assorted chocolates for Christmas.  Absolutely delicious, especially the coconut items and the truffles.  Ordering again for myself.
It was my birthday so I wanted to do a date night with my husband. I am a child of the 80s and heard about this place and was eager to try it out. Hubby and I arrived early, after reading reviews about waiting for spots to play these retro arcade games. We got there around 8 and there was a nice, pleasant crowd. The music often surprised me with a throw back from my childhood (hats off to the dj). All of the games are free to play and there wasn't a cover. The beers were reasonably priced and I didn't mind paying a little more since we were playing free games. The decor was impressive. A very interesting cocktail menu...we ordered 'Weird Science' and it was entertaining AND not bad tasting! 15$ well spent since it was a beverage that was fun and delightful.  The place started getting packed around 1030, 11 on a Thursday night. That's when you find yourself waiting for a turn on the games and so we called it a night at about 1130. Had a blast and couldn't stop ranting about it.  The only qualm I Had (which also reminded me of my youth) was the temperment of the Atari and ninetendo, having to fiddle with the games to get them to work...which wouldn't discourage me to return! It's the nature of these vintage machines. Thank you Joysticks for allowing me to relive my youth vicariously through your memorabilia, music, and all your retro touches. For my birthday I was brought back to a decade I enjoyed thoroughly!!
We used ADBF to board our very hyper German Shorthaired Pointer, while we went to the East coast, two weeks before Christmas. He had a wonderful time, and came back all in one piece, with little energy to spare. I have taken him to a places before, where we got him back with a staph infection and many other issues. Everyone here is welcoming during drop offs and pick ups, and they are great when you call to check up on your dog. Huck Loves all of the staff, and other dogs. We will use ADBF for all other boarding needs!!
These people are the best.  I don't know anything about plumbing, and I had an unusual plumbing problem at work that had to be fixed asap.  The guy was able to come up with a solution, and actually assembled the parts for me, so all I had to do at work was screw the whole assembly onto the pipe.  Then he didn't even charge me for the adhesives or for his time.  It was amazing.  I'm definitely going back if I have any plumbing trouble in the future.
Bought a deal online for 5 classes.  I have been taking similar classes at a Lexington studio.  Apparently, Jody owns both studios.  These classes are amazing!  They are challenging and go by quickly.  My body has changed drastically, taking this type of pilates once a week for the past couple of months.
Spectacular, one of a kind restaurant with an elegant, serene atmosphere. They have the best deals during September, as you can order the Magical Dining all you can eat option for about half off the original price. One of my favorite places for exquisitely made steak and simple but delicious desserts.
The service we received was absolutely fantastic. Extremely friendly and helpful for my 11yo daughter who is very picky.
Oh wow, yum.  I went there last night and will definitely go back.  The ingredients taste so fresh and flavorful.  The place is really cute.  My only gripe and the reason for giving it four stars is the waitress service was lacking.  It took quite a while to flag someone down and I finally got one of the bus boys to take my order.  (I was starved!)  It seems they have a buffet.  I'll be back to try that one day.  At $13, it's the same price as most of the entrees and a great option for the indecisive like me.
I visited the Sam Adams brewery during a trip to Boston in September 2008.  It was much more intimate than I expected, as it is one of the largest breweries in the US.  It turns out that this is the original location, but more of an R&D facility currently.  We had to wait around a bit for the next tour, but it wasn't too long.  I was quite surprised to learn that Sam Adams was founded in 1984 (I would have guessed 1884, if those were my two options).  The tastings were good and we even got to sample a couple of new brews they were testing.    I haven't been to Harpoon, so I can't compare, but plan to check it out the next time I'm in Boston.
I have been to Capital City when my regular mechanic is not available. They have fixed my head lamp, at no charge! turns out it was just unhooked (they said that sometimes happens with these Volvo's) They could have easily charged me for a new bulb, but they didn't. Their great customer service will definitely bring me back. That is what I love about my neighborhood shop. They are honest and friendly and will get the job done fast =-)
I accompanied my husband to Orlando for Cisco Live. We chose the Peabody due to its close proximity to the convention center (the most convenient location) and stayed here from a Sat to a Fri. We arrived extremely early on Saturday and luckily they had an available room for us. I wasn't a fan of the smaller room (and I'd be the one hanging out in it the most) so we upgraded a notch and got a larger room in the Mallard Tower. It was very spacious with a separate seating area and a vanity for me! Yes, the Mallard Tower is the older building, but when we looked to switch to the newer tower due to our a/c not working so well, I didn't like the size/layout of the room. We decided our current room was better. We had another minor glitch in that our fridge was not working, but that was fixed by giving us another working fridge in the room.  Should I need to return to Orlando to be near the convention center, I would stay here again. The convenience factor is huge, but the service is what sold me. It was impeccable. Every single person is incredibly accommodating and nice! Really made our hotel stay and minor blips easy to get over. Although I wish the rooms had coffee makers. Another plus are those like me who do not have children. Luckily, there are two pools. The grotto pool is the huge one w/ the waterfall close to the parking structure. The quieter lap pool is also large and catered more towards adults. I loved this area. While the husband was in his classes, I was relaxing by the pool. More hotels need two pool areas like the Peabody. I also got to check out the lovely fitness center (didn't use it), and used the spa twice. Wish the spa was larger with a hot sauna as well as the steam sauna.  Peabody also has a few restaurants. I recommend Napa for lunch and dinners. B-Line Grill was gross and Capriccio not very good either. I also recommend self-park. I'm normally a valet girl b/c I'm lazy, but every time we valeted, it was backed up and took forever for our car to come out. The parking structure is conveniently located a short walk from the hotel. It was faster and a bit cheaper to park this way.
Got my tires swapped a few weeks ago a and they were very friendly and nice. Went shopping right after and noticed the tpms light went off and gave them a call and asked about it and they told me to swing by and that they would check it out. Even though they were busy they still were able to check on my car. Very satisfied! Thanks again!
Their chile relleno en crema is one of Austin's best meals.  It's also one of the few places in town where you can get real interior Mexican food -- pepian sauces, ancho chile sauces, and deeply rich moles. I'm pretty indifferent to the atmosphere but the food is outstanding.
Thank you yelp, in the ATL for a day and we were looking for great chicken and waffles.  Took your advice and found the great unassuming little restaurant in a strip center that was absolutely #fantastic.  The Chicken and Bacon Cheddar Waffles was perfect,  perfect moist fried chicken and the waffle was just great.  We also ordered the southern breakfast and again ---- just perfect.  I consider myself a grits snob and these did not disappoint.  Creamy, no clumps and when I cut those fried eggs in, #omg.  #justsayin. On my next trip to Atlanta I will definitely return.
This place is for coffee geeks. Coffee was excellent. The selection of snacks/pastries was fairly limited, to a couple of scones and cookies, perhaps because we were there late in the day around 5. Non-coffee drink selection for kids seemed to be limited to hot cocoa. Nice small space though for sitting around having coffee.
Hit this up with a group of friends and it was awesome.  Good beef, good pork and a pretty solid mushroom burger coming from someone who doesn't usually dig on that hippy nonsense.  The fries are cooked perfectly and they are rocking truffle salt.  Truffle salt!!!  Good call.  Also, I think they make the fries out of Yukon Gold potatoes which is always the way to go.  Can't wait to be back to try out some more bridges.
Got my hair bleached and dyed for the first time here. I was really nervous at first because I had never bleached my hair before, but the staff were exceptionally helpful and explained all the pros and cons to allow me to make my choice. In the end, I still wanted to dye my hair pearl white. Note that I have black, Korean hair about as dark as it gets. I ended up bleaching my hair three times before dying it and it looks amazing! This was done 2 weeks ago and it surprisingly still looks super good. My hair doesn't feel damaged and I get complements for it all the time. Oh, and the cut? In my books, they are specialists when it comes to asymmetric cuts. I would highly recommend this hair studio and especially Han.
Really great pizza quality and toppings options. The crust is thin, light colored, and soft with dark, charred spots that tastes like it was baked in a very hot oven. The atmosphere is also really nice- our waitress was great as well. The reason for 4 stars, not 5, is because my salad wasn't too great. I just got the house salad and found it really oily and sweet. I also noticed other tables got bread to munch on before their food came, but we didn't get any
So we decided to stop in to have a bite. And we made a wonderful discovery here. The Pizza was some of the BEST in town. Service was amazing and I think the waitress was named Mia? Location is E. Broad st. She was very sweet & keep us happy. Also we had drinks & more food & Desert YUM!!! We will be coming back for more and talked about trying the Lunch menu as well.  Letting ppl know how great our 1st time was. Keep up the great work !!!
The food here is amazing and well priced. The chef specials are always great. I love the Tom ka and the thai tea is my favorite drink ever. Seriously one of my favorite restaurants ever. A must try place in Louisville. Once you do, you'll keep coming back!
Tiny little bar, but I understand there is an upstairs that has never been open when I have been a patron. I typically frequent bars/restaurants on a Monday night, as I am a chef myself.   Hands down, best chicken wings in Boston. Monday they are 25 cent wings, lucky for me it's the day I always go. Meaty and juicy with a handful of different flavors. Also, they have a a 7 dollar coors light pitcher. You tell me where else in Boston you can get that! I'm still looking.   My only gripe is that the jukebox has been out of service for the past 6 months since I discovered this joint.   All in all, it's a nice little bar nestled on cobblestone streets between TD Banknorth Arena and the Italian North End. Definately worth checking out if you're in the area and looking for a snack and some cheap beer.
The server told us they won the Best New Downtown Restaurant Of 2017. Some delicious, gourmet-portion dishes.   Their hospitality was disappointing as we made reservations the night before for 8pm on a Tuesday and when we arrived the female server said our table wasn't ready and if we left and came back in 20 minutes she'd be able to push 2 small tables for our group of 4. She didn't seem apologetic at all.  A male staff member then handled a group of 5 Caucasians that were behind us in line. The one guy in the group said he had called in reservations about an hour ago. They got seated right away at a table right in front of us. Wondered why we didn't get that table.  We discussed the server's demeanor and whether to go elsewhere.  The server said they would call us once a table was free so we left for drinks at Yagger. We went back to Cinara and there were several tables available, yet no one had called us back.  In terms of food, standouts were the $8 Chicken Liver Parfait with cornichon, capers & garlic scapes, $17 Albacore Tuna Charred Broccoli, Black Olives & Smoked Tonnato, and $16 Beets, Foie Gras, Sunflower, Espelette & Red Wine Reduction.  $33 Beef Short Rib, Farro, Toffee Shallots, Fiddleheads & Black garlic were a 4/5.  $23 Duck and Anchovy Ragu, Lemon and Parsley was good.  $4 House Bread and Butter, $19 Mixed Salami Plate and $23 Tagliatelle, Bolognese was okay but no different than anywhere else.  $24 Nettle Risotto, Pecorino & Shaved Almonds was a 3 out of 5.  Again, some tasty dishes but tiny portions. The noise was also slightly too loud to the point that you'd have to ask your neighbor to repeat themselves. We still had a great time despite the reservation issue and unthoughtful service. There were 2 dishes the server cleared without asking if we were done. They only had a bite or two on there but these are gourmet portions girl! That's like a third of the dish!   Bill for 4 people that were still hungry after was $292.50 before tip.
My favorite place now in Beverly for casual dining.  The food is plentiful, attractively priced, and damn good. Surprisingly varied menu. The ambiance isn't overly sophisticated but is quite acceptable.   This place usually is not overcrowded: on some nights, though, there is live entertainment, so if you don't easily handle noise/increased din, get out by 9:00pm.  Full bar and full wait staff service.  Turnaround time for food orders is not too long.  Way above-average pub experience.  Great value, friendly staff.
What an awesome cool place!!!! Best grilled cheese ever. Had the crisp buffalo and my husband had the  melt. It's whim delight and nostalgia on a plate... must come!!!
Rigatone and Steak.  That's all I have to say!!!! This place has some of the best food I've tasted in Boston!
Delicious low key spot. Enjoyed sat brunch. Had hash with egg, black cod fishermans stew abd orrechiette- all tasty. Sangria was a little bitter and served withiut fruit. Friendly service and cute atmosphere. Single bathroom so plan to wait. Would like to try for dinner since lunch is brunch menu.
This is hands down my favorite pizza place in central Florida.  After a recent trip to NYC I can vouch that A Touch of Basil is just as delicious and any of the shops I tried while there. Love it!
They're pizza is great, authentic thin crust with fresh toppings.  They should be charging more then $2 a slice. Plus the staff is really nice.
I am in love with this store!! Dropped in for a quick ring size and Joe was very courteous and designs some amazing pieces. I'm planning on going back with some stones and see what kind of explosion of creative genius can happen. Also... If you need custom yard art, this is certainly a place to check out as well!!
Hair snobs unite! This is the best place I know of in Harvard Square.
I ordered the avocado Margarita that they are famous for. I was not disappointed. It was super creamy and they add just the right amount of alcohol that creeps up on you! :) I also ordered the tamales- also were very delicious.
We stayed at the Burlington Marriott and ate at Summer Winter for dinner. I had the filet mignon and my husband had the lobster mac n cheese. We left so completely full and satisfied it was ridiculous. That was THEE best filet mignon I have ever had, hands down. It was seasoned perfectly, and cooked exactly at med rare as I requested. My husband raved about his mac n cheese, noting that they used a very tasty white cheese and the lobster was a large piece (1/2 a lobster tail I believe) and very tender. It was a pricey dinner with drinks, but well worth it!!
The entrees at Sakura can be hit or miss, but the appetizers and sushi are consistently good. If you like spicy food, the fire on fish maki is great. The egg rolls may be my wife's favorite appetizer in Wakefield.  As a bonus, the delivery is unreasonably fast, so this is a great option if you are too hungry to wait.
This place is excellent and I'm glad we have it so close by in Clintonville. I have only been once so far. I had the thinly sliced flank steak w/garlic and general tso's. Both dishes were the best I have had. Very fresh with a lot of veggies. I will definitely be back for more and to try the sushi and Thai dishes they offer.
Great HH and reverse HH everyday, and all day on Sundays (includes select sushi, appetizers, and sake). Sushi is high quality, recommend lobster roll appetizer, crazy roll, spicy yellowtail, and tuna. Seaweed salad and miso soup are cheap and tasty too.
Always a profound experience. The JFK100 exhibition was extraordinary. It included the speech he was to give on November 22, 1963 in Dallas as well as a portrait painted posthumously over what was initially an image of his brother Senator Edward M Kennedy.  The building itself is an outstanding example of architectural excellence.
Animal Kingdom Lodge is a big beautiful hotel on the Disney property.  The staff was all super friendly and helpful, the rooms clean and comfortable, and the view of giraffes, zebras, and other exotic wildlife cannot be beat.  Jiko is maybe the best restaurant in disney world, and Boma had a great breakfast.  While Victoria Falls was great to grab a drink at. The one problem I really have here is that it is a bit far from all the parks, except Animal Kingdom.  I have stayed here twice and enjoyed it both time very much, but I think my wife and I will try a different resort on our next trip.
I'll start off by saying that four stars here is generous. But it is for two simple reasons, the view is absolutely gorgeous and the ambiance is far above that of the Oasis. If you want a sunset dinner or cocktails overlooking the lake, Soleil gets four stars.  Now for the bad news. The food is only three stars. The menu sounds great with trendy options that would compete downtown. Unfortunately, what is delivered to the table falls a little short. I am normally very good at picking out flavors and appreciating unusual combinations, but there is a sweetness to many of the savory dishes that I can't place and just doesn't seem to belong. Sweet caesar salad? Sweetened bell peppers with hangar steak? Even sweet fingerling potatoes. It is not overwhelming by any means but just enough to leave my taste buds confused and off-balance.  With that said, the views and ambiance really are fantastic! Perfect choice for cocktails at sunset, and makes for a great date night.
Service here is spectacular!   Our family ate dinner here after an unsuccessful attempt to dine at Gracias Madre (their staff was out on a beach vacation...I WANT IN!). We were kind of bummed, but Tin Shed really brought our spirits up with their kindness, home-styled foods, and rustic vibes.  It was a cold night, and we were that annoying tourist family that requested to sit by the fireplace outdoors. They didn't have any indoor spots available. I loved the space. Our super sweet host told us that blankets were available should we need them--that's quality service in the ears of Californians.   Our server was a tall down-to-earth boy who checked on us at the right times. We enjoyed some pints of local beer and literally licked clean all of our plates. Their food is veggie-friendly and there are options for everyone from burgers to salads. Tin Shed is also dog-friendly in the patio (and they offer dog desserts too!) and such a comfort-feel space. This place is a great place for family night or even for a chill date.
After having all the usual stuff we eat on vacations (chicken tenders, burgers, pizza, etc) this was a refreshing meal.  The food was good, not out of this world good but good.  Their version of chicken tikka masala needs some help but what do you expect when it is not an Indian restaurant.  The dumplings were amazing as well as the other more traditional Asian dishes.  The service was Disney quality.  Our son had fallen asleep just a minute before we got to the restaurant.  Instead of inconveniencing us by having us take him out of the stroller, they switched our tables so that we can leave him in the stroller and have him resting tableside while we enjoyed our meal.
We all loved the pizza. Wonderful flavor. Nice crust. The fettuccine Alfredo had way too much garlic for our liking (lots of chopped up garlic pieces!)  More than I had ever seen in a fettuccine Alfredo.  Won't order that again. Otherwise the portion size was nice. Too bad I threw most of it away.
I love this place. I just started taking guitar lessons from Alex a few weeks ago after taking lessons with a previous instructor for about a month and a half. The reason I quit my lessons with my previous instructor was because the lessons consisted mostly of him just teaching me new chords and having me play the chords/various simple songs over and over at increasing speeds. I felt like I could've learned all of that on my own, and I felt totally uninspired after each lesson.  With Alex, it's a whole different story. In our very first lesson, he emphasized to me the importance of learning the fretboard not just by memorizing different chord shapes, but also by understanding both conceptually and instinctively how each string is laid out and exactly what notes you're playing at all times (as well as which notes make up the chords you play, why they create the sound they do, etc.). He talked about how a lot of people will learn to play the guitar by learning a bunch of chord shapes, but then when asked to improvise or make their own song will only be able to play through the chords that they've memorized by rote. By learning the fretboard by heart, we can instead hear a tune or a certain sound in our head and play it immediately, rather than relying on muscle memory for all of our music-making. He gave me an EXTREMELY useful exercise for kicking off this process.  Every single lesson with him is a great learning experience. The classes are loosely structured and he tends to ask me what I want to work on before each class. No matter what it is that I show him, he always gives me incredibly useful advice to make my playing sound smoother, add a little extra flair, etc. He's not the kind of instructor who just listens to me play, tells me it sounds fine, and moves on without offering anything useful.  On top of all of that, Alex is honestly just an incredibly likable and positive guy. He's really fun to take lessons from and he's also really really good at guitar. Unlike my previous instructor, he doesn't hesitate at all to demonstrate things when I ask him to. He can pretty much hear any guitar song and play it instantly, often adding his own personal touch to it (well, he's been able to for the songs I've showed him thus far). He has a huge knowledge base and has learned tons of cool tricks from all of his years in music. I've left each lesson so far knowing I've learned something valuable and feeling really happy and inspired.
No complaints on my side. This pub's 2 star review is undeserved and probably given by those who expect everything served on a silver platter. Understand that Texas industry abides by a different standard and you shouldn't expect fake smiles and an after meal foot massage from your server and you'll do fine here.   Matthew and I started with a round of drinks: a corona and a bloody mary. Coronas will be coronas on good and bad days, but I was QUITE satisfied with my airport bloody. Strong, thick, & perfectly seasoned, it was just what I needed before catching a plane.   We ordered some sweet potato fries, a plate of wings, and the potato soup. For the price we payed, we got plenty of food that was well prepared, and the kitchen didn't skip out on plenty of cheese and bacon on my soup.   Our server, Tony, was dope. For a young guy, he took care of all ten tables in the pub real well.   We're headed home, but if ever stuck in Austins airport again I wouldn't mind stopping in.
This is my favorite Mexican restaurant- we come here very often on the weekends! I love the enchiladas with beef and the Guacamole.  The service is always fast and the staff is excellent.  Side note: they are very family friendly, they always accommodate us and our baby in his car seat.
At first my review was gonna be a mediocre 2 stars. However the service really saved them because I was honestly impressed. My friends and I were here to order drinks and apps, simple bites like chips and such. Our beers were fine, they were what you'd  expect. However when our duo chips (salsa and queso) came out, we were less than satisfied. The queso tasted extremely burned. Like as if it it was stewed a little too long, burned on the bottom and therefore permeated that burnt taste throughout. We told our server about it who stated that a few others had also complained about it. I happened to also order a fried chicken taco that was also served with queso...that also tasted burnt. In the end, I was impressed by how the manager and server approached the situation. We received a complimentary round of drinks which is the reason and multiple apologies. Mistakes happen, so it's how they handled the situation as to why my friends and I will be returning.
Normally, not one for cupcakes, however, the organic carrot cake with cream cheese frosting and a double espresso was a great juxtaposition of bitter and sweet.  Not too many places open on Sunday evening in Cambridge, so this spot was a Sweet find.
The Cart in the middle of DTC has good Burritos.  I get the fajita wrap which with my specifications entails: rice, cheese, guac, salsa, hot sauce, steak, grilled onions and peppers and sour cream.  It is superb.  Not cheap for a street vendor (Large is $6.50 plus a buck or so for guac), but very good.
Best coffee ever!  I love their half moon lattes. Great atmosphere, parking is a little tough.
Today was my first time going to Whiplash and I will DEFINITELY be back!! Tameka the receptionist greeted me very promptly and offered me a bottle of water. Elise SLAYED my sew in and was sooooo FAST!!! She was also very professional and friendly! Excellent salon, the prices weren't extremely high and they sell hair so it's convenient also.   UPDATE!! I went back to Whiplash and got some individual braids. I found out that Mika is actually the OWNER and not the receptionist (sorry Mika lol). Kim the braider did an AMAZING job on my hair. I've been receiving compliments literally since I left the salon. The customer service is impeccable and the stylists are very professional.
This place gets "nice neighborhood restaurant" just right, and has one of the top two or three shrimp and grits dishes I've had in Atlanta.  The warm, laid-back-but-elegant interior combines with a usually very gregarious crowd to form an easy to like environment.    The menu is more free-spirited and personal compared to a typical southern themed New American style restaurant, a bit playful, like Ron is talking about stuff he salivates over through his menu.  There is a propensity towards putting stuff in a bowl with tasty, gooey sauce/gravy/broth which really reminds me of the sort of shit gluttons think up when having the 2AM munchies.  It helps that sauces are very good at Rosebud otherwise some might find the approach sloppy.  Asian flavors are also lovingly referenced in a few places, with enough restraint and good taste to not come off as ill-advised fusion experiments; though don't interest me much.    I've had dinner here about four times and brunch once.  Appetizers are mostly solid with fried oysters and bruschetta being standouts but calamari and mussels underwhelming.  A crab cake special had some of the best crabby flavors I've had but is not on the regular menu.  The best entree is shrimp and grits, rightfully mentioned as a great dish in this area by many people.  This version is a sweeter take on cajun style with a generous amount of delicious tomato gravy.  Grit is cooked just right.  It's usually a struggle to try new entrees because resist ordering this dish is so difficult.  Out of the seven entrees ordered by my party in last two visits, four were the shrimp and grits.  Surprisingly juicy is the braised lamb shank.  Decent fish (I've sampled the trout), generally good vegetable sides.  On the other hand, disappointing is the fried chicken--bland, although only slightly worse than the norm for $15 fancy fried chickens, of which I've tried many.  Another bad entree was a pork rib special, presumably smoked using the BGE outside, that turned out unpleasantly dry and we were hardly able to finish.  Brunch can be a great time to give Rosebud a first try, as it's more casual, features many grit dishes, and still has many normal items available, including the shrimp and grit.    The beverage selection doesn't dazzle but the whole package keeps up with the times competently, with good mixed drinks, enough respectable beers (not a lot), and many wines by the glass as well as the option to go with house wine for simplicity and economy.    Service is excellent and I have no problem with the fact that the chef writes a blog venting about bad customers.  Rosebud is a good neighborhood restaurant and a viable options for all occasions.
Literally not a thing, anything at all,  in my order was right but they gave me enough food to feed an African Village for at least a decade so I can't complain.  I ordered for me and  my brother I got enough food to feed all of Angola very pumped.  If it's midnight and you drive thru they'll hook you up with basically the whole menu from what I gather.   They did charge me an extra 2 bucks from what it said on the screen tho so 4/5 stars.
Good, authentic Taiwanese beef noodles. $10.75 per bowl. Costs an extra $1 for wide noodles.
This is possibly my favorite "fast food chain" per-say. Everything is amazing. The servers are always very nice are always willing to serve you more condiments if you ask for "more" of something. I especially love the the guacamole that they make at Chipotle. Although sometimes the servers don't fill up the whole container of you ask for it to be on the side or is completely fresh, it never fails to taste amazing. It's almost as good as guacamole in Mexico, but definitely the best in Oregon. It isn't a thick or watery consistency with the perfect size and amount of avocado chunks which makes it perfect.
Wow.  Amazing hamburgers.   First visit.  Thanks yelpers for a correct review.   Had to try the prime time burger.  OMG delicious.   Poblano burger very good.  Sunrise burger delicious.  Classic burger so good.  Fries and sweet potato fries great.   Will definitely make plans to return next time we are in Austin.
Pijiu belly is new restaurant in Westside that had its soft opening last Tuesday(12/09/2014). They call themselves a pub fare restaurant with Asian influence. I had a chance to try their food for lunch. Pijiu means beer - I am not sure they named the restaurant beer belly or the belly is a reference to pork belly in their menu. Regardless, it's always nice to see new restaurants.   The restaurant is located on left, if you are driving from GA tech campus and 85, on 10th street, past north avenue and right across the street from sherwin Williams store. The parking is in a lot, right next to the restaurant. Currently it's a self park, but I hear it's going to valet parking in the future. The lot will fill up to 18 cars but they also have another lot up the street.   When you enter you will see the prominent bar with granite counter, bar stools and TVs. On the left there is small area for dart boards and pool tables(not complete yet but I was told that the plan). There are several high bar tables on the right side area with 6 seating each and regular tables with 4 seating in the back, behind the bar. It has a modern-industrial style.   The menu is rather simple for now - but they will have a revised menu with more items during their grand opening in January. It has charcuterie plates, starters, burgers and sandwiches, sides and beverages. And of course they have beer menu on the board as well. Taking about beer, they don't have beer on tap installed yet but I was told that it will be ready by end of the week with large selections.   From charcuterie selection, I ordered la cabana - soft goat milk cheese made in Spain with rosemary crust. I liked the cheese but it wasn't as soft as I expected it to be. I also ordered, spicy soppressata - Italian made spicy pork cured meat and it was delicious. The plate was served with strawberry jam, pineapple chutney, Dijon mustard and balsamic reduction.($4 each and $11 for three).   I also ordered, 'The Pijiu burger' based on recommendation from the bartender. It had fried egg, kimchi, cheese, beer-bbq sauce on brioche bread and served with hand-cut fries, onion, tomato and pickles. ($13)   The burger had complex flavors and tasty, thanks to the runny egg yolk, kimchi, onion and beer-bbq sauce. It all works well together. My only gripe is that kimchi was quite oversalted for my taste and it kind of takes away the experience a bit. I liked it overall but would have loved it if they had salted kimchi just right. Strangely, there was no salt at all in the pickles and it was spicy!! I mean, I am ok with that but some of my friends who are hardcore pickle lovers would have problem with no salt pickles.   The hand-cut fries was perfect though - neither too thin, nor thick. So it was nice and crunchy outside and moist inside.   Overall, I like what I see. Yes, they are still setting things up. Currently there is lot of empty spaces, beer on tap missing and so on. But that's what the soft opening is for - to get feedbacks and make sure everything right before grand opening.
Pretty good stuff. Had cold udon for the first time and it was awesome! Very small place, I been at UT for two years and I never saw this place on the drag. It is a must check out!!
Mattresses...we all need them, but it can really be a pain to shop for them; seems like the mattress business attracts some hucksters to it. Notice all those 50% sales at the mattress stores? Umm hmm.   Anyhow, the old mattress had been caving in for quite a while and she finally started to share my opinion that it was time for as new one (I think when you have to climb out of the bed rather than off of it, it's past time). There is one specific brand/type of mattress that we really like, and after coming up with bupkis at a couple of stores we spotted Mattress World on our way home and decided to give it a shot. I had assumed that it was a national chain, but MW is in fact locally owned and the owner was in the store. They have a lot of mattresses in their showroom, all there to be tested out.   Rachel, our sales woman, was very friendly and informative, she really knows the products. After laying around for a while we found the mattress of our dreams (so to speak) and she was quite willing to price negotiate. So we've got the price and set a delivery date for three weeks out at a particular time on Sunday, and the delivery guys arrive exactly on time, set up the new mattress with no drama, and take away the old mattress. Everything done exactly the way it was agreed to. Perfect.
OH MAN. Romers is the best. I love everything about it top to bottom.  First, the decor is fab. You walk in and feel comfortable, but a bit classy. Its got the feel of a sports bar / pub, but the look of a hip lounge. Its really smart and clean. I hate feeling smothered in a bar and Romers is open and inviting.   Second, the staff is awesome. The servers wear casual jeans and a grey shirt, which I really appreciate. It makes me feel more comfortable. They are friendly but professional, attentive but fun. From the tables in the back, you can see the open kitchen and the staff back there seems to be having a blast, but taking it all very seriously. These are not just burgers to them, which I find very reassuring.   Third, the drinks are great. Romer's went out of their way to get locally made beer that isn't god-awful granville island. They serve craft beer (small batches from micro-brews) on tap! I find that amazing. And for a GREAT price, less than $5 a pint. Half the beers I had never heard of, and I'm pretty keen on Vancouver's craft beers. There is also bottles. The cocktails are all doubles, and FRESH - I mean the watermelon juice tastes like it just got blended. The Sangria was the best I'd ever had, and the basil-lemonade is a MUST try (believe me, actually tastes AMAZING). Finally, a top notch wine list of, once again, mainly local bc wines.   fourth, of course, is the FOOD. oh my word. the Appies are great, and reasonably priced. We had the cheese plate, a basket of fries with gorgonzola cheese, the olives/pickles plate, and edamame. YUM. That was for six of us by the way, not just me :)   The burgers are literally to die for. The meat is all LOCAL and fresh which I can't describe how much I appreciate. The toppings range from your usual suspects, to really unique but delicious! You can also order your burger green, meaning it comes wedged between two big slabs of iceburg lettuce - AWESOME for those of us curbing carbs. But that being said, the buns are made in house and must be tried at least once! Burgers range from $9 to $14, just for the burger. Fries come at $3 - but its a whole basket that can feed 2 to 4 people easily.  Considering its free-range, healthy meat - the price is unbeatable!  finally, dessert! DONUTS made FRESH with different dips. OH MY. sooooooo good.   All around, Romer's ROCKS. Its great whether you are watching a game, or out for a date. The burgers are far too big for small kids, but  two kids could probably share one burger. They have a private room for groups. good music, good vibes, great times!!  go Romer's!
The queso we received for checking in was delicious, and the fajitas were pretty good. We went on a Saturday night, where it was super crowded and they were understaffed, so you could tell everyone was a little stressed. It was also a little much for a margarita that was just mediocre.
My friend recommended me of this new place in town. This self-served frozen yogurt shop has a greatly optimistic attitude fit for Portland. I felt good the first time I walked in and saw a green-yellow themed decoration with a number of great quotations about life and laughter all over the place. We were greeted with a sample cup to taste all those wonderful flavors of frozen yogurt. There are so many flavors to choose. My favorite is Chocolate Cake a la Mode. They say they will change the flavor every week so it's a good reason to go back there again and again. The options for toppings were even more fabulous - ranging from chocolate fudge to chocolate chip pieces to fresh fruit. I totally love this place. Highly recommended!
Acquired by the very friendly and helpful new owner Tamie in May 2014, Med-Physique at 3 Graces now offers several new spa services, including Exlis, Botox, Juvederm, specialized peels, laser hair removal...as well as a variety of message styles to choose from and organic airbrush spray tanning...all in the newly remodeled spa facility.   Although I loved my services provided at 3 Graces before, the space was indeed in need of a bit of a "makeover" itself. Great new facility and treatment options; however, I only visit for message or spray tans so I can't speak to quality of other services.
My first Yelp experience was choosing movers and Precision Moving seemed like a great option.  From the Yelp review, to the website to the actual move, Precision Moving provided the BEST moving experience my wife and I have ever had (at least 6-8 moves between us).  Rudy, Gil and Jeff were professional, careful and efficient.  Although I haven't used all the Boston companies, I would say Precision Moving strikes the balance between cost and quality.  Easy 5-star recommendation.
I'll start out saying I do my research before going to restaurants I haven't tried before and I love the raw, honesty of reviewers. I decided on going to Bosphorous as our anniversary dinner restaurant, over Texas De Brazil while we were driving to Orlando from Ponce Inlet (1.5hr away, no ethnic, fine-dining restaurants here up to par).. Bosphorous was actually second on my list. They have a great website with a full menu (and good music to boot!).  The atmosphere was very elegant (as most Winter Park restaurants) and quite lonely on a Monday night (as most ethnic restaurants are in this area). We started our appetizers with the Turkish Ezme, which my husband nearly inhaled. It was described to us as Turkish salsa, and it was superb! So fresh! I am definitely looking that recipe up online. One thing to mention, you have to order the Lavas (Turkish large hollow bread) to eat with it. My opinon, have the bread come with the appetizer on the menu, versus ala carte. The bread was to die for, topped with melted butter and crisp sesame seeds. I barely got a handful of pieces, as my husband was wolfing that down, too!  I loved the Turkish wine there, the winery brand is Yakut. Delicious, especially if you love a smooth, well-spiced but mellow red wine. After studying the menu, I decided to order the Yogurt Sis Kebap with rice instead of the buttered bread. My husband ordered the Turkish Pizza, him being a Pizza guy and all-around American that is just venturing into international cuisines.   The owner then came by our table and introduced himself. Then, he explained what type of dishes he enjoys and mentioned that the kitchen is all Turkish cooks. I was so excited. He even improvised our food order to make it extra special, and my lamb more crispy on the outside. That was unexpected and that service sets the bar above average! He then elaborated on the origins of the wine and let us enjoy our dinner as it was then served.  I cannot describe how delicious the meal was. I moved here from Dallas, and all throughout Texas we have several Turkish restaurants, as well as so many other ethnicities. This was truly the best Turkish food I've had in my life and I am a Spaniard.   We finished the night off with a delicious cup of Turkish coffee, served the proper way on a Turkish serving tray! Our server was lovely and provided great suggestions. You really must try this restaurant and if you like intimacy, don't go on a weekend. It was awesome.
This place is a gem. The donuts are the best EVER. The girls that work here are super friendly and the deli is delicious. I don't live anywhere near this shop but I make special trips to get donuts, coffee, and scratch tickets nearly every Sunday.   Oh and they are open 24/7.
Jesse and Ashley do an awesome job w gels and give the best pedicures. The place is just a little expensive but totally worth it.  Getting a pedicure as we speak.... It's so relaxing .... zzzzzzzz :)
Ok, lets get through this. The pizza is on point. Its not the best in the world, maybe not the best in town even, but you cant go wrong with any pie on their list.   Good service, good food, lots of parking, cant go wrong.
Good food, fast service and friendly staff!! Pancakes fluffy and patty melt very tasty!!! Wendy is fabulous!!!
About Skyview (from their website): "Towering nearly 20 stories above Centennial Park, the SkyView Ferris wheel features 42 climate-controlled gondolas providing guest with breathtaking panoramic views of downtown Atlanta and the surrounding metropolitan area. Those looking for an even more enhanced experience will enjoy our VIP gondola boasting Ferrari leather seats, glass floor and a longer flight time. And, with its convenient location just steps from many of Atlanta's most popular attractions, SkyView Atlanta is the perfect compliment to your downtown adventure."   Took my ex on a date night of things that he loves. Skyview was something he had wanted to try out so I planned a visit during our night out. Adult tickets are $13.50 but they have military discount. And they let me apply the discount to both of our tickets. Cool. There was a line, but we got on the ride quickly. I was afraid that the ride was gonna be really quick since it was near closing, but it actually seemed like we were on there for a good amount of time. It was beautiful seeing Atlanta all lit up from the sky, but I wish I could have seen it during daytime. Guess i will have to go back.
Was curious about this place since before it opened when I noticed the large "DINER" lettering atop the building.  And finally after more than a few weeks I had the opportunity to walk over and have breakfast. And it was a great time. Friendly staff, Jenn was a sweetheart. Concise and modern "diner" menu, and the food was delicious!!!
Nice brunch spot.  The berries and cream crepes was so good.  I also tried the summer in italy which is french toast with fruits which was also pretty good.  Ordered takeout this time but would definitely come back to dine in.
Dinky place, big taste!  If you want some traditional and great Chinese food you can find it here (note the roasted ducks with the heads still attached and you know you're in the right place).  Try their BBQ pork, Chaxaw pork, BBQ cuttlefish, crispy skin pork, and the dishes they have written on the menu on the wall.  The flavor is great, just like Chen's down the street.  Place is small so I usually just do take out and eat at home but the flavor is not the same as if you dine in since they do something to the dish in the back (adding different type of sauces) which make the food taste batter (plus they heat it up).  Try the noodles and wontons also, it's pretty good, but I rather have other type of noodles instead of yellow egg noodles).    If you like Chinese food and want something different than typical take out places then this is the one you have to try!
We came here for Dine out Vancouver. Awesome service, they were very accomodating and we had a  great dinning experience here.  Will come back again to try out their regular menu
Went there for my little sisters 21st birthday and we loved it. Cocktails lived up to the hype, food was fantastic and our waitress, Julia was an absolute doll. Atmosphere was great for an intiment occasion. Definitely be coming back!
First, I would like to shout out Tavrious! Their system assures amazing customer service, but Tavarious knew we were from out of town and worked with us!!! Tavarious is amazing. I came from DC and I'm a stickler for costumer service! All of the drinks were hand crafted and strong! The manager explained the entire system and business bc I was honestly confused why there is NOT one in DC, I even offered to invest in one... Yes, it was that amazing!!!! I recommend the duck taco or bowl & the pork belly!!! Again, amazing spot and my new ATL favorite!!
I just loving going to TT's to see my buddy  Kevin playing for the Raging Teens.  Can't be the cheap PBR's, great music and diverse crowd.    Always a great time and loads of good bands...
I purchased my tank from The Wet Spot about 10 years ago. This tank was very successful - most of the fish living for a very long time. We decided to add live plants and a couple new fish about 3 years ago. That was the last time I was there. Customer service at that time was severely lacking and almost all employees seemed rude/agitated. Maybe you could blame that one on the severe humidity in the place - it's almost unbearable. We wandered in there yesterday, the whole time my bf muttering under his breath about how he didn't want to be there, didn't want to deal with anyone's shitty attitude, and thought the place was overpriced..... I just wanted to test the water in our tank, add some new fish, maybe a frog and some cool plants. Enter Colby...... the MOST helpful, patient fish person EVER!! He tested the water, gave us suggestions to up the pH level and spent the next hour with us. He helped us pick out fish, lights, plants..... He was Awesome. I'm so glad we decided to give them another shot. As long as Colby is there, we will continue to go back.
Have been here twice, and I live 300 miles away. Stopped in the first time a week ago and I had the Guru Rice while my wife had Noble Broccoli...they were both awesome and we left totally full. Power combo of flavor and portion size with these dishes.  Then today we were swept back to Portland on the trade winds and decided to stop in with our friends. everyone enjoyed their food. we even shared around. even our non-vegan friend loved his food...so this place is a win.
This place is truly exceptional!   My big goofy pit bull managed to tear up her paws while out for a run and needed all four of them bandaged, and the staff here was just great with her. I imagine it must be pretty easy to find a good vet if you have an easy dog, but for owners like me with very particular pets, the demeanor and attitude of the staff is almost as important as their medical expertise, and the staff at Alpine is amazing.   My girl was rescued from dog fighting so she, understandably, has some quirks--she is extremely dog aggressive, is very uncomfortably with men, and is a mix of very strong and very tender. I was SO IMPRESSED with how the staff here treated us--I told the receptionist before we came in about her somewhat peculiar needs and they were more than accommodating. They made sure that only female members of the staff handled her and they made sure that she didn't interact with other animals, allowing us to wait in a separate room rather than the waiting room and shifting some things around in their treatment area so that she wouldn't have to be bandaged up near other pups.   Everyone we interacted with was totally comfortable with her breed and her demeanor (they were incredibly understanding of her dog-aggression and there was absolutely no judgement of her as a bad dog or of me as a bad owner, which we've experienced with other places) and I would strongly recommend this place to other pit bull parents.   I was really impressed with Dr. scwartzman--she was very gentle with my girl and did a wonderful job building a little bit of a relationship with her in the short time of our appointment, and she also took the time to explain the injury and treatment thoroughly to me and made sure to answer all of my questions.    The vet techs were awesome as well--they gave my pup plenty of treats to help her feel more comfortable (they even used a frozen container of baby food to distract her, which I think is brilliant) and they did an excellent job with the bandages themselves.   Finally, the front desk staff was spectacular--they were super nice and super helpful and they obviously care about the people and pets they get to interact with.   I felt that the pricing here was very fair--I'm surprised to see so many other reviewers complaining about the cost. Also, for me, the fact that they required an exam before treating her injuries was a huge plus--I wouldn't feel comfortable having a vet prescribe treatment or medication without first examining my dog, and at least to me, it seems far less a scam to get money out of unsuspecting owners and far more a hallmark of a responsible and well run medical practice.
I have had dinner from El Potro 3 times since they have opened.  One time we did take out and I have sat in there twice.  Every time that we've gone there, we have had great service.  The food is delicious too.  I have not had their margarita, but I have heard good things.  The decor is bright and appropriate for a mexican restaurant.  I am excited to try their breakfast!
I don't know what we would have done if we didn't find Kim to purchase our 1st home. We relocated from So. Cal, and she was with us through some tough situations and made it a cake walk throughout the entire process. She and Julie Davis are amazing. They are extremely knowledgeable, helpful and friendly. We had tons of questions and concerns and they addressed everything in a timely manner. Thanks so much Kim & Julie for helping us find our beautiful home! - R & B
Popped in one night about an hour before Closing. Found out ,with a stamped ticket, Parking is free for 2 hours. A, plus. Stood in line for about 15 minutes, then the door matron let me in, to stand in another line(very long). Was chatting with a couple in line and, one of them said you can sit at the bar and get quicker service. So I sauntered over to the one remaining seat. The bartender was friendly, took my order. Only waited about 15 minutes and the food was brought out on a metal tray. BTW, they have Stevia and Sugar in the Raw for sweeteners. A-plus. The Burger (a Classic, )was good. Fries were over cooked. Got out for around $16.
We ordered the Miso soup and for entree, the U.N. and Chanel rolls.  All of the items were excellent.  Our drinks were also very good: The Mule, Apple Old Fashioned.
This is fantastic! We had cold lobster rolls and shrimp burgers at our server Amy's advice. She was spot on! The grilled octopus and fish dip as appetizers were worth the fuller belly than we planned!  Again, Amy came through when we asked what to dip the homemade chips in. My hubby and her discussed what he liked and she actually went back and mixed her own dip of horseradish, Old Bay and mayo, and we basically dipped EVERYTHING in it! We could not be happier with Amy or our stop here!
Service,  Sat with 2 friends at the bar. Craig was great.  Knowledgeable,  friendly and funny. Food,  Calamari and Brescetta to start....both great.  Entrees; Veal Marsala, Salmon,  Veal spinach ALL GREAT. Can't say enough.
I was lucky enough to visit Pabu twice last week - first before a show then again to celebrate a birthday dinner.   Each visit the staff was attentive and cared about our experience. On my second visit they remembered me by name!   We did the omakase at the sushi bar (HIGHLY RECOMMEND) and our personal sushi Chef Ray along with Chef Brian gave us an amazing tasting of nigiri while showing us and explaining each special treatment of the fish. All of the staff, including the management, stopped by to say happy birthday and check if we needed anything.   this is my favorite place for Japanese cocktails. Each time I went back to the Classic Lolita (Japanese Old Fashion) and Porco Rosso (named after my favorite cartoon character!).  Whether or not you're looking for an authentic Japanese tasting or picking plates from the never disappointing a la carte menu Pabu is the spot to dine.
I cant tell you how much I love Hertz and its #1 Gold Priority Service.  Hertz makes it so easy to get to your car, and leave!  I never have to wait in line filling out paperwork I have already done online.  Get off the plane, find my number, go to the exit and already on my way.  Pricing is never much more and most the time cheaper than what the other places will nickel and dime you.  The time you get back not waiting in line for them to assign you a car is worth so much more.  The kids are already antsy from the flight, throw them in the car and get on the road to a happy vacation!
This was one of the few physical therapy places in the Boston area recommended to me by Massachusetts General Hospital for help with a broken wrist.  It was great in all aspects, and I would also highly recommend.
I met up with a friend here the other day on a sunny afternoon. First of all, I love the name of this place. I had never been here before but my friend recommended it as she lived in the area. The cafe is on the smaller side in terms of available seating, but the kitchen space is much bigger, as they not only serve bubble tea, but breakfast and snacks too. I didn't check out the food menu, but the drinks menu is quite extensive.   I really liked that they offered two different sizes for the bubble tea. There are just some days where a full size is too much, but the smaller size (500mL at $3.50) was very reasonable, and still more than enough to get your fix. I'm a bubble tea purist at heart so I ordered the milk tea with pearls, half sweet. I loved it. The bubbles were soft and chewy, the perfect consistency. The milk tea was also nice and refreshing, and tasted like actual black tea rather than the powdery milk tea drinks I'm usually accustomed to. Although I had ordered it half sweet, it still had the perfect amount of sweetness to it. I've had bubble teas in the past where my teeth literally ached from all the sugar, but this one was just right. They also have daily $2 specials which is practically unheard of in this day and age. I can't wait to go back. An awesome bubble tea gem!
I went here a few weeks ago and had the best experience. The food was amazing and fresh, the service was excellent. The two people serving us which we think might have been the owners were so friendly and welcoming. Highly recommend!!
I come here for dinner with a bunch of friends every now and again. Beer list is good, fried pickles are tasty, and the staff is generally stellar. I've been happy with the grilled cheese and club sandwiches I've ordered. Once we came here and there was an embarrassing bro cover band, but I don't think that is a regular occcurance.   Prices are good and this place adds a much needed casual but nice dining option to Malden.
Came with the family on a saturday nite. Service and food was great. It was a little pricey for what it was but the live music made up for it. im not usually a fan of live music at resarsunts but this was great! Cant go wrong with johnny cash and Willie.
This is my favorite bar in Austin, and I frequently use it to give people a sense of what Austin is all about. It's like the hippest backyard you've ever been to. It's very laid back, and a little bit out of the way. They have an Italian food truck in the back called Patrizi's that is developing a really good, and really well-deserved reputation.  Now that they have a full bar, I can't imagine a better place to hang out and relax.
Surprisingly good for Italian in Vancouver. My only criticism was that there needed to be a few more pasta choices.  I also thought that I prefer my meatballs mildly herbed and they were a bit too spicy for my linking. In spite of the few shortcomings it was a nice find and I'm amazed I hadn't eaten here before tonight. Definitely going back.
Passport services are on the 2nd floor. You can take the stairs just to the right of the main entrance to the International Office or take the elevator from inside. I arrived at 8:10am to have passport photos taken. I was out of there within 10 minutes with photos in hand. There were two families queued up for actual passport services. Since I just needed passport photos, the receptionist took the photo and processed my payment. There is a separate counter for processing passports and ESL services. Great experience!!
Ciao!  Here on. Tuesday at 6pm.  The staff, cuisine and ambience was wowza wowza!  Greeted and seated immediately and couldn't have been more friendly.  We ordered soups, dinners off the daily menus.  I had the mushroom penne, side of meatballs.  Hubby had the chicken cacittoria.  All excellent.  Biscotti' for dessert.  $52  We will be back.
Great place to eat German food and drink German beer, and it won't make a hole in your wallet.  The only thing negative is the neighborhood.  If your dinning here at night, please be aware of your surroundings.
Came to Wonder Spice with a friend who grew up going there. The two servers we had were very friendly and attentive, and the food was delicious! They heard me talking about how I'd had a certain dish spicy somewhere else and offered to make my meal spicy. Big portions and a comfy atmosphere-great for lunch or dinner--reasonably priced as well.
Wonderful Vietnamese food. Have gone here 3 times already since they opened barely 2 weeks ago. They're so nice and friendly, and the food is amazing. My partner is strict vegan as well and there were plenty of options.
Le's is always a win. I've been gong here with my family for many years now and have never had a negative experience. My favorite dishes are lemongrass chicken and any of the wide-rice noodle dishes. What makes both of these dishes great is the flavoring. It's hard to describe precisely, the best way to explain is just that  they get the flavor right here.
My house is two blocks from here, and it's taken me this long to try Sauced due to the mediocre reviews found here, as well as word of mouth. Based on my experience last night, my concerns were unwarranted.   Dined with a friend, and we shared;  pork cracklins - delicious, perfectly fried, seasoned well, and way bigger serving than I expected,  black-eyed pea fritters - delicious, perfectly fried, larger than I expected (Asian chili dipping sauce good, but the others were meh), white bratwurst - not my cup of tea, so I shouldn't speak to this one, caesar salad - very enjoyable, grilled effect was quite nice, skewer trio (selected brisket, chicken, & shrimp) - this was quite a mediocre dish, came with weird uncomplimentary sauces, only thing I had that I wouldn't recommend.  PS This was way too much food, we totally rolled out of there. My plan is to return with my man, have a couple drinks, some pork cracklins and black-eyed pea fritters, and call it a night.  On the drink side, the menu was nice. Turn the page to get past the $10 house cocktails, as the second page has the $6 ones. I had a Harvey Wallbanger, quite nice. My friend had a sazerac which he enjoyed.  All in all we had a great experience. Total tab was $55. The decor was comfortable, not at all as overwrought or kitschy as I was expecting. We sat in the back on the rounded booth which was quite comfortable. The noise level was very acceptable until just before we left when the place was packed, about 8:30pm on a Thu. And Ria was playing hostess. She was extremely welcoming, and gave us our pick of table.    I consider this a great addition to the hood. And I'm looking forward to coming back, sitting on the front deck, having a cocktail, and enjoying the street scene.
First of all, to be frank, my friend's Power Pizza was served uncut. We were all very disappointed and astonished. Additionally, my other friend's Shrimp Fettuccine only had approximately five pieces of shrimp. Also, there was a paper table cover on the table but we were not supplied crayons for our pre-dinner rituals. Furthermore, my friend who is lactose intolerant received cheese on her Shrimp Fettucine. Finally, we asked for the check and received it about 6.9 minutes later. Overall, the experience was unforgettable and we made mems nonetheless. 10/10, would recommend.   P.S. Beautiful toilets!
College Optical is wonderful!  They are always attentive and ensure that my prescription is up to date and correct.  Their selection of glasses is incredible.  At each of my visits, they spent time with me to pick out glasses, fit me for contacts and discuss my insurance benefits.  Not once did I feel rushed or unheard.  Most importantly Dr. Holland and the rest of the staff are always friendly, helpful and honest.  100% would recommend this business.
I ate here 4 times in my week in Portland. Partly because it was across the street from my friend's house but mostly because it was really good.   The oatmeal pancakes were really really good. And the short stack is still huge. Their organic syrups are super amazing.
I always avoided getting our carpets cleaned at our old house because it seemed like such a hassle, but I made a vow to do better in the new place. Several people on our neighborhood FB page recommended Peacefrog so I decided to give them a try. Called on NYE day and got a friendly scheduler who explained everything. The technician, Mike, arrived on time and worked quickly. He was aware of our cat and gave him a chance to hide before getting started. We had a pet stain that wouldn't come up and we weren't charged for the extra cleaning attempt. Carpet looks great and the whole thing (upstairs and stairs only) took about two hours, plus drying time. Good job! Definitely would use again.
Great place.. good burgers.. surely like this one!
Damn, I am so glad Henry's partner at Otto's told me to get the F- out when I asked why did my 10 dollar lunch turned into  a 22 dollar lunch?  So anyway I am still wanting some pizza, so I get on line and this place seems to fit the bill.  So I order a small pizza and salad.. costs less than what I would have paid at Otto's..  HELLO..  and they brought it to my front door with a smile.. so good, I just wish that I had someone to share it with..  way too much for one...
This place got lots special flavor bbt~  Love the Oreo green tea cheesecake and they have a few selection of savoury dishes too (curry fish balls, teriyaki rice bowl etc... Also hot or cold tofu flower dessert :D  Nice place for grab and go :) only thing is the wait is a bit long~ ordered 2 drinks on a Tuesday night at 10pm, waited 15 minutes and it's not packed busy tonight. Prepare yourself with a patient while waiting for your yummy sweets.
BEST BRUNCH EVER. we waited about an hour to be seated, it was super busy. And definitely worth the wait  the restaurant is very compact with close tables, you get to know your neighbors very quickly. They have a coffee and waffle bar right in the front with unusual dipping sauces for the famous waffles. I had the milk chocolate lavender with a waffle  a nice treat before brunch! My hubby and I ordered the salmon fume and paella. Both were delicious! The flavors dance on your tongue this place is at the top of our list EVERYTIME were in BC!  Salmon fume: 5 Paella: 5 Waffle + milk choc lavender: 4
Me and The Piegon went this past Saturday around 4 in the afternoon. It was a good thing we got there when we did, because around 20 minutes after we were seated the rather small wait turned into a real Charlie-Foxtrot.   There were 40 people lined up along the small front waiting area of the joint shooting daggers at those that were already sitting and enjoying their food. The looks were those of desperation and hunger, coupled with a few who looked like they were dragged there by their wives and girlfriends because it's new and cool and would rather have said screw it and headed to Neuvo Laredo just around the corner.  The Piegon got the Butcher's Cut and I got the Flip Burger; we split the Onion rings. The burgers were exceptional and I liked the fact that they were not too big (5.5 oz), because when I left I didn't feel like throwing up or taking a diabetic nap like I do when I eat at George's or the Vortex.   We actually had enough energy to head over to IKEA and pickup some picture frames. Speaking of IKEA, the join totally looks like it was furnished by the Swedish furniture giant. The white walls and modern red plastic chairs look like something from A Clockwork Orange.   We split the Nutella and burnt marshmellow shake, it was O.K, nothing to slap family members about.  Overall the experience and burgers were good and we will certainly head back over to Howell Mill Rd to eat there again.
Have walked past this place for months meaning to try it.  And, have absolutely no regrets about finally doing so today.  On previous occasions it looked like it had just a few customers in there but today it was half full when I got in.  My timing was perfect as within 5 mins of my arrival, the rest of the place filled up with a wide assortment of folk  I ordered the Tamago (Egg) Ra-men that's featured on the menu cover and requested the spicy version. I am not a ramen aficionado by any means but I have to say it was tres delicious. Extremely flavourful and raise the roof off the top of your mouth, not blow it off, spicy. !  In fact,  I'm going to go out on a limb and say I definitely now prefer Ramen with chicken base over the regular pork base.  I was a tad thrown by the whole brown egg that came in the dish and at first thought it was still in the shell but it wasn't.  Biting into it and getting the partially soft yolk was a sublime moment.   I am normally quite a big eater and found the regular portion size ample.  I left feeling pleasantly replete and not over full or bloated which would have made continuing my chores onmy bike very uncomfortable.    The decor is beautiful in an understated way.  Could not stop myself rubber necking to get a good look at how the casual yet classy ambiance  had been accomplished with a subtle colour scheme and textures.   Will definitely go back and was suitably impressed to take others with me
I LOVE LOVE LOVE LOVE LOVE this place!  Been coming here for years.  The moment you walk in and sit down you immediately feel like you're in someone's persian family home and ready to eat a home cooked persian meal.  If you're more into the "experience" of dining out, you may be critical of this place, because they're not about glitz and glamour, they are about DAMN GOOD FOOD!  The beef kebabs always come out scrumptious, the flat bread, the persian style lentils and rice, I'm not even kidding my mouth is watering just typing this out.  It's also a very culturally interesting place to eat, because it's the only place where during any given lunch time, you can see Israelis, Arabs and Persians all eating in the same room feasting on the same delicious eatery.  Now if only we could get the entire middle east to run like this resteraunt things will be great :)  Been coming here for at least 7 years and won't stop for another 7+.
Best fat burger in town ( there are many types fat/skinny/greasy/etc Hoppdoddy has the best Fat burger) cool ambiance, great idea ( sustainable eating) its not a new idea, but i like the way they make it easy to understand for those of us that don't usually partake. My personal favorite is the Greek burger, and the Hard Cherry Lime-aid with Gin or vodka... for dessert try the Salted Caramel shake... they also have the real sugar sodas... DEFINITELY GO THERE  :)
First of all- the Staff is amazing.  Everyone is super nice and always cheery.  I usually opt for the drive thu because in the morning I'm lazy and don't want to get out of my car.  On the off chance I do go inside I feel like I'm waiting FOREVER for my order.  I almost feel like the drive thru is faster.  My advice is wait in the drive thru line- you'll get your drink faster.
Great food, great service, Great location! We tried their veggie momos last Friday. Never had such a tasty momos. When we went there owner was actively working in the kitchen. Staff are very pleasing and friendly. Service was very quick as well. Will definitely be one of their frequent customers!
Richard was great.  *  Showed up on time *  Focused on the areas I requested *  Went the extra mile by organizing things!   I really appreciated his eye for detail. I am going to request him again soon :)
Stopped here for lunch before a road trip. I had the grilled cheese and fruit bowl.  It was ok.  Nothing exciting but not horrible. Mom got the short stack of banana nut pancakes.  She said they were good but not awesome.  Very generous portion as she couldn't finish them. I'll go back to try it again.
Yup, 5 flippin' stars. I'm just going to delve into the facts, the Szechaun beef noodle is literally THE best I've had. There was so much that I had to take the rest to go and the leftovers even sufficed as a whole meal of their own. The noodles were soft yet not soggy, the broth was...oh gosh, so good. So flavorful and comforting. It's like if your mom made you a nice heaping bowl full of love. The beef chunks were plentiful and not full of tendons like most places. It just falls apart when you eat it. Price wise, the noodles costed about 9 dollars, pretty dang good for what you get.   We also ordered the beef rolls, basically the green onion pancake wrapped around some beef and hoisin sauce. Four in an order, and trust me, you will get full off of two. The green onion pancake was nice and flaky like green onion pancakes should be, so thumbs up to RiceBowl for nailing that.   I'll be back, RiceBowl. Just have a bowl of beef noodle waiting for me!
I first time here, but I like this place!) See u soon again , thank you so much for amazing coffee ) and sandwich))) mmmm yammy yammy))        .
This hotel never disappoints me!! Stayed here with my wife for our 1 Year Anniversary and the package we paid for was above and beyond what we were expecting. Mira called us the morning of checkin and went over all the details in regards to our stay. Jason our driver dropped us off to dinner and was there in no time to pick us up. Jason gave us 5 Star service! My wife told me that she felt like we were out of town so that tells you how great of a stay we had. Only down side of the stay was trying to hangout at the pool. Recommend you get to the pool early if you want to have somewhere to sit and hangout. Other than that we had a true 5 Star stay!! We will be back!!
I like it. I work very close to this place and I've only gotten their food delivered. That being said I've never dined in the actual establishment.   So far I've tried:   salad rolls: fresh and delicious with their perfectly spicy peanut sauce.   Tomyum: it's ok. It's a little too sweet for my taste but some people like it that way.   Pineapple fried rice: mmmmmmmmm, that is all.  Tropical cashew crispy chicken: very delicious. My second favorite.   Thai Smile chicken wing: OMG. The best on the menu. My favorite item here.   There's a lot of good Thai in Portland and this is pretty legit. If you go I would recommend something off of he signature house special portion of the menu rather than the usual pad Thai or curry from this restaurant because I'm sure you've found your favorites of those elsewhere and it would be unfair to judge them that way.
This is a good default breakfast place. There service is always very good. They have a large menu. Nothing is truly amazing here, but everything I've had is good. There is something on the menu for most people here.
This is a cute little gem of a cafe. For the vegan in our party they had vegan French toast, tofu scramble, and vegan sausage, while I had a ham and caramelized onion omelet. Both were phenomenal leaving us both happy. The one downside was the smash browns, but everything else was so good we overlooked that...
I miss Boston Tea Stop!  My favorite stop for boba in Boston.  A cute little place just off of Harvard Square.  It's pretty small, so I don't usually stay, I just grab my boba to go.    The bubble tea is great.  I rarely stray from my standard black or green milk tea, but here I remember really like the rose petal? or rose-something tea with lychee jelly instead of tapioca balls.  (sorry it's been so long since I've been there).  And they also have mochi ice cream which is YUM.  I always try to stop there on my (now very rare) visits back to Boston!
LOVE LOVE LOVE this restaurant. This has quickly became one of my favorite brunch spots. I have tried quite a few items and all have been awesome.  I normally order the strawberry orange juice. The staff is friendly and fast. Food comes out so quick it is scary.
Shame on me for taking so long to get here! I walk & notice signs saying, "Sue says..." I'm already liking this place. A woman takes my order & I ask if she is the famous Sue. She says, "I'm Sue, but not I'm not famous."   I get a hot Italian. It was perfect. I like the bun a little toasted so it doesn't get soggy with the oil. I'll be back!
Fun hibachi style. Long wait though even with a reservation. Food was excellent. Pricing a bit high. Would recommend if you're not in a hurry.
Nate, the owner, came out and looked at my house prior to the move, just to get an idea of what would be needed manpower-wise. I liked him from the get-go! Great guy, very personable. After meeting him, I knew I'd found a great company.  I got a few estimates, and most are in the same price range. So just find a company you like, one that gets good reviews about the employees being friendly, taking care of the furniture, etc. WM Pro guys were all that. Got my 1400 sq ft house completely loaded and unloaded into the new house 45 minutes away from start to finish in 5 hours! I was truly impressed. I would gladly call them again for my next move.
Authentic.  Not fancy.    Know what you're going for - Noodles, Lamb Skewer, or Gyoza.  If that isn't what you're looking for, go the Asia Cafe around the corner.  Noodles are fresh, not dried.  some people like 'em, some people don't.  I do.  Know where you're going - to a noodle house.  Nothing fancy.  There is a good chance you'll be sitting at a card table.    While this is Chinese fare, it is the most authentic noodle restaurant I have found to date - very similar to what I use to enjoy when I traveled to Japan.    The pancakes may be a little oily for some palettes but if you know what you're ordering, you'll likely find them to be excellent.  Be careful - they will be HOT.    I ordered the Lamb Noodles and the broth was excellent.  Fortunately, it was not too salty (something I frequently encountered when traveling to Japan).  While I generally prefer spicier fare, the flavors were excellent.   I would thoroughly like to see more noodle houses - real ones, not chains - in Austin.    If you know what you're going for, you shouldn't be disappointed.  But don't try to make it something it isn't.
I've come here for a couple years on Record Store Day and the service is always great.
Awesome happy hour! Good selection of brews. Also, they have a Hawaiian melt that was to die for. Splurged a little and also got their truffle fries. Cleared the whole plate, and left 5 pounds heavier and happier :)
Very friendly employees. The make up artists are very talented. I've had a couple of them do my makeup. I also recommend trying their smoky eyes service. I like to go to Sephora during off hours when it's not too crowded in there. Obviously the no pressure concept is working for them. I also like to support small local stores as well but one of the nice things about this place is you can browse among a lot of different brands and not feel pressured about commissions. They'll make you samples. I also like to buy products here versus some other places because you get loyalty points for doing so.
Great tacos for a great price.  And they have a gluten free menu - yay!  The tacos you will want to eat again and again.
My favorite indian food and beautiful decor. When you want to treat  your self or family to a nice night out GO HERE. LOVE IT:)
I only went in super briefly to buy the sample packs they carry, but I liked how kind and eager to help the owner was.  Fumerie carries niche lines, most of which I've never tried.  I can't wait to come back and get tailored recommendations from the owner!  A must-visit for all perfume lovers!
I am definitely no expert when it comes to the French experience but I have traveled extensively to France and can confirm that this restaurant has an authentic flair to it's food & service.  it is a real gem in Vancouver - where the neighborhoods are lined with Sushi joints & Cactus clubs on every corner. Les Faux bourgeois is very charming and quaint, a great place to take out-of-town guests to show them how "culturally diverse" the cuisine is in this city.  Tips: Try the French Onion Soup, Steak & Frites and Florentine tart. Lastly, be sure to make reservations!
As a native of the New Orleans area, I can tell you that this food is legit! It is delicious and amazing. crowded, but charming. Their biscuits are out of this world as is their home made jam.
This is only a review for the auto shop, not the gas. This is the only place I've been for an inspection sticker. They seem to know what they are doing as I have never had a problem with any inspection sticker. They are honest and all business. I even once drove from Boston because I know I can trust them.
Had my first visit and fitting. Was a little nervous because I have been hard to fit. However, I had a very good experience with Elise and was soon fixed up with what I needed. I will be returning in the future,  when needed . Thanks Elise for all your help.
After a review that I made about Spud, I received a week later a reply explaining the reasons why they couldn't provide us more local products. It is due to the terrible weather that we are experiencing. Unfortunately they have to propose us more Californian products as California had been more lucky with he sun than we have been.  I mean what kind of company answers all your question to make sure that you are happy with them ........  Spud.ca, you were already a big favourite of mine, trust me now when I say that you are my hero .......
I love Meghan. There, I said it.  Meghan's amazing for two reasons:  1. She makes magic with my hair. She seems to find THE color that works well enough to get people saying 'hey, hot stuff'... okay well not quite 'hey hot stuff', but that's the way it sounds to me after I get my hair done. And if I'm thinking about making it short, oh she'll make it short, and give me the confidence to think I can actually pull it off. Which I did, thank you very much.  2. She has the best personality evar. She's seriously such a delight, without being fake. She's totally honest (even admitting her love of questionable 1980s musicians who shall remain nameless).   She's so fun and I'm thrilled to be able to get a rockin' lookin' do, while having a great time, too. Can't ask for more than that!
My husband and I have eaten here quite often with our family for a special nite out and have gotten take out from here. Everything is always amazing!! I recommend the meatballs, eggplant rollatini, and veal parm. Only reason for not giving 5 stars is parking and wish seating was more comfortable as you feel to on top of other guests next to you. It is very cozy though and the service is wonderful!
I've only tried 1 type of sandwich, and I've inhaled it every time! Simply amazing! The prosciutto with red pepper.  Price: under 10 bucks for a sandwich and drink.   Service: Fast and efficient once you get to the front of the line. Be prepared to line up to order, they are making the sandwiches as fast as they can but can't keep up with the  droves of hungry peeps. Lunch time is especially busy.  Selection: Italian deli with meats, pastas, sauces, other Italian delicacies  Seating:Theres only 2 outdoor tables so better off going for take out.  Parking: Free street parking but not that many spots around.  Payment: Cash, Credit Cards, Debit.
eat the COPPA. best thing ever.   I usually get the mashed potato with gravy as my side and then my bf gets the Boss salad and we split the two plates between the two of us. The coppa is amazing but it's quite heavy so half the sandwich is perfect amount for any foodie person. Trust me. Service is solid. They do have a 5 drink max policy.  If you go there often get the beer card so you could eventually get a mug.
The bar area had a very classic look, with lots of dark wood. The seating was elegant, with wooden chairs and white fabric table clothes. I loved my drink and the bartender was even nice enough to try making a new drink I had heard about. I loved the music in the background, it was at the perfect volume. Definitely would come here again.
I haven't had dumplings in years and I'm eating primarily on the gluten free ones here. They were super good!!!!
I always get a solid haircut Sports Clips. Stylists are friendly and always consistently good.
My wife and I had been looking for a good Central American restaurant for awhile, and we discovered this place a few years back.  The pupusas are fried masa and cheese with bacon bits, and they make some of the best pupusas I've had outside of Honduras.  Put a little of their pickled lettuce on top and it's delicious.  I also recommend the Yucca plate if you're in a big group, and you can literally chew off pieces of Yucca (similar to a potato with a harder texture) and bacon (real meaty pieces, not strips) for an hour.  If you like Central American food, I've yet to find a better place in Texas.
Delicious ice cream and amazing prices on Quest bars!   They have a really good selection of toppings, and the free sprinkles on Saturday are great. Also, I got to talking with the owners and they are very helpful and attentive. Great little find!
OMG!  Sooooo good...but don't go here for chicken fingers.....fried shrimp...lobster sauce....although they're really good here this is authentic...HEALTHY for the most part and DEELISH Taiwanese food...been going regularly for about 7 years....the best sauces....around.   Mmm MMM ....greens like Sprout Of Snow Peas.....or Spinach and Garlic.....or Chicken and Garlic.....sooo yummy.   Hot Pots...many, many many more dishes I had never known...and learned by asking the friendly waitresses...what is he eating?     Look around....see what others are eating and try....too many favorites to list here as I LOVE most of the dishes....go explore...enjoy!
Didn't like the marquee sign out front, looked cheap and appeared to be a strip club or something. However, the food was good and the beer was great! Outdoor seating was comfortable! Service was great! Wings were descent, jalapeño bacon wrapped skewers were good!
Still a good burger, but the experience has started to slide.  Lot's of signs with rules, limitations, etc.  No more smiling server greeting you in line to get a drink order.
Elephant's contacted me the same day I posted my original review to follow up on my experience.  Wow!  They left a very nice message verifying that the PDX location does participate in ALL of their punch cards, including coffee and cookies.  Also, they said that they're reviewing this with all of their staff, so something like this doesn't happen in the future.  Thanks Elephant's!
I ordered the chicken and dumplings with string beans.  Both were seasoned nicely. There was a nice serving of dumplings.
Typical beach all you can eat buffet. The lobster and crab legs are obviously the main attractions, and they should be! I'm not a crab leg or lobster connoisseur but they all tasted great to me. The other fish was all a bit over cooked, seemed like it had sat under the light for a long while.  Some of the sides were good including the lobster ravioli and the crab cakes. Definitely try this place out if you are looking for a buffet in the Orlando area.
Delicious cheese steak and Great service. Will def go back. Calorie explosion though, so expect to be FULL and would recommend for hangover.
This seems to be the sixth location in the area and is similar to the Roswell Rd location, but opened end of December 2013 and has a bit more space.  It was brand new and clean (though a few things were still being added) and fairly empty, so the kids roamed around having a good time.  They even had a dance party with a mascot for the 10-12 kids there at the time (I would have guessed they did this only for parties).
Lots of cute accessories for the pre-tween girl. Only buy when there is a sale - other wise everything is ridiculously overpriced.   I've always had decent luck with the sales staff. Friendly and helpful.
Like what other Yelpers have said before: What a great hideaway in Central Square!   Yelpers can take FOREVER to decide on a restaurant, especially with our star rating, price range, category of food, and neighborhood locale computing in our little heads. I was actually surprised that Jessika picked this place, since she hates Chinese food. But this is different than what you might usually find. The dishes actually tasted more Taiwanese than anything else I've tried before. For a party of five, we had no wait on a Friday night!   She was quite fascinated with the background of the food in the introduction of the menu. For dishes, we had the Shogo Nurmtak (appetizer) , Chhasha Curry (chicken), Langsha Duluma (beef), Langsha Momo (steamed dumplings), Gonga Deyngo (pork fried rice). All the descriptions and other choices are in menu pages, so be sure to check that out! All in all, the food was very tasty and well seasoned. It is not greasy at all and not the kind of food that you would regret eating afterwards. Darn the Chinese for their unruly occupation!
We tried 3 dishes all 3 were good. Unfortunately instead of coke we got cherry coke. I'm curry there wasn't enough meat. Over all good experience
This is a fairly nice place to go for a special occasion.  The atmosphere is nice and the view is grat.  It also sits at the end of a very nice walk.  The food is fairly good.  I took my wife here recently for her birthday.  I had salmon, one of their 5 version of it, in truffle sauce.  it came out almost like a fajita.  The onions and mushrooms had the nice fajita consitancy, and the salom, a fairly average piece of it, was placed on top.  The salmon alone was meh at best, but the mushroom sauce and the grilled onions and mushrooms definitely made the meal.  My wife got some opakapaka (which I later learned to some sort of Hawaiian snapper).  I tried a btie and it was one of the better wish fish preparations I have had.  I am a fan of red fish, but not too fond of white fish, however I would definitely eat it the way this was prepared.  Overall a good place for a date.  On a side note in response to a couple of the reviews I read:  Seriously, who goes to a fancy (at least fancier) restaurant and expect a 24 oz. steak?  When you go to a place like this you aren't supposed to gorge yourself like a fat pig, save that for Claim Jumpers or Mexican.  You are paying for the ingredients, the preparation and the atmosphere.  If you're just looking for some ho-hum food made in a ho-hum manner in a ho-hum restaurant but in large quantities, please go to Denny's and stop soiling the reputation of decent places with your improper expectations.
I wanted a classy experience with some friends on Saturday night and thought that Gypsy Kitchen would be a great place to try out. It's located in Buckhead and is upstairs at the shops of Buckhead.   There is a parking garage located right beside it and there is an elevator that brings you right to the restaurant.  Gypsy Kitchen is a Mediterranean and Spanish influenced restaurant that features many drinks and a wide range of tapas. Great place to grab some drinks and tapas! They have a rooftop as well.  I loved the atmosphere and vibe of the restaurant. It felt classy, yet had this Spanish feel to it that made it relaxing.   We were seating on the rooftop right away and enjoyed where we were seated. We were greeted by an amazing waiter, named Stanford, who made our experience even better.  We ordered the Rose Sangrias, which were absolutely delicious, and for food, we ordered a plate of Patatas Bravas. They were pretty simple, yet they were pretty good. I honestly think that it was overpriced though. I wasn't completed impressed by that.  Overall, great place to hang out with friends or have a date night with a romantic feel to it. However, it can be pretty overpriced.
The fact they didn't include the "Famous" on here irritates me. I was a doubter but, as a beef guy, I must say the best of the bunch. Roll it out rare and tender, 3 way please. Never tried anything else and likely never will. I've tried all the others and while good they simply aren't "Famous"
The best $7 you will spend on lunch in the area! Talking about the Gyros..They put some sandwiches to shame. WOW, this thing was: Fresh..Juicy..Meaty..Yummyyyy  This little no frills place packs the punch. I went in there after being cooped up inside with a cold and was craving something good. Even though my appetite was lacking, I put that whole thing down and felt great after!   Zooooo Gooood!!!!!
This is a fairly newer QuikTrip. Located conveniently on my way to the gym. It is nice and clean. Plenty of pumps. There is an entrance and parking on the side of the building in addition to the front. This is a great way to avoid the crowd. Prices are affordable and the pricing sign can easily be seen from the road. They sell lotto here - fyi for the gamblers. :-) The staff I have encountered are nice.
What is a Chinese street sandwich?  Delicious, that's what it is!  Just picture a handmade flatbread wrapping device enclosed with a chicken so lightly fried you almost think it's calamari.  Then add pickled peppers, greens and sauce.  You now have the Chicken Po Boy in your hands.  Eat and enjoy.
I just had an amazing massage by Jessica. If you have any type of pain anywhere she will take care of it ! She also asks questions in regards to what you like an dislike and what you'd like her to focus on.   She incorporated stretches and seemed to be extremely knowledgable about the body.  I was very happy that she pin pointed areas that needed work. I just booked a 2nd appointment next week
Sadly I don't recall his name but I had one gentleman arrive with a very unassuming truck for my move. It wasn't complicated so I suppose that was sufficient. He was quick and efficient. The fee to move was sensible. I guess they are a new company because there was no branding on the truck and the worker didn't appear to have on a shirt identifying him with the company. He was very kind and even conversational. For smaller moves I wouldn't hesitate to use them again.
One of the best pho places here in Portland!!! The size portion is decent, the soup and meats are in good quality. I just wish I live close by and can come here to eat everyday.
My family and I just love this place. We take all our friends out to Blue Fin for dinner; I eat lunch there 2x a month at the counter next to this lovely Japanese woman who probably eats lunch there every day. Food is fresh, sushi wonderful, people who work there very friendly. Not a fancy place , not too expensive, and a gem of a neighborhood restaurant.
The food is good and it was rated A on the state inspection app whatthehealth.  I wanted to leave a tip but they don't accept them. They say they want you to come back and their excellent service backs the statement.
Good frames.  Good pricing scheme.  Lenses included in frame price.  To get my annual benefit for insurance it costs more to use insurance than out of pocket.  Beautiful frames.  Especially like the limited edition frames.   No spring hinges so minus one star.  The suggestion that if you buy 5 you get one free kinda indicates that the type of clientele here isn't really me. For my 2017 benefit you'll find me at target optical.   But I love the clearish shiny opalescent blue frames.   For that I might up my price point for my 2018 FSA use.   The doctor is trendy.  Matches the store.  She is honest and kind.
We really enjoyed this place!  We each had a curry plate. I had the Tikka Masala and Lawrence had the Korma both with chicken. I got mine at 'medium' spice but I feel like I should've gotten the 'hot' instead. Other than that everything was delish! I suggest the Mango Lassi as well for you mango lovers out there.  Our meal was less than 30$ and we also had an order of Naan bread as well. They also have the buffet option which is $9 per person. We left very satisfied with the service.
This OSJL used to be just ok, and average. Once the Dedham store opened about 5 years ago, it was much better. Now FINALLY the good shipments of inventory and rather well organization have arrived to this location, right off Route 1 past the Dean Street traffic light. If in the area, stop by, otherwise go to the Dedham one. They are both great and equal.
We had Katherine take care of our pup while we were out of town for a few days. We went by her house and met her and some dogs she was watching at the time, and our dog just loved her and the other dogs. She sent us text and pictures updates of how he was doing. He went and played at the park and went on lots of walks. He seemed like he had a great time and came home a happy, healthy and very tired puppy! We are very glad we found Katherine and our pup had so much fun!
Excellent service,food,atmosphere, This is definitely one of the best restaurants in Orlando but a bit pricey but still worth every penny. Reservations suggested if not U will wait for a long time.   Food Quality- (out of 5 stars) 4 Atmosphere ( out of 5 stars) 5 Service ( out of 5 stars) 4
This place has its mix of good and bad stylists. I think 72 (includes tip) for a haircut (above a new talent) is a little steep, but maybe that's just me. The lady I went to did an okayjob, but she cut my hair a couple inches shorter than we agreed upon. However it ended up turning out well and she was very polite.
We have come here twice and had an excellent experience both times. I work at a fine dining restaurant myself and can speak from experience when I say the service at Eddy V's is the best in Austin. You'll pay a pretty steep price, but you will get EXACTLY what you pay for. The steak is good, but the seafood is some of the best in Central Texas. If it is in your budget, I highly recommend Eddy V's.
Clearly The MLBPA has some taste. I definitely enjoyed my stay here. I came for a trade show and the room was built in to my cost.    I thought everything about the hotel was nice. The room was nice,clean and comfy.  As almost everyone had said the TV in the bathroom was awesome. Not that I would need the TV, but since it was there I made a point of turning it on while in the shower.   We had breakfast and a working lunch during the trade show. The lunch was so so good. Tons of choices really good chicken and steak. Delicious deserts. Not your typical buffet lunch.   They have nice piano bar in the lobby, with actually decently priced cocktails. It looks a lot swankier than it really is. But still nice. The food at the restaurants are pretty good. I think they have 4 or 5 restaurants. The pool area is huge too. Top Notch.   The hotel is also really close to the Pointe, which has a movie theater and tons of places to eat and shop. They even have an awesome comedy club! So you don't have to pay for a cab or Mears to go anywhere. If you're  only in town of a conference or trade show.
So much fun! Perfect summer activity. They have boards, kayaks, canoes, etc. all reasonably priced for the area. Staff is local hs and college kids, but they're super polite and really helpful.  And shocking for Marblehead in the summer... free parking!  Also- they have "frequent paddlers" discounts, if you get addicted.
Best time here out of all of the Hooters...... Ended up with 3 of the girls to go out for drinks with a few friends of mine and they were all down to earth. Good times and good peeps. I recommend getting their porno wings and a pitcher of their coldest.  Porno? eh? Translation: XXX hot=porn  Enjoy
i'm a sucker for puns. any one that knows me knows its true.  i love this place. both times i've gone have been on saturday nights when the djs were playing a sweet mix of mos def, chromeo, old school reggae, and the funky fresh stuffs. the enormous room is a great time. the drinks are decent. i mean, booze in boston is expensive anyway. the bartenders a cutie and the rest of the staff handles the crowd like its no ones business. the only downfall that they have is that it takes so long to get a drink at the bar, that half of the time, my friends are out the door before i can even get my drink. other than that, great lounge, great vibes, great beats.
An incredible dining experience! Four of us had dinner one Saturday night and still talk about the outstanding service and food! Two people in our party have food restrictions. Our server went above and beyond to make sure we had safe meals that were still delicious. Everything is made to order, even the sauces!! I assumed I wouldn't be able to have a pasta dish because o cannot have garlic or onion. The chef was able to creat a sauce just for me! Another person in our party had the gluten free pasta (the only pasta on the menu that is not made in house) and it was REALLY good! The restaurant is small, but very cozy in a good way. It's ideal for a romantic date. Tables are very close together, but once you're seated you don't feel overcrowded. There are only 15 or so table total. Make a reservation! We cannot wait to go back!
AMAZING deal for quality, new boxes. More people need to know about this place! Bought four boxes today - 2 medium and 2 large - for under $7.00!! You can't beat that with a stick! Anyone buying directly from a U-haul is nuts w/ this place around!  Totally impressed!
I've been to Gusto many times and it is always great! You can't beat their happy hour. All of their apps and pizzas are so good! We just went their for brunch recently as well and everything was delicious. I got the polenta dish and it was sooooo good. Pancetta was a little salty, but I didn't mind! I'm looking forward to going back for more happy hours and brunches soon! The service is always stellar as well.
I had the Pad Kee Mao take-out and it was great. The place was very busy when I went and so it appears to be a popular place with the locals.
Amazing açaí! Authentic, fresh, healthy and energizing. Great location near south congress. I suggest the Chuck Norris for post workout or the Over the Rainbow add Avocado. Check them out!
Wanted authentic Mexican food, small restaurant but still got what I wanted.. Great service delicious food. I ordered the stake with enchilada topped with mole, beans, rice plate. With a chile relleno on the side!! Uuummmm
Everything has always been top notch when we come here. Luis had always taken care of us, and the food is tasty.
Good food, good price, and good service.  You will always find the same staff and enjoy getting to know them.  You can also get in and out quickly if you are in a hurry, or call in a to go order that will be ready by the time you get there.
Super yummy food, but FYI some of it is on the sweet side. The catfish was perfect  with just the right cornmeal to fish ratio. The Mac n cheese was good, so was the cole slaw (condiment for cole slaw was sweet but on the side so you could choose how much). The ribs and pulled pork sandwich were also really good - smoky and substantial with a thick, tangy, almost pineappley sauce. We will definitely be back for more - can't wait to try the rest of the menu!
We loved VietRiver! We stopped just to try out some Vietnamese food without realizing what amazing vegetarian/vegan options they had! Super bonus! My (meat-eating) boyfriend even loved the vegan "ham" wontons. Everything was SO good from the Vietnamese iced coffee and fresh lemonade to the Vegan Buddha Feast Soup (with veg. chicken, vermicelli noodles, veggies) and the Vermicelli Chicken Bowl. Service was great too. A definite gem! Highly recommend!
Imani (bartender) is the absolute best! I was very pleased with all of her recommendations and quite pleased with the drinks she made.  Every time someone comes into to town we make a CowFish stop.  My last guests brought children who were served bento boxes with the cutest rice crispy/sweetish fish treat on the side. I loved the service as well as the music!
The rotisserie chicken is GREAT and a good deal.  If you come at dinner time they will be taking one right off the skewer for you most of the time. The steak kebabs are great as well. The chicken pot pies are awesome but a little costly, def worth a try.  As for sides I like the mashed potatoes, stuffing, and cornbread. They all taste great but (other than the cornbread) are just a bit salty for my taste, probably not much more salty than most other take out places though. I haven't tried much else on the menu yet,. This place is a good alternative to pizza or Chinese (especially Belmont Chinese places) They have free delivery to Belmont and Watertown.
Vacationed in Maui last summer and this place felt so true to the island! Loved chatting with the owners about our previous trip and comparing their food to the authentic Hawaiian food we were used to. Amazing pork and fish tacos! Love the cool food truck vibe. Only bad thing is the flies around the picnic tables. Other than that, this place is definitely worth the hype!
The Buckle is what every clothing retail store should model themselves after. They have a great selection of premium jeans as well as a lot of other "teenager/young adult premium wear" and accessories. If you wear a standard size pant (waist size 28-40), this is a fantastic place to shop for jeans, as they carry a range of washes, fits, lengths, etc.. so you'll be able to find a few pairs that fit well and look great.  The quality of clothing is premium, but it's not crazy expensive either. I've had jeans from there last through beatings; only 1 pair has gotten a hole in it, and not a single torn seam. Most jeans are going to cost $70-80, but there will be a few that may cost more. They're definitely a good value if you're looking for a premium quality clothing product without spending a fortune.   Although their clothes are good quality, their accessories such as necklaces and bracelets aren't quite as high quality. I've had these break on me after only a few times out with them, and you can tell just by looking at them that they're pretty frail.  As far as customer service/experience, I went in today, and I have been to the buckle stores a few times. I was greeted when I walked in, and everything was neat and orderly. A young lady name Kat (or Cat) asked if she could help me find anything, and what I was shopping for.  We quickly picked out a few different fits, and from there figured out what washes I preferred. I only had to go into the dressing room once, and Kat even found a few similar styles and sizes for me to try on while I was in there to make sure I was getting the best fit and look I possibly could without having to go back and forth from the dressing room. As a guy.. none of us want to spend a ton of time shopping for jeans, its a nightmare honestly, but Kat made it easy!  I also will admit that I don't know a tremendous amount about jeans, but Kat also was on the spot here, telling me about the difference between "rise", "fit", "leg opening", and material, and how this affects the fit and look when they're worn. She even showed me a few different washes in the size/styles I liked that we could order online and have shipped to the store or to my house.  Overall it was a great experience, and I appreciate people like Kat that take a great product carried by the store, and make it an easy and pleasurable experience to find, learn about,  and purchase the perfect clothing for the look you want.
South Congress Cafe continues to impress me every single time I visit, which lately it has been quite often.  Everything that I have had thus far has been absolutely delicious.  Last time we went we got the appetizer special, which was escargot in jalapeno butter with crostinis.  Those of you who will not dare to try escargot do not know what you are missing.  I am pretty sure my eyes were closed most of the time taking in all of those     flavors and textures the dish had to offer.  For entrees, we ordered the trout almondine  served with lump crab meat and toasted almonds, and the five spice crusted pork tenderloin (my new favorite).  Both dishes were excellent.  The rainbow trout had a nice pan-seared outside and a flaky inside.  The chipotle lime brown butter complimented the fish nicely.  The pork tenderloin stuffed with blue corn chorizo was well prepared and full of flavors.  The ranchero burgundy sauce that it comes with is spicy and delicious.  The tenderloin is served with potato enchiladas to settle down the heat from the sauce, and fresh vegetables that not only added more textures to the dish but beautiful colors as well.  One of the best dishes I have had in a while.  We finished dinner with a coffee (medium house blend)  that hit the spot.  Props to our waiter Tim for adding so much to that evening's dining experience.    The previous time we ordered the jalapeno venison meatloaf with charred poblano demi-glace on a bed of roasted garlic mashed potatoes.  Talk about comfort food!  All of the components of the dish came together in perfect harmony.  I just wished it was bigger.  The country snapper was also very good, particularly its light panko crust and the guajillo mashed potatoes that it came with.    Whenever I thought South Congress could not top itself, I got the dried cherry and pecan  bread pudding with bourbon sauce.  That dessert deserved a moment of silent.  For those of you who are familiar with my reviews 1) I LOVE bread pudding and will go to places to grade theirs, and 2) I do not like it with ice cream.  So in this case, Amy's Mexican Vanilla ice cream was nowhere in sight.  Even before I tasted it, the aromas of the bourbon and cinnamon were intoxicating me with joy and delight.  As my fork gently cut through the pudding I could see a bit of steam emerging from its warm center.  I think it might have spelled the word "bliss".  The cherries were not tart as I had feared.  The pecans were not overwhelming and only emerged in a minuscule way to add a slight crunch to the perfectly-sweetened homemade bread.    It was simply perfect.
The owner, Mr. Abercrombie, was very patient  working with my changing schedule.  Our carpet is light in color and has not been cleaned in 10 years and Genesis made our carpet look new!  All of the black spots and stains were removed and the job could not have been better.  Everyone was polite and professional.
Had a great meal at Bartaco on April 12! I took a suggestion from Southwest Airlines' magazine and had a great experience. Really unique flavors and ingredients and a cute, comfortable atmosphere. Be sure to try the wild boar or the pork belly tacos, and the CLT!
My favorite place for a quiet romantic dinner or gathering with friends. Excellent food, service and atmosphere.
Location/Parking- Easy to find and there's a small parking lot.  Customer Service: Very friendly staff Ambience: Very quaint with few tables, but that's all part of its charm.  Food: So far, I've tried the pork and beef burritos, guacamole and beans with cheese. All were delicious with lots of filling in the burritos.   I'll be back to try the breakfast and the grilled chicken entree next time.
Good customer service, even on a busy day. Only reason I giving them 4 stars is because of a lack of inventory.  I was there close to a hour trying to find the right pair of work boots. It was worth the time though. I had narrow my choices down to 2 models of what they had in my size-12. They found 1 of the models with a blemish. I didn't care since they are for work, and it was cosmetic. I walked out happy paying $65 for a pair of $200 boots.  This is my 5th pair of Keen boots in 8 years. Great brand, but a little pricey. That is why I am stoked about my new boots.
We have been here several days at Disney World and desperate for a good sit down dinner that wasn't over priced!   This place is very well priced and is a very nice.  The food was quickly made and very good!  I had the spaghetti bolognese and thought it was great.  My daughters had the kids spaghetti and cheese pizza and they were real adult versions, just smaller so it was also wonderful eats.  We order a half craft of their table red wine.  Also good.  Definitely worth the visit and prices $10-13 entrees.
Great place to have/host a happy hour.  We always order from the "bar food" menu.  The wings and burgers are great.  Also, try a half order of the lobster nachos.  There are usually good music acts as well on Friday or Saturday.  Parking can be a problem, so get there early.
I had a gel manicure/pedicure and it was the most perfect thing I've ever had. They take the time to fix any smudges and make sure the polish isn't over the nail and don't rush at all. I'll definitely be back. Also try to upgrade to a deluxe pedicure it will be the most relaxing thing you ever experience:)
I started looking for movers in early January and got kind of freaked out by how expensive, or shifty, or nonprofessional, or whatever that they all seemed to be.  I called an old friend who had been in the moving business years ago and he said, "You ever use Yelp?" "Duh," sez I. Practically living on Yelp, why didn't I think of that. So, my friend Lee goes on, "Check them out. They have a million reviews and they still have 5 stars." He told me that he sends all his old customers there and he's heard no complaints.  So I Yelped them and Lee was right. And if you know how to read Yelp, you know a shill review from a real review, and these were real reviews by real people. You also know that anyone with 99 reviews and a full 5 stars has to be doing something right, and they are.  I called Jennifer and talked to her. She sounded intelligent and pleasant. I described the move and she said, "you could go with 3, but I'd recommend 4 guys." I thought about it for a day, looked over the other cheesy estimates I'd gotten, and although Precision's estimate was much higher than the others, but I I suspected it to be more accurate.  I decided to drive in to Somerville and see their facility and meet Jennifer. Finding it to be well established, clean and organized, I booked the job with Jen and picked up my $50 worth of free boxes.  You get a lot of boxes for $50 at Precision. And they're good boxes; U-Haul quality good for a lot less per box. (BTW - do yourself a favor and stay away from Home Depot boxes. Flimsy, fall apart, and not at all rectangular. Whatever shape they do approximate is one where the flaps don't even come close to meeting when you try to seal them.)  On moving day, my crew was Bo, Phil, Iztvan and Bella. They showed up promptly at 9AM, they looked strong and well rested, and immediately took  a walk-through of the house.  Bo told me right away "We might not get this done today, but we'll try," and they launched right into moving me out of the top two floors of a 3 decker, and basement into temporary storage a couple hours away.  And they flew through it. These guys worked their butts off. None of this "2 guys will carry and 1 guy holds the door thing." Each guy moved things by himself that I could have sworn would take two guys. One guy moved a cube safe by himself! By himself, on his shoulder like it was a sack of flour! It was men in perpetual motion and they had filled the truck - to the top - by 1 'clock. And it was starting to snow... and it was forecast to snow hard. I was worried - a full truck meant that getting it all into the storage space would be iffy.  They took less than 2 1/2 hours to get to the space. Having driven it before, I can tell you this: IF they stopped for lunch, it was to pick it up at a drive through and eat it on the road. They mooooved.  At the other end... allow me to digress. Have you ever heard of the Theory of Nominative Determinism? It suggests that "...a person's name is given an influential role in reflecting key attributes of his job, profession, or general life," like a guy named Larry Speakes will grow up to be a White House spokesman, and a girl named "Eileen" will limp? And then there's the aforementioned member of this moving squad, "Phil." I guess the theory holds up for homonyms.   These guys work as fast in reverse as they do forward. Three of them unloaded and Phil worked inside the space arranging, stacking, shifting, rearranging and re-stacking, filling every cubic centimeter of the unit. Absolutely amazing. Like backwards Jenga.  It was after 6 PM and snowing hard - almost blizzard conditions and the stuff was piling up.- when they finished. They flat rated their return trip to Somerville at 2 hours. Maybe they made it in that time, but I'm pretty sure they saved me an hour or more on the back end.  This move was expensive, don't get me wrong. But it did cost what Jennifer said it would cost, and it did cost what I had already figured it would cost. This crew took on a tough job with enthusiasm and good spirit and carried it through to the end.  I could not rate any experience more highly than this. If Precision Movers were a barbecue, I would eat there weekly.
This store is great.  They have wonderful sales and the customer service is amazing.
I come here all the time as I live within minutes of this place.. and I love it. The monk who works here is very friendly and makes good suggestions for special treats to eat from the menu. I love that they make all the fake meats themselves, you can literally taste the difference! The salad rolls are super yummy. And definitely try the avocado smoothie- a tasty treat!  I will mention that this is a very laid back restaurant and while the service isn't like a regular restaurant you will not compromise the quality of food. I will continue to go there for a quick snack/ lunch/ dinner forever!
The food is great!  One of my fav brunch spots in town.  The service is always awesome, and the environment is welcoming.  A great place to meet up with friends or have a nice date night!
One if the best dining experiences we've ever had. The aroma, flavors and presentation took us back to the orient style cuisine. Staff was so professional and nice starting with our waiter Joe. Every single dish was explained to what it was and how it was cooked.  Most of the fjord was prepared with locally grown products. We are making plans for our next visit.
When I stepped in this restaurant for the very first time, it instantly smelled of alcohol!! That raised my concerns about the place. However, have been here twice now and ordered their dosas on both occasions. The dosa was gr8, crispy with 2 kinds of chutney and a spicy sambhar. The potato mash stuffing inside the dosa was so spicy the first time around that my toddler was red in the face. The owner was generous enough to offer complimentary Gulab Jamun to calm the heat :) The jamuns were perfectly soft centered making them melt in the mouth. My husband had a to go order of Biryani on both counts, the quantity is for 2 servings but its still over priced. We tried the chicken chettinadu with nan. The Chettinadu was awesome with nicely balanced flavours, no over powering spices. The service can be be slow on weekends and be prepared to wait 45mins before your order arrives. Over all...gr8ly satisfied.
First off, I'm not vegan, but my girlfriend is so we often eat at vegan places when we go out. I wasn't even hungry but thank god I ordered a vtopia club, and my girlfriend ordered the grilled Mac and cheese.   I made a Yelp profile just to review this place. I just ate the best sandwich I've ever eaten in my whole life. Do yourself a favor and come try it. That is all.
I don't have time to haul over to Allston/Brighton for Yi Soon bakery, so this is the perfect place for my more frequent visits to Chinatown. In addition to marbled tea eggs, this place also has homemade Taiwanese style bahtzang / zhong zi -- sooo delicious, probably  mostly because they are fresh! I also really like their buolo bun so much more than other bakeries' around here -- light, fluffy and the crust is moist and doesn't separate from the rest of the bun. Only tried a handful things so far but will definitely be back to taste more!
These guys are great! We did two resizings - very quick no problems and great fit. I also worked with Phil on a custom piece using an old stone. He was so helpful, had great ideas on what we could do and picked out exceptional accent stones for the piece. Very easy to work with, great pricing and fantastic work. Highly recommended!
I walked in early afternoon, and my initial impression was very, very nice.  The salon was clean! The salon owner, Tamara, greeted us right away and was very pleasant.  The nail color selection was smaller, but I liked the fact they had a good selection of O.P.I. and Essie in all the colors that are in style right now.  Tamara did my pedicure and she was very friendly.  She even offered me tips on taking care of my nails at home in between manicures and pedicures!  I liked that she established a rapport with me right away.  By the end of my visit I knew all the ladies and they were all professional.  The prices are pretty reasonable and I like the menu of services that they have.  If you are looking for "Official" nail care this is your place. I will be back!
the lobster raviolis were absolutely delicious but my dumb boyfriend was challenged by the waiter to eat a large pasta dish and it was gross watching him out how BIG it really was.  seems like a fun place to take your family for a huge meal.
Nice modern-looking environment. Mellow music. Friendly service.  Most importantly, great food. My friend had the combination fried rice. He loved it! I had the combination clay pot and it wasn't bad at all. I wish I had chosen my friend's seafood clay pot which looked amazing.  You have to try out this place. Great eat for the late night munchies.
This was so interesting and fun. Our guide was extremely knowledgeable about all of Boston's haunted history and we got to do a little paranormal investigating at the end of the night.
Divine ambiance. Red walls. Cold ones. Love music. There is no better place in the 'ville.
Went here for a birthday celebration.  Birthday girl got her dinner free.  All menu items delicious and service is the best.  Always try the specials - they are great.
Great drinks at the tequila bar! Cierra recommended awesome drinks! Fast and spunky and she totes loves her gig!
We come here about once a week. Pizza is delicious and the wings are really good too. We usually eat next door at hoplandia which is also awesome. Get the Pizzatna , amazing!
Very professional and passionate about their work. Great communication and responds very quickly.
This is my second time getting a breast augmentation and lift, the first time was done in Scottsdale, Arizona by a different surgeon. I had such a great experience and am unbelievably satisfied with my results. I am SO happy I decided to go with Dr. Gorin, and his nurse (Christy?) is the sweetest person, I am so thankful for her kindness. Dr. Gorin and his team are literally nothing short of amazing!
Nice staff. Good burger, juicy. You can order without a bun too. Excellent Bloody Mary.  Clean rest rooms. Overall would go back for Tasty burger.
awesomeness!!!! Their oreo cakebatter ice cream was to DIE FOR!!! After my first visit I swallowed my pride and waltzed my ass back in there with my head held high and calorie counter back home the very next day lol. The workers are very friendly!
Nice authentic Mexican food. Doubled checked my food before leaving to make sure I had everything there. Good portion of carnitas and good amount of cheese on the quesadilla. Would recommend for Mexican food. It was ready promptly and would order again.
Visiting Vancouver, saw this close by to our hotel, kids ordered kids chicken pho husband had the #8 pho chicken, chicken ball and quail eggs (but it only cane with one egg), I had the Cambodian style pho.  Generous with their veggie garnish, also fresh.  Good lean slices of chicken in all the pho.  Quail egg was good.  Cambodian pho was flavorful, but very salty and had definite MSG in it.  My tongue is a bit swollen feeling from salt overload, but I would come back another day and try their vermicelli.  Overall grateful they are nearby!  Went back 3 nights later for dinner and tried their vermicelli with prawns and grilled pork.  So good!  This is what you order here.  Generous portions, well seasoned and tasty.  Good proportions of ingredients.
Half Fast has so many options that it never gets old. And I don't think I've ever had a bad sandwich there either. The only downside is it can take a while to get your food, so don't go if you're in a rush. You can try calling ahead, but I've had varying luck with that. They also deliver, so there's that, too. This is usually the place for me and my friends to go on a lazy afternoon to get food and drinks.  The Strong Islands and Margaritas are great. Just don't drink more than two pitchers of anything, ever.
K&G has been one of my go-to spots for YEARS. This one in particular has been my spot since I moved to Atlanta in late 2013, and with good reason: great selection of big and tall clothing, and a fucking phenomenal selection of self-tie bowties.   Generally, I'm stopping here when I need to re-up on anything that I might need to look A1 at work...button downs, suit jackets, slacks, neckties or bowties, tie bars...but I refuse to buy shoes from here...that's not a thing. They haven't failed me yet, and their selection of shirts in the 20 neck/38 sleeve range is a thing of beauty.   The only gripe I have? No public restrooms due to construction.
Hands down the best meal you will have in an airport anywhere. Ever since my 1st visit last year, I schedule extra time in Atlanta airport so I can zip over  E concourse for a bite. Extremely well trained staff that never meets a stranger and will always greet a weary traveler with a smile. Not much of a lay over? You can always call in take-out from the runway and grab your bag of delicacies on the run.
The restaurant is warm and inviting. I believe it is run by a family and the decor and atmosphere reflect a family vibe. The owner spotted us as soon as we walked in and was super attentive making us feel right at home. He clearly takes a lot of pride in their homemade food and in helping people navigate the menu while taking time to explain every item to us and make suggestions. Cant say enough about how awesome the service was! Food was some of the best tasting  Venezuelan I have had.
Boy do I love me some Moe's!  My only complaint is the tomatillo salsa is hit or miss depending on location (and ripeness of tomatillos perhaps?). All other salsas are always spot on, my tacos were great as always, and they were willing to accommodate my mix and match philosophy of taco ordering lol!  Would have been 5 Stars, but the tomatillo salsa was watery......
Lilikoi  Once you find this small storefront you will put it in your internal GPS.  You aren't coming here for the decor but for the FOOD which is delicious, affordable and plentiful.  The owners Veth and her husband (terrible with names) are very sweet and welcoming.  I took takeout for the family and was sent home with some delicious extras, bread, slaw, etc.  The drunken noodles are savory.  Both the tofu and chicken come with plenty of protein and leave you with at least a second meal of leftovers.  I had the pulled pork cuban sandwich and it was delicious.  The homemade sweetbread made it great and the slice of ham was sublime.  It made my vegetarian partner think twice.  When you patronize Lilikoi you know you are helping small business owners in the best way.  If you live in NEP this should be a regular togo option.  If not, call in your order, drive by a few times, find 'em and take home a feast.
Little hole in the walll place  with just a few tables.  The watress was nice.  The owner was walking around talking to everyone.  Excellent food.   Had the mushroom  swiss burger and fries.  That and iced, total with tip was $13.  I would definitely recommend coming here.
Highly recommended for food and drinks.  a hiiden treasure.  a bit stuffy.  worth the wait.....food portion on small side, but bursting with flavor.   Most have is the Pork Belly Sliders and Mango Quinoa Salad!
A group of us were wandering around Boston on a day trip and stopped at Scoozi for lunch. The restaurant was still pretty empty but the bar looked so inviting we decided to eat there.  There were 4 of us including my autistic daughter. The female bartender couldn't have been better. When she asked my (adult) daughter what she wanted to drink and got no response I explained to her about my daughter's disability she couldn't have been more accommodating.   We got a round of Noble Pils, and a BBQ chicken pizza and a Blanca pizza.   The food was tasty, the service was great, the only scary thing was the hike down the stairs to the bathroom.
There are so many coffee shops in Austin, but Caffe Medici will always be my favorite. Perhaps it's because it's within walking distance to campus, or because the background noise upstairs is just right for long study sessions and coffee dates alike, or that they serve their coffee in proper coffee mugs with pretty art in the foam, I'm not entirely sure. Yes it is expensive, yes it gets super busy, but they make their almond lattes right, and they serve taco deli tacos.
When I come to visit my family in Atlanta, Octane + Little Tart Bakeshop and Cakes & Ale are our go-to coffee shops.  We're pretty picky about our food - particularly coffees, teas, and desserts - but Octane never disappoints.  (Neither, for the record, does Cakes & Ale.)  Pros: -The baked goods from Little Tart Bakeshop are truly divine.  The meringues, chocolate/caramel tarts, and basque tarts are particular favorites.  You can tell that all of the ingredients are high-quality, the recipes are tried-and-true, and the bakers are highly skilled. -I'm a tea drinker, and I am thrilled that Octane offers loose-leaf Rishi Tea.  Yay! -I'm not a coffee drinker, but my parents are, and they both very much enjoy the coffee at Octane.  They are extremely picky when it comes to coffee, so this is definitely a compliment.  -In contrast to other reviewers, I've found the waitstaff to be perfectly pleasant and polite every time I've been there.  The male cashier with the gage earrings and the tattoos is particularly friendly and helpful.  Of course, I have only been here a handful of times, so who knows? -It's a neat loft space with high ceilings, plenty of light, and a rustic retro feel. -Although the patrons (and servers) largely appear to be "hipsters," unlike other reviewers, I have never personally had an issue with any of them being judgey, impolite, or at all unpleasant during my visits to Octane.  That said, I've only been here a few times myself.  Cons: -The chairs (as other reviewers have mentioned) are small, hard, and singularly uncomfortable.   -Most of the tables wobble. -In the summertime, the shop is virtually un-airconditioned, with two tiny ceiling fans providing next-to-no air circulation.  This makes it particularly difficult to enjoy a hot tea, which is my preferred beverage, when I'm already sweltering.  I can only imagine how overheated the servers, cooks, and bakers must be hanging out over ovens and stoves in the back.  However, the temperature is fine during other seasons of the year.  Overall, I would highly recommend Octane + the Little Tart Bakeshop  However, you may want to wait it out until slightly cooler months of the year to enjoy their delectable desserts and delicious drinks.  Although I've never had them myself, my family has told me that their sandwiches and quiches are also wonderful.  If possible, it would be great if the chairs, tables, and AC could be fixed, but otherwise this place is truly excellent, and the food & drinks are perfect.  Yum!
I would give this place four stars, but one time someone asked me if I was pregnant here. That is why I gave it a demerit.  On the other hand, my moh (man of honor/bestie) used to come here a lot on Monday nights when it was empty and drink dirty gin martinis (yours truly) and Johnny Walker pink (or black whatever) with our buddy Benny the bartender. BTB turned a blind eye when I put the moh's rocks glasses into my oversized bag so that we could continue the party back at our places. They also have delicious food here. The cobb salad and the black and blue wrap are phenomenal.   The ambiance sucks on the weekends. Would you like another blue button down shirt to go with your Bud Light, sir? And there is always a line on the weekends.   Great place to drink in the afternoon in the Spring/Summer time on their downstairs patio, complete with separate bar and 2 plasmas.  xo
I'm fairly new to motorcycling and my first bike was an older Ducati monster. Motocorsa helped me with parts and some long overdue servicing on the bike. One thing that I needed was a new set of tires and I noticed they had a sale on tires. The tires on my bike weren't a standard size and were not on sale. Regardless, Motocorsa special ordered me the tires and gave me the sale price anyway without having to ask. I was very thankful since I was already dumping a lot of money into the bike.  Fast forward to two weekends ago, my bike was unfortunately backed into while it was parked and the insurance company totaled it. I went into Motocrosa and Christian helped me look for a bike that fit my budget. He did an amazing job at helping me figure out what I wanted, since the old bike I had isn't made anymore. Christian really did a lot to look for a bike for me even though it is an incredibly busy time of year for the dealership and my budget was low. I didn't expect such great service since there wasn't a ton of money to be made from me but he did a great job! I ended up finding a bike from a private party. Christian was excited for me and didn't make me feel like I made a bad decision by not buying something from him.   I had a great experience at Motocorsa and they definitely have my business in the future. Thanks guys!
This place is really cool! The decor is interesting, there is a crane inside the dining room! We went for dinner and arrived just after 7pm on a Friday. It was packed. We had to sit at the bar but it was fine. Food is pretty good but I was a little disappointed in the meat, cheese and dip platter. I wouldn't order it again. Hummus and pizza were good. Wine flight was fun and there are 4 or 5 to choose from. They don't have a lot of beer options so for picky people looking for beer you probably won't love the selection. Not very many lagers if you are a fan of lighter beers. Lots of vino ;)  There is some free parking on the street which is a buns!  I would go back for sure.
I had been to happy hour here some time ago with some work friends and was pleasantly taken by this joint.  So much so I decided Linda and I should check it out.  Thanks to traffic in this wonderful town, she arrived late to see some friends of mine, so we decided instead to enjoy our time in town and ended up here.  Not in the mood for a full on dinner, plus the bankroll was a little thin, we hit the bar for appetizers and near privacy.  We sat at a little table by the window at the far (as in closest to the door) end of the bar.  For the longest time, read: most of the time, we were alone.  It was nice.  Very nice in fact.  We split the Queso Fundido and Ecuadorian Potato Cakes, not realizing there actually is a menu for those without the love of meat.  But it was near divine.  I'm a sucker for cheese.  Especially for cheese with peppers and other fine additions.  I wanted to take it home and slather it all over... I mean it was wonderful.  Linda loved it as well.  Washed it down with a beer and life was good.  Service was, well, spotty.  I think maybe because we were far away, or that our order was pretty plain, the waitress kind of ignored us.  Not in a "you're not good enough way" but in a "you don't even register on my radar" sort of way.  And to be fair, the isolation was nice - I hate it when servers are over your shoulder every 30 seconds, it annoys me.  I think next time we'll come back to hit true happy hour...maybe even dinner.  Time will tell.
They were awesome! Me and my sisters are in town for the weekend and we wanted to do something fun together so we went to weymouth nails studio & spa to get our nails done and we had such a great time, we called and they took us right away when we arrived, they did such a great job with our nails and toes  everyone was really nice! I got a pedi and a manicure and it was great! I will totally come back again!
Tried this nail salon for the first time and had Tammy do my nails. She did a wonderful job... It was a little packed due to the holidays...but everyone was super friendly and nice.
Amazing!! Really, it's an overused word but this spot truly lives the definition out: "Adjective (hee-hee) : Causing great surprise or wonder; astonishing. Startlingly impressive."  When you think antique store you think older, dingy and cluttered. Not here. This spot is huge, organized and easy to move around in. Each little room is a different vendor and you can feel their theme as soon as you lay eyes on the area. You can check a wide range of who stocks here on their website: http://adjectivesmarket.com/category/dealers/  There are tons of employees walking around ready to assist when needed but not pushy in the least. They also take your items you are carrying and place it on the table in the front for you. Great way to keep your hands free and each section organized. The range of decor and fashion is really broad so there is truly something for everyone. Furniture, decor, clothes, jewelry, maps, lamps, shoes, wood, tin, glass, so much awesome stuff.   My favorite were the abundance of wall decor, broach art, wood furniture and old windows and so many owls! I saw so many various pieces for myself as well as fabulous gift ideas for all sorts of occasions. I purchased two things for myself on this visit as well as two gifts.   Super packed on the weekends but still fun to go, however, if you want much less of a crowd, hit it up during the week.   Truly Amazing!
Came off a flight from Newark NJ and went to a paint and wine activity. After that we were starving so we ended up here. This was my first time. I liked that when you walk in not only is there a retail section of glasses and other things but there is a bar where you can do tastings. Also a bakery section in the back. It had potential.   Waited about 10 minutes for a table which wasn't bad. Our server was Heidi and she was nice. Not too attentive but very helpful. Ordered red sangria, friend got the sparkling wine flights and they were both OK. The sangria was too sugary.Nothing special which is crazy since they make their own wine and that's their thing. Maybe I'm just use to the bottle wines I like, who knows. Appetizer was Thai Chicken Lettuce Wraps. They delicious. The amount of chicken was not enough for three people but it came with onion crunches, chopped cabbage mix and delicious cucumbers. For dinner I ordered the flatbread and salad combination, Carne Asada flatbread and Caesar pesto salad. The salad was really really good. I didn't really taste much pesto but it was faintly in the background which added so much flavor. The flatbread was perfect. The bottom was crunchy and the meat was very tender. My friend ordered the wild mushroom and chicken risotto. The risotto was very tasty. Got to try the ooey gooey butter cake and it was so good. Ha everything was so good ! I would love to come back and try more things. The lobster bisque soup was calling my name.
This is one of my favorite places to come eat. So far everytime i've been here the waitresses/waiters has been on their A game. The apps are good esp wings/hummus platter. My favorite sandwich is the BLT but there was just a little too much tomatoes inside. Recently i also tried the egg sandwich lyonnaise and i was in love! It's a good place to come and grab something to eat. I love their late hours too!
I stopped by this place to get some coffee and pie the other evening. I like the decor a lot, it's very warm and feels very nostalgic. They have alcoholic coffee drinks for $7, but they were running a special on one that was $5. I believe the slice of pie was $4.75. I had the chocolate, which was so rich I couldn't finish it. They seemed to be quite busy, with a mixed crowd of old & young. The staff was friendly for the most part, over all it was a good experience.
Good carwash, they hand dry with towels. Helpful and friendly staff. Make sure you fold in mirrors if possible because brushes can be rough ! Unlimited carwashes for $29/month is a good deal! (Rough of one basic wash is $15)
I took a friend out for a birthday dinner here on Monday (1/29/18) and our reservation was at 9:15pm and we arrived a tad bit late at 9:20pm (Downtown Parking). But despite being late we were welcomed and seated right away, it was a Monday night so they weren't incredibly busy. Because the restaurant closed at 10pm, I thought for sure that we were going to get sub-par service (bad experiences) and that who comes in 40 minutes before closing look but the service was great and the food was even better. I highly recommend the grove to anyone looking for a good downtown Italian meal and an extensive wine list. Will for sure be back!
This place has great breakfast and dinner. I've been here twice and the only complaint is that the service could be better. The food is so so good. Their pies are the bomb. The only bad experience I have had was last night when they forgot to give me fries with my take out order and I didn't realize until I got home. They are giving me a free meal next time.
I could easily recommend the Jinya #3. The Brussels sprouts were outstanding. We ordered two $1 sides of them. The (free) side of hand-pressed garlic was also a novel feature. We'll definitely be back. In fact, this place could easily become our new go-to place for Ramen!
Fun colors, relaxing environment and great attention to detail! Ryan took his time and filed every nail to squared perfection. He used high quality glosses for my manicure and was an extreme professional. Need your nails done in downtown Portland? This is the place!
I've been using this Discount Tire location for many years and for my last 3 vehicles. These guys are absolutely top notch in what they do and also accommodating for my previous and current vehicles which are lowered. They do proper work in a prompt manner, and there's even a window where you can check out your vehicle getting worked on. Their services are plain and simple: tire installation, rotation, tire pressure check, wheel balancing and flat repair (that means no alignment or check engine services done here). The technician pulls up your vehicle right outside the store entrance and recaps you on the work done and any reminder(s) for the next service, and then you're good to go. In addition, the waiting area at the store is pretty decent with good A/C, clean restroom, comfortable chairs, available coffee and magazines (if you want to grab food or drink, there's a McDonald's next door as well as a Wal-Mart).
Life savers! My phone was dropped and shattered. Insurance replacement value was a rip off and would take a week. Called these guys and dropped it off. Had my phone back good as new within hours for a reasonable price. So lucky to have this place on the Westside!
I try to choose carefully to find a reputable company and I chose Austex Sprinklers because of the amount of great reviews in Yelp.  They did not disappoint! The tech who arrived at my place was  Frank M.  He was awesome! Very nice to speak with, extremely helpful and educational on a few items. You could tell just be speaking with him that he is a good human. :)  It was clear that he had my best interest in mind when we were talking about the related sprinkler issues. I will not hesitate to contact them again in the future and I will be sure to tell anyone I know about this company.
Ordered online wedding invitations. Cheap, easy, and the final product looked fantastic. THANK YOU!
Great spot to grab a drink from and chill in the park across the street   Pros: - Love how they grind the fruits and veggies right in front of you - Place is simple and clean - Gigantic menu displayed on top (they're actually in a font size you can read without squinting, which is a major plus)   Cons: - Pricey - $5.60 for a 16 oz  - Place is tight, you can enjoy your food/drink in the park across the street
Awesome cheap food with good service. I always come in with a large group and the server expertly handles us and is very efficient with splitting checks.  Perhaps the service is better at  the late hour  we usually come, but I still have had an enjoyable experience at other times. My only complaint is that if it's after 11 you have to pay for parking.
Had them come out to clean and startup my pond this season and the results were amazing!   Jeff came out to give me a bid and next thing I knew he was able to get me on his schedule. Got it cleaned and the young man who cleaned it gave me suggestions for eco friendly ways to keep it algae free as I have tadpoles every year. Still looking great. After it was cleaned I noticed it was loosing water. Even though it was several months after it was cleaned I contacted Jeff and again was put right on the schedule. Came out and found the issue immediately. The pipe that returns the water to the upper resivour had gotten bumped and was loosing water from there. He fixed it right away at no cost.  I plan on having them out yearly for startup service and any issues I may have. Wish I had found them 10 years ago when it was built!!
Ayyy order the Black Cherry w/ soft serve vanilla-it's hella good! I ordered it togo & the worker made that $h!t pretty fast! I'm about to go back there tomorrow again ha ha.
We went twice while visiting Portland. The omellettes are incredible and I'm sad now because no other omellete will ever be the same! The whole wheat french toast was just average but I'm not sure if its the fault of the restaurant or the fact that whole wheat bread does not a good french toast make. BUT what sealed the deal and makes me love Bijou forevermore is there oatmeal pancakes. BEST pancakes ever. I am craving them as we speak. If you go to Bijou make sure to try their pancakes. I heard the buckwheat ones aren't as good, but the oatmeal? TO DIE FOR!
I don't know what took me so long to finally check this place out, but I'm glad I did.  I'm a fan of any place that has games and drinks and decent food and Thinking Man hits the spot.  We had the potato rounds and edamame, all yummy, and played Apples to Apples over a few rounds of drinks.  Their mixed drinks are unique and tasty, and my husband enjoyed a few different beers (until the next morning.)    I'm mad we had already eaten dinner because the TLT sandwich sounds too good to be true.  We are planning another night there soon to try it out!!
Best Thai in Austin! Correct me otherwise...  After visiting Thailand, I'm a real sucker for Thai food, but I'd say Titaya's is loads better than the other Thai restaurants I've been too in Austin. I'm a serial meal repeater, namely that Gang Penang Curry. I could seriously just put that in a cup and drink it up.  Pad See Ew- MUST get eggs with it. You'd be making a horrible mistake not to. Trust me, it helps make the dish.  Aside from the awesome food, the service is good compared to a lot of Asian restaurants (ahem, pho restaurants?). I've never had a complaint with the service, and lord knows I've been far too many times.  If you don't want to believe me, then trust my Thai and Sinaporean friend who also agree that it's the best Thai in Austin ;).
I consulted yelp for the best watch repair in Vancouver and this seemed the best, despite it's location. After walking past it I realized he's in the post office there. He has enough room for a chair and very small work space. He did some testing and determined it was just my watch battery which he replaced. It took 5 minutes and $5.60. I'd go there again.
First time here and it was excellent! Food was delicious, I had the Spicy Chicken Ramen and I've never tasted anything like it. Our server was amazing at taking care of us. I'll definitely be back in the future.
This is the best it's gonna get in Austin! I came here twice in 3 weeks due to the impeccable, friendly service and bomb ass Korean Fried Chicken (KFC)! College Roadhouse is owned by a super nice Korean couple who made me feel right at home. The owner quoted me the weekday karaoke room rate on Saturday, but he still honored the cheaper price ($15 vs. $25)!   Both times I came here, I rolled up with a large group and ordered at least 10 bottles of Soju and two KFCs. We usually stay for at least 3 hours, and I only spend around $27! For enough alcohol to get me tipsy and dinner, it's one of the best bargains in town! We usually get the KFC chicken with the sweet and spicy Korean sauce and buffalo sauce, and both are delicious!   The karaoke room has a good selection of English songs. I don't quite understand their karaoke grading system, but it's fun to predict your final score. One of the mic keeps fading in and out, but it wasn't terrible. I will say that I wish they played the correct music video with the English songs we chose.   I'll most likely return within the next month!
All i've had so far are the tofu soups, but they are outstanding and affordable and keep me coming back again and again.  If you're lucky you'll be in a spot where you can watch the kpop music videos, so fun.  Yum, i'm salivating just thinking of those delicious soups.
This place is great! Been going for about 10 months and honestly the food seems better just within the last couple months. YUMMMMM!!!
I blew a plug with space heaters in my office.  Jack came out the next day, took a look and installed a heating system within 24 hours.  I am warm, no business interruption.  Jack's a pro and has the resources and smarts to bring you the best service at the best price and his timing is impeccable.  They are all about service and getting to you quickly.  They worked their butts off, cleaned up, and I am super happy.
I grew up on hot pot, so I am easily disappointed.  Came for dinner on a Mon. night.  It was surprisingly busy.  My primary complaint is that service was slow and inconsistent, but the quality of meat and the lack of feeling pressured to eat and not linger was far better than other hot pot places in the area.
This place is delicious! I work right down the road and stumbled upon this place. The service is awesome and the staff is super friendly. I went during lunch on a week day and they seem to have a lunch rush. You are seated pretty quickly and if you order pho it comes pretty fast. My boyfriend ordered the small brisket pho and added meatballs to it. He said it was delicious! They add tons of meat in there. The small bowl was plenty for him and he even took some home! I ate one of the rice bowls that had pork slices and roasted poems skin. Their savory sauce is delicious! A little sweet and the consistency of BBQ sauce. Loved it. My plate was delicious and also a bit big. Will for sure come back to try other things.
Great spot for a quick breakfast or a lovely salad lunch. The owners are awesome and they run a great little cafe.
I need to come back here and try the buffet.  Unfortunately we went somewhere else for dinner which wound up not being good so we needed dessert we knew would be fantastic.  Our waiter was Mike T and he had a great personality and was very speedy.  I ordered Vanilla Cream Puff, which I didn't really need....but wanted.  I also ordered a Mint Hot Chocolate which was such a scrumptious way to wash it down with.  Boyfriend ordered slice of German Chocolate Cake with side of ice cream and he ordered Hot Buttered Rum.  There was a 2 man band playing accordion and drums which was a great way to unwind after a disappointing meal elsewhere.  I did walk around the buffet on my way out the door and it looks sooooo good.  We will absolutely, positively be back and hope Mike is our waiter then!
Definitely worth a visit. We were looking for something to do on our last day in Boston and so glad we came . We have a 13 and 16 year old and they too very interested and enjoyed it. We spent a little over an hour . Defined catch the movie before you start your tour. My one complaint have been to other presidential libraries and children under 17 free feel that should be here too it would make it more affordable for all families we want to educate our children
I've brought my car here a few times now, and I will say that I like the service I receive, especially for my money.  The actual wash itself is great, but where Scrub-a-Sub really shines (no pun intended) is in the additional services that they provide. Having a team of three guys tackle your disgusting car at once is excellent. One goes to town on shampooing and cleaning the floor mats. Another is busy vaccuuming out french fries from Wendy's, McDonald's, AND Burger King. The third is busy cleaning the dash, windshield, and other interior panels. The cleaning goes like clockwork, and usually, it's done in about 15 minutes.  The only downside is that if you choose to have the additional services done on your car, you may end up waiting for a bit of time. They service only one car at a time, and if they're busy, you're going to wait in line for them to get to your car, and that could end up being a long wait, depending on what the other people in front of you paid for.
My family's go to place for hot pot in Chinatown is Shabu Shabu so was looking forward to mixing things up by going to Kaze Shabu Shabu. Kaze Shabu Shabu is on the edge of Chinatown and is in a distinct purple cube. A friend had gotten reservations for five of us on a weeknight though upon entering it didn't seem like they were needed. We sat at a booth which were comfortable though the backs of the chairs were thin (kids were sitting right in back of us and kept kicking the seats). The service was friendly though sometimes a little slow however the menu is quite extensive. I am use to just choosing from two or three broths but they had probably about three to four times that. Also they had a lot more beer and drinks to choose from but no smoothies. I settled on the tom yum broth ($3), seafood deluxe with udon ($18) and a hot tea. The tom yum was delicious but spicy and the seafood deluxe had a nice assortment from clams and squid to salmon and fish balls though I kept wondering if these were fresh (there was still some ice on the seafood). I was stuffed by the end and felt that the experience and price were reasonable so I think I would come back here again.
Pretty darn good brisket! The self-serve style sides and desserts made it a little too easy for me to over-indulge... Resulted in some tasty leftovers though! Loved the great selection of shiner beers and Texas decorated interior. My only complaint was that the brisket was a little dry for my taste, but the lick-your-fingers good BBQ sauce certainly helped make up for that.
The remodel has made for a fancy-er Produce Row. The patio is really nice although a bit noisy. Nice draught selection. Love the Beer & Whiskey Pairings! We didn't get a chance to eat, next time!
Delicious coffee in Austin. I'm a coffeaholic and this place was great. Very hipster atmosphere which is great. I will definitely visit this place again when I'm back.
Have ate here three times. Every time, food has been delicious and service has been excellent.  No complaints. Their sushi is amazing.
This Hotel is one of the best I have ever stayed at and I have stayed at many. Highly recommended. From the modern spacious rooms to the fantastic pool area and views. It has it all plus location.
I cannot express how underrated this restaurant is: great food, great price and great people!  I would love for more people to know and frequent this wonderful restaurant because they deserve it - but I'm selfish too.  Everything is amazing there.  You will be coming for traditional Thai cuisine.  I highly recommend the Nam Tok, Squid Salad, any of the curries and the Drunken Noodles.  Enjoy!
Natalia P. gave me a cut, condition, and partial foil today and it looks phenomenal. I never really know what I want done with my hair, just that I want it to look good, and she definitely understood my vague instructions and gave me a cut I'm comfortable with but looks fresh.   The salon's environment was lovely, and the front desk attendant and girl who washed my hair were great as well. I was offered a variety of drinks upon arriving (water, tea, coffee, hot chocolate, wine, and more) and salon also features a boutique which was fun to peruse before my appointment. I highly recommend this salon and look forward to returning soon!
The Tony Roma's remodel is great inside and out.  I used to get depressed when we had to go to Tony Romas because it was dark (even at lunch) and the menu, pedestrian.  Now, we've talked about going back more frequently when we drop off our guests at the airport because of their recent renovation.  The exterior is more upscale and sleek with an outdoor patio.  The interior is much brighter than before, more welcoming, and it has an open kitchen.  The menu has local produce listed, and for the plating/size and unique spin on the typical meal, the menu prices are very reasonable.
LOVE this place! It has a fantastic spin schedule. They are very welcoming and have people participating at all skill levels.
Fantastic spot. I ordered beef swarma (sp?) and instead of rice got all salad. Yum. Wife ordered combo rice. Fantastic choice too.
I give this five stars because it's "As good as it gets" for a death metal pizza place since I don't have anything else to compare it to.    Situated on 6th street admist the chaos of the young and drunk, we get a little gem of death metal and pizza.  The pizza is greasy, tasty and  fills you up after an evening of  debauchery.  I stopped in here to grab a slice before a night out and loved the atmosphere which included a  hardcore kid working the counter, Underworld on the 19" tv and a soundtrack of Death Metal to comfort me as I ate my pizza.  It was a nice escape from the outside crowd.    If you like to step away from the ordinary and ease on over to the dark side then you'll love Hoek's.       I only wish there were one in my hometown.
Oh, if I could love a restaurant more I think I'd be leaving my fiancé.  I have been here twice and once to Uchi. Uchiko was a better experience both times. It is a truly magical experience and so refreshing. There are so many restaurants popping up all the time in Austin that are all style and zero substance and they could all take a note from Tyson Cole. I've never experienced service so excellent at a restaurant before. I strongly believe newbie restaurant owners should take field trips here to learn what's up.  It's the little things at Uchiko. You know the food is excellent and inspiring, that's a given, but it's really the service that makes them stand out for me. They go so out of their way to make you feel like a guest, not just a customer. Whether it's the bartenders throwing in a free app while you wait for your table or just the honest and knowledgeable recommendations from your waiter.  Even though we pay easily $200+ when we come here, I never feel ripped off like I do at so many restaurants around town. It is an absolutely phenomenal experience that is honestly more akin to theatre than a typical restaurant experience. Uchiko is a truly special restaurant that deserves all the hype it gets.
Ya know, for a chain restaurant, the steak at Bugaboo Creek is pretty darn good. In fact, it's the one chain restaurant that I really find myself craving on occassion. The decor is kinda kitsch-y, but the food is actually quite good. Serve has been kinda hit or miss every time i've been there- we've had some really great service, and some really poor service. There are 2 reasons that Bugaboo Creek gets 4 stars instead of 5. First, they're a chain, and I don't think that there's any Five Star chain restaurants out there. Secondly, their corporate offices do not make their nutritional information available, which I think is completely ridiculous. Any place that is standardized enough to be a chain should be standardized enough to have their nutritional information figured out. But going on the quality of the food alone, Bugaboo Creek is worth a visit.
Dr. Hymowitz was great! The whole experience was easy and convenient. I had never worn contacts before but by the time I left I felt like a (almost) pro. They have a great selection of eyeglasses and though I resisted at first, the lady who helped me knew what she was doing!
Nice environment, good meal. This place has both indoor and outdoor seating. Standard seating gets busy, but we were able to walk right up for bar seating on a Friday evening.   We started off w/ sushi & brews. Tempura shrimp sushi roll as well as a spicy tuna roll. Truthfully, this was my first sushi experience, but it was pleasant. The tuna had a nice spice to it, but not overly spicy. The restaurant had several beers on tap including several locals (Red Cypress, Crooked Can, Cigar City, etc).  I ordered scampi shrimp and scallops for an entree. The scampi was good. It was not over/under cooked at all. The dish was what you would expect from scampi. I ordered asparagus as a side, which was nicely cooked. The whole dish met expectations for scampi w/ asparagus. Overall, the sushi was the best part of the experience.
Late night comfort food dining. On a cold rainy night I came here with some friends and was not disappointed.  We were a party of 6 and did not have to wait long for a table.  The menu was huge - I didn't get a chance to try the Congee because I wanted to save room for other dishes.  I can't remember exactly what the dishes are called - I should have taken a menu but I have pictures!   - deep fried spicy tofu - clams in black bean sauce - fried pigs intestine - roast duck with plum sauce - thousand year old egg - stir fried pea shoots in garlic - spare ribs - deep fried little fish (bak fan yu - translated I think it means "white rice fish"?) - deep fried fish (cod?) with corn  Everything I tried was yummy - my favorite was the deep fried tofu, it was delicately crunchy, spicy and they used fresh oil! The deep fried little fish were also  delicious, not too salty either.   Service was efficient and friendly, no complaints there.   I will go back and try the Noodles and Congee - I just need to get 3 more stomachs like Bessie the cow so I can try everything on the menu!
You do not need teeth - the brisket simply melts in your mouth!!  The smoker is right next to the restaurant - you will feel the heat and smell the love as you walk in!  Best Texas BBQ I have had in Austin so far. Last two visits (been there only twice) they ran out of beef ribs one order before my order-the second time they gave me the hint to call ahead so they can set aside and hold my beef rib order.  Third visit will be the charm! All the sides are awesome.  Staff and service are great.
It's a small cafe, wish it was a bit more spacious so you're not almost elbow to elbow to the next table, but regardless of that, I would still recommend this place to anyone!  This is the first time I have ever had braised short rib for breakfast (Fricasse).  It was deeeeelish! It was served in a cast iron pan, consisting of caramelized onions, watercress, braised and shredded short rib, slice of applewood smoked cheddar (if you haven't had that before, try it at Whole Foods, that is one of the best cheeses everrrr), topped with an over easy egg.  I had all that plus a waffle with their berry compote. I could have eaten 10 of those waffles!  Will be going back soon!
Tasty and a decent value for the price.  Also open to 11pm during the week and serves Maine Root fountain drinks--lots of positives.
Another great "hidden patio".  A great place to kick back after a walk around the waterfront on a warm summer day.  This spot is a bit off the beaten path but has excellent beers on tap.
Free stuff! That's pretty much the long and the short of it.   Sampling Lab wants one simple thing from your. Your opinion! In exchange they will give you free products to enjoy (or not enjoy) and review. Said reviews are passed on to the makers of the products. Viola, it's that simple. What's not to love? I have gotten a sugar scrub, many products from FishPeople, candies, all types of little goodies that I wouldn't otherwise have tried.   There is literally no downside to this place. The space is beautiful. TOO beautiful to be giving out free things, what did we do to deserve this? If you were giving me free stuff out of a dark shack I would still take it happily. My understanding is that you can rent the space, which would be great for an intimate something or other, it has a very PNW vibe. Employees are friendly and helpful.   The Sampling Lab doesn't have a ton of stock as of late. It's hard to keep free stuff on the shelves I would imagine. It is literally next door to my gym so I can peek in if I see something that catches me eye. I wouldn't go out of my way to come here, but if your in the area it's worth stopping by.
We had 11 in our group for a birthday dinner.  The setting was perfect, the service was prompt and accurate, and the food was delicious.  Four people had the grilled sea bass and raved about its freshness and salsa-like accompaniment.  Several of us had the lamb cassoulet that bursted with flavor and a balsamic sauce.  Bread pudding dessert was a hit as well as the classic chocolate lava cake.  The wine selection was plentiful and the whole evening was fun, intimate for a family birthday, and the ambiance friendly and warm.
For over a year now I have come to Border Grill and they are still the best taqueria in Orlando.   Don't be afraid... Try the lengua (tongue) taco! :)
Damn girl I got so lucky coming in off the street! I had waited for two weeks for the Benefit Brow Bar at Macys to be able to accommodate me ( yes you read that right.. two week wait ) but I'm a sucker! My appointment was at 12:20 and I got there at 12:23 because my boss asked me to finish something up, and they flat out said they couldn't take me. Whatever. Screw that place! So I typed eyebrow into yelp and saw the good reviews for threading here, two blocks away. I came and made an appointment for after work. Got there, friendly attentive staff, then... I meet Roju. What a fantastically unique, funny, genuine person (my first instinct was to write artist... I know) - I had never been threaded before and I honestly will not do anything else again (she made me promise I would throw out my tweezermans). I looked in the mirror and loved them, but noticed some stray hairs in the beginning of one of my brows and asked about them. She said:"no. I'm right. You need to let that part grow in." I laughed and said ok, and honestly when I got home later and took a long hard look - she was totally right. You gotta respect someone so good at their craft they're willing to defy the customer because it is for their dumb customers own good! I'm glad she did. Also - threading leaves your face feeling smooth like a baby's bottom. Just  sayin.
Okiedokie, let's do a little education first.  When a restaurant is small and extremely popular and in a very popular part of town, you make a reservation, m'kay?  Being told you have to wait or there isn't a table when you walk up during dinner or brunch rush is not the restaurant's fault, it is yours.  We decided on a whim to come here, but called ahead and made a reservation for later that evening.  Yes, we had to wait 2 hours for that reservation, but because we called we were able to go shopping and do other things rather than sit and stare sourly at the host.  Also, I found the staff to be superbly pleasant and obviously dedicated to their work.  I watched the entire staff while there, as I had a view of the entire room, and it was like a dance.  They all help each other and watch out for each other and give a head's up or quick word to the table's waiter if it wasn't their table.  The manager walked the room three times while I was there and spoke to each guest at least once to ensure a pleasurable experience.  This was a level of service and cooperation rarely seen outside the five-star scene. If you find attitude here, you brought it yourself, love.  The food is carefully crafted to bring out specific flavors and combinations that the chef has designed.  This is not Applebees.  This is carefully crafted food, and it may not all be to your taste.  But that is the theme and design of this restaurant.  Frankly, I f***ing love it.  No, not everything on the menu, but the concept.  I spoke with the staff throughout the meal, and they take care to buy local when possible and also sustainably raised/harvest food when possible.  I like that in a restaurant, as that is how I eat at home.  The drinks were also crafted with as much care as the food.  And while pricey, it was worth every penny.  Don't come here on a budget, but it's not overly expensive either.  The value matches the pricing perfectly.
This place is one of my favorite places to go on a late night. If you haven't tried KFC (Korean fried chicken) you're missing out! This place is soooo good. I highly recommend the KFC combo! They use an entire chicken (~17 pieces) and you also get a pitcher of beer of your choice. They offer a couple of sauces (some to dip, some you can toss). Tip: you can ask them to toss half of it in one sauce and the other half plain or in another sauce! The chicken tossed in Korean sweet and spicy is my fav. They also give you a side dish of picked daikon radish. I wish they gave us more side dishes! It's free so I really can't complain. I've also tried their kimchi bulgogi fries and liked it! It's not the same as chilantro's but it's still very tasty. They have other dishes like the military pot which I've heard good things about.   The server is incredibly sweet. I always talk about him when I bring my friends to college roadhouse. I've been a couple of times already and always enjoy my experience here. They have karaoke rooms if you are interested in that.   If you haven't tried this place, deff check it out! They will be open on sundays from Nov 18 and on! So yay come get your KFC fix.
Its been over a year since I visited Alfredo's, and I still rave about it.  Alfredo's is absolutely the best Italian food in Atlanta, period.  This place wrote the textbook on customer service.  My wife and I were seated at a four-top table.  While we were in the process of sitting down, two people descended on the table to break down and clear off the two extra place settings.  Our wine glasses were never empty ( I highly recommend the house Pinot Grigio).  The waiter asked me 'What type of pasta would you like?'.  I asked him 'What kind do you have?'.  His response?  'I said, what kind do you want?  We can make it...'  The food was equally as good as the service.  Don't let  the outside of the restaurant fool you.  Alfredo's is a first class establishment all the way around.  Take your wife here for your next anniversary, and you won't be disappointed.
I've lived in ATX for over a decade and rarely have found SUCH impeccable service. We were blown away when we went for dinner and drinks last night. Beautiful scenery, great food and cocktails and, again, out of this world service. Cannot wait to go back when the weather cools off. Highly recommend for date nights, etc.
I have been there more than once and wonder why it isn't packed. Great food and nice folks. Check it out! Garlic knots are fabulous. The salads and pasta are very fresh. Good house chianti also. Help it stay open with the new train coming!
This is as close to dining in Italy as you'll find in New England. Chef Paolo is bringing exquisite, authentic Genovese cuisine to the North Shore. If you're looking for fine dining in a fun, casual atmosphere run, don't walk to Prides Osteria in Beverly.
How does the song go? "When the moon hits the sky/Like a big pizza pie/ That's Amore..."??? Well, it is love, love, love from me to Baraonda.  My new job is in Midtown, which is fabulous for my lunch options (not so much for my pocketbook) and I finally tried this fabuloso Italian place! One of my favorite dishes ever is Checca (helpful tip- it's pronounced with a hard "ch" sound like a "k") - a short pasta like penne, garlic, basil, fresh mozzarella and chunky pieces of tomato, with olive oil. Baraonda's is the best I've ever had.   Loved sitting at the bar. Loved the friendly bartender. Loved that I wasn't familiar with their wines, so Eddie won me over when let me sample tastes of three reds so I'd know what to order on a future dinner visit. My pasta came out quickly, just timely enough that I only ate one piece of their yummy bread with olive oil and parmesan.  So many things look good on their menu, and I can't wait to go back and try the lamb sandwich with goat cheese and romaine (how yummy does that sound?!) and that the diner next to me was greedily enjoying! A new favorite place!!
I love Camp Bow Wow and my dogs love it even more.  I appreciate the customer service they give.  They always remember my dogs' names and are so sweet to them. Most of all I l love being able to watch my dogs play all day on their webcams from anywhere in the world!!!  I highly reccomend them and will continue to use their services.
This was one of the best meals we have ever eaten.  There was absolutely nothing that wasn't perfect.  I had the Angus beef filet, with Béarnaise sauce and iI wanted to lick my plate!  My husband had the lobster/halibut/scallop in an excellent ginger sauce, and it was to die for.  The appetizer was a salmon tartare and melon squares, which were a perfect combo.  The bread was hot, crusty and a lovely sourdough.  I don't normally eat dessert, but everything was so wonderful we couldn't resist - and both were worth every calorie!  My chief regret was the fact we had such a late lunch we weren't able to try the Five Course meal for two.   I can't imagine anything not being done to perfection, and we had to settle for only two entrees!  Oh, and the views of Vancouver harbor are spectacular..  A perfect evening and a perfect meal.  On my Vancouver must do's for our next trip!
Yoga Sakti is such an amazing place. The numerous classes they have to offer and the space itself, puts Yoga Sakti in my top position for yoga studios on the North Shore of MA.
A step above the TGI's and Ruby Tuesdays of the world. The whitewater shrimp is a great appetizer, and the deserts are a meal in themselves. The ambience is what I felt gave the place a special feel with a talking moose and antler shaped lighting fixtures. Its a nice place for families and large groups, not realy for a date
Just got my new car today and it was a very nice experience we've got from the staff of Nissan (new ownership Clay Clooney) especially from Elaine our Sales person. She was so sweet and professional, and was knowledgable with the product she's selling and gave us very good information about the car were buying  It was an awesome Customer Service, from the Sales manager Danny, and John who arranged all the paper works to enable us to take my car home. These was our 1st purchased to Nissan and I will definitely reffer them to my friends. We are so satisfied for all the services that nissan offered us. Thanks so much for all the staff, we had so much fun purchasing our car today. Well done and keep up the good work!
I've been going off again and on again to Pro X for almost a year now. I was originally going to the Boylston St location but switched to the High St location for convenience. Therapists at this location are incredibly knowledgeable. The staff here consists of mostly male therapists, except for my therapist Lisa (And Kelsey? Who might only be there part time not sure). I actually prefer a more male dominant clinic, as I find that the atmosphere can be more relaxed while still keeping a professional tone.  I work as a professional ballroom dancer and came in for two injuries (knee and shoulder). Lisa has given me a program geared very specifically to my athletic ability. The skill sets and quality of physical therapists can range greatly. I've been to clinics where I've felt that I was not being challenged enough given the physical demands of my sport. Lisa has designed a program to optimize muscle rehabilitation with a concentration on exercises geared specifically to increase blood flow and nutrients to my knee and shoulder.   Aside from being a great therapist, I find that Lisa is able to give a genuine warmth and sense of concern for her patients.  While I've been to a number of very qualified male therapists, I find that they can sometimes lose their sense of human connection to the patient and I end up feeling like a cow in a factory line.   In Lisa I see a great ability to empathize with patients, often putting their needs before her own. No matter how busy she is, or how early or late the day she always greets me with a genuine smile and a welcoming tone.   Although I find all the exercise technicians to be competent, I have found Kyle to be the most knowledgeable and personable. He, like Lisa has a genuine care and interests in the well being of patients and is always very confident in his delivery of information on exercises.   Eric acts as a mentor at the clinic, and has really been able to hone in on microscopic details in my rehabilitation that has helped to propel my recovery process.   Jess, the clinic manger runs the best clinic I have ever been to. The office, while small is neatly kept, towels are always new, rug always clean, and table always sanitized. He has an incredibly staff that demonstrates customer services at its finest.
Amazing sushi. Among the best in town. I've not been here before because Thai food isn't a personal favorite, knowing they have this quality of sushi, I will be back.
I have had ongoing neck/shoulder pain that flares up when I spend a large amount of time at the computer. I visited Dr. Segal and after the first adjustment I felt 100% better within just two days. I followed up the adjustment with a visit to their massage therapist who did an excellent job and worked exactly the areas I needed. The staff at the reception is friendly and very willing to work with my insurance constraints. I will definitely be returning in the future.
The first time I found this place, it was an accident - I was walking up Hampshire to eat dinner nearby.  Now every time I'm in the neighborhood I stop by to check it out.  One of their many fascinating sections is their Local Interest/Local History section, which typically includes numerous old books on the region.  Yesterday I found a 1903 book on the history of Vermont that was in excellent condition, very inexpensive, and had some pristinely printed & maintained historical & (at the time) contemporary maps of the area in it of a higher quality than many of today's maps.  I also personally especially like their cookbook section and, as a former library staff member, the way they have several sections that are interestingly categorized, like the one of creepy children's books.   As some other reviewers have already noted, the staff won't bother you when you first come in - which I too appreciate - but I have also found them to be very helpful when I DO have a question, which I also appreciate.
I love the high level of training for the most part.  Friendly staff, awsome coaches,  variety of classes, convenience, great training partners, etc... I love this gym!
Pretty darn good upscale fast food. The sauce bar is yummy and has about 10 dipping sauces. The cheese on the cheese fries is super good. think melted, good-cheddar, not nacho liquid. The place is pretty small thought, a lil claustrophobia inducing, hopefully they will expand with success and add more tables and waiting room.
Love this place! The chicken tenders, chili, meatloaf, and bacon wrapped dates are my 4 favorite things. Lots of flavor and I never leave hungry, and you get a good amount of food for the money. Also, their dipping sauces for the chicken tenders and meatloaf are delicious!
Reminded me of Northern California. The seating is not the best but other than that this is a great place. Very nice people. Great service. Very healthy and tasty food. I had the Roast Chicken and loved it. They have a cool fireplace as well. I will be back to try a couple of other things. They have brunch as well but call first... Have Fun.
Even if I didn't have a black clad, Cure worshiping past, or live a few blocks away from it, I'd still love this place. Even though it is a cemetery it puts pretty much every public park I've been to to shame in terms of diversity and beauty and attention to detail in the living elements of the park. The stone monuments, many of which are gorgeous and worth visiting to see on their own, just end up adding to the experience, especially if you are able to disassociate them from their morbid significance.  It's America's oldest arboretum/cemetery/elysium, based off of the Pre Lachaise in Paris, though I honestly think it is more beautiful, perhaps because if feels more naturey  and pretty than I remember the Pre Lachaise being.  175 acres of rolling hills, ponds, wildlife ranging from frogs, herons, to woodchucks, a tower where you can get a near perfect view of Boston, 700 different species are represented in the cemeteries 5,500 trees, all of the paths have horticulturaly themed names...what isn't there to love? If you are history minded, you can go and seek out the graves of some of the cemetery's more famous "inhabitants" such as Isabella Stewart Gardner, William Gray, Winslow Homer, or Mary Baker Eddy. The cemetery also offers guides describing the different trees, birds, wildlife, and plants you can encounter during your explorations of the grounds.  In the summer, nothing is more peaceful or tranquil than grabbing a book, my camera, a bottle of water, maybe a friend, and sitting next to one of the ponds, feeling the sun on my skin and listening to the frogs serenade each other.  I feel like Mt. Auburn truly is a superb testament to the intertwined nature of both life and death and how the two constructs can, and must, exist in harmony with each other.
Best restaurant in the Boston area -- not just in Concord -- by a long shot.
I've gotten smoothie bowls from here two days in a row. It's my new obsession! My favorite so far has been the Orlando Magic Berry Bowl. I added granola to it. It was the perfect light dinner. They also deliver through Uber Eats which is convenient.   I look forward to trying one of their salads soon.   Great to have an organic, gluten and dairy free option in the area. So good!
You have heard don't judge a book by its cover and this is a perfect example. It's the most fabulous Italian restaurant in Columbus no doubt in my mind however, it's kind of tucked in this nondescript strip mall near Polaris. Artie and his wife Natasha are gracious hosts who really take time with their customers. It's old school. A beautiful bottle of wine hand picked, a homemade dinner and service beyond what you find unfortunately almost everywhere today. The homemade limoncello is so good that you could skip dessert and just have this aperitif. But my children love the chocolate bomb that Natasha makes. The one side of the restaurant is cozy tables and the newer side is for larger parties. If you have a nice big party of over 20, don't hesitate to call them. Or people in from out of town. It's impressive and they don't disappoint.
I love iPic and Maxwell took great care of us. Love this place, come almost every time I'm in Austin. Great drinks, good food selection. Service in your seat with a powered seats, comfy pillow and blanket. What more could you ask for? Oh. A massaging chair. That would rock! Thanks iPic!
I have done business with Audio Systems since they moved into their store decades ago. They carry high quality gear from small systems that are not very expensive up to  high end. They are a real audio store.They have their own somewhat quirky style, as mentioned in another review, but I appreciate that they don't push me to buy particular products and do not upsell and use high pressure. I like a store that lets my ears and pocketbook make my decisions. Also, they don't try to pile expensive accessories onto every purchase.   I have found them honest and reasonable and they have had my positive regard for a long time.   No one is perfect...recently, I had a problem with how something was handled. Mark, who runs the store, treated me respectfully, listened to my issue and we reached an agreement with which I am pleased.
I loved this place! The food was delicious. The service was great. The waitress was nice. I came for a visit from Boston, MA on vacation and when I suddenly spotted Papi's, I immediately had to give it a try. I was impressed with the restaurant décor, service, and food menu. I had the shredded chicken, yellow rice, plantains, black beans and salad the first time. Delicious. The second time, I stopped in before heading back to the airport and just got the appetizer sampler that came with stuffed fried potato, ham croquettes, and a beef empanada. Delicious. I was not disappointed both times I went. I came with two friends and we were all completely satisfied! I will come here again if I have the opportunity to.
Definitely give this place a chance if you've never been before! The breakfast tacos are always amazing, and I've tried them all! :D the Migas taco is probably one of the best I've ever had. If you go for lunch, the Thai chicken salad is super good, with plenty of chicken. The staff is always super friendly. They treat all their customers as if you've been going there for years!
The wait was very long so if you are hungry, go somewhere else. If you are hungry but not enough to keel over and go from hunger, then you are not going to regret waiting for this place.  You are seated at something like a ramen bar and you'll probably be sharing a table with someone you don't know, but it's likely that's how it's like in Japan. Our friends advised us that their tamago ramen is their best and it was so good because the broth was not too salty and the ramen was al dente. You might be tempted to get the one with more cha siu (pork), but since their noodles are their best part, you can also order just noodles when you're done your original serving. It's worth saving room in your very hungry self from waiting all that time.
Got to Boston on Thursday, I only really wanted to go to one place that was Wahlberger it was a 45 min drive from the house all I kept hearing was "genny better like this burger" we get to there Saturday everybody got a burger & everybody liked it! So glad that it was good! Wooooooooot woooooot! Was very busy in there but it didn't take long at all to get the food.
My favorite pizza in Boston.  Was there last night after having an urge for this pizza for a week.  It must be the sauce or the dough, but this pizza tastes so fresh and delicious.  You gotta be into the ambiance which is not fancy, to say the least.  It's a funky place, but the pizza and grilled meats are basic and exceptional.  Starting to want some more right now!
A great portland/beaverton breakfast spot.  I come here a  couple times a month. They have great food and are friendly staff.  Quick and the food is hot.  Can't ask for much more.
Went here for lunch today. Really good! Like the first reviewer the burger was a little on the too pink side but edible. We walked in for take out and it was ready in 8-10 minutes. Everything else was great. Will absolutely be going back!
Hey! I ordered my food online for pickup. When I arrived they forgot my cheesy bites and, too, none were readily available. It would be 6 min. for another batch to be ready. I was offered a drink while I wait. Such a nice, simple gesture from a sweet staff. Thx!
I absolutely love the chicken then thuk. The noodles are sort of shapeless and chewy. The broth is rich and salty (in a good way), and somehow holds the heat so the soup stays hot until you're done eating. Delicious. I took off one star because the service is a little weird, though not terrible. There is one server who just makes a lot of non sequitur remarks every time he comes to the table which makes the customer feel a little crazy trying to understand the connections.
I finally made it to Tassili's this past April and was not disappointed. Truly lived up to my expectations. I'm still reminiscing about my "dat ish" wrap topped with the black love stew. The staff was so nice and helpful. I wish they delivered wraps to NYC. Next time I'll make sure to bring enough wraps back home. Wish we had a place like this in the city. Definitely will be back!!!
Ittoku is awesome. The staff was super nice upon arrival and attentive! TBH I have never had better waiting service in Boston. If you've read my other reviews, you'll know that customer service is important to me haha.  The place was pretty busy for a Thursday night, but we were seated quickly. I didn't have anything to drink, but we ordered the beef and garlic dish as well as the yakisoba. Both were hot, delicious, and well seasoned! Although we only tried these two dishes, i'm sure the other menu items are just as great and authentic judging based on drooling over other customers' foods.  I will definitely be back to try out their drinks and smaller plates on the menu (oh and the omusoba!). The location itself is pretty inconvenient, but the restaurant and experience were well worth the distance.
We stayed at a 2 bedroom condo from 6/16/13-6/22/13. Our reservation was for 6/15/13-6/22/13; however, we did not arrive until the morning of 6/16/13. I called to notify customer service so there were no issues. When we got to our condo, we were blown away! The entire condo was spotless, spacious and the second floor with loft was a pleasant surprise. This place really felt like home. I'm giving the resort 4 stars rather than 5 due to the cloudy pool. We took pictures with our waterproof camera and noticed that the water was cloudy. The pools at Disney's Blizzard Beach were way more clear. We will definitely return during future visits to Orlando.
I don't dole out the 5 stars too often but damn, why haven't we gone here sooner?  Sassy servers, good prices and AMAZING food. Standard breakfast fare and not so many choices that you're overwhelmed but enough to give you variety.   Their pancakes are delicious and those cinnamon rolls?  HOLY BALLS!!!  They were like pillows of heaven with cream cheese frosting.  I even hate cream cheese frosting and I had to take 2 1/2 bites.  I was psyched to see they carry mixed fruit jelly from my youth and my enthusiasm over this prompted the server to give me some to go.  We will definitely be back!
This is our "cheat day" place when we're craving for some good comfort food.  The workers seems to look happy to work there which reflected on the great service we received.  I love their meatloaf, and I know we will be back for some more.  Indeed this place will be around for a while; no worries there.
Got the gluten-free brownie and gluten-free chocolate chip cookies and they were amazing!! Honestly, better than any regular chocolate chip cookies I've ever had. Will definitely be going back for more!
I go here all the time for their food, entertainment and the social fun atmosphere. Last night (Wednesday) I went for karaoke night and by far that was the most fun I've had there. Also I decided to go the healthier route and got the Walrus salad, it was sooooo good!!! One of my favorite spots in Columbus!
Absolutely I MEAN completely INCREDIBLE Peach Plum Pear crumble pie! Sourceam Blueberry or Raspberry pie Great too AND can't forget the BUTTER tarts mmm mmm delish! Staff is uber pleasant and happy even when its busy.  Thank you!   Update!!! Ok so I was dreaming of peach pie today and all summer actually......just a few hours too late whoops they're sold out! After much himming and haaaing I had a Buckwheat chocolate chip walnut cookie... and then Dam.....Another one! So soft chewy delicious BUT i came for pie so I was not leaving without one and at $4.95 i cant resist considering the mediocre ones in kits are $7.95.  Ok so here is my pie/dessert biking adventure in print.   Sour cherry pie from tartine Davie street and French Vanilla Gelato from Yaletown Gelato on Homer and Davie.  Tartine doesn't offer ice cream with their pie but Ill still give them a 5 for deliciousness and patience with me.
Great company to deal with. Very friendly personnel and very hard polite workers. Went smooth as silk from quote to finish. Replaced 150' of storm damaged fence. Very pleased with install and timeliness. Would definitely recommend to everyone. A++ work and job satisfaction. Thanks for the great looking fence :)
Great service. Clear communication and follow through. Hallelujah. My little car is running great. I just moved my business from another Toyota dealer/service provider (12 years) to Broadway - it's closer and much better.
Update:  A few changes  --they now offer Wunder-Pilz kombucha  --the bowls are only made on weekends --they are offering fresh juices from Johnson's Backyard Garden (cold press for $2 more--same for juices) --they advertise as 100% vegan --no more 12 oz size.  $6.50 is now cheapest drink for 16 oz  This place is still just as amazing!
The Hot Chocolate is a run race and a Peachtree Road Race qualifier, so if you do well on the course, use your time when you run on July 4th to boost your seeded wave. I have done this race twice, so you really have no idea what to expect in terms of the weather. It might be cold or it might be freezing cold. Make sure you have compression pants for this race, you will thank me later. I cannot stress it enough, do not wear cotton clothing, as it does not wick away your sweat. You will be running 15K (9.3 miles) and as you run, you will be sweating and all that sweat will be absorbed by your clothing and wet and freezing cold weather will make you extremely sick... not a good combo. So wear polyester fibers... or better yet wearing cold gear...   This race is known for their goodie bags, hot chocolate, banana, melted chocolate, a bag of snacks and a very cool fleece jacket that you should not wear during the race.  Overall, this is a fun race, something I would recommend at least once.  [Review #491] (76th Review of 2017)
I wasn't aware there was two locations as the first location I went to on Stark street i wasn't impressed. Went to their second location in Pioneer Square and ordered the Philly Cheesesteak and it was good.
I was in the cardiology dept as a patient so I felt extra dutiful to try and eat healthy, and since I had a visitor coming, I thought why order hospital food for dinner?  So I had them pick me up the cobb salad and the baked fries.  It's not the best cobb salad I ever had but one of the best healthy cobb salads I ever had. I just wish I hadn't poured the dressing on. The dressing tasted very chemical. So I'm curious as to what was in the dress, because the rest of the veggies were crispy and fresh in the salad. I think I would have rather eaten without dressing than the one that was given.   And those fries are good for you? I have to look into this more because I'm sorry they were delicious!! And I wasn't so medicated that I didn't know they were delicious. And fries are a red light food for me. I usually don't allow myself to have real fries because then the fry frenzy begins.  But these were flavorful and crispy. And they weren't piping hot by the time they made it to my hospital bed even. So, I would eat here again. Nice to have a healthier option that is quick and not to expensive.
I'm a meat eater- think paleo, and I think this place is great! What meat eaters don't seem to get is we can eat vegan/vegetarian food! And when it's good, it's very good!   I first tried NF in a yurt in CA; I loved it then & I love it now. I avoid highly processed foods now, and my favorites there tend to be the fake meat items (highly processed) and the cupcakes (so good- but the frosting is highly processed) but I still like eating here every so often. They really do vegan right. It's really all about the sauces & seasonings. I'm ok in the kitchen, but I'd love to be able to make flavors like they do. I hardly ever leave a restaurant without thinking, "I coulda made that better at home." But not here. It would take a lot to learn how to work spices, herbs & sauces like they do! Kudos Native Foods for being dedicated to your cause AND truly delicious... Not just for vegans!
Had a great experience with this company today. My fiance and I had a small, local move to contend with, and they made it all painless, sending exactly what we needed: a guy and a truck. Cheerful, timely, professional, and so reasonable. Will definitely use again.
My wife lost the key fob to her new car and was locked out We found Integrity on the web and called them on Saturday  I explained the situation and he ordered new fobs for us on Monday with overnight  shipping. He then came to our house on Tuesday to rekey and program the fobs  Nir was very responsive and arrived right on time  I would recommend them for any locksmith services
Yes, the food is fantastic. It really was and I highly recommend it to anyone. But this review is mainly for the customer service. I don't think I've ever met such a NICE and welcoming group of people in a restaurant. Truly, I will come back again for the nice smiles and service. Again, the food was great but these people are really wonderful and will make your day!
Nice friendly staff, food is great pretty busy there. Good varieties of breakfast, they even let me change of the side too
Fantastic food! Fast and friendly service too! Happy hour has a great nachos bar that is complimentary and the fajitas are fantastic! I lived in Texas for almost 10 years and was ecstatic to see a Chuys open at Easton. It definitely lives up to its reputation and is worth the wait! Margaritas are the best in town too!
Had a horn problem they inspected it for free and gave a free overall inspection listing out what needed to be done for the car. Love the service these guys gave me. Im so happy that I found a honest auto repair shop since im new in town. Appreciated good service from these awesome team. Free shuttle is a big bonus!
Very cute dessert place. Huge portions. Macarons, but not so tasty compared to La Duree or the ones made by J'Adore Macarons.  Asian style desserts.
Very impressed...food is made from scratch onsite. Great staff...great atmosphere...great food.
Mango slush with the cubes on top is so bomb. It's a must get if you come across one of these cafes. It's a chain. I want to try the bubble waffles next time I visit Canada.
WOW. Only word I can use to describe our experience yesterday through this morning.  We got one of the huge suites as it was a special occasion and everything about its appointment, the staff service, all of it was first rate.  Who doesn't need a TV that comes on in the bathroom mirror and has reflected screens in the shower? I mean, c'mon.  The palatial suite was about 1400 square feet so beyond luxurious for a couple and with those kind of doors that lock on both sides that connect to other rooms, it would be ideal for a group/family gathering. My fiance had requested an assortment of pink roses in vases, and spread all over the suite, and it was amazing and gorgeous and so special. We don't drink so our "welcome treat' was those special size Diet Cokes in tin cans and chocolate covered strawberries.   Valet parking was complimentary with this level room, and as we were on the Club Level, there was a lovely room with tons of seating, small tables, arm chairs, and such with meals/drinks/snacks through the day at almost all hours. The breakfast might be called "continental" but it was only a hair "less than" the spread downstairs. The fluffiest eggs (my absolute fave are well done hotel spread eggs), a ton of perfect fruit, Irish oatmeal, a coffee machine that makes every drink you could want, breakfast burritos....I could keep going since I love breakfast food so much!  The hotel was BUZZING with the football folks, another big event going on in a large ballroom, I'm sure what was just early holiday traffic, and everyone we encountered was pleasant, helpful and just lovely.  I loved everything about my fiance's idea that yesterday should be a "trial run" of sorts for our wedding NEXT December 1 and the InterContinental was a super place to choose for the royal treatment.
I miss Le's; I used to come here A LOT back in my college days. The food is delicious, down-to-earth and inexpensive. You can get a lot of food for your money. Best of all, service is fast, but if you do want to sit there for a good an hour or two longer, they dont do anything to shoo you out. This is a great place to go with friends and family-- a very practical eatery. Lets just say if a guy takes me here on a first date, I probably won't be impressed.
Exquisite food, great cocktails and beer. I go to Columbus for business and a friend recommended this place. I had a pork tenderloin to die for. Perfectly prepared, oven roasted vegetables and reasonably priced. They even knew how to make a Last Word.  The service was responsive and attentive. It was so good that I took my client there the next day for lunch. Perfect burger and salad.  Fast forward two months and I returned with my wife. Unlike me, she is a Pescetarian, no meats only fish and veggies, and I suggested Wolf Ridge. The tenderloin was gone, they revise menus regularly, and she had a vegun risotto grain dish. Superb. Grains were slightly el dente. I had the Tomahawk chop and we shared a forest floor salad (wild greens, mushrooms, walnuts, blue cheese and a wonderful vinaigrette).   A little of the beaten track but worth it.   The only downside is the acoustics. The place gets loud so out is not a place for a quiet intimate dinner but better than pounding club music.
This B&N is a good size, with a well-laid out - eh, layout.  When you walk in, the magazines are to the left and the café is straight ahead.  To the immediate right is the checkout counter and the rest of the store is everything else.   The sections are clearly marked and sorted by general topic or type of book. They have everything from fiction, fantasy, romance, biography, classics, etc.  They have a cool selection of books on local things like Oregon trails, pet friendly travel in Oregon, and much more.   What's cool is they have a whole section on American History (AHEM, to the guy who said there are 0 books on WW1), and history in general including many books on WW1.   Another feature of this B&N is that there is a HUGE kiddies section at the end of the store. Here, kids will be able to find just about any book they are looking for.   The café section is large, and many people use the sitting area to sip something tasty while reading enthralling and entertaining stories. They have free WiFI (in addition to the WiFi offered by the Lloyd Center Mall), and you just have to accept the terms of use and voila, you're online.    I would go back to this B&N, as it offers a nice place to take a break from a long day of shopping.
Great fast and friendly service. Just needed a trim and that's exactly what I got! Ask for Cristina and you won't be disappointed!
I love kimchi but only for lunch.  Their prices during the weekend are insane.  I Took my family there for lunch and couldn't believe how much more expensive it was.  I'll just only go during the weekday
My dad loves this place and insists on eating here every time he comes into town. The choices and combination are endless making this ideal for picky eaters and vegans. The food is moderately priced, the service is excellent even when the place is busy. They even have a full bar.  If you've never had Mongolian BBQ before, give Golden Tent a shot.
The $5 Wednesday night pho special (7pm to 9pm, ignore their website's promise of 6pm) is obviously the main draw for me. I usually get the #17 or #20, depending on whether I want just steak or some brisket also. 5 minutes after ordering an immense tureen of tasty pho is deposited in front of me and I go to town. 15 minutes after that I'm a beached whale, a stranded walrus, a dog who got into a full bag of kibble. It's great stuff, and while I can't claim it's the best I've ever had in my whole entire life, it's certainly worthy of being considered for all their awards they brag about.  I'm always disappointed when Vietnamese places don't do banh mi, and so despite the vast menu, much of which is quite good, I'll hold a grudge. But that pho is definitely worth coming for, maybe even worth paying full price for if it happens to be the 95% of the week that isn't 2 hours on a Wednesday night. Their lunch specials are also worth a look. They're either $7.25 or $7.50 and include scads of shrimp/beef/pork/chicken dishes with white/fried rice, soup, and an egg roll. Definitely worth a place in your Asian rotation for lunch.
We finally get some hot summer weather and I decide to pay to go into a 95 degree room to excercise. This is a great yoga studio. No attitude and I was made to feel very welcome the minute I walked in by the person at the desk and the owner, Roman, who also instructed the 90 minute hot yoga class. The place was spread out, very clean, and had a nice atmosphere. They also have a parking lot. I will definitely add this place to my fitness circuit. I left there with my zen back in place.  I've started taking Daniel's class at 6 pm on Fridays and it is an awesome way to start the weekend. While my colleagues are still at the office for happy hour drinking beer and eating junk food, I'm having an even happier hour. After sitting at a computer all week and accumulating stress, this class hits a mental and physical reset button for me so I can really enjoy the weekend. I also love that he plays music.
Can't beat Marriott CRM. Checking in @ 10am. Handed over my ID, and after a quick glance at it they say "oh yes, we have your room waiting for you."  Made me feel like I'm a regular guest here.
I just started seeing Dr. Brian and Dr. Chris within the past few weeks. I had severe back pain and did not know where to turn. Luckily my brother-in-law referred me to Ability.   They did a full examination to pinpoint the injuries I have been suffering from, a very informative consultation including charts and visuals that made it extremely easy for me to understand. They went over payment plans after looking into my insurance program to assure me I would receive the best possible care with an affordable payment plan.  I honestly have never seen any other doctor that made me feel so cared about, they really do have your best interest in mind and really go out of their way to make sure you know that.  I have a feeling I will keep going here for life!
I been to Chen's Noodle House several times for lunch.  Their noodles are handmade.  Gives it a lot character since the noodles are cut by hand so they have a not so straight look to them.  I don't know if it's just me or what but these homemade noodles taste so good. Plus the texture is different in a good way too. Not sure if it's a mental thing cause I know it's handmade or not.   The broth for their soups have a real clean and subtle favor to them.    The place is really small so go early if you want a table. They have about 8 small tables there I believe.
LOVE this place! They are always giving out free samples of pizzas and desserts, the staff is extremely friendly and helpful too.  There are always coupons available, so it's a great deal.  Another plus?  They often have specials on desserts and cheese bread - we purchased them for $1 each close to closing time!  Basically, you can build your own pizza here; choose from a menu or choose your own toppings.  They do have gluten free crust options as well as thin crust, original, pan, stuffed, etc.  The pizza is deliciously fresh and you simply pop it in the oven and bake! Perfecto!  It is WAY better in quality then any of the other take out pizza places in town. This location is extremely generous with the toppings, so go crazy! I also like that they have "gourmet" toppings like artichoke hearts and kalamata olives.  They also have ready made salads that are great lunch options.  Everything's been delicious and they always hand out discounts and coupons to keep us coming back. Love it.
The food was fantastic, the setting is beautiful, and our waitress Meghan F. was so helpful and friendly. We took all of her recommendations, and she wasn't wrong.    Definitely try the doughboys for dessert. They were my favorite part of the meal.   We will be back for sure!
Was in the mood for a bar burger so stopped in with my boyfriend who had been here once before.  There was some sort of football game on every tv.  The wait staff was very nice and very attentive to our table.  We each ordered a burger which was large and very tasty however it could have been seasoned a bit.  We also both received a side of tater tots.  They were falling apart which made them hard to dip in ketchup.  Should have cooked just a little longer to put a crisp on them and help keep them together.  Would not mind going back again but will ask for tots to cook longer.
I'm not normally into the health kick but was looking for something light and filling so decided to try this place.  As you can tell from my star rating, I was pleasantly surprised.  I went with the spicy korean bowl and was everything it promised . . . light bright healthy ingredients with good flavor and portions.  But the thing I cant wait to go back for is the beauty brew!!  You do pay a little more but it seems worth it
I've had the single burger here many, many times. This burger reminds me of a back yard cookout burger, but BETTER! Real thick juicy beef, not a floppy frozen cookie cutter mystery meat patty, cooked over real wood flame! Not many places where you can get that! I am very particular about my burgers & this one is PERFECT!  Green leaf lettuce, not cheap shredded iceberg, CHECK! Red onion, pickles, tomatoes, CHECK! Toasted bun, CHECK! Afore mentioned real thick juicy beef, CHECK! Cooked perfectly, CHECK! Over afore mentioned real wood flame, BONUS! Zesty dressing, BONUS!  I'm giving 5 stars, even though it is a food truck & so you gotta deal with the flies & the birds & the picnic tables that are never clean. Hopefully some day they can open a brick & mortar location.  DO NOT leave your food unattended! I walked away for a moment to get a knife & when I came back, the birds had almost made off with my top bun!
Really cute spot to sit and hang out with people or quietly work on stuff. The music is soft and not distracting, which I love. There are four small tables and a big table for people to share, plus a cute corner with comfy chairs.   I got a lavender latte, and I LOVE it. Perfectly steamed milk, fun latte art, and though I can't really taste the espresso through the lavender I'm sure it's also great.
Update 8/29/2014: The recent strike ordeal revealed that Market Basket is an exceptionally good organization.  When the TV movie is made telling the story of Arthur T., I want to have a cameo as a customer.  :)  Update 12/21/2013: Market Basket does not earn 100% marks because their new plastic carry bags are tissue paper thin although they look the same as the old ones.  When single-bagged, these new shopping bags are so thin, a soft styrofoam meat package can rub through it.  They cannot withstand pressure or rubbing.  Market Basket has no web site, no receipt survey, and does not actively seek customer feedback.  If Yancy-F-127 haphazardly crushes your eggs and makes a messy soup in the bottom of your shopping bag each time, while Aurelia-G-186 treats your eggs as carefully as if they are her own, the managers are not aware of who are their best, and who are their worst, cashiers.  The management is not in the loop to resolve ongoing problems quickly.   Original:  This is the Boston metro area's last best chance for a "everyday-low-price" style supermarket.  Market Basket is super busy on the weekends and specially the night before a holiday weekend.  It is not the place you should expect the cashiers to ever know you by name.  It is busy.  It is high volume.  For people lacking time to shop weekly fliers for bargains, Market Basket will be easiest on your wallet when buying most assorted foods.  It is a place to find 25 pound bags of jasmine Asian rice.  The regular price of fresh produce will often beat the sales price of other grocery stores.  Frequent bargain announcements blasted over the store PA system gives the place some personality.  Shoppers who hate long lines may want to shop elsewhere regardless of higher costs.  However, if you visit Market Basket during bad weather in the middle of the week, long lines can be avoided.
I just bought my first new car ever today at MINI of Portland.  I went into the dealership with a "say no to everything" attitude to protect myself, and made sure Jay, the salesman who ended up taking care of us, knew I wasn't going to be swindled.  He was a very good sport and over the course of the hours-long transaction, we grew to like and appreciate his candor and his no-pressure approach.  He was extremely cool and just sat back and let the car sell itself.  I wouldn't hesitate to send anyone interested in buying straight to Jay at MINI of Portland.  (Also, the dealership is pretty snazzy, and has a giant espresso drink-making robot that is most likely the reason my heart is racing even faster than it should be considering how much money I just spent.)
Good quality food... The staff were very friendly and helpful. You have to get the mango lemonade.
DELICIOUS!  Amazing salad bar, wonderful meat.  Come here with a good appetite!  Too bad they don't have one in SoCal.
Very comfortable, friendly waitresses/waiters and it mixes 2 great things: Food quality and price. I have been coming to this restaurant for 3 months and I always find seats. The food is excellent! This is definitely my favorite Vietnamese Restaurant in Boston.
Amazing dinner for our first night in Boston. They were so accommodating to our gluten and dairy sensitivities!   We had the oysters to start - delicious! Then for our mains we had the scallops, market fish and broccoli side. I would highly recommend this place if you have food sensitivities - they even have "gf" labels on the menu!  Update: We didn't wake up sick from the food! A good sign that this restaurant really knows what they're doing with food sensitivities / allergies!
The only rental company that hires college grads. They have an incredible training program. Every employee I have ever encountered is polite, upbeat, and most of all knowledgeable.
I know the place is called Meat & Bread but their salad stole the show. The salad served on the day I visited consisted of chickpeas, fennel, red onion, red cabbage and oranges... no filler mixed greens or butter lettuce. Sounds a little odd but it was so good and filling - even my boyfriend enjoyed it!   The Porchetta Sandwich is also super good! The bread is crunchy on the outside and pillow soft on the inside. The Porchetta itself is cooked to perfection with crispy pork skin and juicy loin meat. I had a similar sandwich in San Francisco which is compatible but Meat & Bread's is slightly better in my opinion.   Good place to get your meat and bread fix for sure.
This store has the best selection of fabrics and yarn out of any place I've ever seen! There's usually a coupon for whatever you're looking for as well. Might have to wait a minute at the register, but overall a lovely store. 6-2-2017 I had come into the store to pick up yarn and use my 50% off of one item coupon on my phone. Unfortunately I didn't have enough reception to load it on this day in line. I had tried several times with no success. My cashier Monica (I believe her name was) saw that I was having trouble loading that specific coupon and was able to find the code for it and gave me the 50% off. I found that so helpful and nice, it's one major thing that keeps me coming back is the friendly and helpful staff!
What a great place. Cool vibe, great bartenders, customer focused owner. I will definitely be coming back for more!!!
Before I start, let me say this:  "Give Chill A Chance."  I know, I know, Vancouver. It's touristy, I'm touristy and altogether we're this sloppy, touristy sandwich posing around Gastown. I am sorry for that and I understand your disdain: I live in LA and we get that touristy crapola all the time.  But,but...hear me out. Chill Winston wasn't that bad, in fact I didn't think it was touristy at all. Shout out goes to the cute Hostess rocking a shaved head and the curvy girl indulging cheap fashion spots around Vancouver; you made an LA girl feel at home.  Look, the poutine was crazy good, all gooey and savory with a hint of Jack Daniels. The beer list, heavy with microbrews, were fantastic and Winston's Earl Grey Creme Brulee'? Say whattttt? My dining companions had the blueberry coffee cake which disappeared after a 5 minute trek to the bathroom.   Stop that, Winston. Delivering good food on a warm summer day.   Shame on you.   Look, I know it may seem pretentious, but that vibe wasn't there at all. Our servers were on the ball, a mix of white apron crisp and urban cool, and no one caused any dramatic, touristy scenes. So, locals...give this place a chance...it's honestly a pretty cool spot to nosh.
Outstanding. Lived up to all the hype.
It's a local brewery with damn good tasting beer. What more could you ask for??
I had the flat iron steak, very good and cooked too perfection.  Wife had the chicken with mashed potatoes.  Chicken was well seasoned and moist, potatoes paired very well.  I'm a big fan of the potatoes, would likely pair with anything.  Price point was as expected for food of this quality, especially on grounds of Disney.  Service was very good as well.
Cafe Belo is awesome! I've always had the same thing when I come here - Rodizio.   If you like a Brazilian BBQ, you've likely been to Midwest Grille or Olivera's down the street. To me, prices are a major differentiator for Cafe Belo. Servers are generally friendly and attentive enough, live music on Friday nights is pretty cool. Like anywhere, they have their nights. I've come a couple times when the meats were a mixed bag; some dry, some over or undercooked, but most of the time I've had juicy, tender cuts of beef, pork and chicken. I always leave full.  I'm a big fan. Its a great value and you can really get as fat as you want, come hungry. Try the chicken wrapped in bacon!
First, working with this company is fantastic.  I hope they can keep the personal attention as they grow.  Don treated me like I was his only customer.  He was anxious to help me get what I needed on the day I needed it.  The website is easy to use to determine your needs and to place your order.  The boxes are great, very sturdy, it would be hard to break one.  The larger boxes could probably hold so much if you are not careful you'll never pick it up.   But I digress, it's rather inexpensive especially considering the fact there is delivery & pickup and you feel like all your items are in private storage locker when they are packed in the Bungoboxes.   I love it, and highly recommend it.  Just realize, you can probably only stack 5 or 6 filled boxes on a dolly.  So if you want items to remain boxed and on a dolly, you'll want multiple dollies.   Great company, great concept.
I have been going to Smita for the last 3 years. I have been here for threading and waxing.Never a bad experience. If you have a time constraint, it is good to let them know as there can be a wait sometimes even though you have made a reservation.
Always come here for my curry fix. Today had something different and as usual aswdome
Thierry is kind of overwhelming when you come in the first time. The chocolates, the pastries, the ice cream, the drinks - it's a lot. But it also all looks delicious. THe bf and I shared a napoleon, a ginger ganache chocolate, a tea ganache chocolate, and iced teas. Everything was wonderful. I wish there was a place like this in SM - cute cafe to just get dessert. I'll be back.
Been going here for a while. One of the best thai restaurant in greater boston. From pad thai to ginger chicken rice to fish, all have been great. But their tom yum soup can be a little too spicy..
In my opinion this might be the best burger joint in Portland. Now its not necessarily a burger place, but miniature burger place. But the variety is amazing! So instead of filling up on burger, you can have a couple different kinds and have a multi orgasmic mouth experience! Now don't get me wrong, you can also order any normal size burger here too... but then it's like any other place. Nah, go for the sliders!  When my wife and I visited the other day we ordered The Hawthorn each, she got a Chicken one and I got a Philly. Now the hawthorn was great, weird combo of goat cheese and preserves. Mouth orgasm! Yum. Her chicken one was tastey, but not a good pairing with the hawthorns sweatness. Same with the philly. It was good, but not well paired. Next time we will either get sweet and sweet or savory only. We also shared the fries. I'm really picky about fries. I like them crispy, not soggy. I like them shoe string size and i like them hot. So these fries hit all of my req, they were perfect. Plus they were seasoned with garlic.  I am a wheelchair user, and getting into this place is easy, flat and tables are large enough to accommodate me. Also the tables are tall enough to park under. The staff were knowledgeable about the products and pleasant to speak to.  This place does have beer on tap but I didn't try any. I will next time!
My buddy was visiting a friend that lives in the condo complex across the street from this place. I hoped into this cafe as I was running low on coffee. I actually ended up buying a cinnamon bun and a hot tea. The bun was delicious, and gave me an extra boost of energy. The tea was smooth and delicious. The staff was nice. They gave me a good recommendation on what tea flavor to get. The cafe was clean, and their wifi connection was reliable. I'd recommend this place to anyone finding themselves in the vicinity.
Mario's is pretty great.  They are definitely worth the price, since they only charge $30-$40 for a woman's cut.  I have been there about five times, and got good cuts all but one time.  That one time wasn't terrible, but the woman who cut my hair gave me short bangs which looked kinda dumb.  Twice I had my hair cut by Mario, who gives a great haircut (along with his barber-style sparse conversation).   One thing to note -- from my experience, their cuts are better than their styling.  So I've walked out of there looking okay, only to find that when I style my own hair the cut actually looks great!
One of the best views of Portland!   Admission into the Mansion is $10 a person, but you can still visit the grounds and see the magnificent view! Parking is free, and it's a very quick drive from downtown to the top of the hill.  If you're short on time or cash, you can skip the tour of the mansion. For the most part it's just furnished rooms from the residents that previously lived there. You can get through it in probably 20 minutes or so.
Excellent service, great atmosphere, and delicious food. The wait staff was very friendly and attentive and the food was very tasty. They have a great selection of seafood, pasta, and chicken, and the appetizers are too good to pass up. It's a great date restaurant or restaurant for a small group.
Jeff Chow is a righteous dude serving some delicious Chinese inspired comfort food.   Noodles that are chewy crispy and a garlicky spicy broth with Bok Choy. hand formed dumplings and wontons that are on point and chicken wings that are some of the best crispy delights in town.    You can only go wrong if you don't make it in time before the Asian express runs out of steam or #yummies for the day!  Jeff is not only a friend, but a great cook.   We look forward to seeing what other amazing dishes he will turn out given a little more space to stretch those culinary muscles.
This taco stand has been a staple of my diet for over 2 years.  Cheap, fast, friendly, savory.  Se habla espanol, and they understand spanglish pretty well too if you need help ordering.    The tacos are really delicious, asada, pollo, al pastor...you can't lose.  However, the real score is in the tortas.  If you want a bad ass sandwich, get to El Primo as fast as you can.  The bread they use for the tortas is the best bread I have ever eaten.  If Subway had bread half this good they would be running the New World Order by now.   South Austin diamond in the rough.
If you need a Neurosurgeon you want them to be better than good! This entire group of surgeons are amazing and I genuinely trust them with ease.   When my Neurosurgeon of 23 years retired I panicked! Since my son was dating the daughter of a General Surgeon in Round Rock I decided to make a call and see if he could make a recommendation. An educated "insider" view was much more comforting than choosing from the preferred provider list my insurance company provided. I got online and learned all I could and agreed this was the practice that was right for me.   My first visit with Dr Fox was several years ago and this past June I was forced to have surgery since my foot and calf were going numb with zero improvements with steroid pills or injections. And, I'm happy to say I couldn't be more pleased! Dr Fox and his dynamite nurse are ROCKSTARS!! I just love them!   If you're forced to trust someone with your life and neurological health this practice is the place to be! I'd give them 10 stars if I could!!
My husband and I stopped in for dinner after seeing good reviews from our neighbours on the Next Door app. We were both really happy with our meals. We shared mahi mahi tiritas as a starter - very much like ceviche and very good.  For entrees, my husband had the chicken breast and I had trout - both very good. We sat in a booth by the window with a nice view of the wooded area around peachtree creek. Nice setting and great service. We will be back.
I stayed here for a wedding I was in. My husband and I arrived at 3pm on the dot and there were no rooms ready. Kind of bummed since we had a ton of stuff to carry up, so we waited in the lobby for about 10 minutes. The room was nice enough, had a lot of desk type space and since we were sharing the room with another couple, that was nice. It had a fridge, that froze everything we put in it, and a speaker dock, that didn't work. There is a keurig to make coffee. No fan in the bathroom, which is not awesome when four people need to take showers and get ready. The bride was on the executive floor which was where we got ready and they have a little snack area set up with a cool coffee maker and pop/juice free for the taking. The housekeeping staff was great. We had the do not disturb on our door and when the one lady saw me going, she stopped and asked if we needed anything for the room. She definitely went out of her way. The paper is also hanging on the door each morning, it was the Columbus Dispatch. Valet parking for $17/night and you just text them when you need your car. It was ready every time I needed it.
Love this new restaurant in our neighborhood. Great food, friendly service and when the weathers nice their outdoor seating doubles the restaurants size. They bake their own bread and offer wine and beer.
Skip the cluster parking lot of the Home Depot on Ponce and come here instead.  They have just about everything you could need, prices are good, everyone who works here is super friendly and helpful, and (for me) it is within walking distance!  Can't beat it.
Great place to hang out, they have a small amount of outside seating when the weather is nice. The sandwiches that I have had have been great. The smoothies are very good. Free wireless internet. Only problem is that it is sometimes very crowded.
Mark and his team prepared an awesome feast for my 50th birthday - kalua pork, teriyaki chicken, maui coleslaw, and sunimono salad - everything was DELICIOUS!! Their family recipes are fantastic (try their lava sauce!) and they could not have been nicer to work with - super generous and friendly :) If you're looking for a great anytime dinner at their food truck, or a feast for a special occasion, I highly recommend The Big Kahuna. FIVE STARS -- Mahalo!
Really great vegan bakery. So happy to have stumbled upon this place. Very responsible and delicious. They were also very kind to me and my son which helps! Can't wait to go back to try more!
Really wasn't planning on doing this but it wasn't bad. Number one complaint was the engine noise was so loud it was hard to hear the tour guides. Staff was friendly.
I don't know of a better deal in Austin for price, quality and taste. Had the BYOB with salmon, yellow dragon sauce and brown rice - delicious! And the spicy salmon roll (4 pieces for under $3) was a great appetizer!  We'll be going back regularly.
Came here with co-workers for our team-building lunch-on. The place has a feel of going to a Chipotle, FreeBird and Poke houses. However, more of a Mediterranean flavor/Indian.  Albeit, its not authentic flavors to being Mediterranean/Indian - basically Americanized.. However, it was delicious and fresh in its own way. I would recommend trying it at least once, and I do see myself coming back with my wife!
Yes indeed .... Put the car in drive and head to Somerville.  So we were out driving around the North Shore and Stumbled upon Posto.  I was intrigued it had so many reviews and wanted to see what the excitement was all about. Warm ambience abounds. A most gracious staff were eager to offer assistance.   The menu is a bit limiting but the options they offer are all delectable. I chose the gnocchi with short ribs in a red wine sauce. Oh yeah.... Mouth watering. My husband had the bolognese and although he prefers a wider noodle the combination of beef, veal and pork were a perfect blend.   Now I would have rated this a five star but they charge for bread. My thought is if you serve meals with tangy sauces that should be savored by a swirl around the plate with some bread don't charge for it.  Just a point that I thought should be notated.   All in all don't hesitate a jaunt to Davis Square.
This is our go-to sushi spot in Atlanta. The ingredients are fresh and they have a variety of roll options! The price is also very reasonable.   Knocking off one star because the hibachi and bento box items are pretty bad. I would recommend sticking with sushi.
Really awesome burgers, friendly staff, homeade condiments, thats all I need for a good lunch!
Make a reservation, get a ton of friends, sit in the main room on Saturday, order the 3L boot and have the best night of your life. Nuff said.
This is a new place in town that everyone is raving about! I was dying to try it and I was not disappointed. I went for lunch with some co-workers (so no booze), but the taco salad was fabulous. We all enjoyed our meals. It was quiet for lunch time and the service was great. I also want to note that the decor is GORGEOUS. They legit revamped EVERYTHING which is good because the space needed it. Oh and the chips and 3 dips they give you when you arrive are very good!
Their menu is pretty big and has a variety of options. Any fast food greasy option you can think of, they have. Their slices are pretty big and their service is real quick. Great late night option if you're in the downtown area.
I can't really say much about FF since we weren't in the store very long, but I'm giving in 4 stars simply because of its vegan offerings.  While I've been trapped lately in this internal battle of whole organic foods vs. manufactured vegan goods.  As with all things, there SHOULD be a balance, but you know, balance is hard sometimes when you really just want to eat a grilled "cheese" everyday.    While I've been struggling with vegan junk food, I'm glad there's a place like FF where you can find vegan gummies, jello and marshmallows.
I love love their cakes!! I get one for every occasion. We are getting our one year anniversary cake tomorrow. Already planning my next cake for my birthday!! Highly recommended. Staff is always great!!
Found Full Throttle after a not-so-great experience at a local VW dealership. These guys only service VW and Audi vehicles and they know what they are doing. The un-named VW dealership quoted me nearly $1400 to replace the timing belt (and other stuff u have to change with it). Full Throttle charged me $760 and did a great job. They are knowledgable and friendly to deal with AND... you can actually talk to the mechanic who is performing the service. Nowhere else gives you that opportunity. Will only bring my Jetta TDI here for service.
Great wings. Slow service. This particular location is notorious for having slow service, especially when ordering drinks from the bar. Sometime I'll wait 15 minutes for a beer. That being said... everything else about this place is great. Super friendly staff, excellent food compared to other locations, and the TVs are always on the right channel when sports are on. Don't let the slow service stop you from coming here. It's still a great place. Plus it's a bit larger than the surrounding locations.
Took my car here after not having it cleaned for a very long time. They gave it a thorough cleaning and wax and restored it to something beautiful. The price was very reasonable, and the man who worked on my car was friendly and had a very positive attitude. This will be my go-to car wash from now on.
I know, I know ... what could possibly be said about a butcher shop that might pique your interest to the point that you would kill half a day and find transportation to travel south to where the river and the inlet meet in Steveston Village?   Let me first apologize in advance for offending any vegetarians or those of you that are trying to reduce your carbon footprint and then give it a try:  fresh, delicious cuts of meat, organic choices at prices unbeknownst to those of us in Vancouver proper, knowledgeable servers and butchers that know the details of cuts and the origin of the meats, specialty items that originate in France or the UK and are then carefully and lovingly raised locally and often organically. If you consider yourslef an omnivore (or a carnivore!?!) then Heringers is worth a drive south.   They also make deli items on site and they offer a meatloaf that is unequaled. Meatloaf! There is an excellent selection of mustards and other condiments that are happy accompaniments for your selections of prime cuts and there are cheeses, smoked meats, various dips and dressings and treats to choose from.   The favorites at my house include Berkshire Pork Chops and the Filet Mignon when nothing else will do. Heringer's is a great place to do your shopping in preparation for a dinner party and a nice break from the regular shopping routine. In price comparisons, I haven't found anyone locally that can compete with the quality for the same price.
Fantastic service and honest folks.  That's why I'm sticking with Dave's.  Why settle for less than the ultimate experience?
One of our favorite Salem restaurants nice atmosphere great deck dining and service Fun all year round
I LOVED Pop Century. Maybe because I'm still a kid at heart, but this place is COOL!  Yea the rooms are a little small, but for the price it definitely cannot be beat.  Disney staff is so friendly and smiley and polite. They help you with any questions you have. The resort has THREE pools in funky shapes. Open pingpong table next to the pool. Tons of sunning chairs. Larger than life statues of classic favs from each decade; I stayed in one of the '60s buildings right next to the Hippy Dippy pool. The arcade inside the main building was jam packed, filled with  addictive games. And they give tickets that you can trade in for prizes. Free shuttle buses to ALL Disney parks + Downtown Disney makes life so much more convenient. and we got Magical Express for staying at a Disney resort aka a big bus picked us up from the airport, dropped us off at Pop, and our luggage was automatically delivered to our room for freeeeee.  Food court has simple selections: burgers, pizza, sandwiches, etc. Overpriced, but not obscenely overpriced. The best part are the three stations for drink refills: basically unlimited soda, coffee, slurpees, hot chocolate if you have a Disney cup.   The notgreat part was the keycard demagnetization. It happened so often and it sucks. We would walk all the way back to our rooms to be denied access. Then have to walk back to the main building to get it remagnetized. At least the staff was quick and apologetic. Made us feel a little less annoyed of the situation. and I also kind of felt trapped inside Disney's world. Made it a challenge to get OUT of the Disney area without a car. We learned to catch Lynx buses at the ticket&transportation center.  Overall, I super recommend Pop Century. Especially if you're on a budget or have kids. All the perks of a Disney resort at half the price. I'd definitely stay there the next time I visit Orlando.
ABSOLUTELY LOVE THIS PLACE!!! The spicy seafood pasta is to die for! The atmosphere is quaint and relaxing. Highly recommend.
This place is a hidden gem of NW 23rd. The food is top notch (not even comparable to bar food). You can enjoy the best happy hour in town- try one of the pizza's and the mango salad! We also enjoy sampling their well-equipped bar (they had my favorite- Ransom Gin!). And of course their are the many billiard tables. This place basically provides a whole night of fun! I have also heard their tasting menu is a fresh and amazing treat. We look forward to trying that sometime.
OMG!!! Amazing menu, beautifully executed.  My husband graciously drove me there from Lake Buena  Vista.  We sat at the bar and enjoyed a wonderful meal.  I had an onion tart that reminded me of one I had many years ago in a Paris bistro called La Cour.  It was heaven on a plate.  I can't wait to go back.  The wine selection was outstanding.  The waiters were friendly.  Did I forget to mention the caramel popcorn?  Loved it.  I can't wait to go back.
Came here for a lil pre-bowling dinner. Located conveniently in Central Square, take the Pearl St. exit, and voila you're in a lil piece of Tibetan heaven.   We ended up getting a bunch of different plates and sharing it Asian family style. See Kenny for the list of what we had.   The food was so delicious. They also use 0% Tran Fat Oil.   I think the best dish was the pork fried rice, which is not your typical Chinese pork fried rice. no no no. This pork fried rice has eggs, broccoli, pieces of pork, spices, and onions.   In addition, the price is right. We had enough food to feed 5 of us and we only spent $17 each WITH tip.   Here's a tip: GO CHECK THIS PLACE OUT! You won't regret it!
This place is right across the street from my office, and I hadn't really noticed it until I saw the Groupon offer - glad I did!  Topline: Incredible food, pleasant atmosphere, a bit pricey.  Went in a group of six, which was genius because we got to try a variety of items.  The bread and hummus/dip that comes out to start off is very good and tasty... but don't overdo it because the food gets better as you go on.  For apps we had the bruschetta which came with chunks of chicken and was good (but I'm not huge on bruschetta so can't comment farther).  The calamari was fanstastic - well cooked, in a slightly spicy red sauce and the portion size was large and came with two big crostinis too.  I love that it was NOT fried like it is everywhere else you go.  We also go the eggplant/spinach/ricotta app and I'm pretty sure we licked that bowl clean - even the people who did not like veggies were in love with it.  I would consider it as an entree with a side of pasta in the future.  I had the whole wheat linguine with squash, peas, tomatoes, mozzarella and some other veggies.  Good, light sauce and healthy but flavorful feel overall.  One friend had the gemelli with shrimp and scallops which actually sounded like the best thing on the menu but was slightly disappointing to me. The sauce was a brandy-gorgonzola, which was GOOD and quite unique but a little watery for the dish.  I would have liked them to thicken it up a bit.  Two friends got the chef's special risotto for the night and everyone was SUPER impressed with it.  Good portion size, perfect al dente, incredible flavor and lots of beautiful ingredients.  Excellent choices.  Another friend got the penne with chicken, sundried tomatoes, olives, and I forget what else.  This sounded plain on the menu but was actually quite good. I think it was my favorite thing on the table!  Overall our dining experience was great and we all really liked the food.  Only thing is that the bill could be high if going back without coupns - especially for Watertown.
I have been to Atlanta before but on this trip I was able to eat at the blossom tree. It was worth the little walk from my hotel, the food was fresh and tasty and it was just perfectly served.   You can pick from Rice dishes, BIbibam and tacos. The best part of this place is that they have two sides that come with every dish. I opted for salad and dumplings it was the best choice, you can also Pick from kimchi, rice, etc.   I got Bibibam with chicken, brown rice, Korean salad and dumplings.   The restaurant is in front of a park and I got there early so I didn't have to wait long for my food.  Loved this place and would definitely go back.
Tom is very knowledgable in his field and is one of the most honest people in the business. I don't have enough hands to count all the times he has got me in and out with a quick fix.    My family auto shop has a small fleet of rentals and Tom has been our go to guy for as long as I remember. No job to big or small for him.   I've used him on personal cars for myself, my girlfriend and even my girlfriends family. A lot of times he will get the vehicle back in a few short hours. He's even done work on some of our hot-rods.   I wouldn't hesitate to recommend him to anyone. An honest, knowledgable and over all great guy.
My wife and I have been searching for apartments over the last two months, and have dealt with many leasing agents in the apartment front offices. At one point several months ago we gave up on the IMT property due to what we felt was a lack of effort. We recently revisited the IMT to give it another shot because we did love the property and we happen to get helped by Gary Stiil. From the moment he greeted us it was like night and day from any other leasing agent we had dealt with over the last three months. It was very close to closing time and in fact I suspect during the tour of the property it was past time for him to go home. He never once referred to the time and we never got the impression he was trying to hurry it along. I even mentioned it being near closing time and he shrugged it off  When we were done we explained to him we were determined to get a first floor two bedroom apartment with a yard and would be willing to wait for that to come available. I have had this similar conversation with other leasing agents and never heard back from them even after being assured  they will contact us when one came up. Gary took our information and made the same promise. Much to my surprise two weeks later I get an email from Gary informing us that he had found the two bedroom apartment with a yard.   Gary is a real standout and complete professional. He made the tour enjoyable and fun and followed up on his promise. I will also add that after the tour that day my wife and I were hanging out near the property talking when we saw Gary leaving. As he walked by we talk for a moment before he went on,  and that's when I realized he was waiting for us to finish so he could go home, and never let on. So if you are looking for an apartment at this property I highly recommend working with Gary
Best.  Donuts.  Ever.  Just amazing.  Great selection, great flavors, great portions (large donuts).    The only thing I would recommend for this location is that they clean the store.  It's in the middle of the drinking hot spot - 6th Street - so loads of loaded people come in for donuts, which is fine, but the place reflects that.  It's looking a little rundown and the donut cases are dirtied with old swipes of frosting, the tables are sticky, the floors are sticky.  Doesn't show this amazing product too well.
Windy City is by far my favorite pizza joint in dot. I always order the Hawaiian pizza and Hawaiian wings and am never disappointed by the flavor, and amount of topping on the pizza. Staff is always pleasant on the phone and upon pickup. When ordering delivery the service is always speedy and the food is still piping hot! Bravo Windy City! I will be a loyal customer as long as I am living in this city!
I love this place! I've been here multiple times so I can say they've earned their five stars.  It's small with a cozy atmosphere in the winter and open and airy in nice weather. Their cocktails are great, they make them with heart and they are a buck or two cheaper than Woodsman, Tannery or Tabor Tavern.   The bartenders are very, very sociable and nice - and they love talking about cocktails! This is a big plus in Portland where many with a bar like this are too snooty to chat. Even when it's slammed they are still friendly.   Only con: they took their cocktail menu from about 60 drinks to around 20. Please bring back the big menu!  Highly recommend!
Justin and his team did an amazing job on our two cars. His team was fast and they were there right on time. Our cars haven't been this clean since we bought them. Great job and great value for what you get. I will definitely be using them again.
I am so glad I am not a vegetarian and I live in Dallas....because Nueva Ondas Chicharron Gorditas are addictive and must be spiced with crack. I went to Austin for the weekend and ended up going there twice to eat them and brought some back to the room for an after hours drunk snack!! ...This is the only place I know of that doesn't stew the pork skin in the salsa all day long...they actually marry the two to order so the skin is still crispy....mmmmmm Oh and I have to give honorable mention to the Al Pastor. The pork was chunky and laden with red sauce and pineapple chunks. One more thing you gotta try there is their green sauce...it's got a big kick, but the flavor is outta this world.  After my  weekend in Nueva Onda....oops I mean Austin it's time to hit  the gym!!
Time after time they amaze me. Freshest food, best service, friendliest staff...  The best sushi in town. Their creativity also extends to the items on the regular menu, each item as pretty as it is delicious.   This is an extrodinary dining experience every single visit.
I wouldn't change my decision to go to Northeastern even if I had the chance to do it all over again.  The co-op program is irreplaceable, especially as a business major.  I've had three amazing co-ops and have been offered a great job for after graduation.  The teachers seem to genuinely care about the students, as do the co-op advisors.  The academic advisors don't seem as concerned, but I also think it's due to their hectic schedules and the amount of students they need to worry about.  If I could do it all over again, I would! The school really prepares you for the business world, through the co-op program, and through the courses. Between projects, team projects, and presentations, you will become comfortable talking in front of large groups and becoming a true business person.
I like this place. She is experienced and was able to alter my skirt when I showed up and finished within half an hour. She said that if I ever needed to tighten or loosen it again, it will be easy for her to do. The place is in the basement of the mit student Center so it is convenient. Don't forget to bring cash!!
I love Inner Strength!  I sweat my ass off and after class my muscles feel like they got a good workout but also are relaxed from the stretching in the heat.    My first class here I didn't realize it was a heated studio and didn't have a towel to put over my mat.  Don't make this mistake, otherwise you will be slipping all over your mat because it will be soaked in sweat in the first 15 minutes.  Bring a towel both for your mat and second small one to wipe your sweat!  I like to hit up Adam's class on Sunday late afternoon or Lara's slow flow class on Monday nights.  Adam's classes are a great workout, which is awesome.  I know if I go to his classes often I will get pretty strong and toned, but he also keeps you centered mentally.  It's great.  Lara's classes are great as well - I feel like I am going to therapy when I leave her classes because I feel good physically but also mentally/spiritually.  All of the instructors talk during class, but I especially like her vibe!  I've only taken one of Rebecca's classes, but it was a lot of fun - she's almost playful with the poses and she keeps it pretty light.  She does a good job describing the poses too.  So far, every instructor I have gone to have been great and I like that they each have their own distinct style and personality, so I tend to pick which class to go to depending on what I'm looking to get out of the class.    Sometimes the parking lot is a bit of a zoo, especially during the time when everyone is leaving the previous class and everyone going to the next class is waiting for their spots.    Anyway, I am loving this place so if you're curious at all, just take a class or two and ENJOY!
Went here Saturday for dinner, and it was actually pretty full, which was good to see.  My shrimp tacos were pretty large (I got two of them) and the seafood soup was chock full of shrimp and avocado.  I must commend the girl there for being really nice after our 2 year old smashed a bottle of hotsauce on the floor under the table.   The chicken tacos are pretty average, but the fish and shrimp are really good, and these are what I come here for.
I actually enjoy living here. Sure, the prices are a bit high but taking into account the fantastic location (super close to Kendall T stop, walking distance from various restaurants and the Cambridgeside Galleria) plus how well-kept the building is, I'm rather content. My maintenance orders have always been completed in a timely fashion, the sidewalks are well-cleared of snow, and I haven't had any issues with mail or packages. Also haven't had issues with neighbor-related noise and the monthly events are a nice touch.
Great service - they are very nice here. Ingredients are all fresh (veggies look like actually veggies and not oily). Al pastor is great meat to try and spicey chicken is the most popular (it is medium spicey). Guac and sour cream do cost extra and may not be worth it to add all of them.
Really good XLB - delicate yet structurally intact, rich broth inside.   The pan fried dumplings weren't up to the same standard, but were still tasty!
I love this place, I am obsessed with the lamb plate and my husband always gets the pepperoni pizza (he's a picky eater). One of my favorite places nearby. I have also gotten the lamb gyro but prefer the plate as you also get dolmas.
* Organic food delivery in Vancouver has at least 4 competitors, and this is perhaps now my favourite. *  Ok, since Ladybug has sadly been having problems with the quality and accuracy lately (http://www.yelp.ca/biz/ladybug-organics-home-delivery-service-and-store-surrey#hrid:x1siIpX-AQ-T_30XwQEaMw) decided to try out Green Earth to see how they compare.  I feel like I'm cheating though!    After 2 weeks of the service (my organic delivery secret affair!) here are my impressions:  - The ordering system is much more efficient and easy to complete.  Basically a much better website with streamlined choices.  - I love how they have a recommended bin each week with the freshest produce for the week, and how much this changes from week to week to keep you constantly getting different items and keeping things interesting.  - They are VERY good at only listing the produce and fruit that is actually available when you are ordering so no missing items and/or substitutions.  - They simplify their choices, so they don't offer 4 or 5 different kinds of apples for instance.  But each week they have 1 or 2 (and actually have them!).    - The quality of the produce has been on par or superior with that from Ladybug.  Been enjoying some of the sweetest carrots, creamiest sweet potatoes, non-bitter artichokes, delicious locally baked granola, crispy flavourful fuji apples, most flavour packed broccoli that I have had for a long time along with everything else.  - I love that for things you order regularly you can establish a standing order and get a 5% discount (milk, eggs, etc.).  - Their customer service is really on top of things.  They are very proactive and contact you quickly and efficiently.  I hope this continues, and as long as it does I think it will be Green Earth going forward!  (Sorry my dear Ladybug!)
This is a nice surprise in powerhouse sq. The volume of food is a great value, the Bao bao's are amazing and you get like 10 dumplings in an order!
I've been on a hiatus when it comes to writing reviews for a while now but I felt a place like this deserves the most attention it can get. Although I don't have many followers on here,  I'm hoping the couple of them that do see this will visit and tell their followers about it and so on and so on.   This small place on Burford Highway can be very easily missed; i mean I missed it trying to get there and had to drive back again to spot it lol, anyway came here with my friend Ravi on Monday night for dinner, we can be very indecisive about our food but the server was super patient with us and luckily spoke Spanish and English like me also, made it much easier for me to explain the food to Ravi.   We chose a few things on the menu to try out: empanadas de carne which were amazing,  also tamales or chuchitos as they call them which I have never liked from any country or my own family for that matter and my mind wasn't changed this time either, but that doesn't mean they are not good because Ravi liked them; its just my  personal taste bud. We also got pechuga a la plancha con arroz y frijoles negros which was off the chain,  and lastly a quesadilla with chorizo which was also delicious.   All in all we were very satisfied with our dinner that night and would love to come back to try their breakfast in the morning and any other plates they have. So I highly recommend it, please give it a shot, and tell more people about them cause small places like these deserve more attention than the bigger ones everyone already knows.
Very pleasant staff and beautiful selection of cards, small gifts, journals, and stuffed animals.  Love this store everywhere but this store, although not the largest, has a lot of variety and is laid out.
I've been for lunch twice now and can sum it up in three simple words:  fast, cheap, good.    The end.
I truly loved having dinner here with my boyfriend a few weeks ago.  The bruschetta was the best we'd had in our lives... even soon after a long summer trip to Italy.  I wish we had tried the calamari! Next time...  The Maine crab-stuffed tortellini was incredible--perfect texture, softly balanced sauce--not too creamy, not to heavy but light and airy in unison with the fluffy light texture of the crabmeat.  Divine.  The service was really impeccable.  They run a tight ship there and our waiter was kind, thoughtful, and extremely attentive.  I hope that the next time we visit Posto is just as good!
This is the best bottled kombucha I've ever had. It is smooth and has a perfect balance of flavors. My favorite is the lavender lemonade. It's so good we now sell Lion Heart at our massage practice. The owners are also very helpful and friendly.
Amanda is amazing!!! Talk about anticipating ALL of our needs!  From having the external heater turned on as we were arriving to making sure we never had an empty cocktail, we had a great time and Amanda was part of the reason.  Add in some awesome food and it's a combination for a wonderful night!
Always greeted with a smile and pleasant, prompt service. They're open to some substitutions which is nice. The food is great and the containers, utensils, cups, etc are all at the very least commercially compostable. I'm a big fan of the coconut pork paired with ginger maté tea with a cookie to boot. All the omnomnom noms for this place. The price is a little bit up there but it's not a deterrent for me. If you frequent this place,definitely sign up for the loyalty program.
Rich was awesome! He helped us with our old mice-ridden house. Looking forward to a more peaceful existence thanks to B&B.
The Enormous Room is one of those places everyone should try because it's different than any other bar in Boston. What the Enormous Room does offer is something rare, but something people who are familiar with Chicago's nightlife can appreciate.   It's a lounge with a good DJ. It provides a semi-upscale, hip atmosphere for drinking, hanging out with friends and even dancing, but be sure to arrive early because the interior space resembles what would happen if a Miami nightclub and a hooka bar had a bastard child and to say seating is limited, is a gross understatement.   The deep, soft couches, pillows and overstuffed chairs lining the exposed brick walls make seating very limited. The only bar is really a window in the back of the club where waitstaff shuffle back and forth taking drink orders and generally creating poor traffic flow.   My recommendation would be to arrive early with a group of friends and claim a good space or for the more adventurous couple/date, grab a good spot and order some of the tasty appetizers and watch all the fresh Nike kids work on their break dancing routines.  I like this place but if you don't feel like standing around and waiting for drinks, then this probably isn't for you without prior planning.
The only spot in China Town where I get Banh Mi.  They make the sandwiches really good, good bread, good meats, and pickled veggies-I usually just go for the cold-cut combo. They will ask if you want it spicy (I usually don't, but you can).  There's only one table in there so order to go.  CASH ONLY
Great service at a great price. Had Pete the owner come to my house to check why my A/C wasn't cooling, within 5 minutes he had us up and running for less than $150.00. Prior to having him come out my wife received a $1000.00 quote for the same repair. Since the service was so good we hired him to do full install on our business. Again great experience and great value. Thanks again Pete for all of your help.
Alexis helped me tonight, great service. Recommended for late night. I'm right down the road and felt like ordering a late night pizza. She made it quick and easy. A+!
First time here. Happy to say that the food,  the service,  and there music were great!    Appetizer : Really good fried pickles... And that says a lot from me because I don't like pickles outside of a hamburger bun!   Meal:  Vanbarry's Bacon Jam burger. The burger was perfectly cooked (rare-medium). The beef was high quality. The bacon jam has kind of a sweetness that offset the bacon's salty side. Kind of a caramelized taste. The blue cheese was perfect with it. I decided to try the sweet potato salad as my side,  because I've never heard of it. It was really sweet and creamy. It was really tasty but not quite as chunky as I prefer for my potato salad. The flavor was great and I'd definitely have it again.   Oh, the beer was cold and good too! :-)    As an aside,  the band/singer was really good! Kind of a Dave Matthews type. Great voice. I missed his name but I told my wife thst I could see making Sundays on the open patio a regular event to listen to enjoy the music and food.   Certainly a place we will return to! Highly recommend it!
I am a sucker for ice cream, but JP licks seriously have good ice cream.  Service was friendly too.  I asked for 2 fav for taste (in same request).  The person smile and friendly.  No attitude.  I had Coconut Vanilla sorbet.  It was like so creamy almost like ice cream. And you can taste the REAL vanilla.  Good job!
I have been wanting to try this place since they reopened. I had a day off and decided to go have lunch.  The place has a really nice decor, friendly staff and the service was quick. I sat at the bar and was greeted by the owner I believe. There was a woman sitting next to me that apparently comes several times a week. She made some recommendations and I decided on the Thai Basil Rice with chicken. Their lunch specials  come with a soup, which was Tom Kha that day. It was delicious and my meal came not long after I was finished with the soup. Some of the reviews said that the portions were small. I didn't have that experience. My dish was huge and I had enough to take home for two more servings. My meal was very good. I walked out with a bill of $11.31 plus tip, not bad for all of the food and a tea. I will definitely be back.
Fantastic little spot in SE! Amazing food - I highly recommend the burritos and the taco bowl. Service is quick and friendly, and the drinks are reasonably priced. Great little outdoor patio & off-street parking is available. They also have a stage and host shows regularly, and the shows start early enough that you can get out & see friends and still get home at a decent hour!
Super live club! Last time I went the DJ was killing it the whole night had everyone super turnt. Music is loud and they have a big led screen with trippy motions goin all night to the music.
We visited here for my friends birthday. We had 12 people and 2 kids. We received wonderful service. I highly recommend the Violet Love Martini! Will be back for that drink for sure. Everyone enjoyed the food and atmosphere.
My friends and I came here after bailing on Waffle Window due to a lack of seats and then bailing on Cup & Saucer because of a long wait. We asked if they could seat 7, not feeling too optimistic but were told it wouldn't be a problem, they would just put us in the back (this place is way bigger than it looks from the outside). We retrieved our friends from outside and headed straight back.  The service was a little disorganized, but I'm not expecting perfection when we spring a bunch of people on them at the last minute at a busy time. Overall, I think we were helped by 4 different people and they were all pretty great, happily giving us their opinions. The food came out with surprisingly little wait and it was so dang good. Everyone at the table was pleased. The potatoes au gratin seemed to be a particular hit. I will definitely be back to try their sweet crepes since everyone at the table went with savory this time around. I'm excited to have a new restaurant in the area that I can depend on.
It's hard to find a Japanese restaurant in Vancouver that doesn't just sell sushi so I was elated to find out about Marulilu. I've always wanted to try authentic okonomiyaki and takoyaki and although I'm not sure how close it is to the real thing, my experience here was unique and I found it worth the visit.   The okonomiyaki was described as a cheesy savory seafood pancake and it was exactly that. It had a nice crisp on the outside and an incredibly soft and fluffy inside. The cheesy pockets were the best! It was more salty than I imagined and the sauce on top lacked the sweetness that I originally thought it would have. The pickled ginger was also unsweetened. It wasn't an unpleasant surprise though. The seafood gave it a nice variation of texture as well. I would highly recommend it!   The omu curry rice with the pork katsu was also very delicious. The katsu was the crispiest I've ever had and the curry was very homely. The omurice had a comforting light texture to it as well and everything tasted amazing when it was all put together!   I also had the takoyaki and I'm happy to report that it tasted identical to the ones you can find all over Vancouver from the night market to random sushi places.   All in all, it was a neat little place to visit at least once. The staff are extremely friendly and they have the most adorable voices! The food was very comforting but there's nothing about it flavour wise that would blew me out of the water. However, it's one of the few places that serve okonomiyaki in Vancouver so it would still be worth a visit.
Very welcoming staff.  Feels like you are at your best friends house and you just had a slumber party and they are making you breakfast in the morning.  It's small inside and definitely a locals portland diner. Good food, good prices, good people.
$3 banh mi, other readymade meals like curry chicken, BBQ pork w/ cucumber and sweet&sour sauce, egg noodles w/ char siu pork, kept warm in plastic containers. The idea is similar to Woorijip in NYC's K-town.   I will be getting food here as a study break more often. Take it to go, it's cheap and fast.
Third time here, ordered take out. Pad See Ew was amazing! They put it in an aluminum tray and plastic lid with cardboard bottom, so it stayed warm for the journey home. Fast, easy, decent price.
Came here for the Austin passbook deal. Buy one get one free deal for a grilled cheese and a side, not bad! The location is adorable. Right off Congress in the shade, small picnic tables and a few chairs. It's right next to the Austin Juice trailer. (Which is also in my passbook, I plan to try that soon!)  We ordered the Croque-Madame. And then ordered a custom sandwich with a Hawaiian bun, cheddar, ham, an egg, spinach, and jalapeño cream cilantro sauce.   It was tough for me to decide which one I liked better but I think I settled on the Croque-Madame. It was a little sweet but the flavors combines were amazing.   Our custom sandwich wound up being really good too, mostly thanks to the sauce. I highly recommend the jalapeño cream cilantro sauce.  It wasn't spicy to me at all but it had an amazing flavor. I'm a sucker for anything cilantro.   *The sourdough bread did get a little soggy, but it didn't bother me (might bother others). The Hawaiian bun stayed pretty toasted and crispy.*  Our sides were a fruit cup and tomato soup (cute!). The fruit cup was green apples and oranges, refreshing and the fruit tasted fresh. The tomato soup was good. Had some chunks in it, probably tomatoes. So that was a strange consistency, but the taste was really good. I think having tomato soup at a grilled cheese trailer is a great idea.   I'd definitely go back to try a different combination or a different sandwich. The ones we got were really good, but I'm looking for that one to be blown away by. =]
If you are a fan of buffets and soups and salads, this place is for you!  Heck - if you're a fan homemade tasting food, this place is for you!  This Sweet Tomatoes is located at the end of a lack-luster shopping center, so it can be difficult to find if you've never been here.  But once you walk inside, you are greeted by the salad buffet and a carpet with tomatoes printed on it (these people take their veggies seriously!).  You choose your salads and toppings prior to paying.  Patrons sit themselves in either tables or booths and the soups, bakery options, pasta, fresh fruit and ice cream are located in the back and you can go up as many times as you want to sample the many fresh and yummy offerings.  My favorite part of the buffet are the soups and pastas - so many choices - creamy and cheesey gooey macaroni and cheese and two other options that change every so often!  Also, there are certain soups and salads highlighted (and changed) each month.  For instance, in March, the theme is Latin flavors.  The bread options are abundant as well.  For example, when I last went to Sweet Tomatoes, there were four types of Focaccia bread (and they all had some type of cheese on them, so of course, I had to try them all!), muffins and biscuits.  They also carry Gluten Free and Vegan options, which is a plus.
Admittedly, some dishes here are hit or miss. The hits, WAY MORE than make up for the misses. The Khao Soi is the best I've ever had,and I've had supposedly the best while visiting Thailand! Very friendly and fast service in the this lovely little hole in the wall.
Service was a bit of a disaster operationally, but the food and ambiance are top notch (for Ethiopian).  I had made a reservation, but it apparently disappeared and I had to wait with all the plebes.  I was seated relatively quickly after, and servers were pleasant.  I went with the Veggie platter and a salad.  Adding the salad was a mistake.  They brought the salad first,  which ended up delaying the main veggie platter especially long.  They even brought the check in between!  I probably had about 50 calories to start, so was a little annoyed.  The veggie platter itself was very good, and different from your usual Ethiopian fare.  I found it a little spicier than usual, which was a plus.  They have some additional cold dishes including beets, which were a strong point.  Their injera is very pleasing to the Ethiopian neophyte, since it is soft and spongey and cut with wheat, so with less teff = less sourness.  That said, the gluten content goes up.  Overall, I enjoyed the ambiance, which was large, hipster, and fun.  They're very busy with good reason, the food is delicious an affordably priced.  I pigged out and still my check was maybe $20.  I get the impression the meat dishes are the stronger suit here.  A lot of people were oohing and awing over the beef tips.
I have been coming here for years.  the waffle is the same awesome quality year after year and the owners are just a joy to be with.  They have started baking breads and those are simply irresistible just like their waffles.  do yourself a favor and check this place out no matter where you live!  a must visit when in Stevenson.
Went here for a snack and my boyfriend and I tried the Kofta Saj, which is a ground beef, lettuce and tomato wrap with tatziki sauce. So good! Highly recommend. Service was great as well.
Very impressed with the prompt service and super-friendly staff!  Love the convenient location too; they share a parking structure with Freddy's, so you can pop in, put in your order, and go grocery shopping while the pizza is being made. Doesn't get any fresher than that!
This place is super yummy. I come here all the time and they never disappoint. The only complaint I have is I wish that they always offered there eggs Benedict because they only have it on the weekends.
Crispy coconut shrimp, garlic shrimp scampi amazing, awesome mango slushy an ultimate margarita best times ever! Did I mention the live music Saturday night, reggaes the best!
Food was absolutely superb from start to finish. Just incredible. And extremely reasonable for the quality. Including reasonable ($65) bottle of wine. The meal for 3 was $210 pre-tip.   Sadly our awful waitress was curt and forgot that we ordered 2 sides (we never got them and I didn't ask for them a second time or remind her as once we saw the entrées and realized we probably didn't need them). But she never mentioned it for the rest of the night. I also would have liked coffee with dessert but none was offered. It cost her in the tip but we still had a wonderful time.   Highy recommend the cavatelle and the ravioli for starter, the scallops and halibut for entrées.  The calimari was good, not as good as the other starters and the veal was very good, but again, not as good as the others entrées.  The calimari and veal were NOT bad, they were very good, it's just the others were absolutely outstanding!   Panna cotta and chocolate lava cake w/ice cream was out.of.this.world! Love this little gem and will be back. We'll just ask for a different waitress.
These guys rocked! They gave me a courtesy call 30 minutes before showing up and didn't waste any time getting started. They finished my move in the two hour slot I had planned on and were positive and upbeat the entire time. Not only was the service affordable, but I actually had a great moving experience (which I didn't think was possible!) My movers were Luis and Jonathan, and they were phenomenal. True professionals with laid back attitudes. I'd highly recommend them and will use them next time i move.
For what it is, you can get some great deals here. If you aren't careful, you could also end up spending more on something than it is actually worth. They charge by the pound so if it's a crappy item but it weighs a lot, you will pay a fortune for it. As a schoolteacher though, I love that the children's books are only $.25. Another downside is it's $1.69 a pound for the first 25 pounds. At about the 15 pound mark, it costs more than 25 pounds resulting in putting unwanted items in your cart so you pay less.
So my third time coming here in the past 2 weeks:  I'm a fitness buff and as such I do not eat out a lot. The two allowances for this rule are coffee and sushi. Fish Market has now snagged my "Go to Sushi Spot" award.  I'd learned a valuable lesson years ago when I had gone to a restaurant for the first time and gotten rather mediocre food. I didn't go back for over a year even though it was right next to my apartment. I went back and BOOOOM best dinner of the year that night.  This is a reason I withhold my reviews until I've been to an establishment a minimum of 2 times. Being my 3rd time at Fish Market, I must say this place is a go to spot.  1) It's tiny. To some this may mean a wait that they wish not to endure. For me this means no damn screaming college kids "HEEY MORE SAHKIIII". It also makes it feel more like a sushi bar and less of a japanese food trough service.  2) I've gotten the same waittress every time. Although the first time dining at FM there was a confusion with my order, she remedied it swiftly and with a great attitude. She's always super sweet and attentive, even promoting their "Free ice cream" promo while my lady and I were discussing whether or not she wanted some ice cream.  3) My sushi/ meals here have so far been consitently great. I always get a "clean" fresh taste from my food here. It is what I now expect. If the sushi were priced higher, as it is at some restaurants, I would not hate it due to the great quality. I have yet to try the acclaimed Avocado ball, but everything from my Eel Handroll to the Chirashi and Sushi Deluxe have been amazing.  4) Price is great. It's also why I do not fear leaving great tips. $5 tip on a $15 should ont be considered exemplary but it seems it is by current standards. Either way, don't hate when I get my food before you.
I drove from Knoxville to get Japanese hair straightening (thermal reconditioning) done. It was worth the drive. Bryan was very nice and the service was awesome. Now I could wash my hair and just let it air dry and it will be straight. Don't need to spend an hour straightening my hair anymore.
I really love the Cuban coffee that I had there. The jerk chicken salad was good. I really like my experience there. I love the juices there, it makes me feel like I am in the Caribbean drinking juice.
I've been there at least 10 times. The eggplant parmesan is  splendid. Generous portions. Pretty good salads, too. I think for the price it's a great lunch or lite dinner place. Their honey mustard dressing is the best I've had.
If you ever have a chance to visit Disney's Animal Kingdom Theme Park. Yak & Yeti Restaurant is another good choice for you when you are looking for a good food and good service.   Yak & Yeti is a fine table-service dining which will serve you during lunch and dinner. And this restaurant is base of Mt. Everest in the small town of Anandapur. This place serves Asian fusion ( Combines flavor from China, India and Nepal)   My fiancé, our godson and I had a wonderful meal there at Yak and Yeti Restaurant.  We started with Wok-Fried green beans, House Salad, and Thai Chili Chicken Wings as our appetizers. These dishes were so wonderful. Then we had Combo (shrimp and Chicken) Lo Mein , sautéed egg noodles, carrots, cabbage, green onions and bean sprouts for our main dish. I would say, we really loved the food and this place. We got a really nice service as well.     Too bad, this place is too far a way from me to visit often. Otherwise I will be a big fan.  Don't miss out during you visit Disney's Animal Kingdom Theme Park, Yak & Yeti Restaurant is a hit!
Not much can be added about Breakfast @ Val's that hasn't already been committed to cyberspace. We loved the food there, and affirm that the portions are huge, the overall value is very good (Hey! you can't spell 'value' w/o the letters V-A-L), and the service, warm and personable. Val has been on her game in the Couve for about 2.5 years now, after refining her most sacred shao-lin technique with her hot pots, in downtown Portland "for about 15-16 years."  Deserving special mention from the menu were the triple-decker Ruebenator, and the philly cheese-steak scramble. So much tender, juicy meat! I'd drive out of my way out to the Couve, to order either of these entrees again.   The one glaring omission in Val's business model is the lack of accessibility. She's only open a few hours a day. True, she's built a booming business with legions of adoring fans and in all likelihood simply doesn't need to hire more staff to stay open later. The problem being, there's a vast cross-section of potential and acutal fans of Val's that work swing or graves that are largely, effectively cut off from having access, and this little diner is a place that deserves plenty of exposure to the masses. Should Val ever consider  later hours (esp on weekned nights), that'll be just the bump needed for instant 5 star accolades.  If Stepping Stone can do it, you most definitely can dooo it.  Val and co: you're a shining star, no matter who you are. Shining bright to see, what you could truly be...
Jon and his crew are top notch!  They went above and beyond, and I will definitely have him come back  to do additional tile work.  Jon is extremely easy to communicate with and my whole experience was easily 5 stars.
Great hummus and homemade bread, for starters. Comfort food, strong drinks, and not too hard on the wallet! Sometimes, I want great spaghetti and meatballs! My husband always wants lamb chops, and he really likes the chops and risotto here!
This place NEVER disappoints! Great quality food at reasonable prices!! Sad they took out the arroz con pollo off their menu, it was amazing!!
This branch is just like the Roosters over here in Grove City and sometimes it's good to have consistency.  Sometimes you just crave some dumpster wedges or tots and I know I'll always be able to get there.  The chicken tenders are always well cooked and they have a pretty solid drink collection.  Just wish there was ginger ale!
Good food and pleasant service. Self seating can be a pain sometimes, and parking is usually slim to none in the evenings. Live music was enjoyable. I bring my dogs and sit outside. They always bring me a fresh bowl of water for them, which I appreciate! I would fully recommend this place!
A slogan should mean something and with Reliable Property Management it does. We have leased from Reliable Property Management for over 2 years and we have received nothing but excellent and professional attention.  If I have a maintenance problem, a simple email to them has resulted in an immediate authorization to arrange for the repair. All upkeep of the property to excellent standards have been met in every way.  I owned a home for many years and now they have made me feel like this is my home. From the owner Terry Godbold, to the staff of Debbie, Bobbi, Connie, and Diann, all of whom have made our first leasing experience very easy and enjoyable. Reliable does say it all with this company.
We met some friends for drinks in the tap room on a busy Saturday night (at around 10:00PM). The restaurant was hopping, with a short wait for a table. But the tap room downstairs had plenty of seating, and quick dual-bartender service. Some nice things to note about the tap room: 1) you can enter from the back of the restaurant where most people park, 2) if you are a smoker you can pop in and out, 3) there is plenty of bench seating for large groups, 4) this floor has it's own restrooms (clean ones), 5) you can request a table for dinner, and then hang out in the tap room until the table is available. It got a little noisy in there, but only after they started to fill up. The room is really large, and had nice lighting (and clean tables).  The drinks weren't too bad. It was a strange selection for as many beers as they had. I am an IPA fan myself, but with the 20 some beers on tap, there was one IPA, and one Imperial IPA. I did a beer flight of 5 beers for $12.50. I have had cheaper flights! When I couldn't decide on a fifth beer I asked the bartender to give me a wildcard and surprise me and she gave me a "Bucharaht" (sp?). To me, it tasted a bit like bacon. I passed it around the table, and everyone agreed it had a nice smoked flavor. I ended up having to order a full beer of it.  The bartender was not the friendliest I have ever had, hence not a five star in my book. You expect a little more personality, I guess. But I got beer, relatively fast, and was able to cash out after every order (not knowing how long we would stay).  I noticed parking was a pain. We were staying in town and went on foot. I would suggest parking somewhere central and hoofing it. We also made use of Uber which worked in our favor for the night.
I had a lovely dinner here with my girlfriends on Tuesday night.  The service was fantastic--friendly, attentive, and informative--and the food was delicious.  I was blown away by how innovative each dish was, from name to plating to taste.    Favourites of the night: - Comfort High (cocktail served hot that is basically holiday cheer in a cup) - Wannabe Carbonara (the perfect marriage of Italian and Asian noodles with a creamy, egg sauce) - Vegetarians Only (crispy mochi goodness; filling!) - Dr. Octopus vs. Mr. Tuna (I've never seen anything like it!) - Kickass Rice 2.0 (pork belly aburi that melts in your mouth) - Magic Stick (This dessert was so heavenly that we had to order a second one to share.  Imagine a chocolate ganache bar with amazing matcha crumbles and different fruit sauces. Now stop imagining and go to Torafuku to experience it in person.)  I got there at 6:30pm and snagged a booth, but it did start filling up after.    I'm looking forward to coming back!
Sometimes you walk into a place and realize that it may be just for you. So when I heard there was a new poutine place in Boston, I said "Yay!" When I heard they had a solid craft beer list, I said "Woo Hoo!" When I heard four of those craft beers were draft lines, I leapt in the air!  No frills, great food, great beer, great staff. Small and cozy. Not much bar space. So many Sauses and options you could visit Saus a dozen times and never eat the same thing twice. Which is great because everything I've had was superb. Shaved Brussels sprouts! With bleu cheese and bacon!
Quite possibly the best restaurant in Atlanta. Always a go to for family birthdays. Excellent wine selection. I could eat the piroshkis for breakfast, lunch and dinner. Great setting. Great ownership.
This place is amazing. Great for dine in and take out. The service is very enjoyable, everyone is friendly and great to talk to. Believe the sign outside-- the lasagna is amazing!!! Definitely recommended.
Love love love Gilbert's.  It's such an exotic little place, with a plush mediterranean feel.  Some of the pretty boys from Blake's next door may spill over, but it's definitely more low key and relaxed.  Enjoy your super strong cosmo!  The food is delicious as well.  The hummus is yummy, and my favorite sandwich is the tender and juicy lamb burger with tzatziki sauce.  Surprisingly enough, the paella for 2 is fabulous.  Great place all around!
I'd call this a do-not-miss if you're in downtown Boston for a casual dinner. It was loud and lively with fabulous and fun decor. Our wait wasn't more than 10 minutes at the cocktail tables outside the tent that defines the restaurant, then we were seated next to a nice family with cute kids. Everyone sits at picnic tables and unless you have a large group, plan on sharing your table.  Starters were the crab cakes and drunken shrimp (it doesn't need the chips) -- perfect with the Fisherman's Brew from Glouchester on draft. My dining companion and I split a two pound lobster that was scrumptious. For obvious reasons, you don't get relatively inexpensive lobster on the West Coast, so this was a treat.
We had an awesome time here celebrating our anniversary.  Our server was so nice, explained the menu, and was attentive.  The atmosphere was low key but fun, and we loved our meals! I had the shrimp and mussels combo with the shakin sauce, and added on corn and potatoes.  I was impressed to see a couple purple potatoes in there!! We had the spicy calamari to start and it was fantastic as well!! I can't wait to come back soon!!
This place sounds like a simple sandwich shop but is actually one of my favorite places in Boston. I always took visiting guests here because it has something for everyone. The first time I ate at Parish, I took a chance on the meatloaf sandwich, which normally I would never look at as I'm not a big meatloaf fan. That sandwich is honestly one of the best sandwiches I've ever had! It's got a chipotle mayo that is just incredible. It's been about 3 years since I've been here but I still crave that meatloaf sandwich all of the time. I did have the Mac and cheese at one point and from what I remember, that was great too. I'm really into Mac and cheese so I almost always try them at restaurants but usually am disappointed because I can make better, which was not the case here. I'll definitely be paying Parish a visit when I'm back in Boston.
I'm pretty inexperienced with the vegan world, but have recently become interested in what lowering my animal protein consumption might do for my health. With that said, I've dined twice recently for lunch at Proper Eats. The foremost surprise to me was how well the meal stuck with me. I thought for sure I would be hungry again by 5PM, but that was not the case. Second surprise was just how tasty everything was, especially tempeh which I don't believe I'd ever had before. Overall both meals I had were scrumptious and filling. Last time I was there, one of the employees asked me how my meal was, and this is an important sign that a restaurant takes pride in what they do. Also, I noticed the prices on their organic produce was MUCH more affordable than my local Fred Meyer, so I'm going to be doing some shopping there sometime.
We booked the Hampton Inn for our wedding room block, and it was better than we could have imagined. The front desk staff was so incredibly friendly and accommodating, and the rooms were larger than expected. Our suite was beautiful, spacious, and quiet.   The free breakfast buffet was a big hit with guests, and there was a lot of space in the lounge area for everyone to mingle and catch up over breakfast the next day.   Overall, the Hampton Inn exceeded our expectations and helped make our wedding weekend wonderful.
Amazing location. Classy, great lightung, clean and well mantained.   Great fresh coffee, and the food is absolutely to to die for!!! Had a bacon wrapped shrimp tapas with a lemon beurre blanc type sauce. Then went on a chicken carnita sandwich on ciabatta!!  Very reasonable prices...especially if youre looking for a nice meal and a bottle of wine. Good service as well.  Its about type this area got a classy, great quality restaurant thats not ridiculously overpiced (Genuine).   Great change of pace from the previous rude owners as well.
My first taste of pho and I have loved it since. Huge portions for a low cost and tremendous taste. I always order #16 and have never been disappointed. Unexpectedly the wings here are some of the best I have ever had. The only contention I have with Le's is the service can be absolutely horrid and you really have to flag down your waiter/waitress to get service sometimes.
Lots of healthy food choices, including tons of vegan and vegetarian options. I've never been for breakfast, but apparently that is amazing as well. Much of the food comes from the UBC Farm. . Service is quick and they even serve beer. Prices are decent and there is lots of comfy seating.
The ladies there were super sweet and also had great ideas for Halloween costumes. Went there in search of a one inch straightner... found a decent one for $80... which we called the 'jay-z" straightner. It's red, it's long, it brings the heat to 400 degrees!   Cute little whole-in-the-wall stores and all kinds of fun wigs!
Love this place! The new location is great! I think the services provided are outstanding and recommend this to anyone looking for professional threading and/or waxing.
Good pizza, with a cult following. Worth a trip out on the blue line. Not the best I've ever had--the crust is too bland and mealy, and the cheese is a little rubbery--but still delicious. The sweet, herby sauce is the best part of this pizza.    The price is right (about $10 for eight nice-sized slices). The place is unpleasantly dirty though. My water glass was filthy, and crumbs were everywhere. Friendly service and ultracasual,blue-collar atmosphere.
Very nice establishment for some evening cocktails and dinner. Haven't had the food yet but I've been to the one in Dunwoody. I think once they get the ambiance right with the music and live performers it will definitely be even more of a hit. Nice wide bar and upscale
Next time I'm here you will find me in my snuggie.  There I said it,  it's out there and now and the world knows that not only am I a man of comfort, I'm also a man of style which is why Johnnie Fox's Irish Snug is the perfect little place for me.   To be honest I'm not a fan of Irish pubs, sure I would love to go to a local pub in Ireland but the term "Irish pub" seems to have lost its meaning in this town. I'm glad i did not listen to my inner scepticism because I love this little place.  The first thing you will notice is the size, it's a small pub where the bar alone takes up half of space with some nice cozy booths in the back. You will feel comfortable as you are, with or without your snuggie.   The food was a cut above your normal pub menu, those little mini yourkies are the size of mini cupcakes are delicious. The Irish nachos and roast beef sandwich are also very tasty, add these together with some beer and it's a match made in heaven.  I often visit this place during or after work so if you see a guy wearing a collared snuggie (cursed you work dress code!) in the back nursing a beer come say hi!
The food was outstanding. We had the Wagyu Beef sliders and the baby grilled octopus. The octopus was cooked perfectly. The flavors were savory, on point. Great wine list. Had wine from Paso Robles, so amazing. Atmosphere was chill, relaxing with a touch of hipster.
I have to admit, I dont' really know why I like the Green Briar so much-  it's nothing special and feels slightly contrived, but it does feel like a fairly authentic Irish Pub.  If you are in the neighborhood and need some quick food and a pint, you won't be disapponited unless you are a culinary snob. (I kinda am, but you set expectations based on where you are).  Fact of the matter is, you will see some dude's watching the game, reading a book over a pint,a nd a gaggle of fiddlers practicing thier tunes on any given night.  It's a fun spot for a change of pace if that's whjat you're lookin for.
I have had a Samsung Galaxy S6 for a little over a year and the home and power buttons randomly stopped working. When I went in for a consultation twice (I wasn't prepared to drop off my phone the first time), both the repair person as well as the people at the front desk 1. explained the process to me step by step 2. was clear about the cost 3. accurately gave me an estimation of how long it would take them to fix it and 4. told me they would contact me if anything we discussed changed.   After picking up my phone on time, they told me that because they just needed to clean the phone (there was "goo" inside that was causing the button issue) there would be no charge because they didn't really have to "fix" anything and was deemed a consultation. WHO DOESN'T CHARGE PEOPLE FOR EVEN A CONSULTATION! I WAS BEYOND SHOCKED AND ECSTATIC since I was ready to buy a new phone! Whatever they were going to charge me for the repair was reasonable which is why I decided to go with them initially, but then the customer service aspect was just the icing on the cake.  In addition, there was a constant stream of people coming in for all reasons, so apparently it's in the know and I was just late to the party. As long as they can fix my electronic items, I probably won't go anywhere else and frankly you shouldn't either. And who doesn't like to shop local! THANKS A TON!
My boyfriend and I came here after spending time at Bracket  Town during the NCAA Final Four Weekend here in Atlanta.  It was very quiet and he atmosphere was nice and relaxing. The food came out hot. The services was great.
So I got two slices here, ( the only kind which actually matter) a cheese and a pepperoni. Man, I just gotta say this is some of the best NY style pizza I've had in Portland in a long while. Killer pepperoni! Flavorful and a bit spicy ('m sick of wimpy, bland greasy pepperoni. Good crust, perfect amount of sauce to crust to cheese. It sucks when the cheese is thicker than the crust and when there isn't enough sauce to balance. Not here! I grew up in NY state and this stuff is the real deal! Can't wait to come back!
Great interesting dishes which are great to share.  Perfect place for a small group dinner with rounds of tapas and drinks.  Our service was spot on, and the atmosphere is perfect with the great deck.
There are only two restaurants in Austin I can go every week and not get sick of it, this and Din Ho. Okay, well after two years maybe I'm not as impressed as I used to be, but for god sakes, we're talking every Friday for two-three years?. I go here for lots of reasons. I can't get nepolitos (sp?) and plantains at almost any other Mexican restaurants in Austin. I also can't find pozole almost anywhere else! Their menu is split up into authentic interior Mexican and Tex-Mex, which is perfect. I'm a healthy eater and fitness professional, my boyfriend is a fast food connoisseur. I usually get the fish yucateco and he gets one of their four pechugas (again, sp?). If we bring a friend, they're usually delighted by the avocado margaritas, especially during an hour with drink specials. Any other restaurant almost in Austin, one of us is guaranteed to be unhappy. I have never had problems with the service and would recommend to anyone.
My first time here and the manager treated us like family. I was highly impressed. I had the BBQ, Bacon and Cheese burger with the smash fries. The rosemary adds a little kick to the fries and they were so yummy! The burger was fantastic as well. My dad had the Spinach and Goat Cheese Salad. And according to him he loved it. Next time I'm their I might get it or the other burger I was going to get. The Truffle Mushroom Burger. Well anyway, I highly recommend this place if you're in the mood for a high end burger.
I was wandering down N. Mississippi recently, killing time before a happy hour meet up with some friends, and happened across CD-Game Exchange, so I decided to stop in and browse for a few. The place impressed me quite a bit, and I'll always try to go back and search the racks for a cheap find anytime I'm back in the neighborhood.  I've seen other CD-Game Exchange locations around Portland, and a long time ago I stopped into the Hawthorne location but failed to find the specific discs I was looking for. I think this location on Mississippi is similar in that you probably shouldn't go looking for one specific disc, artist, or game - this is no Everyday Music or Music Millennium.  But if you're just browsing, it's definitely worth checking them out because they do have a pretty decent selection of used CDs, at really reasonable prices. They have a decent selection of discs priced in the $1-5 range, and more priced a few bucks higher. And the bargain priced discs aren't all from bands of which you've never heard or never want to hear.I managed to score a copy of "Honey, I'm Homely" by the Dance Hall Crashers for only $1[!] and it plays just fine.  I'm not really a gamer these days, so I didn't look at their selection or pricing of video games, but if it's anything like their CD inventory it's worth checking out.  They have a fair return/buy-back policy which diminishes a little each day you have the CD or game, so if you have a little buyer's remorse you're not completely out of luck.  As I say, it's not the best place to go searching for that one special CD, but they have enough stuff for you to browse and likely find something you want at very reasonable prices.
I used Jack from Building Knowledge recently for a potential home purchase in Atlanta and was very impressed. Jack was on time, friendly and knowledgeable, and very thorough. Their final report, which I received in less that 24 hours, was methodical, detailed, accompanied by pictures to make it easier to understand, and encouraged me to call them for any follow up questions. Overall a two thumbs up!
Great place with very friendly and professional staff. Prices are very reasonable despite being located in an airport. Food is high quality and delicious. This is the best spot to pass some time in Terminal A.
I think I would go to see just about anybody perform at The Tabernacle.  It's just that great of a music venue.  Small and intimate, yet big enough to attract big acts.  I've seen a lot of shows here including: Guster, John Mayer, Tenacious D, Moby, Ben Folds Five, Ben Folds, Counting Crows, and The Black Crowes.  Standing on the ground floor for a concert is ok... but it's just like any other General Admission venue... you have to keep your ground or else you will probably be pushed to the side or rear of the venue.  The upper balcony is ok (at least you get to sit down) but can be a little nerve wracking because it feels as though you're going to fall off of the balcony at any time.  My favorite place to sit is in the middle section of the first balcony... and they can be hard seats to get, but if you're like me and you really like a band, you will get there early enough and rush up the stairs just to get good seats!
I've been for brunch a few times, but I'm sort of meh about brunch. Just don't really eat pancakes and all that stuff, and they do a nice job with two eggs, but it's not exactly something I would get crazy enough to write a review about. Then I needed a last minute place for dinner. They never seem to be very crowded when I want to go, usually on the early side. I do love the ambiance, which is like a nice little Parisian cafe. The night I went in to meet two other people, I was early, and sat at our table watching the sun slant into this lovely gem of a room. Very nice vibe....  They had 6 rose wines on the blackboard, from France and Spain as well as the US. I ordered a flight of rose for $15, and expected those dinky little two ounce shot glass kind of things. Imagine my surprise when I got fairly reasonable pours of all three. My friends came, and we proceeded to enjoy an amazing meal. We had the watermelon and tomato salad, the kale and brussels salad for apps. For dinner we black pearl salmon, the vegetable entree (that night it had cauliflower and chickpeas, and a slightly middle eastern flavor), and the rigatoni. The latter was mine, and I have to say,  it was gorgeous, with the perfect ratios and flavoring. I took leftovers home and ate them the next day for lunch, and it was just as good.   Then, I dreamed about it two nights later.  No really----I dreamed about a pasta dish I had in a restaurant. I had to go back.   When I went back, I tried the Saint M reisling, which was spectacular. I've been looking for a reisling that is very dry but still has the flavor, that floral, fruity thing I associate with the wine. I was with another diner, and she had the rigatoni while I had the risotto. These change fairly often---mine was with snap peas and other green summer vegetables. Risotto is always too rich for me, but here again, I brought it home and it made a great lunch.  LAter I discovered you can order a half serving of risotto or the rigatoni, which evidently has been on the menu for like 20 years.   Unlike several other reviewers, I've found the service to be attentive and informed, especially about wine.  The servers also have personalities, so it's like talking to real people, not automated servant bots. Prices are, to me, very reasonable for the quality of food. I like that I can get in without making a reservation a week in advance, like some other spots on Tremont. I'll definitely be back at this excellent neighborhood cafe.
Back again to dine in this great restaurant. Enjoying some happy hour glasses of Conundrum wine with a large mixed app platter served with the airy lavas and the fried liver. Then on to the mixed grill with extra rice. So good!! You can't forget the "Sutlac" A rich and creamy rice pudding served chilled topped with pistachio crumbles. Last but not least. The Turkish Tea. Wonderful. We've eaten here many times. Servers that have made our experience worth another visit are Burak , Enes and Tolga. Thank you all for the humble dining experiences.
The people who work here have been very friendly and helpful both times that I have gone. I bought a light bulb for a heating lamp that stopped working after a week and they gave me a new one for free. All the animals look especially happy and have adequate space. It is a little pricey but a great store.
I love their greek chicken salads.  I've had a tuna sub from here once that I wasn't impressed with.  But the salads are really good and the feta is really fresh.  The pizza is typical greek pizza- not my favorite.  Its a little pricey- but it has to be considering the location.  If you live in the neighborhood I would definitely pick it up for an easy dinner, and if you work in the neighborhood it makes a great lunch!
I have no idea how this hotel has 3 stars, I have stayed twice during busy season and it has been great. The entire hotel from the lobby to the rooms is flat out elegant. The staff is friendly and the rooms are very clean. The view is spectacular unless it is a foggy day.
Great place for drinks and appetizers late night.  Good bar menu and friendly bar tender.  The spicy pork nachos were awesome.   Only odd thing is the smell when you come in. Not sure if it cleaning product or something else.... Yikes!     Will be back hopefully after they clean/switch cleaners.
Hidden Gem on Buford highway. I had Hugh who was not only talented but had an eye for which hairstyle matched me personally. Really took his time and paid attention to detail. I will pay any price for effort and quality and walked out of there paying the cheapest I've ever paid for a cut in Atlanta. Check them out!
I visited the Portland Clinic to diagnose and ultimately repair a problem with my ankle. The orthopedists were caring and responsive.
I'm updating to make clear that I used the Heat Busters in Dallas, TX. I lived there at the time.
I have been coming here since it opened and the pizza is always amazing. It's pretty much my favorite in Austin and I love the chill south Congress vibe. I'd give it 10 stars if I could!!
We have purchased several pieces of top notch quality furniture from Red Snapper and have been beyond pleased. the prices are great. Michael and Jake are extremely knowledgeable and go out of the way to help you find the piece that you are looking for. Definitely our first stop when searching for mid century furniture pieces!
I haven't made it to a yoga class, yet, but I did do the Yoga Therapy. I'm really glad I went. I also managed to break the reservation system, which led to a hiccup, and the management were incredibly helpful and went out of their way to make it right. So, I feel quite good about going here in the future.
This place is amazing. With an appetizer, one of their pizzas should be enough for two people, so you really can't beat the price. Spectacular location right in the middle of the North End, and they give you a bottle of balsamic glaze! I've only ever had the margherita pizza and the baked ricotta, but they're both good enough that I keep coming back.
Longing for some Filipino foods, visited this place and oh yeah, was not disappointed. Ordered, paid, ate and loved it!!! :D
Located in a not-so-inviting Smyrna retail strip, Siam Square is definitely much more charming on the inside. Take the chance - GO IN!  My husband and I live around the corner, so we have been here a time or two - or 20.  This is our go-to Thai restaurant in the area.  Appetizers: Chicken Satay - Delicious! OR, go for the combination plate... I haven't been disappointed by an appetizer yet.  Entree: My favorite dishes are the Massaman Curry (of course) and the Spicy Basil Leaves.  The full size dishes are large enough to share or to take home as leftovers - I admit that I have eaten the full dish from time to time.    Sides and such: I absolutely love the cucumber salad and I can't get enough of the cucumber water.  They offer a fried banana dessert that is absolutely amazing.  Atmosphere: Low lighting, booths and tables, huge print of the actual Siam Square, cherry blossom branches in vases, nice Thai dishware with a glass or two from IKEA :)  Deals: You can frequently find Scout Mob and other local deals here, but the food is worth the full price if you can't find a deal (avg $12 - $15 entrees).
Went here on my trip to Atlanta. The food is absolutely delicious as well as it makes a lovely date night spot.
FANTASTIC FOOD & SERVICE!  I would go here once a week if I could.  I love the atmosphere and the food so so much.  Have tried tons of stuff on the menu and I love it all.  Always fabulous service.  Had to wait for a long time once with a big group even though we had made a reservation and the hostess felt bad and bought all our drinks for us and 5 appetizers to share!  Everything on the menu is great and inventive.
Misty is one of the area's best craft bartenders, no doubt. Beyond that all-important detail? Despite liking and missing the previous incarnation, I really like this new Green Street. The atmosphere is comfortable and upscale at the same time, and you get a sense of cohesiveness and camaraderie from the staff. The menu's short and sweet and rarely disappointing. And the brownie sundae? Goes quite well with a Toronto. Mmm.
Best food! Cheap, quick, local!!! Natick has a jem! You never see great places like this anymore a true classic. Everything is so high tech and cloned these days....not casey's this place is one of a kind.
Don't expect anything fancy.  You will smell like the grill, drink out of a can, and maybe even use paper plates.  But who cares!  The food is great and is prepared by super friendly owner.  It is a small time operation, so like the other review noted, finding her open may be a challenge.  Just call ahead, or if you are in Oregon City, (the real OC) you will smell the sweet smoke of yummy.
I came here with a friend and his godparents, who are very fond of this place.  The decor is sleek with dark wood and white table linens.  The noise level is deafening which I found challenging since the godparents were get along in their years.  The portions were small but the food was excellent.  I had the Boston Bibb Salad with Grilled Marinated Shrimp, Lemongrass, Tangerines, Almonds, Creamy Lime Vinaigrette.  I didn't think it was very remarkable but still, quite tasty.  As an entree I had the Grilled Mahi Mahi with Baby Bok Choy, Finnan Haddie Sauce and I think the spinach.  It lacked flavor and had no real kick but maybe that's because I'm into ethnic, exotic foods.  The wine was delicious.  The only thing I really remember is the dessert which was a creme brulee.  It's really difficult to mess that up.  It was perfection.  The top was so crisp with a very satisfying crack when my spoon dug in.
Although their space may be small (6 stools inside and two patio tables outside), their coffee is definitely big. Any coffee shop serving exclusively Roseline coffee knows what they're doing. From their basic drip to their carefully crafted specialty coffee drinks, Never hits the mark every time.
I like clarklewis. I have specific reasons why, so I will add them here.  Happy hour:  This is when I go. I have never been for lunch or dinner, though lunch I might do. The spaghetti with pesto was so perfect. It was a marriage of summer, butter, and cheese in my mouth.  I followed that with a ham and fontina sandwich, mostly because I was at clarklewis and their cooking technique never disappoints me. So, yes. I got a perfectly toasted sandwich that was not overwhelmed by any element and included a hot, grainy mustard.  Last was the ice cream cup, an amazing vanilla flavor drizzled with raspberry puree. It was nestled in the thinnest crepe of a cup, also tasty.  Bonus: a gin and lime gimlet made with syrup. It was so good I had two.
What a relief to have a great meal in an airport. The Salmon hot pot was excellent. Can't wait to return!
I have been here twice: once for a la cart and once for AYCE.  Both times, I found good value.  For the a la cart, I had a teriyaki dish, and they made adjustments to my taste with no issue.  The food was well done, and there was a lot for the price!   When I returned for AYCE, I felt there was a really good selection.  The food tasted good, and the service was good.  I would definitely go bad.  To top it off, it accepts Lyoness, so I got cash back with my meal! Bonus!
We came in on a Friday in the early afternoon. It was very busy but we were surprised to be seated immediately. The service is decent, the waitresses are friendly but don't pay much attention to the customers. But what they lack in service they make up in flavor! I ordered a 2 egg Benedict on regular English muffin with mushroom and white cheddar cheese and split with my friend who ordered hers with ham and the hollandaise sauce.  The eggs were a tad over poached for my liking; the yolk was barely runny. But as a whole the dish worked perfectly. The muffin was toasted to crunchy perfection and the mushrooms provided a lovely bed for the egg, topped with sharp white cheddar. But, by far the best dish we ordered was the lemon truffle hash! The truffle oil flavored the potatoes magically with just a hint of the lemon.   I would definitely recommend this restaurant to anyone in the mood for a nice brunch. Try to go during an off hour or weekday to avoid a crowd.
Nice day spa with a variety of options and from my experience a lack of a hard sell on any products.  Very pleasant people who work there and they provide great service (bonus - they said I have great skin!).
This place is great! The service is amazing. I was able to meet the chef who made the best Jerk Chicken wrap with mango salsa....BOMB!! I bought one for my husband (to go)...he loved it as well. They also have tasty cupcakes. Try the pumpkin cupcake...so goooood. Seriously. Im glad I found this gem.
So happy to update my last review for Steel... I was contacted by Chuck, the owner of Steel, after seeing my comments following a visit with a college pal. (You might peruse that previous review first for context.)  We had a lengthy phone conversation, specifically about White Tuna - which is an endangered species and, as you'll read in my previous review, was an offending dish during our visit. Chuck invited me back for an on-the-house meal, and I got to spend time with an incredibly dedicated restaurant owner who is committed to this city and excellence in foodieism. (On the day I visited, he had accepted the award from Creative Loafing for the city's best sushi.)  The Lobster Roll, which is one I had during my return visit, is a must. We had a smattering of other tasty nibbles, including the spicy tuna (great) - but the lobster roll was most certainly the stand-out.  Chuck also connected me with a source in New Orleans to interview for a blog post. So, not only was I re-enchanted with a local restaurant I had previously loved - I made a new friend in the process. Support this joint, because Steel opened and survived during the 2008 downturn and is still one of the nicest eating environments in midtown.
My boyfriend and I went here for our anniversary dinner. We recently moved to Austin from California and found this place highly regarded by his co-workers. First of all, we went on a Tuesday- so there was NO wait which was fantastic. Our server's name was Bailey, I believe, and he was really attentive. The atmosphere of this cute little restaurant is in itself, enjoyable. I had the bacon-wrapped filet special with asparagus and roasted red potatoes. I LOVED the portion size; I'm pretty small and I always struggle finishing the food on my plate. It was such a phenomenal meal. And, to top it off, the Manager came over to our table and talked to us and once he found out is was our anniversary, he gave us a FREE creme brulee dessert. We had such an awesome time here, the service is quick, the employees are polite and friendly, and the food is amazing. I reccomend this place to anyone who wants a great dining experience. Customer service was exceptional, well done.
My boyfriend and I live about a mile away from the mad italian. It's a curse and a blessing because of how often we go. We always start off with the wings, usually getting half lemon pepper (my favorite) and half sweet and sour. Seriously, the best wings around here. The lemon pepper is always so super crispy with a good amount and seasoning and the sweet and spicy are just spicy enough. The philly's here are ahhhmaazing. But so is EVERYTHING. We've have gotten everything from alfredo to salads and everything is fresh, and super delicious.
Best yellow curry I've tasted.  I'm not an expert on Thai cuisine, but I've been going to Titaya's for years.  Now that they have re-opened after their re-model, the place is definitely nicer on the inside as well.  Great food.
I'd heard great things about Sanborn's... that it could possibly be the best breakfast in Portland. It was very good, we'll be back, but there were small details that robbed this place of 5 stars. If they had half stars, I would have given this a 4.5 stars. First the good: The eggs were cooked perfectly, almost too perfectly. The bacon was absolutely 5 stars out of 5. The service was another 5 stars, absolutely great. The 4 homemade jams they served to us were out of this world. Coffee, very good. My husband got the biscuits, which were very good, maybe a little on the dense side, but good none-the-less. His corned beef hash and poached eggs, most excellent. My only complaints were the starches. The potatoes were a little soggy and greasy and the toast was stale. All in all, a great place for breakfast.
Wonderful meal and atmosphere.  The outside is so different from what we discovered inside. The prices were unbelievable.  Had a carnitas wet burrito and there must have been half pound of meat that was well seasoned.  The guacamole was fresh and delish. What a hidden treasure!
So happy that Yelp brought me to this treasure since it was nothing short to what we were hoping for. Quality, local, affordable, authentic. We ordered our food to-go so I cannot comment on the whole experience of Sofrito but what I can tell you is that the food is outstanding, the prices are way more than reasonable and in Orlando? Is that even possible?   You order at the counter, take a number and wait as patiently as you can for the deliciousness to be brought to you. The staff is friendly, helpful, and our food came quickly. The atmosphere seemed inviting and warm, even with board games!, so I wish that we had been able to stay. This is a perfect restaurant to stay awhile and chat or to get in and out if you are in a time crunch.   And as for the food, I don't think you can wrong with whatever you choose. I had the Media Noche sandwich, a Cuban with ham, pork, swiss cheese, pickles and mustard. Melt in your mouth scrumptious and overall fantastic flavor. I couldn't get enough. The mustard is pretty strong so be mindful if this isn't your thing. Unfortunately I didn't get to try the other dishes, but our party also ordered empanadas which received only positive feedback and the Polla A La Brasa (White), chicken with herbs. The entrees are served with three (small) sides and a (small) salad. We went with yellow rice, yucca fries and toasted plantains which were all excellent choices and I'm glad that we divvied them up so the three of us could all try. Loved the sauces that were served alongside, they were versatile enough to go with just about anything...so tasty! Wish I could have tried the empanadas and chicken, they both looked and smelled fantastic.  I'm bummed that I didn't get a chance to try the flan or Cuban-style espresso...so don't short yourself out...make sure to indulge in one of the delicious-looking desserts. If you go to Orlando and don't stop at Sofrito, all I can say is that you will miss out.
I was so happy to hear about this place after my new iPhone took a nose dive off the hood of my boyfriend's truck.  The screen was shattered and I actually considered filing an insurance claim (through AT&T iPhone insurance) to get a new phone.  I ended up taking my phone here and for half the price of what my deductible would have been for a new phone, they replaced the glass screen for me and helped me pick out an Otter Box since I obviously am a little clumsy with my phone.  The guy at the front was very polite and helpful and got my repairs done in about an hour!  I hope I don't need to use them again, but if my poor phone has another accident I will be sure and bring it here!
I LOVE this place. I usually find parking around Allston pretty easily on the streets or in the lot behind the liquor store. It's much more convenient for me than trekking to Chinatown or Dorchester for pho, and there are so many tables, I've never had to wait in line.  Their portions are quite generous and for under $10, you get a pretty tasty meal. For the pho, I always ask to get my eyeround beef raw on a separate plate rather than in the soup so that I can cook it myself, and it's awesome. I've done this over 20 times and have never gotten sick, so I do trust their meat.   Their bun (vermicelli) dish is my favorite and I love the ones with meat and crispy rolls. There's lots of veggies on it and I devour the whole dish soaked with fish sauce.   Their pork chops and catfish are both very good as well. The only bummer is that over the years, it seems they've started to skimp on the shrimp and pork spring rolls which I used to love. Since the portions are so big, I've stopped getting appetizers, although the shrimp toast and the quail were both tasty when I used to get them.  The shakes take a while and aren't better than nearby competitors, so I usually stick with the coconut juice which they put baby coconut in.  I generally go every few months and during the winter, maybe every few weeks. (On a side note, after visiting Vietnam and having pho there, I actually enjoy the pho here better for the flavor and generous toppings.) Don't expect it to be mindblowing. I just really enjoy how consistent, simple, and good it always is.
Tonight, we had the most pleasant meal I've ever had. Good pizza. Great Bowie. Queen. The Cure. Great drink selection.  We ate the brattle. Highly recommended from us. Tonight was a quiet, cold Thursday night, and we loved the low key ambiance. People seemed to be loving the soup. Great for a cold winter evening. The guys were pretty funky and cool, too. Bit of advice: follow the vibe. If it's quiet, be easy. If it's lively, go with it. And be happy!
I booked my hair appointment here with Annelise last weekend, where I chopped off my long hair for a bob. Annelise is an easygoing girl and I found it easy to talk to her throughout my time in the chair.   She showed great attention to detail during the cut and was diligent in explaining what she was doing and the products she was using. At no point in time did she ever try to push a product too hard on me which I appreciated. I did end up getting this amazing smelling sea salt hair spray though!   I would return for future cuts, and am considering doing a balayage/ombre session with her.
My sister has gone to Smiles on Sandy for at least thirty years and referred me to Dr. Daby for a consultation on possibly a full set of upper dentures. Every dentist that I have gone too has treated me in a sub-human way because, unfortunately I was not blessed with the greatest of teeth, and was treated as if I didn't care about them so they didn't care what they did to them.  This is THE place to go to be treated with kindness, compassion, non- judgment and complete professionalism.  Dr. Daby did not do what every other Dentist has done to me like just saying "your teeth and gums are beyond repair so when you are ready I'll pull them all out for you when you get dentures." Instead, he did a through exam and found teeth that could stay and recommended a partial.  All the preparation before getting the actual partial was completely painless and all of his staff were so kind and considerate. Not "condescendingly kind," but "truly" kind.  When the day came for the actual "pulling" of my teeth (I only lost six!) I was very nervous and anxious. My sister came with me to hold my hand and support me through it and it went very well, after it was all finished and I saw myself in the mirror it made me cry. All of my worst fears were for not and I am SO happy with the results.  Thank you Dr. Daby and all the staff at Smiles on Sandy I am grinning from ear to ear again!
One of the best veggie burgers I've ever eaten. The poutine with mushroom miso gravy is out of this world. And the IPA and chocolate stouts my party ordered were both delicious.
Treated my little pup perfectly.  Excellent service both in person and on the phone.  I'll be back with Bruschi!!
Wake up and smell the coffee! SF coffee is my favorite neighborhood coffee shop! I love how walkable/ bikeable this place is to my house. I usually stop here on my way to work grabbing my usual Iced Latte with a 7-grain bagel or a bacon egg cheese bagel sandwich.   This is seriously some of the best coffee that you'll find in the Highlands. You'll get freshly roasted coffee from Peru, Antigua and many other international special blends. All of their food is made to order, made with local ingredients and made in house. The egg and cheese bagel with bacon, ham and cheese croissant, blueberry cream muffin are among my favorite eats.  The shop is very quaint and cozy. There is a usually a great mix of people working on their computers, people catching up with old friends, and impersonal business meetings. It's definitely quiet enough in there to get work done or study, if needed.  Everyone that works here is super friendly, including Leo, Caitlin and Mariana, who are always so full of great energy and optimism in the mornings. I never feel rushed to order (I'm super indecisive) or made to feel like an inconvenience. It gets pretty crowded in here during the mornings, which is typical for a coffee shop, so get there early if you're on a time crunch.
This place was a pleasant surprise. First I didn't realize that there was a Marketplace on Krog street. If you're in the area it's worth giving it a try. There are lots of food and other specialty shops! I stopped here because the food looked delicious!  You can watch them prepare it, and once I dug into my laffa I realize this was a good choice. The ingredients were fresh, and the laffa was very filling. I tried the Salatim, which was full of vegetables. I also added beef. The portions were generous, but I ended up paying about 6 extra dollars for the meat for a total of $16. I will definitely come back and try other dishes.
Simply put - Blake is amazing!  He is super busy but always manages to squeeze me in.  I run my own business so its difficult to take the time out of my day to get my hair done.  Blake has actually stopped by my store to remind me when I need to get a cut.  Not only is he considerate about my scheduling needs but he's fantastic at washing/cutting/styling my hair.  I just had him do my hair the day of an event and I got so many compliments all night long and they continued throughout the weekend.  I'm so happy I found him - I highly recommend!
This is the third hospital my father was transferred to after he fell very ill almost two weeks ago.  The best one by far.  My mom, my brother, or I have been staying in the room 24 hours a day, got to see many nurses, doctors, assistants, housekeeping staff, meal delivery people.  Every single person is polite, friendly, caring.  Not only do they act unhurried, willing to take their time and answer questions, gentle and patient with my dad, while constantly apologizing to him for disturbing him even as he sleeps through most of the visits, we, the family members, are asked if there is anything that we need by almost every person who walks into the room.  Our requests are met with nods and smiles.  Our 7th floor room is clean, large, with a huge window that offers us a view of Downtown and the Capitol, plus great sunsets.  In my sleep-deprived state I find myself routinely referring to it as a hotel rather than hospital room.  Food is surprisingly decent, some offerings I've tried were restaurant quality, for sure.  Even the security guards were pleasant and polite when I left the building after hours and realized I had to go through metal detectors and bag search on my way back into the building.  Considering very trying circumstances that brought us to this hospital, we feel like everyone had tried to make sure we were as comfortable as possible the week we had spent there so far.
Holy Cow! This place got a major facelift recently and it is sooooo much better! The food, the atmosphere, the staff and management, I enjoyed it all so much on my first time coming back to Anna Bannanas after a hiatus.   You gotta try Robin's Tomato Basil soup. It is LITERALLY the best tomato soup I've had ever! They add chunks of avocado to it for a really special extra touch. It really is so tasty! Jamie, the barista, is very helpful, patient and super friendly! I felt right at home, especially once I had the Tomato Basil soup on a rainy day. I've read other reviews about their less than cared for atmosphere, but with the new management in charge, it's super comfortable and a lot cleaner than the past years.   This place will definitely be one of my regular neighborhood spots, especially if the soup is on the menu for the day! Can't wait to see what the new management has in store for Anna Bannanas for the future!
Nice place inside beer is good got some good waitresses, food is like so so but the waitress i had, i believe her name was Cristina very pretty, nice smile and very nice. Great memory when it comes to wht i ordered so didn't have to repeat my self for round 2. Bowling and pool tables on the pricy side but not bad. Management has really sunk this place compared to what it used to be. Always running out of stuff ,so have to always check to see what they do have. As long as they have good waitresses like cristina ill always come back.
Its hard not to admit that the sandwiches here are really good.  Each inspired by a popular restaurant around boston, the sanwiches at Parish are pretty delicious and original.  The drinks are pretty yummy as well (also strong).  BUT the prices are pretty high.  Try it out once at least, but there are other good sandwich places for much more reasonable prices.
This is my all time favorite place to eat , ever!  Everything is Vegan,  and so wonderfully delicious.  The Pho is my fave and I have to order it every time I go there.  The vegetable and spring rolls are awesome as well. It is ran by Buddhist Nuns who are just wonderful.  The language barrier proves to be comical at times.  Can't overstate how wonderful this place is
Loved this place! I was in Colorado on vacation from Chicago and my friend found this place online. There was a bit of a wait, but it was soooo worth it. I had the Cajun omelette and it was awesome. The potatoes were perfect. The biscuits were some of the best I ever had. I would definitely come back here if I'm ever in Colorado.
I just also wanted to comment on Thao--she does a GREAT JOB with both cut and color.  When I first went to her, I had gotten a really unflattering haircut from another salon in the neighborhood and she was able to really improve it, not to mention give me some great highlights.  Later that day I got a lot of compliments on my hair (since it looked so much better than it did before with the previous haircut).  I've been going to Thao since!  I highly recommend her.  Plus she's very upbeat and a hoot to talk to.
I went here for A casual drink and convo! Listen..the mojitos are pretty good with the cane sugar stick in it.
Good happy hour, and good fish and pork tacos. They are a little pricey if you don't hit happy hour, but still, it's good food. Service has never been bad. I'll go maybe twice a year.
Decided to head over to Chen's after we walked into Asia cafe and the place was packed.  I ordered the Curry Rib soup and it was awesome! Spicy but not too spicy, had some excellent bok-choy and tomatoes. The rib meat was so tender and the noodles were nice and chewy.  We also had the steamed dumplings which were excellent as well. Nice dough and tasty insides.  Can't wait to come back and try it again. They were out of the combination soup which was my first choice.
I hired Kelley Tree Services to remove an enormous Maple Tree from my back yard. Their outstanding professionalism and expertise resulted in a safe and effective removal of an unhealthy tree from a very tight space using their crane. I would highly recommend using Kelley Tree Services and feel extremely comfortable recommending them to friends and family.
I went to the Weymouth location yesterday using a Groupon deal.  Beautiful salon, great staff, and my Stylist, Meredith, was fabulous  Definitely would recommend!
Best burritos around town! Excellent customer service... try to eat here whenever I am in town.
My opinion on this restaurant a little while back was definitely swayed by the service but I have to say that after coming back today, it was definitely better. My server Vanessa was on it and attentive. The menu has changed but she definitely knows her stuff. I would recommend the restaurant and definitely the service.
Phó is something I purchase regularly from this place, and after trying a few places around town, this place has the best I've tasted in Vancouver. Friendly and fast service to help with my lunch break stop and go!
My experience with Thierry Chocolaterie Patisserie Cafe was luxury.  I had this feeling when I go into Holt Renfew shopping lol.  I would go back in a beat.  The exotic desserts are exceptional.  Every bite is a goodness like spoiling yourself with no excuses need it.  Allowing yourself to indulge the richness through your taste bugs from a tiny bite of the dark chocolate and a sip of cappuccino with no sugar.. ahh heaven... there you are..
I've been coming to BURN for almost a year, ever since I've been on ClassPass. What I like most about it are the challenging workouts (they fly by) and the two passionate instructors whose classes I've had the pleasure of attending: Jonathon (the owner) and Joseph.  I've joined Jonathon for Circuit Row and Joseph for Tabata when they were still doing 630pm classes on Thursdays. I think both classes are awesome! A bit nervous to try any other of the plethora they offer, but based on the 2 for 2 track record so far, I'm remiss to not try any others.  The classes are good for all levels since you can easily go at your own pace, but both Jonathon & Joseph will challenge you to work past your comfort level in a really positive demeanor. Jonathon's go to line: "You're done when I say you're done, not when you're tired."  The only set backs: the studio is a bit small (but they somehow always make the space work even with completely full classes) and they only offering personal training at 6am, so for full time city workers, there's no option for an AM workout - the earliest group class offered is 7am.
Bob (the manager) and Justin are fantastic.  They really know their stuff, there's no hard sell, they're honest and direct and the prices are so reasonable.  I originally went in with a bike I'd had for 5 years (from Craigslist!) and never really maintained.  I knew it was in rough shape and had an idea what might be wrong, but Justin looked it over thoroughly then and there was really honest about how much work/money was needed to make it safe and rideable again - key for me as I'm 4 1/2 months pregnant and bike commute to my downtown job.  When I got another bike, I brought it there right away for a tuneup and again, they did a fantastic job.  A few weeks later, I started having trouble with it - gears wouldn't change, chain seemed to be skipping, tension on the chain was getting much higher - and when it finally seized on me right in the middle of the Main/Union intersection at 7.30am, I wheeled it back to the store and knocked the door.  Bob was there early and with no hesitation, let me in and had it up on the stand right away.  He called me before 10am with the prognosis and I was able to pick up my bike and cycle home that night.  Not only did he replace the faulty part with a part that will likely last the lifetime of the bike, but he also looked the bike over for free, even checking a wheel that he replaced for me the previous time.    They are just AWESOME.  Love love love you guys - if you have a bike, this is where you need to go.  Great prices, service is outstanding and they really know their stuff.  This is a no BS bike shop fo sho.
This store is FANTASTIC. The owners are super knowledgeable and are great with making suggestions. You can actually rent games to try them out (considering how expensive games are these days this is a brilliant idea) $5 for a 3-day rental and if you decide to purchase you get the $5 credit towards your game. We have enjoyed everything we have tried so far. Not just games, but puzzles too. There is a whole room with tables set up for play and multiple groups that meet geared towards specific games. I have found that their prices aren't marked up too much from what you could get at a big box store and I would rather give my money to these wonderful locals. They participate with Supportland so rack up your points!
I went with my boyfriend and we got the saag paneer and the cholley with an order of naan. Both were very flavorful and delicious. The staff was also extremely courteous and attentive. A great experience overall!
Out of all the sushi places I've been to, I have to say they consistently had fresh fish each and every single time I've been here. The prices are fair for the amount and freshness of the fish. I find myself craving the soft and sweet salmon all the time!
This place is a favorite of mine for breakfast, esp the oyster omelette. It had been 6 years since I last visited and still delicious and just as I remembered.
Well, I eat here about 3 or 4 times a week, that must say it all! haha...I love the wrap, for it's food, for it's convenience, for the quick service. I love it all.  I'm a big fan of the buffalo chicken wrap, the bangkok, and the teriyaki. I also love getting the house salad in a wrap with feta cheese. So good. Yes, you can get any salad in a wrap for an easy on the go meal.   I do find myself still calling it the wrap, as many do, but I don't think Boloco minds. I'm sure that will eventually fade out as us loyal "wrappers" graduate. (I was actually thinking today how much I was gonna miss having the wrap in my backyard).    Don't forget to get the Boloco card. Many people don't know that they have a new card for the new company. You get a point for every dollar you spend and you get a free wrap once you accumulate 50 points (I think).  I use mine all the time and recently my roommate was like "I didn't know they had that"...and she eats there all the time too. So make sure to ask for yours!
I love this venue.  A word of caution:  if you're planning on attending a show here in warm weather, you are gonna sweat your bawls off.   This venue is intimate not only with the artists, but also with your fellow audience members; you'll know soon enough who missed his Saturday bathing routine.  Get here early so that you can score your seats of choice.  Be aware that some folks will come in later and get all uppity when you refuse to move.  I witnessed a couple of cutesy-wootsy college girls come in and try to giggle their way into seats together.  I explained to them that my arrival 45 minutes prior to the show was no accident, and I invited them to vacate my immediate surroundings, post-haste.  My fellow concertgoers cheered, and the lovely ladies departed, wide-eyed that someone could possibly have resisted their incredible charm, wit, and boobs.  Go in cool weather, get there early, and go with a friend so that your seats can be defended while one of you runs up to one of the FULL BARS with DECENTLY PRICED drinks spread throughout the venue.
I go to this place twice a week as I work so close.  I work long hours and need to get a good quality balanced meal in the middle of the day. The staff always have beaming smiles and are super polite. The food is always so fresh and healthy with fresh herbs. Love it! Now it might not be for everyone as you would have to like this type of food but for me it's hands down the best Thai food in Austin. You have to try the Thai Iced Tea it's superb!
We loved this place for brunch. It's a beautiful place and the food was delicious, with attentive service. We each got the fricassée - he got the beef beef brisket and I got the mushroom fricassée. I wasn't that hungry but I ate absolutely everything. They are both served in cast-iron frying pans so the meal stays warm as you eat it. I also got a glass of fresh-squeezed orange juice and we ordered one of the waffles to go. The wait for two of us on a weekday was about 45 minutes so we put our names on the list and walked around for a bit. It was well worth the wait.
I can't imagine why the rating for this place is so low.  The food and atmosphere are awesome for upscale fast food, which is basically what this place offers.  I got the grilled salmon topped with piri piri mushrooms, with grilled asparagus and rice on the side.  The salmon was perfectly grilled and the portion was humongous!!  The mushrooms were a nice touch too.  I would've liked more asparagus and rice with a smaller portion of salmon, but that's just me.  Overall, I felt like I had a really healthy and satisfying meal.  Also tasted the Bonehead's shrimp (under appetizers but you can order it with rice) ... battered and fried shrimp with a delicious piri piri sauce.  It was so good!  Their sweet tea is also fantastic.   I need to book my next trip to the South to try this awesome place again!
The fifth star is usually knocked off as soon as you drive by Hopdoddy and see the line is out the door. This isn't really a fault as much as a marketing success for Hopdoddy, but considering it increases the time that separates me and a juicy hot meat patty I have to consider it a negative. Also you can't really have groups come eat here, I'd consider 4 a comfortable max, otherwise your chances of getting split up increase by a lot and how are you going to explain "bros before hoes" to your wife before you ditch the bitch?  Once you finally get through customs though and place your order get ready for the best burger high of your life. I recommend the shroom burger exclusively, unless they happen to have an appetizing burger of the week.  The shroom burger comes specially with pesto, portabella mushrooms, and goat cheese layered on a brioche bun. The buns are soft and buttery, perfectly baked in house. In a bite, the bun holds the package together well until you get to the real meat of the sandwich. Thick rich meat juice runs across your tongue as your salivary glands ejaculate in excitement, swathed in the creaminess of goat cheese. The nuttiness of the pesto accentuates the patty well, and the herbiness of the garlic gives a gentle bite that makes your spine shiver in anticipation of the next bite. Last but not least, the mushrooms add a good texture for a layered mouthfeel, their mellow earthiness blends well with the meat for a further enriched taste that will have you gnashing away at your burger like a crack addict looking for that next hit. Before you know it, the crack is gone and you're left staring at your tray wondering if it really happened.   If you happened to have fasted that day and are a sweet-tooth, the milkshakes are worth the splurge. Despite the fact the nutella & pretzel shake is often poorly mixed, this just means you have a salty ball of chilled hazelnut chocolate waiting at the bottom of your shake, the proverbial pot at the end of the rainbow.  The fries are pretty good, but not a main attraction by any stretch of the imagination. Overall - if you're feeling like you make enough money to justify spending this much on a nice patty hit Hopdoddy up. If you're on a budget go to  P. TERRY's for the same quality but much cheaper.
I just witnessed epic customer service so I had to write a review of praise. I've always been a fan of Chick-fil-a because i think it's a great company and the food is always good. This time was no different. My chicken sandwich was hot and steamy and the waffle fries were hot with just the right amount of crispness. Here is what I witnessed that WAS different from most any other fast food chain. They were VERY busy and had four registers running with 10 people deep in each line. It took some time until I reached the front of the line to order but the team work I witnessed behind the counter was outstanding. The employees hustled about in perfect harmony, they greeted each customer with a smile, and thanked me after I was given my order. The general manager would occasionally come out from behind the counter to interact with customers and to ensure the lines were moving and guiding customers to each line. I am totally impressed! Great food and great service!
I had an excellent  dinner.  My friends  call me a foodie ....I love to try everything.   This night I stuck to basics, crab cakes, filet and chocolate  desert.  Every  item was great, and I shared with friends!   Sampled the mushroom  crepe also.  The service  was impeccable. ...so impeccable  that I doubled the usual gratuity , something  I  rarely  do!  I also enjoyed that the  bar was outfitted  with bar chairs and standard chairs.  Another  bonus is parking us convenient  even without  using  valet.    The view was magnificent  and comfortable  at the same time.
Stopped in here a few weeks ago knowing that I needed to get a new battery for my Civic. I went in with the hubby knowing that if I went in there myself, they would try to sell me something that I didnt need. I picked out a battery that they had in stock, and the gentleman took my old one out and installed the new one within minutes.  Very pleasant and nice. Great job guys!!!
Owner is super helpful and will greet you upon entering. He'll easily get you outta here under your budget. Asked for a malbec and white wine for gifts and he picked out both my bottles super quick. Stopped in on my way home from work and was in and out in 5 minutes and under my $30 budget. Looks like people regularly stop by to drink wine/partake in tastings.
Navarre is now one of my favorite restaurants in Portland.  I love the ordering system of checking off what you want on a piece of paper and having the option of a small plate or large plate.  Every single thing we had was really good.  The service was friendly too.
So I gotta give praise where praise is due. Jim and his team have completely turned around my impression of this Hotel. We arrived and immediately were taken to our room which had a great view of the river, city and the Fireworks. The room was amazing and once we got settled, a bottle of champagne and desserts came to our room for our anniversary. Jim took care of our room, parking and more importantly  memories of our 17 year anniversary. What a great surprise tonight has been. Jim thank you and your team for your Hospitality.  Tony
I love chocolate and frequent Chocolaterie Tessa (not sure why my reviews do not get posted).  I keep repeating this, but her salted carmels are the most delicious things I have ever placed in my mouth!! ;)  We recently were on vacation and I tried salted carmels at another chocolate store.  Holy cow...there was absolutely no comparison to Tessa's.  Seriously people...if you have not tried her chocolate, it is worth paying her a visit!  She currently has valentine hearts and other festive treats as well.
This place is really good at what they do well. The corn fritters that they serve as an appetizer are very tasty. They do a very nice job with the shrimp as well. I ordered the Royal Red fried shrimp dinner and they were just about perfect for fried shrimp, very tasty and perfectly prepared. The atmosphere is basic seafood restaurant style, nothing fancy. The place is large inside and attracts a big crowd of tourists and locals
I've been coming here since I had my little one and it's such a great shop! They have great prices on things and the staff is very friendly. I'm especially fond of the playroom that my daughter uses while I peruse the racks. It's a great little gem that has saved me a lot of money. The only thing is I wish they had more inventory! They have some cute stuff but it does tend to go fast.
Friendly service, and great coffee. The food was good, and survice was quick. I would definately reccomned this place for out of towners.
I live just down the street and so my roommates and I went here for dinner on Sunday. It was great weather to sit outside! Two of us shared the Linguine with Asparagus Cream and the Quattro Funghi pizza.  The pasta was good but nothing spectacular. It was more oily than necessary. I would have like a bit more cream sauce also.  The pizza was fantastic. Thin and crispy.  And if you're a mushroom fan this will not disappoint!  I wanna go back to check out the awesome brunch everyone is talking about.  Only one negative remark: One of the staff was refilling my roommate's water and filled it too much. It overflowed and spilled on her leg. He moved on to the next table without even saying anything... and it wasn't like he didn't see what he did. But I didn't deduct a star for this bc our server was quite friendly and cheerful.
I'll be up front about this.  I don't really see a difference between the food at this place and First Chinese BBQ or Din Ho.  It all tastes good.  What I think makes Ho Ho stand out is the nicer interior.  It'd be a place that I would want to take company and guests to for a more formal dinner.  Service is also fast and efficient.  You can also see the seafood in the tanks!  That being said, it is also farther away than either of the other 2 cantonese restaurants here in ATX.  Food was pretty good, very homely chinese feel for me.  We got:  1. BBQ sampler: duck, roast pork and bbq pork.  It was a bit cold which was kinda disappointing.  2. Crab Meat and Fish Maw Soup: Good, its been awhile since I last had this and the flavors reminded me of home.  I thought it was a bit salty, but everyone else thought it wasn't salty enough.... 3. Beef with Chinese Broccoli:Tastes good, nothing special though. 4. Scallops with Chinese Vegetables: They don't skimp of the scallops thats for sure.  Vegetables are well flavored in the sauce too. 5.  Some Crispy Shrimp dish: don't remember what its called but it was nice and crunchy, not too much taste beyond the fried though. 6. Chinese Pork Chop- really good, again something that reminds me of home.  Hard to describe the complexity of the flavors but its a must try. 7. Beef Flat Noodle- the only thing really disappointing on the menu (my favorite dish).  Not that special and defintiely better at First chinese bbq.  Larger portion here though... 8. Seafood hotpot- good, but not great.  The broth was on the weaker side, but still retained that unique hotpot flavor.  Too many veggies though.  Come try it if you're around!
friendly staff, huge assortment of curious george trinkets, shirts, toys and books, prices were reasonable
If you like traditional German food I highly recommend Schmidt's, the food is excellent and if you like it they have  a dinner buffet any sausage lover could really return for., personally I will go back for the traditional corned beef Rubin, real German potato salad and chunky apple sauce just try the deserts, (look at the strudel in the case before you order, it may not look what you think it should). The cream puffs are n experience you have to experience. A bit pricey but well worth it.
I've always been interested in the sandwiches-created-by-Boston chefs idea at this restaurant, but everytime I've tried to go it's been like a 36 hour wait, which is really frustrating. FINALLY, on an overcast Friday afternoon at 2:30, there was no wait.  I'm glad that I perserved though. The Flour BLT was an exquisite sandwich, with oven roasted tomatoes, basil pesto mayo, and great texas toast. Served with some cape cod potato chips, all I was missing was the beach.   Great place.
We went for lunch yesterday,  and it was great!  While I wasn't sure what to expect,  the prices were amazing - Super inexpensive.! We got a big fusion mix,  literally.  Had some hot and sour soup,  sushi rolls and Chinese/Thai dishes.  Great lunch for the price and nice service. I even had a ton of leftovers,  so good!  I would go back for sure.
Staff here is always super friendly. Sometimes it can get crowded because of various activities that are scheduled, but it's never too bad. Availability to a jacuzzi and sauna make this my favorite 24 in the area.
Impeccable view of the Atlanta skyline. I suggest you go at night to see all the lights. Fun 15 minute ride
We love this place.  They have a special on Wednesday's for a soda and two slices of any kind of pizza for $3.99.  You can't beat that!  It's part of our regular weekly routine.
Hands down THE best frozen custard I've ever had. The selection/flavors/combinations--superb!!!  Come on thru!! Bring your family and friends!
Max & Dylan's is one of my go to places. Menu items I recommend: Ahi Tuna salad, Mac & Cheese, Clam Chowder. Sooo good the staff is friendly and the drinks are amazing.
I've been visiting this cute as a button, family owned store for over a decade.  It is the most convenient spot for picking up little things, snacks, drink mixes and basically anything else you need off hand.  The same family has owned this place the entire time and i'm glad to support their store over any gigantic mega-corporate one.  The service you receive here is so warm and always with a smile.  Literally, everything you want in your neighbourhood store.  The selection and quality of the flowers here is amazing.  Whenever I need something just to say 'Thanks!' or a quick 'I Love You' this is my go to place.  You will see what I mean when these flowers bloom and last longer than you would expect from a place that isn't a straight florist.  They have a large freezer with a small but tight selection (pints!) of Haagen Daz ice cream.  The best part of this is that the mark up is only a couple bucks more than the grocery store around the corner.  Great for my cravings but awful for my waistline.  The shop is open until 10pm.
This venue was so beautiful!! I coordinated a wedding there tonight and it was perfect for the bride and groom! Bride changed her mind about a few of the tables and all I had to do was talk to Paul and voila. They switched out the tables in minutes! Many of the guests came up to me to tell me how beautiful and spacious it was. Crew was awesome and so helpful from start to finish. Very professional and the turnaround for a response in communication is so fast! Love the farm tables, the lights, the backdrop, the curtains, the floors, the bridal suites... I could go on and on! The most important part was that the bride and groom were so happy! This is a definite must for a wedding and can't wait to coordinate another wedding at Ambient Plus Studios!!
Shout out to Homeslice last night! I ordered a Margherita pizza for pickup. I swung through to pick it up, paid, and then the hostess accidentally dropped the box. It wasn't a big deal, I didn't make a fuss at all because I know sh*t happens in the food industry, but everybody was so apologetic. They started a new one and gave me and my boyfriend free beers while we waited. The manager was so sweet to us, she voided our check and brought the fresh pizza out to us herself (and a cookie!).   Homeslice is my regular. I live down the street, so I always pop in for a slice or get a whole pizza to go. They are my favorite pizza joint in Austin, hands down, and I am so happy to see my loyalty pay off! Excellent customer service last night - thank you Homeslice for being such great homies! :D
Thia is a pretty neat ride. It is the first thing you see when you come into Epcot Center. It is inside the iconic giant sphere this park os known for the world over. It is a journey through time that begins in Prehistoric times all the way to the present. At least the present at the time this ride was constructed.  It is dated and there is nothing thrilling about. It is more nostalgic than anything else.   As you go up through the different scenarios and reach the top. A projection of planet earth marks the end of the ride. Although this is merely one half of the sphere. You are prompted to play a game in your screen to pass the time on the way down. It feels like they left all that space intentionally empty to add more to the ride with the passage of time, but they never did. It s a cute game. You can see the picture taken while in the ride on your way out. You can even get it emailed to you.  It is an incredibly dated ride, but a staple. A must when you visit Epcot.
Look, I love Nothing Bundt Cakes.  It's yummy, it's moist and who DOESN'T love a good bundt?!  I've had lots of their flavors (as you can tell by my food baby on certain days), and my favorite is the chocolate chocolate chip.   Because the cakes are so sweet, as is the icing, I highly suggest sticking with the mini bundts.   Anyway - enjoy!
As a former Minnesotan, Jamba Juice was a personal part of my story.  Before going for our token Lake Calhoun or Lake Harriet walks, Sonni and I would stop at Jamba Juice and get a Razzamataz Smoothie with an energy boost.  Wow do I remember those days.  So, when I saw a Jamba Juice at the Hartsfield Airport, I was like wow, but then I said wait...  I called Sonni.  "Sonni, quick question, is Jamba Juice as good as it used to be?."  She replied, "Duh, of course".  That was all I needed.  My smoothie was 30 minutes of pure bliss.  Pure orgasmic bliss on my palate.  Thank you Jamba Juice.  A special call out to the two staff members.  They were hilarious.  Their banter while my smoothie was being prepared was priceless and make the wait so worthwhile.  Kudos once again to Jamba Juice.
The beef!  I am dropping five stars on this place simply because of the beef (and late hours).  Their roast beef is nice and tender and comes on a crisp and delicious onion roll if you order the big one.  You should go order one right now, as a matter of fact.  Also, everything tends to close pretty early in Massachusetts.  Except for Simard's.  They will feed you into the wee hours of the morning.
I love this Salon! The owner is always on top of everything and very customer oriented. They are very accommodating to get you in for the services you are looking for. Recently had the eyelash extensions - FANTASTIC LOOKING. Very natural but added much needed fullness and length. Try this salon- I'm sure you will be very happy.
I didn't have time to get my roots colored before heading out of town, and also promised my daughter I would fix a color block she had in hers so I needed two appointments last minute.  I relied on yelp to help me find a salon nearby.  Found one that wanted to charge $70 as a starting point for roots and $70 to put about 4 foils of lowlights in my daughter's hair which seemed really expensive to me.  Luckily I called master image salon as it had more reviews and was just as close.  Soooooo glad I did. They accommodated us on a busy Saturday, facilities were beautiful, stylists were super friendly and down to earth (you'll feel comfortable walking in in flip flops or heels) and their prices were far more wallet friendly.  The hair washing station was awesome, my daughter's lowlights turned out great and my pesky gray was completely covered.  Everyone seemed very talented from what we could see.  Really enjoyed our experience here.
By far my favorite KBBQ in Oregon. The kimchi is always pickled to perfection. I've eaten a lot of kimchi in my life so trust me when I say this place has the best. The portions sizes are huge when grilling. The staff is friendly, the place is clean. I usually try and go when it's not busy, cause this place can get very loud. I just wish it wasn't so far away from me.   Items must try would be:  Bossam Kimchi stew Thick cut pork belly Kimchi pancake And always peach soju
As a former resident of Wellesley who lived there until 1989, one of my cravings every time I come home is the Greek style hamburger and onion pizza. The hamburger is ground up and the taste is so unique. Had the pizza again today and LOVE it. In a Wellesley that has very much changed, Nicks has not and I love them for that. If you are looking for a $50 designer pizza go elsewhere. If you want a real traditional style Greek pizza Nicks is the place
I ate here recently for lunch and really enjoyed my meal.  I had a Quinoa salad and it was phenomenal.  Real nice bartender.  Great meal.
Here's the deal.  I've never been anywhere NEAR Greece.  I didn't even know how to pronounce gyro until I asked the owner, who is a very nice and approachable woman (like another user mentioned (I wanted to confirm), it's "yiro.").  All I know is that I tried the lamb gyro and it was very tasty.  It was a bit small for the price ($9 with some greens that I ended up stuffing into it because it looked bare otherwise).  However, the owner (I think it was her) was super nice and out of nowhere walked up to me and the other gentleman who was there working on his laptop and handed us some "bagnye" or something like that.  Basically it was deep-fried sweet balls over honey drizzle, sprinkled with cinnamon.  These were really good.  Granted, I love honey and cinnamon; I could DRINK this mixture all day.  The consistency was just right.  I guess I got on her good side by complimenting the dessert so much that a few minutes later she walked out with another serving.  At this point I hadn't even touched my gyro but soon found myself well on my way to devouring the 2nd complimentary plate of bagnyes.    The bread on the gyro was spongy and the meat was flavorful and tender.  I've been to other places where the bread is extremely tough and elastic, and it doesn't matter how good the insides are because I end up just spilling my meal all over the place.  This was not the case here.  The food came out quickly and it was nice and hot.  Overall it was a good experience.  Will return periodically.
Simple this is my favorite seafood restaurant. After going to legal for years Finz has made me switch
My dear Yeeps, I'm going to let you in on a closely guarded and rather intimate secret of mine. Sometimes, when no one's looking, when the shadows fall just so, and when most heads are turned..   .. sometimes I dress like an actual human female.   Beyond that, I occasionally do unheard of, taboo things like accessorize and wear shoes that don't have thick rubber soles or steel shanks. However, the majority of my available funds after the monthly necessities like rent, food, booze, and hair dye are spent in the pursuit of mountain summits. Sometimes that means money for summit beers or seeking that elusive small town post-climb vegan meal.   This creates quite a conundrum for your humble reviewer. The infrequent desire to appear what some might call "attractive" (or "showered" or "not in tattered jeans"), but very little money with which to accomplish such lofty goals. Enter: Ether. I only noticed this place when someone pointed it out to me on a bike ride. I was instantly in love since their front-of-store display included my three guiltiest pleasures in the world: scarves, hats, and tall boots.   My initial (and only, thus far) visit revealed a whole new time and money-sink for me. Scarves, large earrings, an impressive array of boots (most of which I l love, all of which are non-leather), a small but cute selection of clothing, large wooden bangles.. pretty much everything I love to wear condensed into one modest store (minus the overly shiny rings and pendants), and priced so that even your average gear-hording mountaineer can afford to retire her current pair of boots with the half-detached left sole.   To top it off, the store is staffed by some of the most helpful, cheerful, but unobtrusive and non-pushy employees ever.   As others have said, the quality isn't top-notch, but since my episodes of masquerading as an actual female are few and far between - it's good enough for me!
This experience was fantastic. Blue is an incredible server. We had a blast. The Southern burger double patties was absolutely perfect! Try this place out and get Blue. It's worth it.
Kelly is a sweetheart ... Accommodating, professional, quick & efficient. Who could ask for more?
Great Italian food!  Had a reservation for dinner with the boyfriend.  When we showed up, Daniela, the hostess and owner, greeted us and let us know that the party at our table was still lingering so while we waited, she offered us each a complimentary glass of  wine.  We weren't in a hurry so not a bad way to start.  After being seated, we scanned the menu and the bf decided we should try the chef's tasting, which I believe was around $70-75 pp.  The server let us know that it takes about 2-2.5 hrs as they time the courses giving the diner about 30 mins per course.    Pros: The food was excellent!  I know that visiting a country doesn't not make you an expert on the cuisine, my bf says this is his favorite Italian restaurant in Austin.  (I personally think it's partially because he can practice his Italian with Daniela.)  He and I don't always agree on food (among other things) but we both loved all our dishes.  Service was good and Daniela frequented our table to see how we were doing.  She also recommended a wine for us which was good, moderately priced, and paired well with the dishes.  I appreciated that she didn't just choose the most expensive bottle on the menu (have had several servers do this).  Cons: The draw back was the portion sizes.  We had the waiter refill the bread basket several time, not because it was amazing, but because we were still hungry.  I understand that in a tasting, the portions are scaled back, but we both left the restaurant that night a bit unsatisfied.     The interior/ambiance of the restaurant leaves something to be desired but if you are looking for really good Italian food, visit Andiamo and you will not be disappointed!
I was very impressed. There's a huge line always, we went on a Sunday night, there was no line. I'm glad we went bc now I will know its worth it to wait in line.   I'd be happy to go back again with 6 people or less! I had the chicken enchiladas and my husband had the steak burrito.  Everything was amazing!!! We didn't get drinks but I can't wait until next time.
If you have a pair of shoes that you love that need to be freshened up, then this is the place to come. They are true cobblers, on site, who love what they do and it shoes. If my shoes are slipping when I walk, they have a solution. If your heels have a tap that break off, these guys can pop a new one on, no problem. Broken straps, buckles or seams are no problem at this facility. And when you come back, your shoes will be as good as new! Polished and pretty too!!!
Tony and Tina are awesome owners and have done a great job with the store.  Great prices, clean and always neat new things!
Climb the steps and enter into an a-typical Chinese restaurant, the décor is quite dated and the atmosphere is quaintly tacky. The food is great and the service is better than one might expect for such an inexpensive menu. The cook times are exceptionally fast; especially given the fact you can tell (by heat and taste) that everything is prepared to order. No soggy egg rolls here! I enjoy the Hot and Sour soup (w/o pork) even on the hottest summer day. The Crab Rangoons are a bit different then usual, slightly cheesier and not as sweet as some you might find elsewhere. It is what it is- though very enjoyable.
Had dinner here last night. Great, fun location! I walked in without a reservation and they were full but kindly offered me bar dining with 20% off. Not a bad deal! I started with a Moscow mule and they served it in a real copper mug! (A lot of places are no longer doing this because people steal the mugs for their value!)   I had the risotto with beef and it was fantastic! The service was a little slow but this is to be expected with such a high volume demand. It's a little pricy but the quality of the food reflects accordingly.
We were seated quickly and our waitress helped us decide what to get - I got the Mi Casa salad with carne asada. Honestly, it was one of the most full and flavorful salads I've had. Overall, a really pleasant experience!
BE SURE TO READ ENTIRE POST!!!  For years, the guys at April Realty/Aero Lawn Maintenance have occasionally mowed and trimmed my yard, a huge 7 acre mini-ranch in south Austin.  Even though they mow it infrequently, I'm always amazed that they remember from year to year all the little details. They do an excellent job, show up on time,  are friendly and courteous, and charge a fair price.  I can only afford to have them do it 3 or 4 times a year and I do the rest.     While they were mowing my yard a few weeks ago, a member of the crew accidentally hit my Toyota truck and put a fair-sized dent in the left front fender.  I didn't see him do it, and without an eyewitness I thought,  'Oh crap, this won't turn out well'.   Nervously, I called the owner, fearing that I might encounter the sort of denial and resistance we all run into all too often these days.  But what I got instead was what we all would like to find in such a situation: accountability.  The owner never hesitated to take responsibility.  His name is David, and I've met him a few times over the years.  And the way he handled what happened is the way every business owner should handle such situations.  The next day, I received a call from his insurance company, two days later an adjustor came out,  and within a week, I received a check for the damage.  That's how things are supposed to work.  That's called integrity, honesty, serving the customer.  And even though it's a little thing, it's the sort of thing that helps, even slightly, to restore your faith in people. And because it's become such a rare thing today, I wanted to point it out and say "Thank You".      Finally, we've gotten some rain and my grass is growing again.  In fact, I just noticed it's looking a little shaggy.  And thanks to David and the guys at April Realty, I know exactly who to call.
I've almost gave up on Chinese restaurants in pdx after all these identical menu at Cantonese places. Husband assured me of trying more. I started researching on yelp on all Chinese places that we haven't tried. This is the one I'm surprised we never noticed.   Cheaper than pure spice, but tastes not worse at all. Larger space and better service. I love the cleanliness and the family atmosphere here. Their BBQ closet looks so clean and price is good too! In husband's words: its chi is centered.  I like here because I feel the food is handled with respect. The saltiness is just right. Green onion is there with tofu. Just all so right. Maybe I'm a little biased just because the room was lighted with sun not like many other place that doesn't let light come through window. It might be fengshui, dude...  I'm happy for them that they have pretty good business while we were there. Customer were continuously coming for BBQ. I'll come back to try guifei chicken. If you wanna try real Cantonese way, ask for a LiTang, daily soup(actually broth for American) as soon as you sit down. Drinking that before eating is the Cantonese way of eating. I believe that's why girls in canton are always so skinny. Personally,I always request that and mark down for the Cantonese restaurants that doesn't have it. Making broth is a big feature of Cantonese cuisine. Ask them if you don't believe me.
We loved the place  Hate the Parking..  Food was Great  portions were not filling..
Pretty good cuban spot. Only my 2nd time having Cuban cuisine and I was very pleased. Food was good and staff was fun and friendly. I would def recommend this place for a first timer.
total punk dive. the music is loud. i used to go here to people watch about 5 years ago. i recently visited and it was the same portland punk scene (a few punky hipsters) this is not a place to make friends. but if you have a few friends and y'all want cheap drinks and good people watching and to be left alone for the most part this is the place to go to.
Nice price and awesome room. The big guy concierge rocks. He is always so helpfull. Too bad I cant remember his name. This hotel has everything. My husband and I love there.
Went today with a friend. The food was great.  I ordered the fried black bean cakes with poached eggs and hash towns.  I was pleasantly surprised.  I thought it was going to be more like refried beans which would've been OK, but this was very tasty...  Looks like they had homemade jam for the toast which was also very good...
When your wife calls you at work, after receiving an arrangement, and you hear the emotions of joy and happiness overwhelming her all is good.  Thank you for an amazing first experience Beaverton Florists, I'll definitely be back!
I've been living here for 2 years. Overall, I like it enough to stay. Pros: Wendell, the security guard, is amazing. He takes his job seriously & is always willing to help. He will tow your car, though, even if he likes you.  Location can't be beat.  Pool has calmed down tremendously, it's social, but not crazy.  Stuff is usually fixed pretty quickly.  Cons: Management staff seems to be unable to comprehend complex issues. They do not pay attention to detail, overlook important information, and lose track of almost everything. Make sure you get everything in writing & be prepared to follow up. Frequently.  Parking sucks. You will need to pay for a reserved space.  It's overpriced. And if you pay with a credit or debit card, there's an additional fee.
So, I was on the prowl for a GREAT soup(Not one of those mediocre soups that are all broth and not much of anything else) but a hearty homemade type. Well,  I was on commercial Dr. And a friend I ran into mentioned this place in particular and what outstanding bowls of soup they had. So of course, I had to check it out!   So they had two soups to choose from, the vegetable beef or a minestrone. I got the beef and my girlfriend had the minestrone.  This place really did not disappoint! Our soups were deep bowls of delicious tasting soup that were hearty, filling and served with a bread! Even even better was the price! $5.50! I would have easily paid $8 anywhere else for the quality and probably would have gotten "average soup". We were too full to try their sandwiches but  the guy beside me eating a breakfast sandwich said his was  awesome and he comes for them every weekend! We will be back and absolutely recommend.
Very friendly staff.  Prompt service.  Our pancakes, scrambled eggs, and french toast were delcious.
I have purchased a refrigerator, washer and dryer at this business, and I have to say the staff is extremely professional and courteous.  The prices are fair, and the added bonus of delivery (at least $25) and removal of old appliances is wonderful.    I would not hesitate to go back to them again.  Thanks guys!!
The food was absolutely incredible.
This was one of the first places we went too. Absolutely the best. Happy hour was 1.00 oysters and the bartender Paul I do believe was his name was the best. What a warm and friendly place. Keep up the great job!!!!
Large portions for a low price. Fast and lovely service. A weekly venture for me and it never lets me down!
I continue to be impressed by each facility I visit that is part of Children's Hospital. Granted I am an adult being treated by their doctors I could see myself bringing a child here.  The professionalism and the decor exceed my expectations and you can tell they care for their patients. This facility offers free parking which is very convenient and the walk to the facility after is short. I would highly recommend this location for followup visits because of the parking.
Came here today for the first time and everything was good. Realllyyyy good cannoli. Also tried a few cookies and the walnut raisin biscotti. It's a to go place so there are no tables. Nice staff. Loses a star because I asked for a cinnamon apple turnover and she did not put it in the bag. I didn't know it wasn't there until I was long gone. I also prefer a place where I can sit inside to eat and have coffee. May return to take some pastries home still
My only beef with Dressew is they don't accept Visa, forcing me to either bring enough cash when I come.. which I never know how much to take, or use my Interac card which I also never use anywhere else but here.
Tried this location immediately after they opened. Brisket and ribs had great flavor. I love BBQ and have also been to Blacks in Lockhart. It is difficult for me to say who is better. The flavor and tenderness of the meat at this Austin BBQ restaurant was outstanding!
It's always a plus going to a locally own place inside a city of tourist restaurants !  I've tried pretty much everything on the menu it's always unique and different dishes. Plus every once and awhile they have such tasty new additional specials .. like their octoberfest soup and lobster soup!  Tonight was a great night, even though there were multiple tables with large parties the bartender always came back to us to make sure we were being taken careful. Michael is his name and he always made sure we had a freshly poured cold brew. Which makes the restaurant even great they are always changing their taps.  ThAnks for another great night and great service!
Awesome place!  Tom helped us pick a fabulous mattress that was selling for 1/3 of the MSRP.  We got a king mattress, box spring, frame, and mattress cover for less then 1/2 the original price of just the mattress.  Tom was friendly, professional, and very helpful.  We had the mattress delivered within 24 hours and he delivery people recycled our old mattress for only $20.  Seriously the best deal in high end mattresses in Portland!  Check it out!  It's a bit of a drive but totally worth it.
Haven't been to Waterford Lakes in a minute,especially to eat, but Finally a really good restaurant in Waterford Lakes ,from the atmosphere,the food, to the service,everything was phenomenal,spectacular wine list on top of it all, 6stars!!!!
After looking for a nearby non-resort park dinner, we found raves about El Tenampa on Yelp, so we decided to try it. Everything was excellent.  Food was fresh,portions were larger than usual and my wife is still buzzed from her Margherita at last nights dinner(12:30am now at Typhoon Lagoon).  Yes they do need a larger sign and it's not a large restaurant, but it was perfect for this family of five.  And Luis or waiter was very good.  P.S. As my wife learned the hard way, don't rub your eyes after sampling all four kinds of hot sauce on your Nachos(fresh and complimentary).  Good think the Margherita was potent.
Great food!  Great service!  The interior could use some improvement, maybe some paint.  But the food makes up for it.  Burgers are good. Love the chicken burrito.
I go to a lot of Japanese restaurants, and Samurai has consistently been my #1 for almost 2 years and counting! If I'm Downtown during dinnertime or lunchtime, you'll most likely find me at Samurai.  The food is excellent. They offer a whole variety of authentic Japanese cuisine, some of which I rarely find at any other Japanese restaurant. For sashimi fans, they have a variety of sashimi for you to choose from. I've never had a bad experience with the sashimi I've ordered here. The meat is sliced very cleanly and prepared well. For makizushi and nigirizushi lovers, they have a wide assortment of rolls to pick from. I particularly liked their spicy salmon rolls, which definitely lived up to their namesake! As for other entrees, they offer some really great dishes. The teriyaki options are awesome. Their ramen, yakiudon and yakisoba are very delicious. My new favourite is the tonkatsu, which is sublime!  The service is very good. They are quick to take your order, deliver your food, and refresh your tea. Payment is a bit of a hassle since you must line up by the cramped register area which is near the kitchen and bathrooms, but other than that I've had no problems with the service here. They can also answer any questions you have about the food which is useful when ordering things you've never tried before.  I would most definitely recommend Samurai. The only thing to keep in mind is that this place is in the heart of Davie St., so during peak hours there will be quite a wait to get a seat.
I walking into this place hoping to just get some coffee.  But when I walked in, I was unsure of exactly what to get.  Mocha? Saudi Coffee? Iced? Since it wasn't too busy, I didn't mind taking more time to figure out what I wanted.  I asked what made the Saudi coffee different from their brewed coffee, and they mentioned it had to do with the spices and cardamom.  Then they started talking about the Fresh Mint Lemonade.  I had to let one customer order before me just so I could decide.  I decided to get the Fresh Mint Lemonade and an Iced Coffee.  The coffee was great and so was the Fresh Mint Lemonade.  The mint was pureed in a blender and then added to the freshly squeezed lemonade.  The customer service is spectacular too, and I plan to go back again.
Cool little place about to order the mother clucker and a beer
Happy Feet is fantastic! I had been looking for a good and inexpensive groomer in my aera and after seeing other reviews i figured i'd take a chance. My 9 year old Maine Coon, Unagi, has extremely thick and long hair, and no amount of brushing him seemed to make a difference. He clearly was hot and uncomfortable with all that fuzz, and i cant deny that having a kitty with a lion cut seemed too awesome to pass up.   He's a big baby and hates leaving the comfy confines of him home, so he cried the whole way to Happy Feet. Within 1 minute of being in Rachel's arms, he relaxed and began to purr and in less than an hour he was looking fabulous and had been shaved, nails cut, ears cleaned and been looked over from ears to tail. Rachel did a fabulous job and made sure he looked and smelled his best while still being comfortable. Her massive amount of experience shows in the great job she does, and her love for our feline friends shows in her quality of work.   I cant wait to bring my other kitty in to have some magic worked on her.  Thanks Happy Feet!
Food was amazing. So much flavor and the sides were outstanding. The restaurant was clean and very industrial modern. Loved the ordering process and the staff was very nice. Definitely recommend the Venezuelan empanadas and the sandwiches. Don't forget the plantains on the side. We will definitely be back!
So we had well over an hour before our little table for two would be ready at the ridiculously popular Pok Pok down the block. Meanwhile, our biggest meal up to that point on that special first day in Portland was taking individual bites of four yeast-raised monstrosities at Voodoo Doughnuts, so it would be appropriate to describe Jamie W. and me as feeling peckish anticipating our upcoming green papaya salad. When we passed by this trendy yet spacious shop, we were naturally intrigued. There was a polar bear in a ski cap and ice cream pop art on the wall (photo: http://bit.ly/2ujpQ7l).  They had chocolate and vanilla, but of course, it had to be Valrhona Chocolate and Madagascar Vanilla. What was more intriguing to us were the two non-dairy froyo options that were apparently made from almond milk. Something sweet before dinner couldn't hurt, right? Jamie went for the Hazelnut Praline which for a small $3.95 cup, was a generously tall serving (photo: http://bit.ly/2KKa1BF). That meant I had to get a small cup of the Vanilla Latte which plopped over in pure exhaustion from the spigot (photo: http://bit.ly/2KVvBTc). Refreshing and not too sweet. It was the perfect unintended appetizer on such an eventful Portland day.  FROYO - 4 stars...smooth dairy-free froyo worth seeking out AMBIANCE - 4 stars...stylish spot that manages to be kid-friendly  SERVICE - 4 stars...she was generous with the spigots TOTAL - 4 stars...froyo appetizers make sense to me
Good location just outside of the city. You can avoid toll roads if you wanted (or on accident like me when you're lost haha). There's a nice mall right across the street with a lot of food options nearby.  + spacious room - full beds not queen - limited king bed rooms +/- medium sized bathroom with a nice hot shower + nice business center where you can print boarding passes + delicious complimentary breakfast with plenty of choices + lots of parking - we had a room near the elevators so we heard every DING
I believe this is the newest location and it was very busy on a Saturday night. The quality here is a step above the Richmond location, and I recommend VERY strongly for the boneless 3 sauce chicken (san bei ji), one of the best I have tasted.   The other dishes we had were also very good, including the seafood salad. The xiao long bao dumplings were a bit of a disappointment, however, with dry/thicker skin and lacking that *pop* of flavorful juice when you bite into it. I would go elsewhere for dimsum type food, but the Chinese/Taiwanese cuisine offered here is delicious.   Food: 4/5 (great 3 sauce chicken, lackluster dumplings) Ambience: 4/5, new location, clean, but not too spacious.  Service: 4/5, typical, but efficient.   Overall: 4/5.
I ate both brunch and dinner here this week. The menu is small, but the food is well done and I love the atmosphere. Of all the new spots in Dot, this is my favorite.  Brunch: my four friends and I were all thrilled with our meals. I had the blueberry pancakes and they were amazing--flavorful and buttery with crispy edges. The bacon and coffee were incredible, too. My only critique (and it's super minor!): the sugar bowl is fully stocked with artificial sweeteners and only 2 sugars. Our table asked for more sugar and was given another bowl with the same setup. Strange ratio. Also, with such high quality coffee, I was surprised not to see liquid sugar on the table.  Dinner: We were seated promptly by a friendly hostess. A sweet and personable waitress took our drink order. But then we had another waitress--who was a tad intense. Our group had pizza and burgers and were all happy with our choices. Our waitress forgot about us after a male friend of hers came in to visit. It was odd--she stood a few feet from us, but was too engrossed in her conversation to notice we were done with our meals. We waited a while before the sweet waitress from earlier came by to wrap up our leftovers and bring us our check. We wished our tip could have gone directly to her and the hostess!
So we decided to stop by even after reading some not great reviews on google and I'm glad we did! We had the ceviche sampler, all three were delish! The mixto was my favorite. We had a group of 5 people, we all had a torta; the grilled chicken Cuban, the al pastor and the pernil. Service was great, I am Latina and I am in the service industry, so I can be quite demanding. Our server more than catered to us, it was a young black female and she was great. I'll definitely be back, I'll be craving that ceviche!
I LOVE the fried chicken wings here!   The lady boss is very friendly and if you can speak Teochew, even better. She basically told me her life story on the premise that my mother is Teochew (though I cannot speak it much) :p So I was told this restaurant is related to Phnom Penh, that the owners are related. Hence, the similar food items on the menu.  I have only been here a few times as it is not very convenient for me to get here using transit, plus they also close fairly early. I usually come here during lunch and it is not that busy when I am there. Either people do not know of this place or this is more of a dinner place.  The pho soup is a bit different as it is light tasting, very similar to Teochew style of noodle soup. The dry egg noodle is really nice, similar to the one at Phnom Penh. The owner also let us try a dessert she made on the house - something with black glutinous rice and sugar.   I saw there is beef luc lac which is something I like at Phnom Penh, I will need to visit here again to try it.
The best Chinese food I have ever had, not to mention it's 100% vegan. Decent prices, top notch service, and ah-mazing food is an unbeatable combination.
Steak night is Monday. $6 for a 6oz strip loin which is of surprisingly good quality given the price, and it comes with rice, baked potato, garlic bread and salad, so you definitely won't leave hungry. Also there's a good beer special on Monday, so you can enjoy a cold pint with you meal and get out the door for under $15 incl gratuity. Really, you just can't beat that kind of value at a restaurant.   This place used to be a Mexican place called El Barrio which had pretty good food too, and although I don't know if the previous owners also own or are involved in this place, but there's still a fair bit of Latin american influence on the menu.
Uno dei pochi ristoranti nel quartiere aperti fino a tardi. Posto accogliente e piatti molto deliziosi. Si trova sempre posto anche di sabato sera. Ovviamente i camerieri sono gentili. Consiglio il meatloaf. Anche i dolci sono niente male.
So, Dan from Ashley Chimney Service called me today and I explained that he had measured my chimney cap incorrectly and that I was out approximately $42 with the restocking fee and shipping expense of returning the item. He said he would reimburse me for my unnecessary expense. So I have changed his rating.
OneZo has a truly unique product in Vancouver! Yes, during their soft opening the staff may have been slow, but you can really tell that they're working hard to familiarize themselves with the Point of Sale system and improving. Mishaps aside, their pearls are made with fresh ingredients, and I think due to the handmade nature of the pearls, they actually taste like little mochi balls!   When I went, I ordered the Cactus Tapioca Green Milk Tea, half sweet with less ice. Unfortunately the Cactus Tapioca was not available, but I understood this to because they're not on season. But the baristas were really helpful in helping me choose another flavour; they have so much variety that I wasn't sure what would pair well. In the end I got Black Sesame Tapioca instead. Again about the fresh ingredients - you can literally taste/feel the tiny grains of black sesame in their tapioca. 100% would come back to try different tapioca flavours & drink combinations!
Dropped a package off here this morning.  No line, easy and quick.  Got a receipt for my tracking and was on my way a few minutes after getting inside.  The gentleman behind the counter was friendly and helpful.
I love Chipotle, hands down my favorite place to go for a burrito bowl. The food is great, quality, quantity is all good.   The only reason I won't give it 5 stars is because a couple of the employees give you unfriendly looks when you ask for a certain thing this way or that way but most are great!  Taste wise it's the best Chipotle I've been to so far!
I was really not expecting to be wow'd by CBC. I went into the night thinking that a brewery that focuses on making awesome beer wouldn't have the time to get it right on the food side of things. But I was wrong in the best way possible...  CBC sits on the banks of a river in the Brewery District, way off the beaten path compared to most great restaurants in Columbus. Something that makes the experience of CBC a little fun and more like an exploration than just a night out for dinner.  The menu is deep with good items, I fought it out in my mind over 3 different dishes and was quite happy to hear my friends were deciding over the same items. We ended up getting all 3 and all ended up being as good as advertised.  I went with the bourbon buffalo sandwich which was incredible. The garlic fries that come with being somewhat life changingly awesome, were a complete surprise and a total complement to the BBQ goodness of the sandwich.  The atmosphere inside is nice, somewhat modern with touches of wood and holiday decorations that didn't feel cheesy.  Remeber to wash down your meal with one of CBCs awesome beers. I love the Bodhi double IPA. Great place, great atmosphere, great drinks.  Oh and a yelp deal for a free dessert! Get the bread pudding, it's kickass.
One of the friendlier and less crowded Kinko's in the chain.  I'm always able to find a helping hand here when struggling with the copier and printers.  The system is efficient and effective.
I made my very first gun purchase here I know somewhat about guns, but I came in knowing what I wanted I asked a lot of questions and the guys there didn't make me feel uncomfortable or stupid of the gun I wanted and it was a very smooth fast process. Definitely looking into more guns and this will be my first stop.
Great place the staff was friendly the food was great. Got to meet Paul from the show he was great with all his fans. Took pictures with everyone. Really had a great time.
Great place to go with the family and get healthy salad with plenty of options! I love this place. Very clean, friendly staff.
This place has bomb chicken fingers! I am one of the pickiest eaters there is and they are awesome! I order delivery pretty often and it has always arrived hot and correct! Definitely recommend you give it a try!
These guys are fantastic. I had done some damage to my driver's side door when I broke into my own car, after having locked my keys inside. I went in for my routine MA inspection and came out with a fixed door as well! No extra charge. Highly recommend honest and kind folks.
Excelled in the details! I was in love with the drinks I ordered, Maquis and Ornament and Spice. I also sampled the drinks my friends got. We were all impressed. The drinks are interesting, intriguing, and actually palatable. They make you want more...so we ordered more. The Maquis featured Black Whiskey and had just the right balance between spicy and sweet. Also I LOVED the interesting stories behind each drink featured on the menu. Those are the little details that make for an out-of-the-ordinary experience.  As a special note about the customer service, the bar was pretty busy on a typical Saturday night, but the staff was calm, courteous, and attentive. It's a relaxed atmosphere, and you feel free to be you.
FAN-TAS-TIC! After a lovely morning snowshoeing on Cypress, we wandered into Mumbai Masala (though it took as a couple of extra blocks to find it - and only then when someone Googled it on their iPhone). Seems 'off-Lonsdale' is actually rather hidden!  Nevertheless, worth the search! Although there was no buffet on today, the gentleman offered us Thali (mixed plate), with both vegetarian and meat-eater options. With two curries and a dhal, rice, the freshest naan I've had in awhile, salad, and pakora (? or something like it), it was an absolutely perfect meal. We topped it off the fresh chai.  The best part (other than the amazing food - and the eggplant dish was my personal favourite) - only $15 including tax and tip! I want to go snowshoeing again just so we can go here for lunch!
Wow this place has great pizza!!  I lived in atlanta for 6 years and the only good pizza I had was from Fellini's. Then I moved to North East (connecticut) and NY and that area's pizza is so amazing you can't compare it to anywhere else! 3 years later I came to atlanta and ate here and I have to say it's just as good as Pizza in NY and CT!! SO good! wouldn't think i can find such pizza in Sandy Springs, GA!!  We ordered: - Queen's Right: Excellent! very fresh mozzarella and brazil! - Ring of Fire: Great! - Mom Says, "Eat Your Veggies!": Excellent! I wouldn't think all these many veggies on top of the pizza would make such a great combo! - Paolo's Pollo: Delicious!! very good :)! - bunch of salads to share. Very good and fresh!  It was 9 of us and my boy friend and his parents are from NY and they LOVED the pizza! When people from NY like a pizza you would know how good it is ;)!
Sounds like fun.. here I am, writing a review of something I never got to see... Was it worth it? I will never know... Were the free light displays beckoning me to get off my ass and out into the night with my bah humbug of a boyfriend? Aye, yes. I want to go. Is it too late for me? Please let me know... I have no family, and nothing better to do besides work my swollen ankles into the ground. This lady needs some hot chocolate, a Christmas tree, and a really big hug. Go easy...
Pretty Dayum Awesome Lunch Buffet!  Mom and pop place, great attentive but casual waitstaff.  All the food on the buffet is hot and WELL spiced... everything so full of flavor!    Lots of meat, vegetable and lentil options.  Found that eating the meat items were better balanced when eating with the Basamati rice.  Can't remember the name of any of the dishes, however there is a small description of each dish on the buffet, THANK GOD, because don't you just hate going to a buffet where you are unfamiliar with the food and not much of an idea of what's going on your plate?  Chocolate and lemon dessert cakes were great also, very dense and moist.  Will come here again.
My friends and I come here at least once a week. Their service is great and very friendly. The food is always great and there are a few items that are not on the menu that are the specials. You have to ask them about it. It's a nice place to hangout and have a few beers and appetizers. The pineapples ice cream is the best and its sugar free but you can't tell if they didn't tell you. They also deliver also if you just want to eat at home. There are lot of off street parking.
Hey there, y'all!  I love Outside in Style on 620 - I had bought two outdoor chairs from Outside in Style last year (still look and feel like new) and just went back today to find another of that same chair and a small, outdoor side table as well.  I was so excited to find my identical chair style for a really great price :). Karen is so helpful, kind, personable and knowledgeable - thank you Karen for guiding me to the perfect outdoor table!  You are like my sister from another mister!  And David, thank you for bringing my new items outside to my car - it was so nice of you!  They look amazing on my porch and I'm so happy :). What really sets Outside in Style apart is that they have indoor and outdoor showrooms so you can see how the furniture really looks and fits together.  And everything is high quality with various sizes and selections - I really appreciated that and it was fun to explore and see which pieces spoke to me :).  Thanks so much, y'all!  Have a great day!
Since discovering Modern Dog I have been a happier dog owner. The team here has been great with dog walks, nail clips, overnight help, and even delivered dog food to me when I was snowbound! Every one of them is reliable, friendly, trustworthy, and patient with my neurotic dog. The shop is stocked with food, treats, toys, and they'll order just about anything you need. Modern Dog is an awesome addition to the neighborhood
I've been a fan of this place since they first opened and have the honor of being the most long-lasting customer. A perk of walking in an open door just as they opened.  Vintage from the start has been committed to "Cocktails done right" and has definitely matured over the years to provide a warm, casual, and fun atmosphere with a sophisticated pallet.  Highly recommended and maybe I'll see you there! Or message me, let's go!
around lunch time, the outside line can be daunting but nothing too bad, ahhhh, their sandwiches i'm now wanting!  food is delicious and menu is ever-changing  so i always make sure, to never get the same thing  waitress was courteous; she didn't keep us waiting the walls are decorated with awards and paintings  so you get a little art, plus a little of their pride overall, it's a great place, i give it four stars out of five
Nice casual day time bar.  Great on a summer day to just kick back, grab a drink with a few buddies, and people watch all day.  It's reasonably priced, good beer selection.  You can't go wrong.
Very friendly staff and warm atmosphere. Up-cycled chairs with picnic table cloths; it's a humble and welcome transformation from the yuppy, pretentious offerings nearby. Parking within a block is easy. The food is fresh, wholesome and made with extra love (and spice!) I have only been here for the special Saturdays, but can't wait to go back for brunch. Happy that this place is holding on to it's roots while gentrification creeps on by in the shadows.
Summer shack always provides a stable quality bake and fresh. Definitely drop the tastes of oysters in this season but still well maintained.
Very friendly, even with our 4 year old.  They fixed a screw in our glasses, which has been fixed 2 other time by other shops.  He took time to explain why the screws keep falling out (turns out we really need to send these back to manufacturer.  Didn't charge us anything for about 10-15 minutes of his repair time.  Even had jelly beans for our kid while we waited.  Awesome.
If you live in the Lake Mary area & you love a great layered look there is no excuse not to go see Briana Styles at Velvet!!  I live in Atlanta now and have had some atrocious cuts for DOUBLE what Bri cost me AND none of those stylists were half as personable as she is.  LOVE her, LOVE my hair, just wish she'd consider relocating to Atlanta so I could go to her regularly!
I feel like this place is really ideal for happy hour. Their prices during that time are really great. I don't eat seafood but I tried the coconut shrimp and it was delicious. Really happy with the outcome of the food and drinks.
I just had a root canal done here and dr Ettrich was just awesome. He is very caring and makes sure that you are not in any discomfort and makes the time and has great patience with his patients. I would strongly recommend him. The support staff he has is also excellent I would not hesitate to go back if I need another root canal
Really enjoyed the tour, I thought it was a little pricey only to find a $3 coupon here on yelp after the fact (disappointing), but our tour guide was energetic and engaging.
They have done regular oil changes and some other maintenance on my wife's Honda Civic. Their pricing is well below the Honda dealership prices, and they do a solid job.   I'll continue to use them for basic maintenance car care.
I've been wanting to try 7 Lamps for quite some time and finally got around to it. I dined last Friday evening with a few of my coworkers (we have a supper club).  For a starter we shared the cottage potatoes. They were pretty decent. Nothing crazy amazing. I also had the raspberry lighting cocktail. It was SO delicious! 3 out of the 4 of us had the black linguine as our entree. I had such high hopes for it! But it was just okay. I felt like the pasta water more than likely wasn't salted. The linguine was still a bit undercooked (not quite al dente) & the sea scallops needed to be seared a little longer. I also would have preferred Parmesan cheese bc the saltiness would have added more flavor to the pasta. I forget our waitresses name but she was a doll! Overall I'll definitely return. The restaurant is super cute and intimate & would be a great date night spot in the future.
This is by far the best burger I've ever tried! EVER.  I was waiting in line and as I got closer to the door, I still couldn't decide which burger I wanted so I was asking the people around me and I guess that day around me there were plenty of  "Primetime Burger" enthusiasts so I gave that one a try. Some of the locals told me they've tried nearly all the burgers on the menu and each has been delicious.   The Primetime Burger surely did not let me down. The ingredients tasted fresh and the flavors were just absolutely out of this world! You can really taste the difference with Hopdoddy. I had some of my friend's fries and they were good too although no where as unique in flavor as the burgers.   I paired my burger with a Nutella & Chocolate Pretzels Shake, which was amazing as well!   I'm not sure if the lines are usually as long as the line was when I was in town so I would recommend getting there a bit early because my friends and I had to wait in line outside, inside, and then a bit more after we ordered our deliciousness. Trust me though, it's 100% worth the wait! While you're waiting, you can order a "Grown Folks" drink at the bar if you're of age of course.   Overall, a really pleasant eating experience!  Hopdoddy, please come to Los Angeles - I promise you'll be oh so loved there as well! :)
Came here last night looking for a Christmas gift for my infant niece. I definitely found a lot of nice things! Ended up getting her a soft blankie and Jellycat rabbit.   My toddler son was with me and going a bit wild, he kept wanting to play with all the toys and books. One of the women working decided to entertain him while I browsed. She got down on the floor with him, and they were looking at this Eric Carle cardboard cutout kit for building animals. My son had dragged it out and didn't want to put it back, so she was going through all the animals with him and talking to him. It was really sweet of her and helpful! We ended up buying it, of course.   I thought things were a bit expensive here, but then I checked prices on Amazon and they were the same! I'm sure we'll be back.
I saw this place on the way out of town a few weeks ago, and had to check it out the next time I was in town. With hurricane Irma bearing down on Florida, I stopped in on a Thursday night for dinner. Other than another pair that were already seated, I was the only one dining there.   After reading the reviews prior to mine, I was a bit cautious about eating here. I had not eaten at any other Bonchons before, and this was my first experience at one. I have to say that it was a great experience and the food was awesome.   I had the small combo wings/drums in half spicy and half soy garlic. Both tasted amazing and the crispy-ness of the wings were on a whole new level from what I've had before. I have to give the prize to the spicy flavor, it's really good and not really that spicy.   I also ordered the bulgogi tacos. They were super tasty and I'd definitely recommend them as well.   I plan on making this a regular stop for me whenever I'm in town!
John was quick to return my call, communicated well, came on time, and most importantly did great work. There was a minor hiccup where he left a lever on that caused the heat to bypass the thermostat but he quickly returned my call and walked me through the process for a quick fix. I would highly recommend. Went through a few other services in the past and John stands above the rest
Busy on weeknights.  Interior is fine for a modern restaurant. Nothing dazzling.. But it's been around for a while. Comparatively, it was really nice when it opened.  Service excellent. Loved that your napkin get reset/folded when a person leaves the table.  Poor menu design! It's one huge rectangle. I wished it folded in to 3 sections like most menus's. 4 people sat at a table, each with their menu in front of them covered the whole table top and then some.  The items on the menu were vast and it took us all ages to pick our food.  Food quality, quantity and taste were excellent.  **** Happy hour specials were really value priced. :) *****
Always exploring new places, I tried Hollerbach's cafe / restaurant, and I really enjoyed it.  The atmosphere is like a lot of family-run restaurants--informal, comfortable, a lot of bric-a-brac all over.  The customers all seemed happy and talkative which I think is a good measure of the restaurant's success in making a pleasant atmosphere for people to eat.  And the staff was friendly and answered all my questions happily.  The guy who waited on me at the bar couldn't have been any nicer.  I had a Wurst Teller plate with 3 different sausages, with sauerkraut and potato pancakes (pancakes aren't shown on the menu) for sides, and a couple of Kostritzer schwarzbier to wash it all down.  Every single thing I ate was wonderful here.  Rich, flavorful sausages, spicy German mustard, warm and flavorful German potato salad, the excellent German beers on tap.  My only regret is that I ate so much that I didn't have room for dessert--they have some very tempting things in the display case.  (I saw a cheesecake and some other cakes in there like a German chocolate cake (which isn't a true German dessert, by the way), a black forest tort).  Also, I saw German beers on tap like Bitburger, Kostritzer, Tuch, and a couple others, which is pretty representative of the spectrum from pils and ale to dark.  Didn't see Spaten das Optimator, or hefeweizen, but I didn't look hard, either.  I asked for one of their world famous Reuben sandwiches with the red cabbage on it for carry out--it was terrific.  This was just one visit, but I really like this place and want to go again to explore more items.  Six stars if you like German food.
We couldn't wait, we had to taste the real food. So another date night spent in Malden. I had a Goddess Martini to start... no offense to the bar tender but "ICK", way too sweet for this sour girls taste buds. I had to switch to a glass of Pinot Grigio to go with my pan seared scallops over Lobster Ravioli with a lobster cream sauce. Very tasty indeed! And the hubby had a veil cutlet special over risotto and three shrimps. I didn't get to taste the shrimp, cause he's greedy, but the veil and risotto were delicious. I liked the small portion sizes too because I didn't leave the restaurant, for once, feeling like a whale. The music was a bit more mellow too, which was nice for dinner time. Just quiet, holiday music in the background. The wait staff was great. Very friendly and efficient. I think we've found a new place for date night.
The happy hour is great, they also have appetizers included. Even when the restaurant is really busy, the costumer service is outstanding. I would definitely recommend this place. ( just for the happy hour)
Made an appointment thru yelp. I was taken back within ten minutes of my appointment. They took my vital signs and sent me to an exam room. I didn't have to wait long. The doctor listened to my story and approved all the tests I wanted/needed. She did an excellent examination. They have an online portal where you can check your test results for the ones that needed to be sent out. Some tests can be performed in the office. I would return again if needed.
This location did a 180! Not sure if it is under new management but the location was completely renovated and everyone we've come across so far has been incredibly professional and friendly. We even had one order made slightly incorrectly so they made us a new one immediately, let us keep the old one and on top of that, added a 2 liter of soda for free for the inconvenience. So glad this location shaped up!
The dishes here look so beautiful and taste very nice. I strongly recommend seafood curd. It contains a lot of seafood and Chinese vegetables.
Everyone I encountered at this clinic was great! They give awesome customer service, they have uplifting attitudes, and it continues after the service for which you came has been provided. Dr. Slater listens to your concerns and even during your procedure, he addresses sudden questions. Dr. Slater was very gentle with my lip filler procedure. Except for one injection where I felt some pressure, I didn't feel any of the other injections. At one point, I was going to ask him, "Did you start yet?" I received Juvederm Volbella because I only wanted filler in my upper lip because it was very small and thin in ratio to my bottom lip. Also, I wanted a more natural looking lip, rather than one that has obviously been filled. When Dr. Slater completed the process, I was shocked because there was no bleeding, during or after the injection and I never bruised either. In the next 3 days, my lip did not swell above that which it appeared at the clinic. The overall experience from start to finish was perfect! I have a follow-up in 3 days and I'm going to consult with Dr. Slater about getting more Volbella.
Yum. This afternoon was my first time to go to El Chilito's. I'm eating a Carne Asada taco right now and it's pretty tasty... but it's also ity-bity! So even though it seems like a pretty good deal to only pay $2.29/taco, you better get two or three if you want to be full.   Mmm... really good, though. And the salsa/mole is also amazing. And the tortilla seems like it would have been really good a day or two ago (right now its a tad stale).   Other people said the line was long, but when I went it wasn't too bad. Maybe 10 minutes to get in and out. And the cashier-dude was really friendly (and kind of cute!)   I'll definitely be going back.
Came here for dinner after a few friends recommended the place. It lived up to the rave reviews - I love, love, loved this place! We came for dinner and it was busy, but the atmosphere was trendy and fun. The only downside of the open concept is that it did get a little noisy at times.  The margaritas are to die for - try the strawberry! The alchol wasn't over powering, but they were definitely strong :) You get chips and salsa while you wait for your meal and the salsa was seriously the best I have ever had. It was a little spicy - my less adventurous husband was sweating a bit! I had the chicken fajitas - SO MUCH FOOD! The chicken was grilled to perfection with a mix of veggies, the rice was deliciously spiced, and the guacamole (an add on) was wonderful. I also had a bite of my husband's chicken enchiladas and could have eaten the entire plate. They were extra cheesy, just as I like them. We will definitely be back!
I wanted to write a review on this little Gem in Winthrop.  I have been going here for about 2 years now and have always been pleased with their talant.  I first started coming to this Nail Salon after I had a disaster of a Nail Job done the day of my wedding at a Nail Salon at Square One Mall.  I now have learned the hard way that you never get your nails done in a Mall (Especially for a big event) because they want to take in as many customers as possible they do not care how the end result looks.  I left the Mall so disappointed and on my way home I decided to see if any of the Local Nail Salons near my house could help me.  The first place I went to could not help because they said it would be too much work to undo what the other place had done.. I decided to try one more place and Thank Goodness I stumbled across A & V Nails Salon.  The Ladies their helped me redo the nails that were done at the Mall and Did a fantastic Job.  I knew It being my Wedding day that my hands were going to be photographed so I can not thank them enough for  their help.  I have been going there for Business ever since.  The staff there is very personable and they remember me everytime I come in the door.  They are all very talanted and hard workers.  If you are close to the area and need a good mani or Pedi I totally recommend trying them out.
I really like this place.  It's cozy and dark, and the service was REALLY top notch when my husband and I stopped in.  Easily the best service I've ever had in a bar.  The cocktail menu is varied, with many slight twists on classic cocktails.  They are a bit pricey (8 bucks and up), but as others have pointed out, they are indeed STRONG.  I had two drinks and was pretty buzzed to borderline drunk (note: I am a person who has a couple of drinks every night after work, so I am not really a lightweight).  I ordered a French 75, which was good, though sadly not the best I've ever had.  Then I ordered the chocolate martini, which was AMAZING.  It's thin and tastes like pure cocoa, not thick and sugary at all.  My husband had the Corpse Reviver #2, which he proclaimed to be fantastic.  Will definitely go back.
I visited Tarrytown UMC for the third time this past Sunday. It was my first service in the Fellowship Hall, with David preaching, and I have to say it was a wonderful experience. The kiddos had just had their Vacation Bible School and performed, it was adorable and sweet. The sermon was touching and thoughtful. The hymns lovely as well. The icing on the cake was a gentleman, Tim Curry (for real!), who performed "Go Down Moses" during the offertory. I would have paid good money to hear that man sing in a killer jazz bar. It moved me to tears. Please go at least to hear Tim sing. Good God. The people were super friendly, the childcare too. My daughter cried when it was time to leave.  I will definitely be back and look forward to the excellent preaching and music. I'm subtracting a star because the parking is challenging. I know they are working on it-I asked-so give yourself a few extra minutes.
I ordered food for the Boulder office and arrived here only to realize I had placed the order at the Denver location. The manager on duty decided to make me the order again and never charged me again. This is an amazing business to have bailed me out of my own stupidity
First time to Orlando and try to find a good place for sushi. This restaurant is nice and everything we had was good. Highly recommended!
I'm not the kind of person that writes reviews, but I had such a great experience picking out my prescription glasses that I had to make an exception.   This was my first time at Warby Parker and will not be my last. As soon as I walked in I was greeted and asked if I had been there before (which obviously was a no) and then they explained the different sections of the store and told me that they would give me a bit of time to browse around see if anything appealed to me. I started looking at all of the frames on the wall and every time I would pull some off the shelf and try them on, I didnt like the way it looked on me or the way it felt on my nose. I did this a few times and still had no luck and became extremely overwhelmed very quickly. After about six minutes or so of doing this, one of the employees came over and started to pull things off for me to try on. The frames that he picked I would have never chosen for myself. And I freaking loved them all. I have extremely terrible vision so my lenses tend to be very thick and weigh down my glasses. He asked to see my prescription and recommended different frames that would be comfortable and fit well when the glasses were made. Two employees assited me while I was at the store and not only were they extremely well informed and helpful, but they were so incredibly kind! I've never had such a great experience picking out glasses before, ever. I've always been the kind of person that wears contacts out in public, but I'm definitely going to be wearing my glasses way more often because I absolutely love, love, LOVE the ones I ended up buying. And I would have never picked them out if it wasn't for those employees. I told my brother about the experience I had and he's going next week to check it out! I will never go anywhere else for my glasses.   Warby Parker, you just got yourself huge fan!
Don't change a thing, Eurasia!! This place has quickly risen to my top 3 favorites in Austin with just one visit!
Me and My Family have been eating here for Years and we love it!  It is different than most place but that difference is good!  Some times you get things that you didn't think you ordered, but that has gotten a guy like me(who always eats the same thing) to try other stuff on the menu. EVERYTHING IS GOOD so you cant go wrong.  The nuns are starting to speak better english so there is less awkwardness and less screw ups on your order.  Also I have witnessed many people without means not having to pay for their meal so this place is also helping our community.  I have eat here probably over a thousand times and have never got sick!!!  If you are a vegan that likes likes fake meats or are not a vegan and are trying to eat good with vegan friends or fam go here and you will not regret it!
I have a 2001 Golf and do most of my own work, but when it's over my head this is where I go.  These guys are honest, knowledgeable and very helpful.  Their rates are very fair and they're willing to help me over the phone when I have questions about my own repairs.
Adulting can suck at times not to mention insurance can get a bit confusing. I had an amazing experience with State Farm by talking to Howard Lao discussing my options on car insurance. I've been looking to switch to reduce my monthly payments I am currently paying with another insurance company.   He made it sound so much less confusing and even gave me an estimate if I was to switch. He was super friendly and went above and beyond to help me this day. Not to mention gave me a clear understanding of where my money is going towards in terms of coverage and such! I'd highly recommend seeing him if you're in the Portland area.    Thanks How!
As good as it gets for all you can eat I had low expectation for this place, which is probably why I was pleasantly surprised. The aburi sushi tasted good, of course not compatible to Miku and minami, but still delicious. The meat's flavor was really good. There are other neat little surprises like deep fried mochi and such. If you got a big group of heavy eaters, this place is perfect for you
Very nice and clean place to eat. Loved the atmosphere and music. Service was great and the food was the best part! I wasn't sure my kids would like it but they really loved the food!
There's no need to go to Newbury St with talent and service like the team at Judy Jetson. I went to Josh on a recommendation from a friend. He looked at the photos I brought with me, and then we discussed how the look would play out on my hair, what I was comfortable with, etc. It truly was a conversation and made me feel very comfortable with him holding the scissors. The cut turned out great and I've gotten tons of compliments on it. The next day, I got a call from Judy herself to follow up and make sure I was a happy first-time client...which I definitely was!
I went here for the first time a few months ago with a gift certificate from my husband's boss.  I had the most fantastic prenatal massage from Kim. Like made my week kind of massage.  Not only was she courteous, professional, and awesome at her job,  the spa itself was lovely. The staff were very friendly and low key and there was a quiet, relaxed waiting area. All around great experience.
I have never been a part of a more engaging dining experience. I am WOWED, blown away, out of the water!!!!! The service holds itself to a high standard of excellence and the low lighting provides a comfortable atmosphere. This place is perfect for special occasions or just to satisfy a craving.  You can do all 4 courses or just 1, up to you!  If you decide to come here make sure you stop by the bar and say hello to Erin, an excellent bartender and person in general. He will ensure your party has an unforgettable night and the best cheese of all the employees ;)
Wow, the service here was superb. Definitely make reservations and come before closing...it's super busy and definitely deserves it's awesome reputation. Also be prepared for the LACK of free parking......However, the restaurant does offer valet...so do it...trust me. Also I recommend dressing nice here...it's a bit above your casual dress.  Went here for a girl's night and ordered the following: Gruyere biscuits - solid awesome. Get those freaking biscuits. They are worth it.   Fries w/truffle oil- good reminds me of umami fries in CA but not to die for personally. Just do it to try once for the experience Ravioli that day was not that great or worth it. Come here for meat. No pun intended.  Get that pork porterhouse. Seriously.  I also recommend the chicken was delicious.
What can I say? The food here is excellent. You do get a lot to eat. They also have a senior type menu called "little less dinner" (or breakfast, or lunch depending on what you order) and the great thing about this menu is its open for all ages. That I like, as not everyone can eat a huge meal. As I and many others here said they do give you a lot to eat and having a "lite" menu really helps. Plus this "lite" menu is the same food as you get in the normal menu just smaller portions.   Breakfast, lunch and dinner is served all day. They have a jukebox that plays all sorts of old time 50s music, (just like a classic diner)   Service is by far the best I've seen in a casual style restaurant. The staff are very friendly, almost like being in a small town diner.  Deserts are also big, big enough that two or even three people can share it. and fresh squeezed orange juice served daily.   Prices are average. dinners such as the Chicken Fried steak, salmon or the normal streaks can run $10.99-$15.99 and drinks $2.50, but I guess you are paying for quality and that excellent service.
My all out favorite eating establishment in Boston, because who doesn't love waffles and french fries? Not too mention oodles of mouthwatering sauces that should leave you coming back all the time. If you haven't tried all the sauces, you truly haven't experienced Saus, and that goes just as well for the waffles. I took my girlfriend here for deep-fried turkey fest and we had a ball! I'm a french fry connoisseur of sorts, and these frites are miles ahead of the competition. Also I don't think I've ever met a nicer staff in any eating establishment, and there's something exciting and new every month! Check out Tuesday night board game nights and grab some frites! Can't tell you how many times I've left campus to sneak away here before the next class. Love this place.
Their chicken fried rice, or any of the fried rice is fantastic. It only comes with onions and peas and your choice of protein but boy are those veggies fresh. The family is always welcoming and the food is always a great choice.
Well, I thought no one could make a cappuccino as well as Coffeehouse Northwest...Barista can.  This is an excellent coffee shop and the staff is incredibly friendly and knowledgeable.  I have had espresso, cappuccino, and french press coffee here and all have been excellent.  The space itself is nice and open and also has an outdoor seating option.  Go to Coffeehouse NW if you want a more casual feel (and a younger crowd), go here if you're in The Pearl and want a great cup of coffee.
First time here and it was a wonderful experience! We arrived and the first thing I noticed was how clean/nice the restaurant was. The servers were all very attentive and friendly. They served us mini sorbets before dinner and they were delicious! I had the Chicken Pad Thai and it was so good! Even the way the food was presented on the plate was so nice. I will definitely bring my friends and family here again.
Really impressed! Food was excellent! All sorts of authentic flavors hit my tongue. A conglomerates of spices and textures done right. And the portions were gigantic. And for such an unassuming place. It's a hidden gem! Prices were great too! So was service! Definitely bringing my friends back!
When you go to Disney World's parks, you expect Mickey Pretzels, Ice Cream Bars, and Chicken Tenders. What you don't expect, is high end African fusion cuisine in the middle of Animal Kingdom.  I dined here solo and was given the most hospitable experience I believe I've ever encountered at a restaurant. The hostess was kind and seated me without a reservation, my server was nothing less than awesome and told me so many beautiful details about the restaurant I wouldn't have known, and I even sat next to some amazing people who actually worked in the restaurant and were dining on a day off.  I ordered the Lunch Tasting Menu ($49) with a Vanilla Passion Fruit Iced Tea which came with a side of Vanilla Bean Simple Syrup so you can control the sugar level.   The first course was a trio of a black eyed pea fritter, sous vide octopus, and butternut coconut milk soup with shrimp. Everything was exploding with flavor, and I was sad when it was gone. The octopus was fork tender and the sous vide process was utilized wonderfully.  The main course was from a selection and I chose a vegetarian ramen dish with a mushroom broth, vegetables, and a siracha lime sauce. Spicy, flavorful, large portion. Can't complain about an awesome bowl of ramen!  Finally was my favorite -- the dessert trio. Deconstructed cheesecake, guava mouse, and a ganache with Egyptian sea salt. As a pastry chef, I understand and appreciate the refinement that goes into a well-executed plate of dessert; all 3 of these were spotless on flavor, presentation, and variation of texture.  The sophistication of this meal belongs in a high-end restaurant that can compete in NYC or anywhere easily.   At the end of the meal, you receive a postcard collectible of an original drawing tributed to the AK. I love this restaurant, I love the food, and I love the service. Do yourself a favor and find some time to escape the jungle of the theme park and enjoy a fantastic meal at Tiffin's.
I just finished a 90 minute session with Elaine. I love this place! I've been coming here sporadically for two years.   She is very skilled and attentive and I always feel better afterwards. She always asks me what is going on for me physically and mentally, checks my hands and feet for temperature, looks at my tongue, etc.   The session involves both front and back acupuncture, with heat application, as well as a cupping session on my back, and some massage.   This is by far my preferred "preventative/balance" body work when compared to straight massage, etc. (Obviously sports medicine/physiotherapy are different realms.)  Great value, and she's super nice. I will return again and again.  (Her service is also eligible for most company health benefit plans. Check your coverage!)
There are few things in life better then a good old fashioned hotdog, and that's exactly what you get at Casey's.   Seating is limited to just counter space and a couple of small tables outside, with parking just as cramped. There is a takeout window on the side, which I typically order from and just eat in my car or sitting on the curb. Hotdogs are extremely inexpensive (~$2 with toppings), boil cooked, and tasty. There is no bend or squish to them, just a nice hard snap. Buns are just the way I like them, soft and moist. Toppings (ketchup, relish, etc) seem out of a can, but still quality goods. Orders usually take no more then a minute or two, and the staff is friendly as you'll find.  They aren't the best dogs I've had before, but certainly some of the better, and for the price, you really can't beat them. I believe they do serve some other items, but all I've ever had are the dogs, and never had a complaint. Certainly recommend if you're in the area or just have a craving.
Excellent spicy sausage pizza. Chicken Parmesan sliders were a great appetizer.
The food was good. They didn't have pitchers for beer. That was a bummer. The service was pretty good. The atmosphere was a little different than what I expected. It was quiet as hell in the bar even though college football was on. That shocked me. Maybe it's louder on NFL game days.
Pricey, but the spinach calzone is to die for!!! My kids also love the cheese pizza and can we just talk about the salad dressing the use in the Greek salad!?! OMG - if they bottles it I would buy it by the gallon. Soooooooo good!
I found this place on Yelp and stopped in after two hard days of soccer coaches camp on my way to Logan airport. I had pain everywhere and a lingering injury to my lower back.   I have been getting body work done for about 20 years and this was among the best massages, if not the best, I have ever had. When the therapist climbed onto the table and drove her knees into my back it was like nothing I have ever experienced.  Yes, it is a little different from a traditional massage in the US. The style is clearly less inhibited. Instead of being buried in blankets and exposing bits and pieces of the body to work on, the therapist uses a fairly small towel to cover just enough of the body for modesty purposes.  However, the results were amazing. I thoroughly enjoyed the technique and felt fantastic when I walked out. I thought the $60 up front for 60 minutes was a great deal and I tipped $20 to show my appreciation.  If you are a prude, you might not like it. If you are comfortable with your body and like to be worked on in unusual ways (ex., tummy rub) this is the place for you!
I've often scoffed at the hyperbolic hear-say surrounding Veracruz, but elected to give them a call this morning during a work break for a breakfast taco. I was placed on hold for twelve minutes. Being sassy and white, I showed them the phone upon my arrival, still on hold, and ordered at the window. They apologized. After eating my taco: I would be placed on hold at a pay phone in a hailstorm until there's a female president to eat that again. Go to here. I apologized.
Fabulous wine flights, great service, divine cheese plates, and chocolate fondue to finish a perfect dinner with friends :)
As a Vancouver native, I have gone to this bagel shop since I was little. The new location is a great refresh and finally matches the level of quality that goes into their bagels and drinks! I frequent this shop at least once or twice a month and have only ever had speedy, happy service.  As for the bagels, they have a vast selection of bagels and cream cheeses... My favourite thing to get is the Greek Eggel, perfect if you want a savory breakfast. I don't know why there are a couple sour reviews on here, I love the place, they do bagels like no other!
A friend of mine gave me the "newbie's tour" of Desta last night.  Technically, I have eaten Ethiopian food once in Washington, DC, but it was about 17 years ago and I was a teenager at the time.  I think my parents chose what we ordered (or maybe the server recommended something) and all I really remember is the part where you use the bread as your utensil.  I've killed a lot of brain cells since then.  My friend recommended the Beef (Tenderloin) Tibs with Shiro and the Vegetarian Combo.  She also explained to me that while a lot of Ethiopian food is very heavy on the sauce, Desta uses a lighter amount of sauce.  They say that the reason for that is that they're proud of their ingredients.  I can see why, because everything was very good.  If you ask to share your food between the members of your party, all the food will come out on one huge plate together.  This allows you to eat "family style" - and also entertainingly reach across the table pretty far, although fortunately, the tables are small so the reach isn't so bad.  The restaurant thoughtfully provides hand sanitizer at each table, which is probably a good idea when you're eating with your hands and sharing food.  The Beef Tibs with Shiro was delicious.  I'm a big fan of beef, and this tasted like high-quality meat.  It was seasoned perfectly (for being tasty - I have no way to know what "perfect" Ethiopian seasoning is yet) and accompanied by onions, tomatoes and I believe fresh jalapeno pieces.  And the shiro was yummy, too - I love hummus so it's unlikely that I'd ever complain about a flavorful chickpea paste.   The Vegetarian Platter was great, too.  I wasn't sure of exactly what items I was eating, so I came home and looked at the menu.  After I looked at the menu, I'm still not sure of all the items I ate because I feel like there were things we ate that aren't listed on the menu and vice versa.  (Not that I mind not knowing what I'm eating, because I eat Korean food pretty often now that I live out in BFE and I usually only know what about 30% of the banchan items are.)  Anyway, everything on the veggie plate was good (except that my friend and I did not try the halved fresh jalapeno with tomatoes because neither of us wanted that much fresh jalapeno).  Some items I remember trying were the collard green stew, the split pea stew, more shiro, a beet and potato salad, and a yellow-tinted cabbage dish.    There was also a salad of lettuce and tomatoes and a red paste which I loved and think it might have been vegetarian fir fir.  Oh, and there was also a dish that was made out of pieces of injera (the flat sourdough-tasting bread that you use to scoop up your food) and something that tasted like olive oil and maybe vinegar.  From looking at the menu now, I think that may have been a fit fit of some kind.    My favorite veggie items were definitely the shiro, the red paste, and the collards.  But there was nothing on that plate that I didn't like.  All of the items were served over more injera.  I guess I should have read the review earlier that mentioned that you are supposed to eat that injera too because it's yummy and has soaked up all the flavors.  Oops.  (Yeah, in retrospect that seems like common sense.  But my friend was minimizing her bread consumption and my week at work has been rough.  I don't think my brain is functioning at full capacity anymore.)  With all the food we ordered, our total check only came to around 24 bucks.  Not too bad for the opportunity to try a million and one items (well, maybe more like 10 items).  I let satiated but not stuffed, and looking forward to trying some more things the next time I eat at an Ethiopian restaurant.  My experience at Desta was definitely enjoyable.  The food was great and our service completely on point.  The main reason I'm not giving a full five stars is that I don't feel really qualified to judge Ethiopian food since I have so little experience with it.  Give me time to build a basis for comparison, and this may become 5 stars for me.  Oh, and on our way out of the restaurant, we noticed that Desta has a drive thru.  Drive-thru Ethiopian cuisine?  Win.
Fabulous place! Lit only with strings of Christmas lights and colored light bulbs, a variety of seating configurations from pub tables to booths to couches, cool local art on the walls, and a great menu. The DJ was great - began his set with Duran Duran's The Chauffeur - doesn't get much cooler than that! He (she?) played a fantastic variety of music and some people were dancing with wild abandon. The bartender Carrie (sp?) is fantastic. Super sweet and fun, interacted with people like she actually cared they were there, made delicious drinks and just provided top notch service all around. My girls and I decided that this is our Friday night standing date place!
So what is a "Hopdoddy" you ask, well on their main page of their web site it goes a little something like this...    Hopdoddy was created to express the perfect union of burgers and beer: Handcrafted Beer (Hop) + (Doddy), the nickname was given to the native cow in Aberdeen, Scotland.  And there you have it, simple and sweet, but make no mistake this place is not so simple but yet the employee's are sweet and very hard working. Everyone from the greeter standing outside in the rain (yes it started to sprinkle) making sure everyone had a menu and answered any questions that were asked. She even handed out some umbrella to customers who were in line but forgot to bring one!  Yes, on some days (mostly weekends) you will be standing in some form of a line to get in and then to order. They only let in so many people at a time as this place is a seat yourself  burger bar.   Because ACL was in town and the last day of the festival was cancelled due to rain, everyone invaded the SoCo area looking for things to do! We honestly waited in line for about an hour. It is crazy but we were bound and intent to eat here. Our greeter told us what to do once we entered the restaurant as she let us and a few of the other people who were in line in.   As we were standing in line waiting to place our order, I decided to order a drink from the bar, I cannot remember the name, but it had bourbon and some other stuff in it. The bartender was friendly and made my drink strong. First couple of sips it was good but while we were waiting in line I started to itch and break out in small rashes on my arms and neck. I was super embarrassed walking back to the bar to ask for a refund. Both the bartender and the manager were concerned and offered to make me another drink. Not wanting to piss my body off anymore than it already was I just asked for a refund. The manager said not to worry that it is okay as I told her I have never returned a drink in life.  One of the servers came up to us after I got back in line and asked how many in our group, Minh said two and we were handed our table number. Was told after we placed our order that we could find our table to the right side of the restaurant.  We finally made it up to the counter to order, with all that was going on, I completely forgot what I wanted to order hoping Minh would take his sweet time ordering his meal I scanned the menu and found what sounded good to me.  -Magic Shroom Burger with a gluten free bun, Angus Beef, Texas Goat Cheese, Field Mushrooms, Mayo & Basil Pesto.  -Shared some fries y Chile con Queso.  We got our drink, grabbed some utensils, and found our table. Our waiter brought our food out to us and asked if he could get us anything else (Ketchup, Mustard ect) he even came around and refilled our drink a couple of times!   My shroom burger was cooked medium well and was full of juicy meaty goodness! The gluten free bun was light and airy and had taste not some stale cardboard excuse for a healthy bun. This burger was huge (it is true, everything is BIGGER in Texas) I found myself having to half my burger which fell a part in the process of cutting so I could eat it. One bite and I was hooked like a fish, the texture of the goat cheese and the mushrooms were the best part!   The fries and queso were good so good in fact that I totally forgot that I am not really suppose to have any type of queso at all. Sadly, I was somewhat sick back at the hotel for a little bit. However, it was so worth it! Creamy queso with a kick of spice paired with grease free fries seasoned to a prefect crisp. It is everything you ever dreamed of in fries and cheese land!  It was a perfect burger for a prefect cooler, rainy day in SoCO!  A bonus point was that they loved my fries and queso photo on instagram! I really like when companies interact with their customers!   Three cheers for semi healthy burgers in Austin!!
Matoi has become our favourite, go-to sushi restaurant in the Tri-cities area. It's usually decently busy but not where there is a wait (unless you have a bigger group). We've always found the service to be attentive and prompt - tea refills, they give free pocky at the end too!  Food wise, we almost always order a couple of the same items - chicken karaage don, negitoro roll, unagi roll, and best of all the black cod (gindara). If you come at lunch you can get a good value lunch set with the gindara that comes with rice, a pickled side dish and miso soup. The black cod melts in your mouth!  Last but not least, I believe it's an authentic Japanese restaurant - even a lot of the servers are Japanese.
I visited this coffee shop while I was out and about. They have a front and back entrance, which leads to a parking lot. They offer almond milk (huge plus for me) and lots of flavor shots to choose from. Staff complimented my glass straws a few months ago, and I recently found out they now offer them in the store. I really appreciate that they are moving to being more environmentally friendly. Unfortunately every time I ask for no straws they still place them in the cup, defeating the purpose of me bringing in my own straw.
I have been a customer at this Bertuccis for a long time and the new restaurant is great. The changes to the menu are fantastic. There is a blonde manager there who has really changed the place around from what it was. She treats everyone like family including the staff and you can tell that they really want to be there. I highly recommend this restaurant!
Popped into Eastside Mario's on Thanksgiving Sunday with my boyfriend Rob and our friends Michelle and Jenn. We'd been poking around Lonsdale market and just wanted somewhere nice and chill to sit, eat and hopefully catch some rays with this lovely weather we've been having. Mario's may look a little 'commercialised' with all the 'Italian Grandma' (or should I say Nona) decor but I found it to be really cute and cosy.   The servers are friendly too (I was delighted to hear the English accent of one of the waiters as he busied to and fro - a little slice of home!) and very attentive. Our server was really sweet and friendly without coming off like a pest - she was very good at gauging when we needed something like a drink or an appy.   My friends have varying tastes in food and Rob is just plain fussy, but we were able to find something that suited all our palettes. I had the Ceasar Salad Piadini off the lunch menu which was really fresh and filling too, for a salad.   The sangria here is soooo nice, I had two and think I may have drank them too quickly as they were so good! Rob had the traditional burger - lovely juicy patty on a soft bun with home fries and fresh salad - who can argue with that? Jenn and Michelle shared a platter of crispy fried goodies. All in all, super happy and the spot on the balcony we were on was perfect!   We'll be here for a few more days at least so I wouldn't rule out popping in again :)
The only nail place to go to. Andy n Rosie are the best. Love them. Come check them out!
My family and I are big Thomas Haas and Ganache Patisserie fans, and I wanted to get cakes to celebrate an occasion with my family, but since both were already closing, I ended up going to Thierry. Boy, that ended up being a great choice as we liked the different chocolate cake slices that we got here a bit more than the other 2 places. The chocolate was very high quality and the cakes emphasized the chocolate taste. I'm definitely coming back.
Great service.  Also offers a 10% discount to students.
Small little place but extremely friendly staff, delicious poutine, sandwich and dips for the fries.
My fav pizza in Columbus hands down! It doesn't get better than their selection of sauce, crust, and toppings.  For something fun and delicious I recommend this combination. Get yourself a Smokin' Joe's with Howlin Hot sauce.. throw a few meats on there too. Then order their nacho's (you wont be disappointed). In my experience the pizza comes shortly after the nachos so what you do is take the left over nachos and dump them on the pizza.   You are welcome!   Update: I have recently spoken with people who complain about the service and how everyone is rude. I simply don't see it. I eat here probably 3-4 times a month and half dine in and half carry out. I have never had a bad experience with service. Perhaps some people are asking too much of a pizza joint? If they are looking for some fine dinning experience they can walk down the street to Harvest.
emailed them on a Friday night at 10 pm. answered within a hour. Daughter was in from out of town with a cracked i phone screen. Saturday morning was in and out in 30 minutes with the phone repaired. Fantastic, Brilliant service!!!! Don't go anywhere else . I've been to others over the years and trust me ,, don't go anywhere else
Discovered this Mexican cart in the new food carts at 43rd & SE Belmont (across the street from the old food carts). The woman and man inside were both super nice and accommodating.  I had the mushroom burrito in a bowl ($6.50) and they were able to sub black beans for the usual pinto beans. The bowl is generous (even includes guacamole) and more than enough for a full meal. It was really fresh and flavorful. I'll definitely be back.
The stars are for the tasty, not the presentation.  I've had cakes from here several times and when they say "do you want decorations on it?" they mean curly ribbons on the edges, which seems a little weird to me.  But people who aren't even cake fans adore their cakes so they must be doing something right!  As for the coffee, it can be hit or miss.  Seating is functional, not pretty.  Not the best coffeeshop to park yourself for the afternoon but it's in a plaza with plentiful parking so it's the perfect place to get coffee to go.
Nice place for taking the family to the movies. Nothing fancy, but still comfortable.  Inexpensive tickets and treats. They are remodeling the bathrooms so it can be a long wait if you need to use it.  In general it was a nice experience.
Fantastic! Went here for happy hour. I like happy hours at these types of restaurants because it allows use to try multiple types of food at reasonable rates. We tried oysters Rockefeller and these were way better than Trulucks and we like Trulucks. Lollipop Lamb Chops, I did not care for these because they did not have much flavor. On the positive side they were extremely tender! Asian fillet Mignon was outstanding. Carpetbagger appetizer was incredible. Tender and flavorful. Ahi Tuna tartar was outstanding. Great flavor super fresh. Chilled gulf shrimp was good, large and fresh.  Drinks: Cosmo was not that great, lot of liquor but missed the flavor. Bulleit Sour was great. Maverick and Sparkling Ruby were spot on.  Our bill was $127 without tip. Great price. Great flavor. Great service. We will be back for sure.  Almost forgot bananas flambe was really good. Looking forward to our next visit.
Had the passion fruit mimosas and vegetarian  patacon. I really enjoyed my drinks and food. I enjoyed the atmosphere. Definitely recommend it!!
Always pleasant. Professional. And speedy.  Have my mailbox here too and it's a great service and package.  Dont see me leaving here anytime soon
Club 205 is, you guessed it, right off the 205. Things that this place has going for them: $8.95 prime rib, $6.95 burgers, no cover, and cheap drinks. The girls are better looking on average, but honestly, that's not saying much. A missing tooth here a bad boob job there.   The Private Room is anything but that. You (or someone else) can purchase a dance, but everyone can see into the "private room". Depending on who you get, this could be worth it, but remember, no touching!  The claim to fame is that they have put the Hooters across the street out of business. Hopefully the girls from Hooters didn't have a tough time getting jobs at Club 205, it's the least they could have done.
Best breakfast in Boulder!! Love the feel of the place, our server was great, and the food was delicious. It's always busy though, so be prepared to wait. You can go walk along Pearl st. to kill the time
Excellent ambience and extremely delicious food. Service could improve on terms of speed.
Great place to kick back with a happy hour martini (dirty martini is a special favorite). Love the calamari appetizer. Good fish and chips.
Went here for dinner in day two of our trip. It was recommended by a few people in the Denver area. It was awesome! We sat at the bar and explained to the bartender we were there on our anniversary trip. He gave us each a free glass of champagne with a strawberry! I wish I could remember his name! He suggested Poulet en Brique for my wife and it was delicious! The chicken had so much flavor and so tender! She loved it and so did I. I had the steak frites and it was great. The meat was ordered medium well and came out a little more on the medium side. It was still delicious and full of flavor! When we go back were definitely coming back to this place. Once I remember the bartenders name I'll make sure to post it. He was the only guy behind the bar on March 27th when we went! Didn't catch their happy hour but will make sure to catch it next time!
In town on business for the week and I was getting really sick of going out to restaurants and having to pick from the one or two vegetarian/vegan options they had on the menu. Finally made my escape and was able to find this gem. Good grief! Absolutely delicious food. Definitely one of the top 3 vegan dishes I've had.  So much selection, very fresh ingredients and an awesome environment. Music was great too.  Never thought I'd look forward to another business trip - I'll be back!
Table of 7 Beer selection: 5/5  They have a good selection on tap, and they do half liters, liters, and boots. Can't go wrong  Service: 4/5  I've heard this place can have bad service but I guess we got lucky. Food: 3.5/5 German pretzel, unfortunately, not good. Way way way too salty, not like it is in Germany. I would rather eat the one in Germany ice cold with no side than this one warm with cheese.  Sausages were delicious, and potato dumpling wasn't the best I've had but definitely tasty.  I will try other selections next time I go.  Price: 4/5  Typical German restaurant prices, but I am glad their beers aren't overpriced. Went to a German restaurant that charged 7.50 for a half liter of warsteiner, now that's ridiculous. This place doesn't do that. You get a whole liter for $11.   Their live music brought me back to Germany. Their long tables are just like an authentic German Biergarten and the music reminded me of Oktoberfest. The place is much bigger than you'd expect.  Overall I would definitely come back. This place is perfect for large parties and celebrations. Definitely a lot of fun. Hopefully the rest of the food brings my rating up to 5/5.
This is the best place to get your ears lowered! They don't take take credit card and a cut is $15 so be prepared. These guys use the old straight razor and make sure you don't walk out with hair on your shirt. Do your dignity a favor and skip the strip mall hair salons and let these guys take care of you.
Everything here is good-- the burgers, the fries (especially the truffle fries), the milkshakes, and the atmosphere. This is a great place to go with friends, and don't be intimidated by the line that snakes out the door -- there is great people watching to be done on South Congress!
I have done my hair with Johnny since 3 years ago and I just love him. he is the best hair color professional that I've met.  He understands exactly what I want and always makes me very satisfied with my hair color and also hair cut. Also I love his personality. He is calm, sweet and makes me trust him. He is very professional, friendly and efficient. I give him 5 stars. Every time I go to Patrice Vinci I leave happy and relaxed. Thanks Johnny for being such a great professional and for making me feel so happy with my hair.
Everyone knows Suzette makes good crepes, and it is hip and trendy and a great place to take your mom, friend from out of town, or freshen you up after a night of binge drinking, but Suzette also cares about their customers.  I wanted a very special Mother's Day this year and that included a sh*t ton of crepes for my mom, family, and girlfriend's family.  Suzette gladly obliged.  Not only did they make us a yummy collection of to go crepes for the crew, but they blew my mind in how flexible and inexpensive the special order was.  Highly recommend
Awesome place to visit on a lazy day! The UBC campus is like a small town and the Beaty is worth a visit
For price, selection, good house brands, and some exotic items, this is my weekly grocery store.  Fruits and vegetables are fresh.  Staffing/checkout is good considering how many people go there on a Saturday.  Employees are helpful and friendly.  The secret to their low prices is volume, and they stock continuously during the day.  The down side is that it's usually crowded, hard to find a parking space in the huge lot, and stockers are taking up space for carts.  When the (non-unionized) employees shut the operation down to support their former and current CEO Artie T, I shop at other places (not crossing a picket line), and it made me realize that the value of MB is undeniable.
Bahn Mi, Pho, Vermicelli.  Not great service, but a great choice for Pho if you're in that neck of the woods.
I wanted to give a yelp out to James Allan Salon for hosting Cuts for the Cause on Sunday, August 17. I'd never been to one of these but I needed a haircut so I figured I'd give it a shot. The email I received said stylists from James Allan would be there alond with stylists from Bob Salon.   They were busy when I arrived and the atmosphere was fun. There were lots of couples with babies and families coming in for cuts. I signed in and they said the wait would be about 25 minutes. They had lots of free food...delicious chocolate cake, cookies, tacos from Zocalo, cheese and crackers. There were reps from Trinity Center, a resource center for the homeless.   People were wandering around with wet hair and I realized Cuts for the Cause is all about volume (unintended hair pun). They just wash and cut, there is no blow dry/styling.   After about 45 minutes, I was hooked up with a stylist who works at the salon. As for the cut, well, it's not the best cut I've had but it's not the worst. The person who cut my hair was nice enough and seemed competent but there was no chance for her to check the cut after it was dry and tweak as necessary. So this morning I got out the fabric scissors and trimmed some straggly ends.   They get four stars for donating their time and energy on a day when salons aren't usually open. If I was just rating the haircut, I'd give them a three.
I have been to the 4 Rivers in Ocoee several times. This one is new and,flavorful and  very close to our home. It is also new, opened this week.  We were there at 2:00 and there was a line but moved good. I asked for a sample of Burnt Ends as I have not had them before. The server gave me a plain sample and then added their BBQ sauce. Yippee. I do not like BBQ sauce but this was delicious. The meat was tender , juicy and flavorful. It was not tomatoey just a sweet sour savory taste. The okra was crisp yet tender.  The sweet potato casserole was very flavorful.  I do not like grits, but the cheesy grits were good.  It was a   delicious experience.
I needed a uhaul the week of my move, and found this location not far from my current apartment.  It sits off the 85 access road, and can be a little challenging to get too if you are taking 85 South (challenging bc you have to cross 3 lanes of traffic on the access road to turn in).  I booked my time for a 9am pickup on Sunday online and requested a dolly and moving blankets.  I ended up getting there around 8:50ish, and they already were open, which was awesome!    I was checked in very fast, and had everything set to go.  It was a very smooth and easy process.  The guy also extended my time with the vehicle just in case.  I loaded up quickly and parked my car around the back (not much parking to leave your vehicle).  I ended up returning the truck pretty quickly with my move, and total only came to $93 for the 17 foot truck plus paying for the gas I didn't refill.  FYI - the 17 foot truck is really only good for a 1 bedroom apartment.  I had a great experience here, which certainly differs from what I read.  I'd use them again!
Got take out from here a while ago. I had the aloo gobi which is cauliflower and potatoes stewed in a tomatoey sauce. OMG it was so good. I've tried aloo gobi at a few other places but so far none have measured up to this place!
Not my first time here but it's definitely been awhile. I remember I used to come here based on the premise that it was the "best Pho in Austin." I'm not sure if I really agree with that, mainly because I don't remember. The drive here is always fun, as the restaurant is located right after a big dip in the hilly road. As I walk in, I always notice the empty buffet to the left. I don't know what time of the day they do buffet, because I have never seen it open (granted, I've only been here like 3 times).  I guess I never noticed before because I've never had it, but the first thing I noticed when I opened the menu was the PAPAYA SALAD! Having had it at every meal in Thailand, it was imperative that I order it because I have yet to find it at any restaurant in the US. The menu offers it with shrimp but the waitress recommended I try the squid.  The flavor is not as strong and pungent as it was in Thailand, but this is to be expected. It still had the light refreshing taste of the papaya that I love, though. The grilled and skewered squid was a nice addition, making the perfect appetizing starter.  I actually didn't opt for Pho at this visit and decided to try the vermicelli bowl instead. It had a good sauce, but for once I feel like they didn't put enough. Most of the time whenever I eat out at Asian places, it's like sodium overload. For this, there was a lot of vermicelli and not an adequate amount of sauce, making the overall taste pretty bland. However, once some of the vermicelli has been eaten and the sauce/noodle ratio was more appropriate, this dish was actually very delicious. The portion was huge also, I had to take some to go.  If I do not find another place to fill my papaya salad crave, then I MUST come back to 888 sometime in the future.
Very consistent in quality and service! It's enjoyable to go out with loved one into this kind of establishment. Pricey, but that's what make an experience memorable.
I agree with Michelle C's review. The Dim Sum is more expensive than I'm used to paying, it is not as authentic as I'm used to eating and the selection isn't as broad as I would expect.  However, if you're a girl like me who dreams of Har Gau (shrimp balls), wakes up craving Congee (rice soup) and for who eating Gai Mei Bao (coconut bun, chicken tail or cocktail bun) is forever linked to the memory of my dad taking us to the chinese bakery after our weekend lunches in Chinatown, this place is heaven.  I went to Get Sum Dim Sum for lunch on Friday. It is a very casual restaurant. You order at the counter and they give you a number then bring you your food. This is perfect if you are eating alone, as I was. It is also perfect for take out, if you just need to grab something quick you can call ahead and then stop in to pick it up. It's would not be that quick or easy at a traditional dim sum restaurant with cart service. I ordered a la carte. My food was delicious, not exactly what I'm used to getting at a more traditional Chinese restaurant but still very yum. The combos they offer seem like a very good value if you want something off their top 10 menu.  I've been thinking about going back every hour since I left. This place is definitely a mouth watering winner!
I went to Henri's Bakery with my younger brother for lunch while he was in town visiting. Believe it or not I had NO idea this place existed until just recently. Not, I've been missing out. Great place to meet a friend for lynch in Buckhead that's classy but on the cheap.   Definitely plan to return.
Went to Pet Supermarket yesterday to use an emailed coupon the corporation had sent me. (They send out a phenomenal newsletter usually monthly and often have great coupons in them for either $2 off of a $10 purchase or sometimes $5 off of a $25 purchase.)   I knew this store had recently been renovated and was wanting to see what was new.  I have to say they did a great  job.  The store is beautiful and well organized, brightly lit and very clean. And the best thing.... the two young female employees were very helpful.   The other best change to me was there was actually prices on just about all of the merchandise!  This was always a problem with this store in the past as it seemed employees just mostly stood around even though a great many items had no prices. Bringing it to the attention of the employees made no difference. I am always annoyed when a store makes it a habit of not pricing their merchandise and cause customers to have to ask what the prices are on many items.  AND I don't think it is helpful when an employee says that I should feel free to ask like as if they are afraid I consider it an inconvenience for them!  I don't want to shop that way and they never seemed to get what an inconvenience it is to the customer to constantly have to bring items up to the register to find out the prices.    I hope this store continues to be well run. It is greatly improved!
Not a big fan of hibachi usually but this place was very good! I was able to get tofu as a choice hibachi style. Big portion sizes! The chef (Yuki) was genuinely funny and not just the generic script comedy some hibachi places provide. The manager came over to check on us a few times and he was also very nice and funny. Came as a visit I in the Orlando area so not sure if/when I'll frequent again, but it's worth a visit for sure!!
Great place to end our tour of Salem on. It was freezing outside and this restaurant was an oasis of warmth, good seafood and yummy cocktails. The wait staff were friendly and knowledgeable about the days catch. Everything we orders was delicious- oysters, pizza, fried shrimp, lobster quesadillas and fried pickles. Only downside was the basket of lobster came out whole with no prior cuts or cracks and therefore was extremely difficult and messy to try and crack and eat.
The tower is incredible. The shaded paths are lovely. The flowers are always in bloom in the spring. It's magical.
Lots of variety and interesting flavors and the donuts taste good! We arrived on a Monday around 10am and there was a line inside but it went by quickly. We ordered the Maple Bacon, Valrhona Chocolate Crunch, and Blueberry Basil. My favorite was the Valrhona Chocolate Crunch, I really enjoyed the crunchy texture from the Chocolate Crunch. I definitely recommend if you're in town!
Pretty solid indian food. I always ask for delivery to UBC, and almost always ordered their butter chicken. The portion and quality is very good, and I (think) it is authentic butter chicken. The delivery process is straight forward and on time. Unlike other places, they can actually find the address that you told them to deliver the food.
Always amazing food and service. Get the vegetable deluxe it is phenomenal. They are willing to work with you on your dietary needs. Been coming here for years and it never disappoints.
I've been here a couple of times, and it reminds me of the mechanic shop that I used to work for when I was in high school.  Not the ones where after looking at your car for hours they say you need parts that you don't want or can't afford, but honest hardworking mechanics who will fix your car the same day you bring it in.  I recently had been towed in from the highway, and after a dreadful morning of breaking down on the highway, missing some of work, and dreading the damage done moneywise, I was surprised to hear that not only would my car be fixed within hours of dropping it off, but I could hold off on the more expensive services and they could keep track of them for a later date when I could be able to afford it.  I didn't get ripped off, I didn't get upsold something that was ridiculous, and I wasn't taken for a ride - I was served and on my way.  Definitely found my go-to place for car maintenance.
It's really nice a lot of food there has to be something for everyone best Chinese buffet in Orlando
Oh man! So good! Clean, quiet and delicious! Don't let the building fool you, it's amazing.
With PDX 671 recently moving to the Rose City Food Park on NE 52nd and Sandy, I figured it was time to re-visit this cart and have some tasty Guamanian food. Last time, I missed out on the Kelaguen Mannok, and I made certain not to get shut out again. I basically did everything short of calling in to reserve a bowl. Spicy pandas gotta eat, you know.  Kelaguen Mannok is a cold dish with chopped grilled chicken, lemon, grated coconut, peppers, and onions. Some minced Bird's Eye chili also gets added to make it a tad spicier. I honestly don't know what took me so long to order this. OK, so there are 700 food carts in Portland. Can't find this elsewhere (at least to my knowledge).  With all due respect to the Bird's Eye chili, the lemon really makes this dish pop that much more. The refreshing aspect keeps me coming back for another bite. Slowly but surely, the heat will intensify, but it's not gonna make me race to the nearest water fountain.  Hineksa Agaga (red rice) is really white rice with achotte added to give it its color. It's characterized as having a slightly sweet, nutty, and peppery flavor. Achotte is basically used like saffron to flavor and color rice.  Make sure you ask for the Finadene, because that stuff is awesome. Soy sauce, lemon, chili peppers, onions. The heart of Chamorro cuisine. Add it to your rice and Kelaguen Mannok, then thank me after you've recovered from your food coma.  Another awesome cart with delicious food! I'll be back for sure.
Delicious and flavorful food. Nearly everything is outstanding. I love the ramen with their own special fresh eggs that they use wow! really, i never knew a regular egg could be so fresh buttery and deep orangey gold color. It tells you something about a restaurant that pays attention to even basic details like  an ordinary egg. What's even better is that the owners remember me and my boyfriend and know and remember exactly what we like outstanding customer service and warm hospitality! They go out of their way to accommodate us on all of our orders. Also their dishes are perfectly sized overflowing with delicious flavors! Go to eat here! You will not be disappointed.
We had a great time here. $10 gets you a nice tasting glass and 5 tastes. We all liked the beers, and they gave us lots to talk about and compare. Staff was friendly, enthusiastic, and knew their brews !   I'm not sure the space was heated. It was quite chilly. So if you're going in the colder months, bundle up!   Good place to go before heading over to Decatur proper for dinner.
I came here on a mission for one thing and one thing only, the beignet sundae.  For those who don't the beignet is New Orleans version of the doughnut.  In my opinion the beignet is one of the best Disney desserts you can get.  My trusted guide Disney Food Blog recommended getting cappuccino ice cream so I got that along with the Nutella ice cream.  I would just pick one flavor next time, but it was still good.  Now how good is it in my opinion, real good but not amazing.   This is definitely worth a try.
As a farewell lunch (aka celebration) of one of my coworkers last days, we ventured over to Max & Dylans for some delicious middle of the day treats. We started off the meal with their philly cheese steak spring rolls. (I did not make that up.) The concept sounded ridiculous- but I have NEVER enjoyed a philly cheese steak more (and I'm from PA). Wanting a lighter lunch, I ordered their French Onion soup which was fantastic- perfect portion to fill me up and still make me feel light enough to finish the day. Luckily, my coworkers ordered their infamous mac & cheese so I could steal a few bites. It was refreshingly light, yet flavorful- cooked to mac & cheese perfection. I loved the atmosphere- with a loft-style layout, nice Euro-feeling bar when you walk in and unique artwork that makes you keep the kids at home. I will definitely return here for lunch (or dare I say dinner), and call it another success of Downtown Crossing!  P.S. After being inside all morning and wanting a little Vitamin D- I was irrevocably happy to find my myself sitting underneath a ceiling of windows beaming sunlight on me as if I had opted out of going to work and instead laid by the Charles and relaxed. (That only lasted about 5 seconds, when I found myself glancing at my watch wondering if we'll make it back to work in time.) Max & Dylans got me through work on Friday!!
Marutama specializes in chicken broth ramen and they do it excellently well, out of the dozens of ramen places on robson street this is the place to go for chicken broth; the broth here is so rich and stands out a lot more compared to other places  The noodles here are freshly made and has a superb texture, noodle refills here are also very quick which is great  Pros: + Chicken broth + Noodles + Simple menu + Style/atmosphere of restaurant   Cons: - Not much variety for sides/drinks - Location isn't very noticeable from robson st
A few years ago I ordered from Thaitation based on the yelp reviews. I'm so glad I did!! There is only one other Thai place in Boston that rivals Thaitation and that's Brown Sugar....and apparently the chef at Thaitation was the chef at Brown Sugar for 13 years, so that explains that.   I've eaten in once but order delivery regularly. Delivery is always on time or within reason, which I appreciate.   The Old Lady Spicy with shrimp (my #1) Pineapple Cashew Shrimp, Fishermans's Madness, Drunken Noodle and Mango Fried Rice are among my favorites. Their soups, specifically the wonton are always a pleasant addition to my order and the honey glazed spareribs are delish.   My only complaint is that I like really spicy food and most of the time it's not as spicy as I like it. I ask for it to be really, really, really spicy and sometimes it is but most times it's not. Maybe my tongue is dead from all the spice.   I won't eat Thai elsewhere (unless it's Brown Sugar) because inevitably I will be disappointed.
Went on Sunday night, staff was nice.  food was good, price "is what it is", but I just miss the days of Red Lobster being a dimly lit with nice music softly playing in background fancy restaurant.  now its loud rock music and babies crying near so it's like for these prices I can go to Park Ave.
This is a well-spent hour and $10. Our tour leader Renzo, a freshman, was engaging, funny, full of interesting facts.
Not what we were expecting.  The self serve coffee was amazing.  And the food was exactly what we were looking for.  I wanted something that wouldn't put me down for a nap.  Ordered their poached eggs with avocado and grilled tomatoes on toast (English muffin) with a fresh side salad.  Meal was done perfectly, very tasty and filling.  Menu is pretty extensive including some generously portioned dishes with sausage, chorizo and crispy fried tomatoes.  Small, single room cafe feel with friendly wait staff.  We would go back for the food.   Hit the spot!
What a great place to dine with friends.  This restaurant, in the Rosen Shingle Resort, is among the best in the area, which is why, we could not believe how empty it was on a Friday evening.  It certainly wasn't because of the food or service which were superb!  All our entrees (pan seared scallops, grouper, seabass and braised short ribs) were a good size and scrumptious.  JJ, our server, was both very personable and helpful.  For the amazing quality of the food, this definitely is a great place to dine.
Tasty reasonably priced sushi. Good sized portions.  Service is a bit hit and miss (wait times can be long), but the staff is generally friendly.  Nothing that will make you think you're in Japan, but better than anything else I've found south of the city.  No kids menu, if that sort of thing matters to you (it does to me), though we ordered the fish and chips for our 4 year old, and they were out of this world.
Expatriate Games  After going to Beast a couple of years ago and falling madly in food love, I knew I'd give Expatriate a shot.   First things first, the website is a real turnoff to me. It tries too hard with its microscopic, unreadable black writing, clever titles and statements like 'open eight days a week.' Barf. Portland doesn't need places to try any harder than they already do. Let's agree to not give the rest of the world reasons to make fun of us.  Moving along.  Crab Rangoon--This isn't your favorite Thai restaurant's crab rangoon. The crab is so fresh, so delicate, so tasty. The won tons were cooked perfectly and the accompanying sauce had the perfect amount of heat and sweet.  In fact, many of the dishes here incorporate amazing flavor combinations and a stunningly perfect heat.  Chinese Sausage Corn Dog--This was the only miss. My first bite was all dough and frankly, all donut. In fact, I'm guessing this is the same dough they use in the donut dessert. But as is, it missed the mark. The sausage is too sweet and gets lost in the sweet dough. The hot mustard is almost inedible, so there is nowhere to take this sweet, carby mass on a stick. Skip it.  Onion & Butter Sandwich--Everyone knows that James Beard was the mac daddy of all chefs. Actually, I have no idea who James Beard was (is?), but I know if you're a James Beard chef, you're pretty amazing. I also know this sandwich of stinky, fatty, Better Homes & Gardens Cookbook items is heavenly, I mean completely divine in my mouth.   Brussels Sprouts & Ground Lamb--True perfection. I'm not a fan of sprouts, I merely tolerate them. This is a complex dish in which every bite makes a statement and invites you back for more. This dish embodies a team--the individual ingredients are less powerful than the way they work together.   Korean Fried Game Hen--Plenty of meat on this bone, deliciously fried and flavored. Like the other dishes, you practically want to lick the plate because it's covered in special sauce and other tiny, sweet morsels.  The space is great--modern, romantic, hip, intimate, but maybe a bit cramped and way too dark for food that amazing. It's like she's trying to prevent the food porn culture from plastering every moment on Instagram.   Our server was really friendly, helpful and genuinely enthusiastic. I thought it was a little much when the gentleman who delivered our food told us that the silverware was made of radon (see paragraph one).  Unsurprisingly, Naomi Pomeroy proves that in Portland, it's quality, not quantity that wins. You don't have to own 10 restaurants (or even three) to make a statement in this town. In fact, I'd like her to stay small, stay focused and stay amazing because of it.   One of the best meals around. I'll be back again and again. Truly special in a town where the bar is set pretty high.
Curra's is a gem in the the waste land of Tex-Mex. This Oaxacan style bar/grill is by far my favorite Mexican food in the city. I love it.  This place is rightly neon, filled with cheap beer and not too pretty. But the spices are rich, the plates are satisfying, and I can think of nothing better than eating here after a long day hiking or kayaking.  All the sauces are exceptional! While the meat was not the shmanciest thing in the world, it's dressed up with an expert hand and I could expect nothing better for the price. The seafood is definitely the smartest choice, and the shrimp I had were great.  I'd also recommend the mole enchiladas, which were fantastic! The mole is rich, dark and perfectly spiced.  Also, the coffee! With my addiction, it should be no surprise that I tried it, but I was completely surprised by how wonderful it was. Deep vanilla dark roast is a definite plus for me.   This place is what Austin should be: fun, reasonably priced, casual, and plain good. Grab a few beers and don't worry how you look, you're in Austin, not SoCo realty magazine.
Not only did we get in with a minimal wait (ten minutes for four people on a Friday) but the waiter was extremely accommodating! When asked a question (whether it had to do with food or the area; we are not from here) he would find out the answer by looking it up. Our table was clean and our glasses were never empty. We had good food and wonderful service, definitely worth the trip!!!
Fun izakaya atmosphere, good selection, but sort of feels like a Japanese food theme park  The menu is extensive and features many of my favorite Japanese dishes.  Overall, the food is usually quite good, but occasionally the flavor, quality, and portions can be inconsistent.    Part of the issue might be that by trying to execute on so many different types of Japanese cuisine, they can't be excellent at all of them.  There are other spots in Portland that do individual dishes (e.g., sushi, ramen) better, but none that offer a one-stop-shop of so many types of Japanese food.  They have decent sushi, but it's the other menu items that keep us coming back (it's similar to Maneki in Seattle in that way).  The yakitori-style skewer options were especially good with the tsukune (ground chicken) and pork belly (technically not yakitori since it's not chicken) becoming favorites.  It has a fun, lively, izakaya vibe, but the furnishings and extensive menu sometimes make it feel like a caricature of a Japanese restaurant.  Early and late happy hours are good times to sample across their menu (fewer choices than their regular menu but still a lot more variety than most happy hours)  Service is usually good, but can be slow when the restaurant is really busy, especially at dinner.  Waits for a table can be very long.
Randomly found myself here on my walk home- didn't know it had reopened!   The pizza is great, and came out fast. The staff was super friendly, and even offered me a free latte after I ordered a water and then decided I wanted a latte as well (once I layed my eyes on their espresso machine).  Super impressed- and so happy to have a good pizza spot in my neighborhood!
So the wife needed to eat so we come in, place is done up nice. This is probably the best looking qdoba I have been to. The staff was real friendly manager was really nice. Of course the food was delicious.
Ok, I like this place. But since it's in the Good Food Here pod, that's pretty much a given.  I've tried 3 of the dishes, though I don't remember all of the specifics. One of them had sweet glazed pork, which I had never had before... but will definitely have again. Yum! For some of the dishes, the items are separated out on the plate, allowing you to add as much jalepeno or specific veggies as you want.   For the meat dishes, I think the price is a bit steep  - $7.50 for a decent sized plate of food (the other northern Thai carts have bigger portions for this price). But the vegetarian dishes (or at least the pad dish that I had last time) are a dollar cheaper while still being just as tasty and filling. So as far as economical eating goes, the veg dishes are your best bet, but the other dishes are still really, really yummy - don't cross them off your list completely.
This restaurant and lounge is a nice addition to Ponce. The interior is contemporary with lounge seating and swings as seating at the bar. Their drinks are excellent and the food is really good. There's not a drink menu yet but there is a beer and wine menu. Although this place just opened, the staff seems to be very knowledgeable and extremely attentive.  I highly recomemd the chicken and waffle sliders, the boogalou wings, and the crab cakes. They also have happy hour specials.    One thing to keep in mind is that there is valet parking which is typically free for women and $5 for men.
I used this company in Sept 2016 and again in January 2017.  Both moves were extremely smooth, nice, friendly crew, showed up on time, worked hard and did a great job.  I would highly recommend them.
The Storm Crow is a gem. It has come a long way since it first opened its doors, particularly the food. The menu has a good hearty selection at decent prices. The original $5 menu was enticing but a little off the mark with the quantity and quality. However, that being said the revamped menu has a wider array of delicious options. For example the Elvish Veggie Burger, Chickpea Fries, and Nachos Supreme. I am a vegetarian, and the veggie burger was so good. Also, the chickpea fries were so awesome, definitely recommend them.  This is definitely one of my favourite spots to game, that is board game! The array of games is quite the feat. My favourite is Apples 2 Apple and Cards Against Humanity , but I am expanding my horizons. I am pretty sure they have most games your looking for!  Last but not least, the ambience of this place is probably what it is best known for. A fantastical homage to everything fantasy. Overall, if you're looking for a fun, laid-back atmosphere to play board games, drink beer, and revel in your favourite fantasy movie/book/or game this is the spot!
I've now been thrice, and have thoroughly enjoyed the experience every time. That being said, I have only limited experience with Dim Sum. I mostly appreciate that they have many vegetarian options, and all are clearly labeled as such. Additionally, I really enjoy the ability to order a variety of many different menu items, and still pay less than $20 for two people.  Overall, though, I was originally inspired to write a review based on the multiple negative service reviews. Each time I've visited, I was immediately greeted with a smile and verbal hello. They always seem in such high spirits, maybe like they're even having fun! At work! Most recently, we unknowingly walked in 5 minutes before close (which is 9pm, FYI), and still received the same friendly greeting. We offered to leave, but they insisted we stay and even fired up a few things so we could get everything we ordered. They were patient, personable, and showed no sign of frustration or disappointment. As far as I could tell, they really were happy we were there, and were glad to service us, even as they lingered past close while we finished our food. The place is very clean and orderly to boot. I'll definitely visit again! And you should (get sum) too!
My experience at Eclipse di Luna has always been excellent,  but my last visit was beyond expectation.  Our server Julian was absolutely fabulous and we really enjoyed his service.  His menu suggestions were fabulous. We love every item on the menu and when we had an issue with one dish, he took care of it without hesitation.  We will be heading back again very soon and of course will request Julian as our server!
Not the best breakfast taco I've ever had in my life but it definitely did the job. We had a big order and they got everything just right which was good! The prices are also very reasonable and there was plenty of parking!
fantastic italian cuisine.  note: by "italian" i don't mean just various pastas and your typical chicken saute' dishes--this is a pretty eclectic mix of FANTASTIC seafood, steaks, chops, and pastas.  wine selection is substantial but the mark-up isn't.  the mussels appetizer is an absolute MUST.  can get noisy and crowded at times, but to me this has always been the sign of a great restaurant.  in terms of legitimacy, let me put it this way:  my italian professor (who is an italian immigrant) says Tuccis is her favorite italian place in columbus.  they have a happy hour special at their bar for half price appetizer too, i believe.
If you are looking for some tofu chigae. COME HERE! Hands down the best place to go if you are craving hot Korean tofu soup. It is always packed but the wait is worth it. I come here often and it has never failed to be delicious. I have tried the surrounding Korean spots but Kaju will always be #1. My regular order is the mild Kimchi Pork Tofu Chigae.
Shari's hands down has the best pies around.  Took our granddaughters there after seeing the lights on Peacock Lane and throughout Portland and before driving through the Winter Wonderland at the Portland International Raceway.  Started an annual family event with the help if Shari's.
I wasn't expecting the food to be so delicious! I absolutely loved my Paesano - get it hot! The pictures don't even do it justice, my meal was just so good and I definitely got my money's worth. You can get beer cheese for $1.50 to dip your chips in, which I did not do this time but I wish I had! The chips weren't bad on their own but I can only imagine how delicious they would be with the cheese.
It was a very light ambience with a variety of beers and cocktails. Typically known for eating outside during the summer, it was a  warm winter escape that allowed for catching up with old friends.   We only got drinks but the food looked wonderful, I wish we could've stayed another day to eat there. The drink menu was exceptional, comprised of great mixed drinks and draft beers.   Would definitely recommend to a friend visiting from out-of-town or for drinks after work.
Ooooh, I really really really loved this place. I was looking for something for a Sunday brunch and found this spot. I had smoked salmon egg Benedict and it was fantastic. Home fries were also sweet. I also tried their French toast for which I had no room left in my stomach but I'm sure it was good. Will go back sometimes very soon and definitely try their French toast as I promised myself
I've been coming here for about a year now and I love this salon. They're always busy but get you seated pretty quick. Manis, pedis, waxing- Ive always had generally great work and I'm pretty picky! They play cool movies if you watch and you can get wine or a cool drink too. :)
Microblading- Catherine did an amazing job Microblading my eyebrows. She was able to make them full and even. It was quite a job because I had very little natural brow to work with and they were extremely uneven. Catherine took the time to make sure that I was comfortable and numb (she uses an amazing numbing cream and I didn't feel any pain).  She is definitely a perfectionist and made sure that I was 100 % satisfied with her work. They look absolutely amazing and I am ecstatic that I no longer have to spend 15-20 min every morning putting makeup on my brows! Catherine has a very cute, clean and relaxing studio that is easy to get to. She is professional, timely and talks you through the process which made me feel very confident in her abilities. I could not be happier with my results! Thank you so much, Catherine! You're a miracle worker!
Great little hole in the wall place for Ramen. Simple menu with few options which is a huge plus in the add on craziness that seems prevalent these days. HOT broth, great taste. Will be back again!
This is the closest bar to my house and I've been coming here since it was Agenda (thank goodness it's not Assets anymore.)  The bartender is awesome!  The beer selection is great!  I love a good hefeweizen and this place always has a couple good ones to choose from.  I'm not a huge IPA guy but I also really enjoy the Stein Haus IPA.  The food is unique and the few items I've had have been very tasty if not slightly overpriced in my opinion.  Two pinball machines (I wish you guys would rotate them though) and free corn hole outside near the large, nice, covered patio.  This is a great place to come share a beer with a friend or two.  One of the things I really appreciate about this establishment is I get the impression that the staff really cares about making this a great place to hangout.  From the way they treat the guests to the decor that I've seen the bartender work on they really put themselves into this place.  Good job, keep it up!
pretty great, quick, easy, cheap lunch. went with a coworker for the first time, and i've been a little underwhelmed by most of the lunch places. had a great tofu bun- they cook the tofu really nicely.  i like tofu with flavor that i can afford--and this has been the best I've had so far..  busy with a long line at lunch, but goes fast and is a really more-than-enough-delicious-food stop.
Loved it! Beautiful!  Great customer service, clean rooms, nice pools! Added bonus was the kids activities.  Every day they have a schedule of activities to keep the kiddos busy.   We had a 1 bedroom king suite with full kitchen. It was plenty of room for our family and very peaceful.  It was like a home away from home.  We will definitely stay again.
Always a line and now I know why! Visiting from Hawaii we don't get this type of food at all.  Everything was savory and tasty. Honestly this place made the most impact on my taste buds during my vacation.  As they say, eat where the locals eat!
The food is very heavy and I would never recommend coming here for ANYTHING light. My friends and I frequent it more as a sports bar. Lots of TV and great for watching basketball or football. There's even a nice little garden area with a ping pong table for a friendly match.   If you're coming for brunch, I recommend their take on the chicken and waffle. I'm not a fan of syrup so I subbed gravy and wasn't disappointed. The donut thing is overrated. Reminded me more of boiled bagels.
I checked out Mike's Comics it was definitely a good recommendation by one of my other collector friends their prices are pretty fair and they have a large inventory of stuff I definitely rate it in my top 3 of local comic/toy places
I am Canadian so I know my donuts, I grew up on Tim Horton's but these are a different breed. My boyfriend and I sent to Portland last summer and our Airbnb host recommended blue star vs. Voodoo and I've had to go back every time.   The donuts are tasty, sweet but sophisticated. Hard to say which flavor is my favorite but try them all, you really can't go wrong.   There are a few locations so I have never had to line up around the block for a donut and they serve stumpton coffee at most places!
I had lé cheeseburger, pink, naked fries which were delicious, clean oil. Bun toasted and buttery. The sauce for the burger, light but flavory. Cheese's texture and light flavor, heated just right releasing the subtle oils from the formagio! Ask for the house made bar-b-que sauce on the side--dipping yummy . Sarah  the bar-maid is lovely, attentive! Great Xperience!
Wonderful coffee house with friendly staff, healthy food, and free wi-fi!! The space is nicely decorated: bright, bold colors, & inviting on the first floor and dark & cozy in the downstairs area. The staff was very friendly and the service was fast. The cappuccinos (read: European style) and croissants were lovely. The Combo Plate with tabouli, salad, and hummus was fresh, filling, delicious, and reasonably priced! The ample seating, inviting ambiance, and good food makes this place a great addition to my coffee shop rotation.
Holly cow, amazing! Ordered a boba milk tea which is always my go too anywhere. It was fresh and yummy. Bragging right to the mojo crepe ..Mind blowing good. Frequent flyer miles here I come
Yelp.  Worth gold!  My daughter is a student and has had some car trouble.  I won't mention the other garage in this review, but the difference between them and Kiser is more than night and day.  Because of the horrible experience at the other garage, and the fact that I'm 800 miles away, I turned to Yelp to find some recommendations.  I'm so glad I did.  The battery in her car died.  This is not the first time, so I really wanted an overall check out of the electrical system to try to find out what was causing the problem.  Talk about leaving yourself totally exposed to a bank account drain!!!  But I have faith, and the other reviews tell it true.  These guys are honest and trustworthy, and really made me (and my daughter) feel like they cared about our situation.  What a surprise to find out it was only like $100 for all their work.  I'm already talking to Steve about my next repairs.  Highly recommended!
There is definitely a wow factor when you enter the restaurant from the hotel.  The dim lighting and decor is very classy and chic.  Despite having a reservation and the restaurant not being very crowded, we had to wait about 10-15 minutes before being seated.  Once seated, the waitstaff was very attentive and friendly.  Our waiter knew the menu well and was able to provide suggestions based on what my friend and I were in the mood for.  Because it was Dine Out Boston, there was a pre-fixe menu to choose courses from for $38, with several items to add for an up-charge.  We started with the tuna tartar, which was nice and fresh, although had a "different" flavor to it which I could not pick up on and did not love.  The quail yoke on the tuna tartar was neat, but did not provide much flavor.  We also shared the porcini flatbread, which was thin and crispy with a subtle mushroom flavor-not too overbearing.  I had the scallop entree, which came with four large, nicely seared scallops over mashed cauliflower, with roasted cauliflower, broccoli and golden raisins.  This dish was delicious and not too heavy-the waiter steered me in the right direction!  My friend had the bolognese, which was a mix of veal and oxtail, served over home-made rigatoni.  This was also delicious, with right amount of sauce over the pasta and a nice portion size.  For dessert, we shared the tiramisu with dolce de leche gelato.  It was good- but I was hoping it would be better, seeing we were in the North End.  The bottom layer was overly moist and the top layers were quite dry.  Overall, we had an enjoyable meal.  In the future, I'd like to eat outside as the seating is on the water.
This is nothing but the real ting without frills and full of fantastic flavor for days! Not far from the Hartsfield airport, this meal is worth the flight here ! It's portions are generous and for less than $15, you can have a gourmet meal with a drink ( try Ting, the national soft drink of Jamaica) . Please know that my Caribbean queen mother will kill me if I give full marks to any  restaurant serving Jamaican food beyond her own kitchen.  So with that in mind, please make a trip to find a rating on your own.  They have the usual suspects... Goat, curried chicken , ox tail stew, rice and peas, stewed chicken, and escovitch fish.  You really cannot go wrong here. This place uses the right amount of spice without compromising authenticity to ginger the American pallet.
We had Chinese brunch and it was awesome~!  Yum Yum.   Price was definitely cheap cheap.  It's a small place, and it as packed!  We got there around 1:30 so we didn't have to wait long for lunch to be served.    But I would go back for food.
The best pasta in Vancouver, bar none.  Consistently and exceptional good, the pasta here is made fresh in house daily.  The traditional roman pastas are really the highlight, from the cacio & pepe to the various iterations of guanciale.  We dine here regularly, and it never disappoints.
Chocolate. Nuff said. But since that's not enough words for a review. Chocolate, chocolate, chocolate, chocolate, chocolate. Vanilla, chocolate, chocolate, strawberry, chocolate, chocolate, and other flavors associated with chocolates.
Went here last year for a candlelight dinner with the GF. This place is amazing. food was delicious and the atmosphere was super romantic. live piano player to set the mood right. will definitely be returning here again some day. Love it.
One of the few large non-Asian pubs/bars in Richmond, this place stands out amongst the closed businesses at night.  It is always bustling and is a great place to go grab a brew and relax and hang out with friends.  Hanging with old friends as well as meeting new people is equally easy here.
I've been here about 5 times and loved it each time. If you are looking for the best Ethiopian food in the ATL, look no further then Desta.   You can't go wrong with this restaurant; food is delicious, and staff are very friendly and accommodating.   I like coming here with a group and ordering all the different meats and vegetables to go along with the injera. The lamb and fillet mignon are especially tasty. Also, very good Ethiopian coffee.
Classic local diner kinda place. Coffee ain't Peet's but above average trick stop blend.  The pancakes rock. The huevos is my favorite. The breakfast burrito is above average and large.  Main thing here is the service. Fast. Pleasant. Love it.  Oh, and it's a clean joint too.
Both egg sandwiches and latte were great! I highly recommend rosemary frittata with spinach. A nice place to begin your day!
A nice bar restaurant on an Orlando Ave corner, Winter Park. I tried their Square 1 Red beer -- great flavor for my taste! - it was only a bit fruity but subtle, so I loved it. Toga Party burger with feta cheese and other good stuff, and side of beans were delish. I've come here before and knew I'd return. Servers are super nice - and super friendly if you're a repeat customer. We sat in a round, corner booth - the cowhide upholstery adds to the nice modern western decor.
There's some good curry here.  Just remember to order extra meat because they're extra chintzy when it comes to that.
Their mixed grill is really good. And so it the eskandar. But they are a bit pricey. Would go back every once in a while. Oh the lavash is just excellent.
Pretty good value for the price paid but nothing to write home about. If you need a quick carb load with tasty cheap bevy this will hit the spot. You do to get to build your own dish and have gobs of ingredients to chose from which is a nice touch.
Put A Bird On It! Well, IN it. They have finches in a cage...looks like an interesting merchandising fixture in this quaint boutique. I loved the feeling that I was finding one-of-a-kind trinkets.  They have a little of everything from clothing to jewelry to books to decor to perfume to toys. You can spend quite a lot of time rummaging through this cluttered, yet organized, store.
This is one of the best basic hotel experiences I've had. Our room was very clean and well appointed. The front desk staff was attentive and friendly. Breakfast was diverse and tasting and there was a ton of seating. The pool water was comfortably warm. I took my daughter for their American Girl package and it was so special. Really great accommodations.
I have been put Back together by Doctor Brian Baisinger and Doctor Greg Lekas over and over for many years. I have referred well over a hundred injured police officers, athletes and friends to the Clearwater Clinic. So far I have never had a single person I refereed come back to me with anything less than a enthusiastic and positive review of their experience.   The thing I appreciate the most is the fact everyone at Clearwater is interested and expert at getting me fixed up and back in the game. I've never felt like my treatment is being extended unnecessarily. The treatment is effective and designed to get me back to 100 percent as quickly as possible.   If you want experts to help you heal and get the most out of your physical capabilities Clearwater Clinic is the only choice. Integrity, honesty and expertise are all hallmarks of the doctors and staff.
Fantastic flavor in their chicken tibs and injera, anticipatory service, and still easy on the budget - they even have Monday specials for their chicken dishes. If I lived in Atlanta, this would be a regular stop.
Excellent service with a smile and great prices. My favorite spot to get any beauty regimen.
Great food, service, and atmosphere, but that bar was phenomenal! Every drink made from scratch. I knew it was a good sign when I sat at the bar and saw the row of assorted bitters lining it. The bartenders were busy mulling fruit and assorted ingredients. The old fashion was incredible.  Call a half hour before you show up and you'll beat the wait.
Where to start... hmmmmm.  FD's Grillhouse was Amazing!  Great atmosphere, great prices, and great staff!  We showed up around 6pm; just before the dinner rush. It was quiet and we were sat pretty quickly. Our waitress came up and was nice and quirky.  She gave us input and seemed very knowledgeable about the menu. She took our order and within 10 min we had our side salads. We actually had our salads before we received our drinks!   My Fiancé and I both ordered the "pick 3." (best deal in my opinion) She had the Grilled Shrimp, Atlantic Salmon, and Fried Catfish. Shrimp was really good. Big and delicious! (Her words, not mines)  The salmon was so good!  It was kind dry, but a little lemon made the whole salmon taste amazing! Lastly was the catfish. No fishy after taste and was fried to perfection! Her sides were a side salad with Lemon Herb & Vinaigrette. (Absolutely amazing dressing if you don't like ranch) She also had steamed broccoli they were good. Just steamed broccoli...  For my 3, I chose the Atlantic Salmon, Crawfish Étouffée, and Fried Catfish. I'll start with my sides. I had the Red Beans and Rice. It was okay. Sadly I think Popeye's makes it better. I upsized my side and got a cup of Gumbo. A little spicy for me but it was too good to not eat all of it! Very filling too! A bowl of that would probably fill me up.   The Salmon was good. Again, a little dry but a little lemon juice put it over the top!  The Crawfish Étouffée was scrumptious! It doesn't looks like much, but the rice will fill you up before you realize it. Lastly was the Fried Catfish. It was great! Cooked to perfection! Had some ketchup and some lemon. I had to take a fillet home with me. (That's right a 325 lb. man couldn't finish his plate.) That's how generous the portions are!  For an appetizer we had the Fried Calamari. My Fiancé loves it here because it doesn't taste like you are eating grease. It was good but didn't WOW me. In my opinion it was a little chewy. I like my Calamari to be a little crunchier. Great taste though! I would definitely order them again.   There is one innovative item they have that I can't go without mentioning. It's this lemon net they have for when you squeeze the lemon onto your seafood. It kept the seeds in, and you didn't have lemon juice spray everywhere. Instead it made a controlled flow for the lemon juice to be spread evenly. It change my life! I'm never letting citrus fruit spray anyone around me ever again!   All in All I would rate this place with 4 Stars. Beer and wine selection isn't the greatest. It did get a little noisy during the rush hour (I know I'm being a uppity about a little noise) and for a Friday I felt they were under staffed.  The reason I am giving a 5 star review is because of our waitress Patience (that's her actual name) was freakin awesome! Attentive and fast. Didn't matter she was overwhelmed. She kept a great attitude and made our experience memorable.  Patience if you end up reading this. You were awesome! If I weren't ballin on a budget I would have give more then 25%.  If I ever go back, I can only hope to get you again.
Located in the middle of terminal E in ATL. This is my favorite place to catch dinner when flying through ATL in the evening. The sushi is very fresh (rare amongst airports) and the service is top notch. Cool, hip atmosphere. Tap or bottled water for the water snobs LOL! Only complaint is that it is pricey with two sushi rolls costing near $30 and a mandatory 18% tip. Great place though.
This restaurant absolutely exceeded my expectations.  The owner spent a lot of time with us and he clearly loves what he is doing.  He is very knowledgeable about the finer ingredients and he spends the xtra $ to use them in his creations.  Service was super, food was extraordinary, and they had very good wines as well.  The bill was a lot less than what I am used to.   It is small, so cannot bring a large group.
These guys are friendly, fast and cheap. I bought a knife set on craigslist, and though they were in great condition, they needed to be sharpened. Hubs mentioned that Knife Sharpest was likely the closest place to us in town. I called for a sharpening quote (they are really cheap) and headed over there on Saturday. When I dropped off my knives, he asked if it would be ok if they kept them until Monday. Of course! I was impressed that they'd be done in less than a week. Their hours and location make it convenient to get to after work on a weekday too. I didn't shop around much, but I did notice they have CRKT knives, so I will definitely be back to shop for gifts for my brothers.
This was the best government office experience I've ever had, and I didn't even have to set foot in the office. I called, and in 10 minutes, my problem was solved. The customer service representative was helpful and polite.
I have been going here for a little over a year. The better part of every day actually. Mon-Fri. Sometimes I just get coffee. The staff is really what keeps me coming back. Don't get me wrong, the food is great. But the staff have treated me like family. As far as the food goes, I haven't had one thing here I didn't like. Omelettes are great. The specials are always good. A favorite is the chicken avocado grill. I get it as a wrap and add onions and bacon. Too good. They're still fairly new in the neighborhood. They've been here since April of last year. But they stay busy. Free parking in the Brookwood Marketplace parking garage. Stop by and get a skillet and a smile.
We went here to celebrate my boyfriend's birthday and we went NUTS. Heck, the people at the restaurant went NUTS. There was a plethora of wine flowing from the decanter (how many bottles did we have? 3? 4?) on top of appetizers off the chain and desserts and the entrees---I can't even.  By the end of the night we were drinking vodka shots from martini glasses the size of our heads (I kid you not) that had a scoop of sorbet in them. That, on top of the wine, on top of whatever drinks we had (I'm shuddering thinking about how much was consumed) it was a night to remember. Or not remember. I'm still debating as the night itself was blurry.  But hey! I do remember the scallops were bomb and delicious. Noms. Definitely a family vibe to it. Apparently my boyfriend's birthday wasn't the only one celebrated that night. So I guess it's a great birthday spot?
All the great reviews are right on.  Called ahead, on time, worked quick, cost what he said it would, (fixed the door sensor on my old washing machine which kept me from the cost and hassle of buying a new one) and pulled some junk out of my garbage disposal for free which saved me waiting all day on the builder of my new house (that's still under warranty) from coming out to fix it.  I will be calling him for any future needs for sure!
Peter and Leo really made my day and my meal today, going above and beyond with my order. They accommodated my weird requests with enthusiasm and hospitality. Thanks again guys!!
Really enjoyed Eastside Tavern. We went with a group of 6 on Saturday night. It was crowded, but they were doing a great job of minimizing the wait. We had a few cocktails at the upstairs patio bar and then our table was ready. The food was outstanding. I would have given 5 stars, but they missed the mark slightly on the appetizers. In addition to the BBQ for the main dishes (which was outstanding), our table ordered 3 appetizers. Fries, which were good and a decent portion. Tater tots - $10 for 8 tater tots. That is out of line. I was expecting something at least close to the size of the fries. The other appetizer was the veggies. Again, good, but the portion was tiny. The portion was less than I would expect a normal side to be with a dinner. If they can work on either the pricing or the portion size of the appetizers, this would easily be 5 stars because it all tastes great (at least that is the consensus - I wasn't quick enough on the draw to be able to try the veggies or tater tots) I would definitely go back again, but would forego the apps unless changes are made.
When I tell someone I live in Sanford (which I usually follow with the phrase "It's not as bad as you think..."), they seem to usually say "Oh yeah, I love that German restaurant" as if it were a natural reflex. That being the case, it is safe to say that the Willow Tree has become a local landmark.  Great place to sit outside and have a beer while feasting on Schnitzels and sausage (expect to take a box home)! Sit inside if you want to focus on the music/entertainment and sit outside if you would rather chat with your dinner companions.
Just a hungry yelper looking for something easy, off the beaten path, and free from logos and slogans. Well, the place wasn't as independent as I was hoping. Still a fair commercial feel going on inside complete with ™s on the menu. Corporate places can get the theme down and polished but sometimes lack in authenticity once the place is running.  The place is kind of like a cross between Quisnos and Jimmy Johns. The sandwiches are very meat-centric. The feel of the place is like they were trying for a bit of an east coast vibe but the only part they really got to was the random yelling of words by the staff.  I get to the line, browse through the quite large bottled beverage selection to see all the typical mass-produced overly sugary selections. Passed on the beverages. Moved passed to order my sandwich. Opted for A Wreck for myself who's ingredients read like an Italian sandwich, and a Hammie for the kiddo. It's ham and cheese.  I was a bit impressed with guy1's calm demeanor in a place that's still fairly busy at a peak dinner time. Was preparing the order ahead of me while simultaneously taking my order and writing nothing down or entering anything into an order and he took the order calmly and confidently and didn't make me feel rushed and his demeanor didn't make me feel like he was rushed or over-worked.  The odd part is the yelling. Once I put in my order he yells out my order and the other two yell the order back to suggest that they heard him. This is a cheap gimmick pulled from fish markets and east coast shops. Guy1's like "Hey, I'm making a sandwich!" and the other two chirp back "He's making a sandwich/That guy's making a sandwich!"  Is this really necessary? Guy2's whole job is to take the meat and cheese bread off the toaster that Guy1 put in place and put your choice of 9 different condiments and vegetables on the sandwich for 8 hours straight. Should he really be so surprised to find a sandwich manifest itself onto his side of the toaster without the guy yelling into the side of his head from 3 feet away? I'd like to see some headsets secret agent style where they whisper into their sleeves that the customer who just walked passed them and the sign on the door that says "Potbelly Sandwich Shop" is indeed here to order a sandwich and is definitely not lost.  I'm such a slacker on receipts. I forget to take them and when they tell me the total of my order they might as well be telling me what they heard on The View last night, because I'm not listening.  A Wreck reminded me of a toasted version of The Italian Night Club from Jimmy Johns, but toasted and on ciabatta and smaller, but I think I ordered the smaller one. The hot peppers actually have some spice to them, where Jimmy's are sweet and zesty these have a mild spice that slowly accumulates until the end of the sandwich where it's still tolerable to my sensibilities. The cured meats actually kind of taste like cured meats, which is always a bonus. Sometimes at these shops it just tastes like a slightly more flavorful bologna.  I nabbed a bit of the Hammie from the kiddo. (for science). The ham was quite flavorful where many others just taste like muted versions of themselves. Notes of smokiness and well hydrated without tasting like it was reconstituted in it's own juices like the turkey packets you get at the grocery store. It's truly noteworthy that most of the sandwich made it into the kids mouth! You parents know this means something!  To test the practicality of the yelling, I've decided to make this a practice at home when I'm up at 6:30 making breakfast. "I'm making Cap'n Crunch™!" I'll update and let you know how it works in a week. (No I won't).
I had such a great experience with Kelley.  From start to finish, I got quick response from the office, answers to all my questions, fast turn around on a quote and on scheduling the work.  The crew showed up on the dot and worked like lightning.  They cleaned up after themselves and you seriously wouldn't know they were there except there's a hole where once there was a tree.  I would recommend them to anyone.  Also I found the price to be reasonable.
Suerte, you get all the stars!  First of all, that door , am I right?  And then you go inside... the decor is perfection.  Our lovely server told us the history of many of the decorative items inside, all either made by local east side artisans or made in Oaxaca.  But it gets better... the food.  Ah, the food.  Perfect.  Simple, unpretentious, beautiful cooked and seasoned.  Everything I hoped it would be, and more!  I really can't say enough.  I hope suerte sticks around, it's a fantastic edition to the East Side.
Very enjoyable atmosphere. A step above what you usually expect in the North End. Food was great service was good. Priced a little higher than most places in the area but worth it in my book.
We love this place!  Best guacamole I've ever had, hands down.  Complementary chips and salsa are fantastic.  Veggie enchiladas are delicious and everything is fresh.  Service is excellent.
First time visiting and we will be back. We had a nice lunch a pita with cous cous. They were very tasty and satisfying. The food was delivered quick and hot. Cous cous is vey popular for lunch and I can see why.
Food: 4.0 of 5.0 Service: 5.0 of 5.0 Environment: 5.0 of 5.0  We ordered the mussels in a delicious light tomato white sauce base, that I highly recommend ordering as our appetizer. We decided to try the Filet Mignot and Scallops. Both were good buy neither was great or exceptionally exciting.   Thus place is great for a few reasons and deserves 5 stars based on the incredibly attentive and friendly service, the ambience, and the price. It's not overly pricey but a nice place to treat yourself and another. Would definitely recommend trying!
We visited Saturday at high noon.  The line was nearly out the door but it moved quickly - 15 minutes from entering the building to walking out with our food.  I'm still debating the price-to-value question, but given the other other grilled cheese I order when I'm out is $2.59 at Jason's Deli, there is no doubt that my sandwich was at least twice as large and twice as delicious for about twice the price so I think it's a pretty good deal. We'll definitely be back for a repeat visit.
This place is great! Close to home and the best pizza around. The prices are fairly cheap and although they are busy, it's worth the wait! I usually place my order online and go in to pick it up.. They have it ready exactly when the time says to pick it up! They haven't let me down one time! I highly recommend MOD PIZZA !!!
Service was excellent and the food was very good.  So happy to have a place close to home where I can get good sushi.  :)
Carne Asada was perfectly cooked, grilled jalapeño was a nice touch. The salsa was very tasty, I liked the smokiness. Overall a great experience, good service from Alex.
Amazing experience! I went in for a haircut with Ginger and she did a fabulous job with my hair. I was doing the locks of Love, cut so she suggested we take a before and after pictures which turned out great! My haircut is super chic and modern, thanks to her!  She also gives amazing scalp and shoulder massages as well. The salon is awesome too, they offer you drinks the moment you walk in and the receptionists are all really sweet.
My husband ordered the Kung Fu tea as is, and I ordered the oolong with 70% sweetness and 70% ice with boba. Both drinks were delicious! The boba was slightly soft with a sweet honey flavor. I moved to Killeen from Seattle a few months ago, and I'm relieved to have finally found a good bubble tea shop.
Arguably the best late night pizza in Vancouver. Not the cheapest slice, but their signature slightly burnt extra-thin crust is always a delicious alternative to the soft and soggy options that most other pizza joints have to offer in the wee hours.  Highly recommend!
How do I love thee Chowda? Let me count the ways I love thy delicate clams so visible to the eye. Tender and fresh, this I cannot deny I love thee light creamy flavor so simple yet you do not waver. Your steadfast quality brings me back again. Sweet tastes of Chowda, let me be thy spokesmen.  Boston Chowda remains my favorite. I compared it to Legal's chowder on this visit and I still prefer Boston Chowda. The fact that this chowder is lighter yet lusciously flavorful, wins my tastebuds over. Not an elegant eating location, but superb chowder.   Man cannot live without an occasional chowder.
Consistent performance - very trustworthy- good employees - typically very punctual. We use them for every 2 week cleaning of our home
did some research and people say kintaro was the spot, but since they weren't open yet and we had to keep our schedule, we came here instead. there was no line on a sunday morning, ordered and food took a lil while to come out, but not that bad.  the gyoza was pretty good. the creamy ramen was not so great to me and the GF, tasted like they poured heavy cream in the broth.  but the shio, damn, ranks in the top five bowls of ramen I've tried. you can taste the richness of the pork in the broth and it's not too heavy either, which was a good thing cause we were headed to stanley park right after. didn't see them hand make any noodles, but don't matter to me where it come from as long as it's good, and these noodles were great, just the right firmness. the pork was a good balance of fat and meat (I like 85% meat 15% fat) and the egg (had to add this extra) was cook perfectly (a lil runny in the middle).  so it was a good thing kintaro was closed, cause if it wasn't, we would have never came here. we ended up going to kintaro another night you can see what I think of them when I review them.
Food is absolutely delicious. Fresh and most dishes are cooked to order. I always do delivery. The only negative about this place is this: delivery takes a long tIme and I only live up the street. There was only 1 time that food came in under a half hour.  Best crab Rangoon and a delicious chicken and mushroom stir fry dish!
I stayed at this cozy motel for a weekend during a trip to Austin, Texas to see my cousin graduate from UT. Texas FIGHT! After a long drive from California, all I wanted to do was just relax and this place offers just that.The price was right at $60 a night. The employees at the front desk were very polite and helpful. We had 2 double beds, a refrigerator (held alot of our sodas and snacks), iron and ironing board, flat screen TV, blow dryer and free wi-fi!!!! The pool was always crowded (it was summer after all).   The only downside I can see was that it was rather close to the highway, but it shouldn't affect your sleep. Traffic around this area can get pretty bad. What may be a 20 minute drive from this motel to downtown can turn in to an hour drive. Also, the exterior of the building could be touched up a bit to look nicer.   Other that, this place is a great place to stay if you're on a budget. Great amenities, close to most points of interest (mall, UT, shopping centers) and very affordable. I highly recommend.
Amazing!!! Finally got my very own custom closet. It's awesome. The installers were prompt and really on the ball. The design process was great also. I wish I could afford to do every closet in the house. It's a dream  I can't say enough about this fantastic business.
I love this place. I ordered the Lamb Saag and I never had garlic naan before but it is a must try! It was so delicious and the garlic was not overpowering. The lamb was moist and seasoned well. I would definitely recommend this place to pick up lunch.
Hands down my favorite Chinese restaurant.  We stopped the first time, by chance.  We were hooked!  We love it so much that it has become our traditional Christmas Dinner.  Why cook, when I can have the most delightful food prepared by someone else?!  I usually get their Sesame Chicken (YUM) and their Chicken Lo Mein (also YUM).  I am a creature of habit and don't like to try new things once I find something that I love.  Their pot stickers are delicious and the sauce!!! Oh my, the sauce...I'm salivating just thinking about it.  We also get their fried wontons every now and then.  (Great Taste's answer to chips and salsa!)    I can't say enough nice things about Great Taste.  They're the best, don't let the cheesy name fool you!
My husband and I were really worried about pleasing his family, while staying true to ourselves at the same time. We met with Genevieve, and she created a ceremony so perfect, that I wouldn't have noticed if everything else had gone wrong. Her ideas were ones I would have never thought of on my own. We did a handfasting ceremony, and I still have the rope we used. I hadn't heard about this tradition, until she brought it up, and I loved it so much. Our wedding wouldn't have been nearly as special without her.
Our first stop in Portland and I'm still dreaming about the passionfruit donut! We tried a little bit of everything and loved it all! The line at voodoo was down the block but there was hardly a wait at blue star. Glad we opted out of the tourist trap and came here instead. They may have the yeast donut down to a science (art form?). I'm not really a fan of cake donuts but their Mexican hot chocolate was tasty and not too dense. Must try passionfruit and horchata flavors. Apple fritter is also life affirming. Make this your first stop in Portland and you're guaranteed to have a great beginning to your trip!
Moved to the Melrose area back in June and spent the summer months looking for a new home gym. I tried the closest Planet Fitness and WOW locations and found they were GROSSLY overpopulated. Getting a machine at either location wasn't at all possible at peak times, so I went to meet with Camille and Josh to tour Anytime Fitness in September. After seeing the open availability of machines, and the "anytime" access, I was sold. Even though the space may be smaller than the big box gyms, the availability of access spreads the "busy times" throughout the day where there's never a crowd when you decide to go. I've never had an issue getting a machine or weight when I need to and I am a regular visitor (probably not as regular as I should be, thanks for pointing that out!). The demographic of members is very easy going. No "gym-rats" or kids, every one is very respectful and clean which is key in a gym for me.   Equipment set up here is perfect for me. It's got everything I could want to use from treadmills and bikes, to free weights and a good variety of machines to work out in any manner I could want. Management is also very accommodating to requests for new equipment and services and encourage members to come up with new suggestions. I have left a suggestion or two on the chalkboard, which is a nice touch. It sort of "personalizes" the gym for me. Very rare nowadays.  For any place I give 5-stars to, I force myself to also list a "con" just to show I am not TOTALLY brainwashed :), and the only thing I could think of here, and it's prevalent in a lot of gyms I have noticed, is a lack of WiFi availability I guess? Besides that, I can't find anything I haven't liked about being a member of Anytime Fitness. I look forward to being a renewing customer next year.  EDIT: 12/14/12  I am leaving the above review untouched so people can see what I typed originally. I don't believe in going back and changing the original review. But went into Anytime Fitness today to find a pleasant surprise.. they've added WiFi to the gym after a couple of us made the suggestion. That was my only "gripe" even though my AT&T unlimited data plan works fine. WiFi just helps on battery life. So that problem is fixed! Why haven't you joined yet?
Great bar and open late! Lightning Will intrigued us since it was open late and was a short walk from our hotel. Seems like a local spot in the evening time. The bartender was so friendly and welcoming she even was very excited to share her favorite spots in town. There were no complaints on the food. We all had a little something of everything. Not to expensive for being downtown. The best part was the game room. We really enjoyed our time and would recommend to other folks passing through!
HUGE burritos...you may be paying a little bit more here, but you get alot of food for what you pay.  The queso chicken burrito is good, as are the quesadillas and the taco salads. For the healthier eaters, try the naked burrito (probably my favorite) which is a burrito minus the tortilla (which you can get on the side if you'd like). The option to have some beers with dinner is also nice, although I've never taken advantage of this.  Don't forget to get your Qdoba card, which gives you free chips & salsa, etc after you accumulate enough points.
Lots of goodies at this Taiwanese bakery!  We sampled a bunch of sweets and baked goods: hot dog in sweet rolls, coconu buns, tiger chocolate cake, tiger green tea cake, 4 different kinds of buns, and much more.  Loved it all, and the best part is that it's all cheap.  Cash only, so come prepared.  Good eats in Allston.
Thierry got some great stuff. The macarons are good. But I'm giving this place 5 stars, based on their Onion Brioche, alone. MY GOD, this is one of the best things I've ever tried from any bakery, anywhere. It's so delicious. The flavor is amazing but not overpowering. The texture is ridiculously perfect! It's not a cheap spot, but definitely worth it!!!
Why oh why didn't I come here last night for dinner instead of Miracle of Science.  And seriously, no disrespect the Miracle - it's just I was so bummed I couldn't finagle this joint as my destination because one beer there last night just wasn't enough to soak in the joint.  I actually only found out about this place's potential thanks to Yelp - yes, I had passed it many a time to head to Middle East, Manray, Miracle, and other 'M' destinations.... and just thought it was, well, closed down frankly.  thanks to Yelp, I popped in for a quickie, and damn it's one of those times where you just wish the quickie was an all-nighter.  35 beers on the menu - and unless you are into funky local brews, you will recognize about 4 of them.  18 cocktails as well (or so I thought, until a Yelper just pointed out that the list of 18 is just a subset of the huge book of cocktails they offer), which are not my vibe - but given that there were a dozen 'iced and prepped' martini glasses patiently waiting on the bar, I figure this is a highlight of the place (I will need to bring Meredith along once so she can sample those goods....)  and the menu, though I didn't order from it, looked great - as did my bar-neighbors' delivered plates.  So I only give this place 4 stars because I LONG to come back here very very soon for a proper meal, then update my review with a final star thanks to that experience.  Hopefully I didn't jinx it - but something tells me I haven't   5/1/2008 update: Had dinner last night.  Definitely didn't jinx it.   this place rocks - 5th star awarded
This place is adorable, well-organized, clean, and in a great location.  I met some really cool people while I stayed here, and the staff was amazing.  They have a great continental breakfast spread every morning, and they typically have clean towels out (assuming the drunk people haven't taken more than they needed.)
One of the best meals I've had in Austin. Top notch modern American cuisine (On our particular night, heavily Asian-inspired as well). Not as experimental as Barley Swine, which often leads to a few duds along the way, but still exploratory with flavors and ingredients. Five courses, and each one had incredible flavors, textures, and presentation.   Conceptually, 3 Five VII allows you to observe the chefs construct your meal, a bit like a performance. They prep, cook, and plate in front of you, and speak directly to you with each course.   The primary dining area is bright and airy, a welcome change from the dimmer, moodier spaces usually encountered with fine dining. And the service, as expected, was attentive and relaxed.
I started coming to Lucas because I was tired of modern medicine. The medical industry just wanted to give me more medications and take more of my money without actually helping or correcting any of my issues.   My wife and I decided to make a big change in our eating habits, exercise schedule and how we dealt with medical issues (homeopathic). With all the good that came with these changes we still had a few issues... I thought I had carpel tunnel in my right wrist and I couldn't sleep at night; I tried almost everything natural we could find to correct the problems but nothing seemed to be working.   My Daughter was going to an Acupuncturist in Chicago to help with her migraines and she asked her for a referral in Austin, Texas. Lucas was recommended because they had studied acupuncture together!   I was a bit skeptical at first because I didn't want to become a  pincushion... so I decided to let my wife try it first. After seeing how quickly it was improving her issues; I decided to give it a try. Lucas is amazing and really understanding! He walked me through the whole process and really helped me grasp his profession and eased any uncertainties I had.   Every time I gave him a challenge he helped me correct it -  I cannot recommend Lucas enough!
My friend recommended Mark at 10th street tattoo. She'd recently got her first tattoo and actually went back to get another one from him a few weeks later. I'd been to one shop before coming here and I didn't have a pleasant experience so I didn't end up getting anything done. I decided to give 10th street a try since my friend had a great experience. I called Mark on a Thurs so I could talk to him and let him know what I was interested in and to see his availibility for Friday. I told him the size and words I wanted, he said it was pretty straight forward. I also mentioned to him my trip to the beach in a little over 3 weeks and he said I'd be fine.   After work on Friday I drove straight to 10th street. I showed Mark the pictures on my phone of the words and symbol and showed him the placement on my body. He said it was great and he could definitely do it and it wouldn't take long...like max 15 min. That was great for me because it being my first one and not knowing what to expect-- the quicker the better lol. I felt very comfortable here.   Before he started the tattoo, I was able to see exactly where it would be and how it would look to make sure it was the exact location. I decided to move it slightly. I'm glad I was able to preview it though...being that it's permanent and all.   Once I got in the chair I tried to relax. He told me to let him know if I needed him to stop or anything like that but reassured me I'd be okay. I'm glad someone thought I'd be okay because I wasn't sure I was going to be lol. We talked through the whole thing which caused me to be at ease. It didn't hurt nearly as bad as I thought-- actually it didn't really hurt at all. A few times it was uncomfortable but just something you'd grit your teeth over. He was done before I knew it. I went to look at the final product and was extremely happy. It was exactly what I'd been wanting for so many years.   If youre getting your first tattoo or a tattoo in general I fully recommend 10th street. They are great, everyone is nice. You can ask as many questions as you need and they'll answer them. The prices are very decent also.
Look no further than Kahn Diamonds for any Jewelry Purchase! I've been to several shops including the big chain Jewelry Shops and Mr. Kahn beats their prices by a LOT!  It is scary how much other Jewelers over charge their customers.  I was looking for a round diamond in a halo setting.  I knew exactly the size and qualitites in the diamond I wanted.  Mr. Kahn immediatly showed me exactly the diamonds and setting I was looking for and walked me thru the whole process in detail.  He quoted me the best price on his first initial quote!  No gimmicks or games!  When I went to pick up my ring I was very happy and amazed with the quality and work by Mr. Kahn.  My fiance loved the ring and was extremely happy!!! When I got the appraisal of the ring I was shocked by how good of a deal I got by Mr. Kahn.  The ring was appraised for over $10,000 what I had paid for it!!!  Go to Mr. Kahn and do not waste your times folks with other Jewelers! The best PRICES, QUALITY and SERVICE are only at Kahn Diamonds!!!
My fiancé and I decided to have lunch here while we were enjoying a lovely day at Little 5 Points. (Good call-the food was delicious!) To start, we shared a California roll, which was made to order and very good. I chose the Thai cashew entree, which was sautéed with a choice of meat with mushroom, onion, bell pepper, celery, carrot, pineapple and cashew nuts. My fiancé chose the garlic black pepper entree, which was sautéed with a choice of meat with black pepper, garlic, onion, broccoli, bell pepper and topped with dried garlic. You can also choose to add some heat to any dish that they have. With this being our first time here, we played it safe with our choices (and level of spiciness) and just chose chicken, but I noticed a few other people's dishes looked very appetizing as well. Both entrees were so good, and had us wishing we had brought some home with us! The portion sizes were on the large size.  I noticed some other reviewers having not so great things to say, but overall, I couldn't really find anything bad to say.   Another thing to note is that the atmosphere of this place is really cool. When you step inside, you walk through this long corridor and then into the restaurant which is not at all what you'd expect it to look like, judging from the outside.  It is located in an area called Little 5 Points. I've been coming to L5P's since I was about 10-if you haven't checked it out, you should! It can be described as Atlanta's spot for alternative, hip, grungy, boho culture all mixed into one! You can find a few great record stores, coffee houses, vintage clothing stores, skate shops, tattoo shops, comics, an art gallery, furniture, and many other odd shops. There are great places to eat there too, Thai 5 being one of them!
Recent stay at this hotel was very enjoyable. I would say though that check-in was late and front desk somewhat understaffed. But all the workers there were very nice.
Best breakfast tacos for the price and fast. Only 1.94 for my favorite egg, potato, onion, & chorizo breakfast taco for lunch.
I've seen the Raconteurs here and discovered The John Butler Trio when they blew away the headlining G-Love & Special Sauce. Both times I had a blast.  It's a pretty easy venue to get to as long as you know it's not easy to find and figure it out on a map first. Also, knowing they don't serve beer means planning ahead if you want some drinks and go to the clubhouse just by the entrance. They do have drink and food vendors though so you won't starve or die of thirst at least.  I enjoy being outside on a star-lit night while listening to the music fill the air. I would not especially enjoy going to a concert in the rain though and I think they need to do something about covering the stage a bit better considering we're on the Wet Coast. Be prepared and pack a rain poncho and small tarp to sit on just in case. The sound is really good here and the sloping hill to the stage means everyone can see. It's a small enough space that it feels intimate too. Security is good but if you know what you're doing it's easy to sneak in a flask to liven up your hot chocolate.
Ray is professional, listens and is very easy to work with.  He has never made me feel as if my thoughts weren't considered.  Extremely up front and transparent.  I can see him saying no if he feels a course of action isn't the best, but he always has options.  Good guy.  Good practice
I came into Follow the Honey on my way out of Cambridge, and was very impressed with everything about this shop. If you are in the area, definitely stop by, and you'll leave a honey enthusiast.   Mary showed me around the shop, and gave me several honeys to taste. Her enthusiasm and passion for honey is absolutely infectious. It's such a great feeling to talk with a shop owner about a topic they are very clearly passionate about.   The shop is super fun - it has honey on tap, honey samples, a bee hive in the back, knowledgeable and nice staff, and hosts community events - it's basically the perfect small business to have in your neighborhood. Harvard square is lucky to have this shop.
OMG! This place was amazing and the service was great. We went and ended up catching happy hour and they had drink and food specials that ranged from $3-$7. They had $4 select pints and a ton of local craft beers. The service was excellent and after a couple beers in we looked up and it was a live DJ. Try the shrimp and tot apps .
Wow does this place get packed!  I have never been here when it was easy to find a seat.  The view is the reason, it is great.  You are right on the Columbia with views of Portland.  The staff here is great.  The food is standard McMenamins which has improved the last few years.  Of course they feature McMenamins beers and drinks.    Happy hour runs 3-6 daily and 10 to close on Friday and Saturday.
This would be an easy four star for me...aw, shucks, I was gonna give a three except for one big thing that nearly resulted in minus 1-star...they almost never have any bread left after, say, 3 or 4 pm, which is really, really %^$#@ ridiculous for a...sandwich shop. I get that they want to serve fresh, and don't want to be stuck with too much leftover bread, but...not everyone only eats a sandwich between say noon and 2.  That said, this is a nice location, clean, fine service, quick...have really liked the pressed caprese panini, the breakfast potato/spinach/egg roll-up, a very nice havarti/egg/tomatoe breakfat bagel sandwich... even the oatmeal is good. Excellent, strong coffee...a nice mix of soup of the day,salads, wraps, pressed, sweets for the sweet. Just wish you could have some sandwich bread after the lunchtime rush, but a good spot nonetheless.
This is a nice place to eat! The staff are friendly and the place is clean. The food is nice, portion size on the baskets is a little small but that's not always a bad thing. The place can get busy so service can suffer a little. The value for money is ok! This place isn't always my number one choice but the fish is good and the shrimp are real good. You must eat here at least once.
This by far is my favorite Mexican restaurant.The food is fantastic,service is 5 star,everything about this place is great.So if you are looking for good food,great service and super friendly people check this place out you will not be disappointed.
Fabulous cut of meat in the burger and the crispy onions gave it a nice crunch! Yum... My only beef is with the bun; whether the brioche or the "skinny" bun: their usually soggy. How about a crispy whole wheat sesame kaiser Romer?
The mixture of spices and seasoning along with the batter marries together in such a way that when you take a bite of that chicken, you instantly forget about any other fried chicken your lips have ever touched.. ever... in your entire life. Yes, yelp, it's that good. Probably the best fried chicken I have ever had.
(sigh...)  1. A 16-ounce cup of lavender lemonade and one bottled water -- $4.25  2. The last sandwich in the case filled with what seemed to be a feta spread and red peppers -- $6.44  3. Hanging out with a group of Yelpers outside a converted storage container in the middle of August while scoring a divine white chocolate macaron from a ginormous platter of macs provided by Kelly S.  -- Pretty freakin' cool.  I have to confess that sometimes it's the people I'm with that makes or breaks a place for me.
Good food, fun atmosphere. It's a great place to go in the summer time for food and drinks. Lots of times will have live entertainment as well. My recommendation is to try the fried clams and steamers. They are money!
Posto has certainly made it into the regular rotation. Always consistent, nice drinks, good service, open and spacious atmosphere. Went here with about 10 last Saturday for my friend's birthday - the big 30, he was a little down so we had to cheer him up and his girlfriend knew Posto was the place.   The best part of the meal was the Octopus Carpacci. This was a truly exquisite use of seafood in carpaccio; the presentation was beautiful. The menu describes Octopus Carpaccio as "roast tomato pasato, castelvetrano, dijon & shallot vinaigrette." In addition, beets, red onions, micro greens and croutons finished the dish. This is one of the most unique presentations of octopus that I have ever seen and Posto pulled it off masterfully.   For Entrée I had the "White Gulf Shrimp, skillet roasted, white wine, oven cured tomatoes, red chile, clipped herbs, tagliatelle pasta." This was an excellent change from their pizza. The shrimp were tender, cooked perfectly and white wine sauce was almost a beure blanc preparation, accented nicely with by the chile and roasted tomatoes. Well done. A bottle of Flaminio paired well with the whole meal.   Excellent service, we'll be back soon.
We have always used this location to board our dog when we go out of town. Very friendly and trusting staff!
I was impressed with brown bag. Great atmosphere with plenty of options. They have many different sandwiches, sides and desserts. I split the Bens black and blue sandwich and another sandwich of the week. Both were amazing. You can taste the quality of each ingredient. The sides are also not something to be overlooked. I went with a side sweet kale salad but it was hard to settle with that with all the other options available. The part I was disappointed with was the desserts. I had a red velvet cheesecake bar and it was lacking in flavor. It looked good enough but didn't meet expectations. This is the same price as panera or other fast casual chains but so much better. I would return.
I was in and out of this place, once for fried cheese sticks and wings and once for some pizza.  Both times I got takeout and did not dine in.  I had fair service, but again I didn't dine in so I'm not expecting a lot.  Cheese sticks: Fair.  Very run of the mill, nothing special about them.  I wouldn't order them again.  Wings: Good wings.  I ordered them extra hot and they weren't particularly spicy, but they were cooked well and were meaty without being weird godzilla mutant chicken size.  Pizza: So, I have a love-hate relationship with the pizza.  I ordered a large garlic, pepperoni and jalapeno pizza.  It's super floppy pizza so you need two hands to eat a slice.  It was freaking delicious, but it did not make my stomach happy and I spent a couple days on the toilet after eating half the thing.  I might gamble and try it one more time just to see if that's what really made me sick, but it tasted awesome, significantly better than chain pizza.
Completely agree with the "best falafel in Texas" reviews.
The corn beef and hash is excellent. Great bloody Mary as well. Staff is very friendly. More of a hipster kind of vibe.
Fantastic experience!  Dr. Henry is friendly and very skilled in his profession!  The level of customer service is great, the office is beautiful and the staff is very professional!  I would highly recommend this office!
My new favorite pizza.  They have EXCELLENT, gluten-free crust, which is a big deal because I can't do the gluten anymore and feel punished by the pizza god's as most options are bland and taste like cardboard.  Thank you, Baby Doll.  We did a #2 (dates, bacon, walnut, mushrooms) and it was out of this world, the dates were heavenly.  We also ordered a margarita which was great. This is our go-to now, and our party guests were super impressed and also hooked! Plus, they have delivery.
Great food and great service! Lots of cool twists on grilled cheese, all served with delicious tomato soup. Everything we ordered was delicious!! Good choices for kids too. Can't wait to go back to try some of the other grilled cheese flavors!!!
We headed here after realizing we would never get a lane at Sacco's.  I am glad, because L&G was a lot more laid back.  I don't understand people's preference for 10-pin over candlepin, but we were looking for candlepin, so there was plenty of space for us.  The automatic scoring is nice, and the animations are a blast from the past. The shoes were pretty much new, which I appreciated.  Not everything works perfectly all the time.  There is really nothing special about this place, which in a way, makes it the perfect place for bowling.  cash only.
I see bunch of spoiled travelers here. First of all, this was the most inexpensive hotel on I-Drive. Great location, good service, awesome view to the lake and pool. It needs room renovation but it's a great place nonetheless. Will stay again.
I rated it 5 because it is definitely better than a 2 1/2 star motel. My stay here was great. I stayed for 3 nights during the week for work.  Their prices are quite reasonable for what the amenities that they offer. IE Flat screen, room size, etc. They have a restaurant that has GREAT food that is also reasonably priced.  The only thing I can complain about was only having one entrance, and I was facing the freeway so it was a bit loud, but great view!
No clue why the ratings on this place are so low, I've ordered from this place twice in the past week & had amazing service and really yummy food. Both times I called for delivery and my order got to me within 20 or so minutes. Servers who took my order were friendly & wished me a fun trip in Boston, I haven't dined in, so I can't comment on any of the "in the restaurant experience" - but I would definitely recommend this place based on the experiences I've had.
Showcase was an amazing surprise on our vacation. We stopped specifically for the monster truck bus orchard tour which was a blast. Which was undoubtedly due to the amazing tour guide Anthony who was funny and very knowledgable. He knew a lot about the farm and what the processes were for the honey they produce and the citrus crops and the other fruit crops. He was provided a lot of entertainment jumping off of the truck to catch a banana spider and offering to catch any other wild life that we might come across. We fed cows along the trip and saw horses and a zebra and water buffalo along the tour. Unfortunately it was at a bad time for the growing season as there was nothing but grapefruit and it was the end of the season for them. Totally recommend this place for any vacationer, as a fun monster truck ride or a nice orchard visit season permitting.
At the suggestion of my brother in-law I took my glasses to be repaired at this shop, I have had two pair of "Titanium" frames and both pairs had the bridge fail simply pushing them up. The first time I took them back to my optometrist and he sent them off for a week to be repaired. When I got them back something was just off with the lenses. I didn't want to do that again. I went to Knights and they told me right away that it would take at least a week and they would have to send them off to be laser welded. I asked about just getting a new frame they told me that could be done as well. I need my progressive lenses so I agreed to that. It only took a day and a half and I had my glasses back. Thank God for this friendly, speedy and exceptionally knowledgeable staff. I love these folks!
Wayne was on time, entertaining, educational, and thoughtful. He's flexible, and will tailor the tour to your likes/needs if you want, but will also take you off the beaten path to his favorites.  Every winery we walked into with him, he knew a TON about and also had great relationships with all of the winemakers. Many of them gave us tasting discounts or free tastings. Lenne was my favorite- beautiful views and amazing pinot noir (coming from a girl who isn't even a big pinot fan).  Lastly, the lunch he packed us was AMAZING. Fresh baked banana bread, strawberries, almonds, cheese/various meats/crackers, pistachio cookies, mmm. We devoured it.  We had a great time!
I'm addicted to this place! Love my usual, Wintermelon Green Milktea with Herbal Jelly and Boba!  If you set up the app, it's just more convenient and they give you a $4 credit to start! I prefer their drinks over Cocos. If they start serving food, that would be awesome!
Her at the Orlando Eye. It's raining but the place is still packed. Loads of stuff to do & are here for the entire family.
We've had friends talk this place up to us for years, and finally they dragged us along for dinner a few weeks ago.  I am so very glad they did.  We had reservations, and though I don't think we needed them, we were seated promptly and the host was a pretty funny guy.  Our server was pretty awesome too - he kept us taken care of and in drinks the whole evening.    For appetizers, our friends ordered the curried mussels with a side of naan, and I, not a huge mussel fan, decided to order the hummus and naan combo.  Once they brought both plates, I figured out that I don't mind mussels at all if they are coated IN THE SAUCE OF LOVE.  I would bathe in this sauce if I could.  Our server tried to take it away once the mussels were gone and we pretty much slapped his hand and just asked for MOAR NAAN.    For dinner, we all ordered a hodge podge of food and went for it family style.  The mixed grill from the tandoor was probably actually my least favorite, some of the meat was a little chewy, but saying that, it was still pretty good.  The Goan Yellow Curry with shrimp was a surprise standout for me - I'm usually not that much into those coconuty flavors as I just want some spice, but it was a perfect balance.  The vindaloo had good flavor, but didn't kill us.  And, the saag paneer was solid.  Creamy, cheesy, tasty.  I'm not entirely sure how we also put desert in our faces, but we shared some rice pudding (kheer), carrot cake w/ice cream (Gajjar Halwa), and the standout for me was the little donuts in the fried sauce of peace and harmony (Gulab Jamun).    All in all, a super fun night with friends, a good date night place for sure.  Although, if Clay Pit had to have a tag line for me, it would be...  Clay Pit: they have sauces I want to bathe in.
Excellent exhibits, great conservation messages, very worth the $30 entrance fee. Favorite exhibits: Jellyfish, Treasures of the BC Coast, Tropics. Much more than just fish here. Sloths, bats, frogs, and other cool terrestrial creatures.
If visiting Portland - or if you live here, you must eat here! My wife and I know our Mediterranean food, and this place is as good as it gets. The owner even bet me his grilled octopus would live up to the one I ate seaside in my native Cyprus. I was shocked when it was even better! Our young boys devoured their gyro platters as did I, and my wife loved her grilled salmon gyro. The bacon-wrapped dolmades are to die for. Unfortunately we don't live in Portland, but we will make Gastromania a must-visit on any future visit.
If you ever down Mills looking for a place to have brunch and some coffee definitely check this place out.  Brooklyn Coffee manages to do a lot within the confines of a small space. Walking into the coffee shop was refreshing and the music playing was a plus. The owner, Daniel, was super down to earth making the service warm and welcoming. The food is a eclectic fusion of many cultural influences.   The Shakshuka is delicious btw! A perfect meal for any time of the day. My girlfriend had the Brooklyn Breakfast and was blown away by the chicken sausages.
Went with good friend for ladies night out. Great tapas..loved ambience and wine options...  will skip sushi next time. Everything else was great!
They did a great job. Very happy with results. This is my new spot for a great wash. Employees were friendly and knowledgeable .
This guy is amazing! I called him yesterday to come snake my clogged pipe. There were some complications (my pipes we old and falling apart) and he said he'd go get the parts and we'd change out the entire grey water run that day! We started at 5pm (I helped him) and he stuck it out until past 10pm! He has such a great attitude too. He is just a super nice and honest guy. He is beyond fair in his pricing as well. This guy is a gem, he'll get you fixed up!
Northerners (particularly NYers) are among the toughest pizza critics. So with that said, we were pleasantly surprise by the thin-crust hand-tossed customizable options available at Hearth Pizza Tavern. Mind you, we passed this place a dozen times and subliminally misread the signage as "health" and so totally blanked it out Lol. Until one day some friends suggested me meet there for dinner so when we look again the "r" miraculously appeared. Even the exterior of the restaurant doesn't strike you as a gourmet pizza restaurant and bar but it is. The exterior can definitely pass for a health food store or even a health spa. We ordered four of the signature pizzas: Simple White, The Cure, Chicken Coup Deville and the I-95. These were all superb and 50% off on Mondays! I also tried their lamb sliders but as a lamb snob I much rather stick with traditional Greek and Turkish venues. We were a party of four and left with leftovers so the portions are reasonable. It also can accommodate larger parties along with outdoor seating. If your looking for a departure from chain pizza and a closer resemblance of northern style pizza this definitely a place to check out!
They were out of their crispy fried rice though (which was odd because it was advertised everywhere)  Otherwise, food was amazing. Highly recommended. Staff was my favorite part - never seen food service so efficient. They also managed to keep the tone friendly as opposed to "rushing you out" - but make no mistake once a table left they wasted no time in cleaning it and making it available.
This is such a well kept secret.  Good cheap fun for your entire summer. You can bring guests and they also have parties like the annual 4th of July party - great location to watch the fireworks. My Dad and Stepmom learned to sail here and have since moved on to bigger and better boats.  But they swear by this program.
firstly, the design of this place is extremely beautiful and modern secondly, the food is absolutely divine third, the lady whom I believe is an owner was such a sweetheart and exceptionally pleasant this place is a hidden little gem and it is worth the drive! also their portions are huge so be cautious before ordering majority of the menu which I did
Seriously one of the best waffle places that I've ever tried! Cute little shop that makes you feel all warm and fuzzy inside. Their teas/lemonades are really delicious and is definitely recommended! I ordered the 3 B's. Our order came out the window really quick and we found outside seating.   Waffle was crispy on the outside and soft on the inside with a slight sweetness. The toppings worked well together. At first I thought the serving size was too small but after finishing the waffle and the lemonade, you leave feeling satisfied.  The price is really affordable considering the quality of the menu items and the service. Definitely a recommended location in Portland!
I had a flight of tasters and all the beers are delicious. The snacks are a typical selection, but you come here for the beers. They're very responsible here since they have recommended severing for their patrons. If you're OK your way here, don't be the driver because everything is worth trying.
Sunday is Happy Hour all day and they have a "Build your own Bloody Mary" bar. I had the Hazel nut crusted Halibut, raw oysters, shrimp and scallops in an Asian slaw over linguini.  I also tried a piece of the fried Halibut.  Go with the Hazel nut crusted its far better.   The place was very slow, we arrived about 15 min after opening and sat in the bar to get the Happy Hour prices.  The bar tender was great and offered ideas.  I would like to return to try several other items on the menu.
I love Dr. Schultz & Dr. Soma. They are so great. They always answer my questions and have an amazing bed side manner. They make my kids feel secure and comfortable. I won't go anywhere else.
Small menu but the food is great. Dough doughs were very moist and delicious. The place was packed with customers but we received our food within 10-15 minutes which i thought was reasonable. Prices were cheaper than expected.
My new favorite nail salon.. reasonable prices and friendly staff.  Everything is very clean and sanitary.
Perfect gym to workout at and has all the amenities.  I have a passport membership therefore am allowed to check out all the gyms which is an added bonus.  They have locations all around Boston  which is convenient for all members.  The Wellington location has great classes with convenient times.
The only way it coud be better is if it was bigger.  On a busy night be prepared to brush beards with fellow beer fans.  The beer list is always varied and there is something for everyone from porter folks to the hop heads.
We did the lunch buffet for $9.50 per person this past Saturaday.  The buffet did not have 101 offerings like a Chinese restaurant buffet. The offerings were about 20 from appetizers to desserts.  But quality triumph over quantity.  The foods were fresh, hot, moist, and tasty.  There were salads, two soups, three proteins, couple of vegetarian main courses,  two deserts and unlimited fresh hot naans.  The spice level was just right for those like my wife that doesn't like very spicy foods. The inside was chic, spacious, and comfortable. Service was excellent, drinks and naans were refileed without asking.  The Clay Pit is worth visiting again.
Had the most amazing experience with Noah! He's beyond personable, knowledgable, sweet, and handsome! Would definitely go back and loved his advice! Really an awesome guy
I love love luuuuhrv this spot! They always have a deep selection of sizes and styles. I've found wardrobe stables (my favorite cream button up & great red plaid skirt), as well as great costume and party outfits. The day I found roller skates my size was mythic! And my super stylish bright pink umbrella was taken from their caché of vintage wood handled hanging umbrellas. Amazing every time!
I just come back from there. Waouu the service is amazing. The bread and the cheese that with it are so good. I order the fillet mignon, it was a little blind, but the chicken my boyfriend had was good. We also had the asparagus as side dishes, it was delicious. I had the crème brûlée, it was ok. I was expecting to see the vanilla bean like it was read in the description. Overall very good experience. I strongly recommend. I receive a rose and a box of chocolate and a gift card of $25 because we were celebrating our 6 Anniversary. And I got engaged at the end of my dinner
I love Bloc 11. They have amazing sandwiches! My personal favorite is the Fairy. So delicious! I also really enjoy their Brazilian lime-aid and pecan sticky buns. Their coffee isn't bad either. It's a little dark for my taste, but with enough cream and sugar it's quite tasty.
I'm not usually a fan of airport food. I usually like to arrive and get to where I need to go. However, I had no choice this past weekend on our first trip to Portland but to stay at the airport for four hours and wait for my boyfriend's flight to arrive. I was hungry and this place seemed popular compared to the other surrounding food areas. I got their weekly special french dip sandwich, not really expecting much except to fuel my stomach but was surprised how good it was! It had the meat with au ju, mayo, chipotle, and blue cheese. Wish I had time to get a sandwich before we headed home.
I met up with a few friends last night at Javelina's for the first time. I really liked the cozy atmosphere.  I loved the Prairie in house drink specialty (had the ice crystals on top, yum).  Hope to go back soon.
I went to Burtons for the first time on Monday for lunch. I didn't have any expectations because I had never heard about it before.   The hostess was away when we walked in, but returned shortly and seated us pleasantly and promptly. I was pleasantly surprised looking over the menu at the variety of selections. My Mom and I love to try a lot of different plates so we decided to share the beet salad, the risotto fritters (why don't they just call them arancini?) and the grilled stuffed zucchini appetizers instead of entrees.   Our waitress, Melissa, was really polite and helpful - she refilled my Mom's tea without being asked and brought our dishes in the order we requested. I will definitely ask to sit in her section again.   OK the food - the beet salad was a revelation. It tasted like they had roasted fresh beets - not canned. We were both scrapping the plate. Both the risotto fritters and the baked zucchini came with tomato sauce that was fresh, chunky and had a great balance of acid and sweet flavors. The food all tasted fresh and carefully prepared.   So why only 4 stars?   We ended with cheesecake that was supposed to come with raspberry coulis. We expected a sauce. We got a drizzle. It was definitely lacking compared to the description.   Also, the ladies room needed a lot of tiding up - there was paper all over the floor. Considering this was a Monday lunch and it wasn't crowded (there were servers cleaning the dining room) the ladies room should have been in top shape.   We paid less than $40 for 2 apps, a salad, a dessert and a tea. I found that to be a good deal. I will be back.
If you're looking for *just a trainer*, look elsewhere. Glenn is a master at digging into your psychological hurdles, driving you toward your goals, and moving you beyond those goals to achieve sustained, life-changing fitness. Big muscles. Even bigger heart. Get ready to become your best self.
Went here for lunch today.   My mouth fell open... and hit the floor... when I saw the cheap prices. How is this possible? So naturally, I assume it's going to suck and be small. Oh but wait, it's actually yummy and nice portions!   So the 4 stars is more for what you get with your money. Had these items been slightly more expensive, the review would definitely be 3 stars. But major kudos for keeping the prices cheap.   Mixed Green Salad - Small $2.95 / Large $3.95 selection of mixed greens topped with peppers, tomato, onion, mushrooms & cucumber - so we got the large, and it was actually.... LARGE.  Mozzarella Sticks - $4.95 deep fried cheese sticks topped with parmesan cheese, served with marinara sauce - So these were my least favorite, and I prob wouldn't order these again. -Just to note, the parmesan cheese didnt really taste like parmesan cheese.. prob the cheap kind (but how picky can we be for $5?)  - Different tasting fried batter... not sure if I love it or hate it, haha.  Tuna Wrap - $6.95  fresh tuna salad with lettuce, tomato & onion in a fresh tortilla wrap - They don't have whole wheat wraps :( But once again, for $7, how much can you complain?  -It hit the spot -Fries were surprisingly awesome. Thick cut fries, good fry on them.   ***Also, the live irish music did not hurt one bit!
Absolutely love this place. My husband and I stopped by here on a whim because the hotel we were staying at was nearby and it kept popping up on our maps and I am SO glad we did! Super friendly staff, absolutely delicious food and very laid back atmosphere. They gave us Greek beignets on the house and they were so good! 5 out of 5 starts would definitely recommend!
Really delightful little place in a "food desert." Service was cheerful. We went for Saturday brunch... They made a cute little bunny pancake with berry eyes and whipped cream mouth. Roasted potatoes were great, and the coffee comes with free refills. The only thing I didn't like was that my otherwise-perfect salmon eggs Benedict came with very smoky housemade chopped salmon instead of lox. However, I appreciated that they honored my "over-hard" poached egg request. Will go back for lunch/dinner.
Vaughan T Ray, my doctor, actually listened to me, unlike any other doctors in the past. The center is very cozy and the staffs are friendly and easy on me. They really don't mind writing with me (because I am deaf) and they actually kept everything we wrote, so just in case we may need it later. They refuse to waste you any time.   I so am looking forward for my next appointment in a few hours for my first pricks test that I have wanted for years. Damn TriCare for don't give a crap about me or my allergies or my overdoses on the antihistamines.
Service and food were both excellent - however - the menu is too confusing - if you have the schnitzel - AWESOME - seems that most dishes from the kitchen were the schnitzel - the other dishes are very complicated - too much deconstructing - too many flavors - it was too complicated. The tuna was like warm and the foam just didn't blend well with that dish - it seemed as if they are in an identity crises as to what to serve.
1st time here and the food was really great! Had the bruschetta which was wonderful, the house made bread was very tasty and our mains were both delicious. Service was prompt and friendly. Would go back.
Nice vibe, albeit a little loud. The food was excellent and even more so for the price. Three of us shared a salad and three small portion pasta dishes plus three cocktails and dessert for right at $100. I highly recommend the pasta caramelle. We were celebrating a birthday and the staff were very attentive, wishing the birthday girl a happy birthday multiple times and treating us with complimentary prosecco. The valet is also complimentary. We will certainly be back.
Great food and service. French toast with strawberries and cream hit the spot. Good vibe and convenient to Northside hospital in Sandy Springs.
Yelp steered us right.  We used them for a move-out clean.  Very thorough job, reasonably priced... thrilled with the service, and will use them again.
Amazing Xi'an noodles that are better than the ones I got in Xi'an. Very reasonably priced, too. I envy those who work nearby.
Nice service.  Clean.  Many flavors.  $0.40/oz takes credit card/American Express.
We went there for dinner on Sunday night and enjoyed it very much! To begin with, our hostess was friendly and accommodating.  Our server was easy going, also friendly, and helpful.  The decor felt like a mix of retro and Asian influences.  We were a party of four and had the cripsy spring rolls and braised pork belly buns, which were fun and tasty!  We also had the dumplings (our favorite dish!), the chicken udon noodles that were a bit spicy but very good, and the chicken wings (good), plus sides of rice.  The drinks (mine a Lotus Flower--delicious!) were creative and yummy.  And then for dessert we had the coconut cream pie and the vanilla bean parfait, both of which we felt like we could have done without...neither wowed us.   I would definitely return, since it was a fun environment with good food and decent prices, but some of the others in my group did not feel that way.  All in all, a good place with good food!
Descent selection of Asian foods, and it is not too far from my house! Only problem is parking, and the semi-rude people that push the shopping carts around this grocery store. But you can find everything you need at a great price. Their meats are alot cheaper then Publix or Kroger's, and they have a BBQ meats place, so next time I need to bring Cash and Buy myself a roasted duck! hahaha.. The veggies were descently fresh, and the frozen food section had alot of stuff that is comparable to California.  After shopping here, I called mom and told her I won't be starving , and that there's an Asian grocery, which made her feel Happier for Knowing..
The food was seasoned and prepared to perfection.  The service was very good, but I felt that their prices were a little on the high side for your average customer.  I believe my plate was like $44.  Overall, it was a really nice dining experience.
I need more stars to give!!! This is not a typical caterer for several reasons: 1. No other catering company has Jeanne Spence, and I could have gotten through this wedding more easily missing my fiance, than missing her. 2. The most gorgeous presentation of food you will ever see. Chafing dishes are nowhere in sight.  3. We had a person just assigned to mine and my now husband's family - making sure we had enough food, drinks and no one bothering us for anything!! 4. The staff is dedicated, incredible, and you can tell they actually want to be there. Amazing, really. Best staff ever. 5. If you don't like something;  they'll work with you!! Even if you only have a few people with food allergies or different food life choices, they accommodate without having an abundance of leftovers. 6. There will be no leftovers!!!! Not one person came up to me after devouring plateS of food, without mentioning how incredible it was. Not a scrap left!!  Hands down, simply the best. And if there was a better than best, Gourmet Caterers would be it!!
I know I live in NY (home of the slice) but every time I come home, it's inevitable we'll get a pie from Rossini's.   In the summer, we cruise on over in my Mom's convertible where an argument will always ensue in the parking lot about whether or not to leave the top down (my Mom thinks a "hooligan" is going to come by and dump a soda in the car. My Dad does not.) The place itself ain't anything to write home about: it has about 6 booths and wood paneling but always has at least one family of locals chowing down and I like how they bring a pizza stand to the table so you don't have to rearrange dishes and what-not. In the winter, we get take out, because let's be honest, it's cold as balls over here!   For 3-4, I'd recommend a large pie - the Rossini Special if you like anchovies - and definitely the Greek Salad to even things out. And for a grand total of $28 (I nearly fainted when my Mom said how much it was), you definitely can't go wrong!
Comfort food galore! I love that this German restaurant is thriving in the middle of German Village. When we have gone to German restaurants in other towns, they have often seemed dead. I foresee us going back often.
I have the Spicy Beef Noodle soup here alot, it is awesome good. Better then Pho Hung and Pho Van. Its a nice assortment of meats, sorta like a treasure chest of meat. Smells SLIGHTLY ammonia-ted, in a good way (i kno you dont believe that, but BELIEVE it). get the banana flowers along with your greens to go in it.  Fish Sauce wings and house fried rice is my go to dish too.  Great crispy wings with a good sauce and fried rice better then most.   Great prices, great staff. this place is awesome
Great food for the price. Priced betterthan nearby neighbor Don Pedro. Had the viva Mexico burrito.....which haden excellent sauce.
Wow! Awesome food! This restaurant is definitely under marketed! It's fresh food, comfort food that makes you think of grandma's cooking. The salad bar... laid out fresh ingredients prepares you for this healthy experience. The chicken soup is a simple broth, egg noodles with the most tender chicken! Creamy Tomato is authentic homemade with just a touch of sweet. Its hard to stop eating it! Delicious! We thought it was just a salad and soup bar but were pleasantly surprised to find pasta, pizza, muffins and a great soft serve ice cream bar. Economical, healthy, a must!
I'm obsessed with the BLTs. I've never had their pizza, but if it's half as good as the BLT, I'll be a happy camper. I just wished they had Diet Coke.
CO was amazing! Went in for Happy Hour today for half off makimono rolls and sake carafes...the rolls were amazing and the sake infused carafe was so refreshing after a long day. We tried both the blueberry and lychee infused versions...soooooo good! Our sever Abi was super sweet and had great suggestions. It's such a cute and inviting place in Poncey-Highland...YOU MUST GO!
Went in afternoon not knowing that they were in between dining hours. Sat at bar and sampled the brews and had an appetizer,  put our name in for a table and celebrated anniversary w dinner.   Really good and service was great.  An overall great time!!
Love. Love. Love This Gym.  I've been to many a gym in my day and this gym is my favorite!! I would recommend it over a Gold's gym any day. It's got everything you need and the price is right. They have unlimited tanning and guests for black card holders. The staff is pretty friendly except for this old lady that thinks she owns the place. I love they real owner, he's so friendly.  It gets pretty crowded and the staff does not enforce the 30 min work out room rules, which really aggravates me.
This is a great places to chill with friends one on one or mid sized groups. Good drinks and a bevy of different games to play. Great atmosphere and friendly staff. The only draw back is the place gets busy quickly so arrive early or rely on luck.
Having recently moved to the neighborhood, not having laundry in my building, and not having time to do my laundry anyway, I've started bringing it here for wash, dry, fold.  The service is friendly, the turnaround extremely fast, and they have not lost items like other cleaners have.   I have brought some items here for dry cleaning and have been very pleased with the fast turnaround and the great prices.   And as one previous reviewer mentioned, their hours can't be beat!
First off you have to get Alx, She will take good care of you! I was working right by this restaurant when I was in town for a couple days. I loved it! I had not been to a red robins many times before then but I loved it every time! I tried the onion rings which was great, the tortilla soup even though it did not look like the picture on the menu it was still delicious! I also tried the chicken wrap for lunch once and it was quite filling, and only had half the wrap and was very content with it. Great red robins, the entire 10 days I was in town.. I did wonder about the remodeling patches on the wall haha
This is a wonderful place. They do all of the same things a regular vet would do, except they don't charge you the ridiculous prices. I took my cat there recently and she needed some vaccinations and medicine for her ears. I only had to spend $48. I took her to a vet last year and she had the same problems and I spent over $80. The vets at Merwin also found some things that the previous vet had not noticed.
Made an appointment with Kristin for an updo for a wedding. I've never been to this location. The receptionist was nice and walked me down to Kristin. Everything down there was clean and nice. Kristin did a fantastic job. My hair looked amazing. I've had many updos and I have never been satisfied and I'm not particularly picky. Anyway, she nailed it. And it stayed perfect all night.
I got the tonkotsu ramen with extra chasu pork, because...pork belly goodness. We then shared an order of gyoza and takoyaki balls (we thought that takoyaki balls were such a steal for the price! )  The tonkotsu ramen was absolutely delicious, savory not overly salty. I ended up finishing the entire bowl. Each table has  a chilli oil bottle, and a spice bottle as condiments if you choose to flavor up your food.   The gyoza was a good balance between vegetables and meat, it was accompanied with soy sauce. It wasn't as flavorful as I would like it but it certainly wasn't bad.   The takoyaki balls were good for their price--the presentation was beautiful. Each ball was stuffed with a generous amount of chopped octopus. I wish it was cooked a little longer for the inside was a bit too mushy for me, but don't get me wrong, with the sauces and bonito and seaweed flakes it was plenty flavorful.   The environment was a very modern rustic, definitely great for a quick casual bite. The staff was nice but a bit more quiet than I'm use to for a ramen place. I'm sure this will change once they pick up more business.   I will be returning for another bowl of tonkotsu ramen deliciousness!
This place is legit. You can pick as many fruit/veggie options as you want and the finished product is a HUGE mound of delicious frozen goodness, very creamy too. I had a large cup made from peaches, banana, pineapple, and kale with mango topping- DELICIOUS! My boyfriend had a cup made from white grapes, honeydew, and peaches- also delicious.   The point is, you really can't go wrong here, we'll definitely be back.
The food here was excellent. I had the bife grelhado (grilled steak) and the portion size was more than enough. I also had a caipirinha which was delicious. Needless to say, I will definitely be returning!
My new go to place for Mexican. So close to home and such good food. I'm addicted to their enchiladas.
We waited until after The craziness of October to finally try Bambolina.  We came early on a weeknight to give it a try since we've heard such great things.  The food was totally worth it and the atmosphere was nice.  Loved every bite.  So glad to have a pizza restaurant like this in town.  The lack of 5 stars is due to the service.  We must have had the same server as mentioned by another reviewer.  She was great in the beginning as she promptly took our order and delivered our food and drinks efficiently but then disappeared.  Even though the restaurant wasn't busy, she seemed preoccupied in back or by the tablet computer in back and when she walked by she never made eye contact so we couldn't get her attention order another round or check to see if we needed anything else.  When she finally did check in we were done eating and had empty glasses for our beer, wine and water.  Not sure if Bambolina offers dessert either since she never offered.  I think this will be great for take out and hopefully the server we had gets some more training.
This place came HIGHLY recommended, especially for their lobster roll. The location is great, on the water with a handful of tables lending to the view. The atmosphere is cozy and shack-like, with cool lighting. Service was fantastic. Hostess was friendly and helpful, and our server, Amy, was the bomb. She had good food recommendations, was HILARIOUS, and made our visit an outstanding experience. The crab cakes, lobster roll (get the onion rings), and fish tacos were phenomenal. Cons: they no longer sell the Barking Crab sweatshirts some of the servers had on!!
This place is an institution in East Boston (and for the rest who know about it )and serves great italian food(pizza,lamb!) in a family/bar setting.   The reviews speak for themselves....I have no words.....
Great, healthy food options - Roasted Turkey, Roast Beef, Chicken (was told that they roast the meat fresh every day).  The employees are friendly and willing to make just about any accommodation for your dietary needs.  Had no trouble asking them to put dressing on the side on my Caesar salad and customizing for my diet.  Will stop by again when I come back to the mall.
So I went here for a co-worker's going away party. This was my first time coming to this chain of restaurants.  I always heard good things so I was excited to go. The food was good. The drinks weren't that potent. Like I've learned that if I want something potent I need to tell them to mix up something random and not something on the menu. The Strawberry Mojito was good though...not everyone can get that combination right. I had the chicken skewers and fish tacos. I'm going to learn to not get fish tacos everywhere I go because they aren't great everywhere I go. smh. The chicken skewers come served with some plantains (maduros). They were good. I will come back and try some other things on the menu.
A hidden gem in hazel dell. Friendly staff, amazing food at an affordable price. Just a small hole in the wall. Never crowded. Seated immediately. You do leave smelling like a kitchen all day. Be prepared but well worth it.
Our go-to Mexican place when we're in the area. Everything is always fresh, yummy and authentic. Love the Cadillac Margaritas, too, but beware as they are super strong. So fun to sit outside in the nice weather. We are really picky foodies and expect good service. We get it here and at their Brookline location, as well. Love the mole and shrimp dishes.
Well Michelin, it is safe to say that you are indeed overrated and biased. A couple months back, I had the pleasure of going to the Water Grill in downtown Los Angeles, a restaurant that holds 1 Michelin star (at least when they had a Michelin guide in LA). It was very good, but in my opinion B&G Oysters is definitely better. We ended up at B&G at 5:30 on a Saturday (the only res we could get a week ahead of time). It seemed like a great place to take my aunt and uncle while they were in town doing touristy things.   For our apps, we ordered the fried clams and the mussels.The fried clams were clearly pretty fresh and the dipping sauce was great. The mussels on the other hand were spectacular. We agreed that these were some of the most tender mussels that any of us had ever had, and they were quite flavorful as well.   For our entrees, my aunt and uncle both ordered some fish that they had never tried before, ordered the salmon, and my girlfriend ordered the lobster roll. The lobster roll was quite good and very lightly dressed (the way I like it). She also had coleslaw and fries on the side. While the coleslaw was pretty standard, the fries were very good. I loved that they decided to opt for tarragon and cilantro on the fries. For my salmon, I have to say that this was easily the most crispy fish skin I have ever had on a piece of fish. The fish itself was quite tasty as well. Oh...and the sauce...the sauce, so good. The chorizo added an element of saltiness that I thought was welcome and often lacking from fish in restaurants. We opted to avoid dessert and go out for ice cream instead, but overall it was a fantastic experience. The service was generally good as well. I feel like I need to try the Butcher Shop now as well...
Firstly, if you have to wait, it's worth it. Secondly, if you have to wait, you may have to wait longer than what you were told. Our 25-30 wound up being 50-55.  What can I say that 500 other haven't said already? Not sure, but here's my 2 shiny pennies!  Pops & I are of Germanic heritage. He'd been hankering for a trip to Frankenmuth MI - while I would rather have a pencil stuck in my temple. I suggested we try a trip to the German Village in C-bus and he was game for it. While the wifey is not a huge fan of german food I assured her I'd make a suitable suggestion from the menu for her.  Fast forward - we're at our table (seating can be tight when busy) near the Autobahn buffet and looking over the menu - prices on everything BUT the buffet, which sort of gives me a bit of anxiety. I suggest babe order the weiner schnitzel (she likes a good tenderloin, schnitzel is the great grand father) while Pops decides a reuben is in order. Our server informs me the dinner Autobahn buffet is $15 which I leap at. (and their desserts are discouted if you order a buffet AND its $3 cheaper at lunch!!!!)  Sorry you guys have to wait, I'm already heading to the buffet!  Skip over the salad and straight to meat - brats, bahama mamas, mild bahama mamas, knockwurst, breaded baked chicken, warm german potato salad, red cabbage, mac n cheese and sauerkraut. Should have gotten 2 plates!  I loved my Oma's cooking but I wish she'd had Schmidt's recipes - especially for the german potato salad. Best ever and I must recreate.  Some say the bahama mamas are spicy. Nah. But if you love garlic, and I LOVE garlic, you must sample their knockwurst. Guaranteed to give you dragon breath tomorrow!!!! For me the standout sausage was truly the bratwurst. Absolutely friggin fantastic. And NO, I discovered a few days later ... you cannot order bratwursts delivered online. Ye Gods!  Pops loved his reuben and sweetie said she was very happy with the schnitzel. [duh]  So the brat was standout. But our takeaway was the vanilla cream puff. We had to have it packed to go - no way we could eat. We 3 split the next morning at our hotel - wishing we hadn't just gotten one.   Not sure when I'll make it back but certainly will.
Whats not to like? Cheap beers, good wings. The sauces are really good. Thats about it.
As a goldendoodle owner I admittedly tend to be picky about my pup's cut.  (No poodle cut please!)  I've now taken him here at least three or four times and we both always leave happy. Katie listens to what I'm looking for and does just that. The first time we went, there was some matting on his tail and they gave me a call to discuss our options which I appreciated.  Each time I can't believe how quick it is. It's typically taken a half a day at other groomers, and I get a call that Walter is ready in just two hours (or less)!  Lastly,I love that he's not crated when finished and gets to run around a bit and depending on the day happily play with other pups until I arrive to pick him up.
I had my prom dress hemmed and the price was awesome. Lili was such a sweet and honest person. I'm going to my prom again this year, and truth be told, I'd only trust her when it came to alterations.
It's restaurant week and that means one thing: picking an expensive place and eat, eat, eat for a great price. After some research and thought, decided to pick a steakhouse and came across Flemings. When I looked at their restaurant week menu, I saw two filet mignon entrees. That did it, and Flemings we went.   The place was dimly lit inside but spacious and had a warm but cool (not temperature cool...but joe cool cool) atmosphere to it. Everything looked fancy but not too snotty. It was nice. Our waitress was great! She was so professional and polite, very soft spoken but gave out a positive attitude. She was great. However, the servers (they looked like staff that went to all the tables to deliver the entrees) must have been either really busy or confused because they had our entrees mixed up between the four of us on the table. We had to clarify a few times. I guess that was one of the reason I only gave four stars.   The food itself was good. Our filet mignon was cooked just as we requested and flavorful. Not too salty, not too bland. It was a lot smaller than I thought but it was enough since we got plenty of side dishes. Wine selection was great and my glass went perfect with the entree. Overall, we got a great deal. Originally, the main entree I got was over $40 by itself...but thanks to restaurant week, I got myself that same entree as part of a 3-course meal for under $35. YES.   I'll probably go back to this place...for a date so the dude can pay :)
Great place.  Always, friendly.  They may not always have my favorite flavors but what can I say.  I love that they have Movie people come by and give away free tickets, posters and t-shirts too.  They also always give my dog a special treat.
First of all- I really like this great little restaurant.  The feel of being near one of several little street restaurants in Tokyo is kind of novel.  I had a really tasty chicken ramen with some appetizers on my last visit and was more than filled up and very happy with the flavor profiles.  Service was good and drink selection was good as well.  Atmosphere is fun and waits aren't too bad.  I will continue to frequent this great little spot on Division.  Highly recommend!
I would give this place 6 stars if I could! Great drinks, delicious apps, and incredible tacos. Stop what you're doing, and get yourself here! Thank you Louisa, fast & friendly service
My coworkers and I come here about once a week for the kombucha (anything with ginger is my favorite!).  Pricey (especially the smoothies) but worth it.  You can tell the ingredients are fresh and most days you can watch the employees in action washing/chopping/juicing the fruits and veggies that go into their delicious beverages.  The vegan entrees are also good (obviously nothing beats real mac and cheese, but Skyebird's 'mac and trees' is pretty good).  Plus, bring back used mason jars and get a discount on your next purchase!
My 3rd time eating here and i love it as always. Our waitress, Joyce, was WONDERFUL! I ate the Hot Turkey Plate (Turkey, Red Skin Mashed Potatoes, Roasted Zucchini and Squash and Cranberry Sauce.   and it was delish! My girlfriend had the Pot Roast which i tasted and it was ok. The meat was good but the gravy of the pot roast was a bit too bitter/tart. The bacon in my daughter's plate was too over cooked but she's 5 so she didn't notice. Her biscuit was good. I would definitely come again.
They do an excellent job! Love Denise! She's terrific! The stylists are professional and courteous and take their time in doing a great job, unlike some other places I've been that rush to get you out. Brookhaven Great Clips is the spot for a sweet cut!
Despite the restaurant bringing us the wrong food and having to wait for them to cook new dishes, I still would rate it five stars!! They don't give you masses of meat for the price, so I wouldn't recommend coming here if you're looking to pig out. However, the food is just SOO tasty that you wouldn't complain! I highly recommend the chicken korma and cheese naan, which tastes just like a naan quesadilla *heavenly*!! The service is great and the manager basically gave us our meal free for the wait.   I have been to this restaurant plenty of times and will continue to come despite the food mistakes tonight!
As a Chinese girl who is crazy about noodles ( that usually only sticks to noodle spots on Buford hwy or Duluth), I have to say this place is VERY LEGIT! It is particularly ideal for those who would like to have vegetarian noodle soup, since ramen places almost always use pork or chicken broth.  This place offers two broth options: original (meat broth) and mushroom broth (available upon request). I have tried their mussels and baby squid, very fresh. Broth is very tasty with garlic notes, no MSG which is awesome, you don't have to worry about getting dehydrated or a headache after eating MSG filled noodle broth. There is also a hidden veggie option which is not in their fridge, shiitake mushrooms ¢95, must try! Usually a bowl of noodles varies between $9-$12...
There are rides meant to be air condition breaks (I'm looking at you Carousel of Progress). PhilharMagic is actually one of the better options when seeking a break from the heat.  You're treated to a show that delights all the senses and due to it's large capacity size, doesn't have too long of a wait either!
This is a great Icy Bar to pick up a nice traditional or more modern Chinese dessert, especially if you like shaved iced. We got a quickly got table for two and were served by the nice gentleman working at the shop. Fairly busy on a weekend night.   I decided I was in the mood for one of my regular favourites, the mango pomelo sago dessert (楊枝甘露) and was met with a satisfying dessert. Nice and sweet with a decent amount of fruits included as well. My dessert was only $8.00 + tax/tip, which although isn't cheaper than the Icy Bar takeout locations is still a good place to come sit down for a dessert and chill out. The positive is that this menu has much more selection than the takeout locations and includes things such as waffles which I don't think I've seen before at the other takeout locations.  Overall, this is a great location. I thought that the staff were super friendly and were pretty attentive to their customers. Another good thing is that they do accept visa and debit so cash is not necessary!
I decided to check this place out yesterday and I have to say I loved it. I like the charm of the decor, music, and vibe. Their busy time is during lunch so I would avoid lunch hour if I were you. The policy of "no laptop" is truly for real. Yup, go and enjoy your reading time/conversation with your friend without looking down on the screen. There's plenty of spaces to park. The coffee choices are pretty fair along with the prices. Go check it out if you haven't!
Super good drinks, shots, beer, and games!!! Awsome vibe they have a section devoted to haunted mansion, pirates of carribean and starwars!!! alot of fun if there is nothing going on thursday nite.. If it gets too crowded its hard to get in on video games!
Very good service. Pricey burgers. Love the skinny fries. I got the luau burger. It was good but I've had better. We also had the burger with chili and an egg that was also good. What I could've done without was the mop water smell from the bar. Yuck
Very professional done and on time.  Brake job and shock absorbers for a reasonable price.
The staff was cool and helpful, even right before the kitchen closed at 2AM. Wings were OK, maybe a little pricey at $1 per. I had the lemon pepper and they were well flavored and not too oily. Tried one slice of Soul Food Pizza since that seems to be what everyone is talking about. It was a very interesting slice of pizza! I ate it all so it must be tasty. I had mine to go, but Jack's seems like its designed for group outings that involve lots of beer and loud conversation. I'll come back with friends.
When it comes to ATX, this place is about as good as it gets when it comes to flavor, texture, and overall authenticity of their noodles. I had the lamb skewers, dumplings, and pork stir-fried noodles and left full and completely satisfied. Service was very quick, but I came at an off time. Been here at lunch and it gets crazy and there are not that many seats.
I like this place a lot and come here often.  There is a good selection of both meat and veggie dishes and all delicious. The music tends to be a bit loud and the back of the restaurant can use new paint on the walls but these are minor things, the staff is friendly, and you get seated right away and your glass of water is refilled non stop.
Absolutely loved this place! The salon was very clean and well-maintained, and all the technicians were friendly and fun. Great customer service. First time visiting: no question I will be back! Beautiful results and great attention to detail.
I'v had cleanings, caps, cavities and i think even a root canal with the good doctor. He's friendly, gentle ( If that kind of thing is important to you :) and most of all honest. I had a bad experience with Aspen dental in lawrence & dedham, using me and my wifes mouth as a ATM.
So I haven't had the fortune to step into this place for a few years but this past month I purchased a pair of the PRI boots in purple. It was easily the best Christmas present to myself. Although the process started back in November because I was just informed of their layaway plan thanks to a friend. Black Friday weekend she offered to put money down for me on them because I was stuck at work.   I returned about a week later to see them in person and was acquainted with the JV crew. Ali helped me out with them but I discovered that my massive hulking calves weren't going to fit. :( *proceeded to cry bacon grease* But Ali assured me that not only does John have a tendency to make the calves small on his boots but they CAN be stretched. She also showed me a few other styles that I enjoyed but I still had my heart set on those tall distressed purple boots. She reccommended coming back in a skirt because my jeans were really thick but painted on.   I came back on my next free day and was helped by Pete. He helped me get my massive calves into those boots. One thing I really appreciated about Pete was he was quite practical and not the slightest bit sharky. In fact, he talked me out of paying them off right then and there until after my reviews at school. Massart Alumni know what's up.   So I came back the following weekend after getting paid and school was finished to finalize the sale and start the stretching process which took a little under a week. The soft distressed leather stretched quite easily and they fit perfectly afterwards. I was also later helped out weather proofing them and given advice on general care. I could also change the soles out on an older pair of heels I had. Just overall amazing customer service!   Although now every time I come in, I'm tempted into buying more shoes. The first pair is apparently the gateway. It's a slippery slope from there. EVIL EVIL STORE WITH SHOE TEMPTRESSES! I NEED MY MONEY FOR RENT! NOOOOOO! D:
Well, been going here pretty regularly on Wednesdays, when the truck stops in my area. I've since tried most everything on the menu, and been about as delighted as I was the first time. The Gangsta Wrap and the Ballpark are tied for my favorite.  I tried the curry a little while ago and came away very impressed. Spicy enough to be interesting, but not annoyingly hot. That's pretty rare, for me. I would very likely get the full plate if doing so did not mean I'd have to skip out on getting a wrap.  The lemonade iced tea is probably my favorite of their drinks. It could stand to have more lemony flavor, but as an iced tea, it's very good. I'm slightly less enamored with the punch they offer -- it's decent enough to buy, but it's missing something. I hesitate to say it should be less sour, because I'm a pretty big fan of sour, but that tends to be the crux of the takeaway.  So, yeah. Still wonderful.
Pupusas here are SO DELICIOUS. Especially with the side slaw/pickled cabbage.  And excellent value.  Super sad that the tamales have meat - we tried to clarify and confirm with our server since we were both vegetarian, but she must not have understood what we were asking, so when it came out and we dissected it, we were very disappointed.  Margaritas are tasty and very reasonably priced.  Tortilla chips are hot and fresh and salsa is plentiful though you might wait a bit before someone can refill it for you.  The other times I've come with omnivores, they seem to have enjoyed their quesadillas and enchiladas and various other entrees.  Portion sizes are generous.  I just stick to my pupusas because usually I'm not that hungry the times I've visited.  Place is clean, cute, but a little noisy, especially if you come on Karaoke night (Sunday?) but it's at least charming and hilarious.
On a recent business trip to Portland a local beer geek friend of mine suggested that we venture out of downtown and visit Little Beast Brewing Beer Garden. I reminded him that I'm not much of a beer drinker  but he said I should be open minded and give it a try.  So off we went.  Little Beast is located in an old house on Division street, which is a nice street to walk, filled with restaurants and bars.  I started with a beer sampler that the waiter recommended and I have to say, for  someone who doesn't drink much beer, I really enjoyed it.  My friend told me that some of the best brew in town can be had at Little Beast.  The menu had some truly original items including steak tartar, and  a shrimp roll that was filled with fresh shrimp.  Mmmm, I really liked that shrimp roll.  I didn't try the steak tartar but my friend said it was excellent.  If you're looking for a great place to enjoy a well crafted beer with some very interesting and tasty menu items, I suggest you give Little Beast a try.  I'm definitely going back the next time I'm in town.
Really really great place to take kids.  They did a wonderful job both with my four year old and one year old, and I feel like we're in great hands with Dr. Buckley.  One word of warning, the parking lot they suggest is a little hard to find the first time, and any door you open at the front of the building has stairs.  So it's not stroller friendly and if you have a little one you need to either carry them in, have a stroller you can fold up and take up and down the stairs, or be prepared to leave it outside.  So that is a little inconvenient but overall the awesome job they do with kids more than makes up for it!
Stylist Isabelle never disappoints.  She is great at cut, color, and style which is rare to find someone who can do it all!
I should probably qualify this review up front by admitting that every time I have eaten at Artist Point I was on the Disney Dining Plan. For those of you that are unfamiliar with the DDP it is a prepaid dining package that you can purchase if you are staying in a Walt Disney World resort. Essentially you pay for your meals in advance and if you are a crafty diner -like me- you can really get a lot of bang for your buck and end up saving some money in the long run. So take my review with a grain of salt because I went BIG at Artist Point and did so without regret.   Of all the WDW eateries Artist Point is firmly entrenched in my top three. Artist Point gets huge bonus points for featuring an extensive wine selection from the under appreciated Pacific Northwest. I'm a pushover when it comes to a good wine pairing and always ask my server to match a glass to each course. Since they are trained in this and I am not I leave it to the professionals.   I am a big fan of the artisan cheese course and like a typical American I treat this as an appetizer instead of an end of the meal treat. The trio of cheeses covers a safe yet broad selection of fromage including a nice cheddar, a creamy goat and a tangy blue. This was matched nicely with an Oregon Pinot Noir.   There are two dishes Artist Point is famous for; the cedar plank salmon and the buffalo. Choosing between these two wonderful dishes is almost a Sophie's Choice caliber decision. Of course if you know that Artist Point has an off the menu surf and turf option where you can have both you won't have to decide. It's kind of like getting your burger "animal style" at In-N-Out because unless you know to ask for it you wouldn't know it is there. Both dishes are wonderful and served in smaller portions when combined so you can enjoy both without being wasteful.   Desserts leave a little to be desired at Artist Point. The signature berry cobbler just doesn't do it for me. The chocolate cheesecake and the clafouti (a rustic baked custard pie with fruit) are better choices.  Artist Point is a popular restaurant so make sure yu contact Disney Dining for a priority seating time.
I will never be accused of being the brightest bulb on the Christmas Tree but after living 4 blocks from the Leaky Roof for 5 years and only walking in there tonight I may in fact be the dimmest bulb.  This is a fantastic little pub. The atmosphere is excellent with a small comfortable bar right next to a fire place. Perfect on a rainy cold late afternoon. The pub including the rest rooms are spotlessly clean. Service is friendly, welcoming and prompt. We only had some appetizers but they were both excellent. There  menu looks great and I will be back for dinner. (Prices are something else. This place is a deal).   There is something about this little pub that is hard to qualify; it is so welcoming and comfortable. Make sure you get here early since it fills up fast. Smarter folks than me have figured out this is a wonderful pub.
Very affordable and all about serving delicious, traditional, Ethiopian cuisine!
I appreciate that I was treated like a queen and walked out with the best haircut I've had - Natalie is wonderful and gave me exactly what I asked for, a cut that was sassy, smart and still feminine.
I LOVE this restaurant. The Lavas bread with hummus alone is enough to keep bringing me back, but the rest of the menu is just as delicious. Great service and lovely location. One of my favorite places to eat.
Excellent service excellent food we spent about 70$ on 2 meals 2 drinks and an appetizer but totally worth EVERY PENNY
Best tonkotsu ramen that I've had in Portland so far. The broth was rich and flavorful with just enough salt to my liking. Noodles were chewy and not soggy. Condiments including green onions, pork belly chashu, nori, and soft boiled egg, spinach, and fungi were all fresh and complimented the ramen.  I would definitely go back for the tonkotsu and possibly try another one of their ramen options (all $11). There is a HH before 6p which makes appetizers more reasonably priced. $8 for 5pc gyoza??? Hard pass.   Street parking.  Shared entrance with nong's.
This place has the best sweet corn in the summer.  They pretty much have everything.  Prices are great too.  My only complaint is there is very little parking, and getting out onto Gender Rd. from Shannon Rd. is like asking to die!!!!
This place was great - and I was there only for Sunday brunch (all you can eat buffet) so far.  Live music, great service, and really good Cape Verdean food (the seafood rice dish and Tuna empanadas especially - although probably have a different name on menu!).  The service was fantastic and the best part was that while it was busy, there was no effort to rush us out as we stayed for about 2 hours.  Oh, and also it has a full bar.  One of the owners name Jose (pronounced Joe-say) was greeting customers, smiling, and doing almost everything else. He helped to create a great vibe.  I will be back for dinner and brunch again.
Spartan's got it going on! Great pizza starts with the crust and theirs is just the right amount of crunch and dough, with a brush of garlic.  They have a rotating selection of pizzas available for slices, my fav is the Zeus.  If you ask they have two kinds of pesto too.  Good ambiance, cool staff and a scenic view of East 6th.
I've walked by this place on more than one occasion, however, finally walked in over the weekend. I am semi frequently in and around little India for grocery, however, this has always skipped my radar even though it's shamefully right by the bus stop. I am glad that I finally walked in, long over due.   The décor of the place is sleek, clean and modern. It is easily missable as it doesn't fit the rest of the feel of the traditional stores nearby.   Outside the store front is a really warm and cute story about the café. You get a real sense of community from one generation to another.   The owner was super friendly and patient. The best coffee house experience I have had in a long time.   This café is close to my home and carries both gluten and sugar free treats. The combination of the two are hard to find. Finally a café that can specifically cater to my culinary needs.   I tried the lavender chocolate sugar/gluten free bar. Just the right amount of lavender that complements the chocolate. A treat that felt guilt free in my mouth.   This is just 29 blocks away from my favourite record store, perfect time to walk and savour my treats.   The hot drinks are the usual suspects that came in a coffee shop with fair market prices.   I will defiantly be back more than once as everyone seems to be raving about the butter chicken poutine. Now we know what happens when a French and an Indian person make love....you have butter chicken poutine.
I cheated and ate here for lunch on restaurant week. That would make you think that the food was only mediocre but Miel transcended that. If their cuisine is that good or (gulp) better on any given day- this restaurant would be one of the best in Boston.  If you have a business lunch coming up- book Miel. If you need to impress someone- book Miel. If you want to treat yourself- book Miel.   The one thing that was odd- we only saw our waiter twice during the entire visit. He took our food orders and came back to check in while we were eating. Any other services ( bread, water, food delivery) was performed by other people. That was kinda weird.
I love the Chinese Reflexology places in L.A. and became a big fan - sad that there were so few here in Atlanta. However, thrilled to discover this wonderful gem near Ansley Mall. After a run in Piedmont Park made my way to one of their cozy,comfy, over-sized chairs and enjoyed the quiet, low-lighting, clean environment. Offered some delicious tea. Selected the one-hour massage for $35.00 and completely enjoyed it! A great place to go if you don't like the 'strip-down-to-your-nothin's' kind of massage. Here you stay fully clothed while feet, legs, hands, shoulders, neck all get a fabulous massage. Staff was quiet and considerate, allowing for a peaceful hour out of my day.
Hector is phenomenal and did a great job. His pricing was extremely affordable and my fence looks brand new. Hector is super friendly, informative & professional. I look forward to promoting his company!!
I found this spot by chance. The service was great, and the food was even better. I had the fried chicken and corn bread cakes. I want to go back soon, and bring friends.   I told everyone about my great experience.   Note: you do have to pay for parking during the weekend. It was worth it for me.
I left the 11 year old unattended with an entire quart of Fishwife clam chowder that I figured would last us a few days.    When  I returned from yoga, the container was licked clean.   This wasn't any old container. It was a $14 QUART! Of Clam chowder!  I am blaming it all on the Fishwife for being so delicious.  Raising a teenager is going to get expensive.
This is one of my favorite rides here and you do get wet, but not drenched.  I remember the lines being super long like 90 minutes when the ride first opened, but I can see why.  The ride itself has three drops which is nice compared to most log fume rides where you go up and then go on a little ride and then go down.  The interactive characters is pretty cool.  The drop is always the best part however and really loved it.
Good food.  The pecan chicken, hamburgers, pizza, and appetizers are great.  We enjoy sitting at the bar.  The bartenders are fast, friendly, and helpful   They rotate the on tap beer selection. The CBV beer, Bhodi, is my favorite.  A double IPA. Golden orange pour with a white soap head. Citrus aroma and some hop bite.
I recently tried Hound Dogs Pizza...a little late in the game, I know, I never got around to it. Wow, I was surprised! Having read all the great write-ups and reviews online...I was expecting a great slice of pizza...they def lived up to my expectations. The crust was delicious, sauce was great...greasy, but in a good way! It's not the type of pizza I could eat every week, but once in a while. :)   Veggie pizza is excellent, so is the classic cheese. Don't go here expecting a classy pizza joint - it's far from it, but you want a great and flavorful pizza...don't hesitate to stop by!
After leaving our previous bar we wanted to go to a place where we could get some food quickly and some drinks to enjoy. We walked right in on the bar side (there was a separate more typical dining area too) and seated ourselves in the corner table by the window. Within 10 minutes our waitress came over and took our drink and appetizer order. The place wasn't full but I'd say it was reasonably busy, especially after a group of 10 people came in and got seated right next to us. We ordered the pizza skins and some honey BBQ wings. We got our beers about 10 minutes later and our food shortly after that. It was a good dining experience and our waitress was very friendly. They even had a machine on the table where you could call your server directly on it and pay the check, once we were done we just did that and got out as fast as we got in. The restrooms here were small but were clean. Would come back if in the area.
I have no complaints. I worked with the evening manager, Byron English, and I could not have been happier. I misunderstood something on their website and he fixed everything. When we arrived at the airport, the shuttle came quickly. The line was not short, but we moved along quickly. As it happened, he helped me there too. For a nominal amount we drove away in a new Mustang convertible. We were all smiles. Upon our return, the shuttle was there. I have never had a better experience with a car rental company and I most definitely recommend Advantage in Orlando and will be using them again. Thank you, Advantage!
I booked a reservation on Open Table for a work team lunch (11 guests) last month. The location is conveniently located near our office about a 5 minute walk. The manager, Chelsea, and our waiter, Byron, were extremely accommodating and provided us great customer service. They originally seated us inside but since the weather was nice out I asked them to move our large party outside to the patio. Byron kept our water glasses filled and was very attentive.   The lunch menu provides a variety of options to choose from depending on your mood and how heavy of a meal you want to consume. I think the portions are pretty generous. The golden coconut curry bowl, trifecta meatloaf and woodfire black angus ribeye were all a hit! Flavorful and delicious! The asiago chicken fettuccine was okay but nothing spectacular.  I have visited the other Sage Tavern locations in Alpharetta and Dunwoody. Looking forward to visiting the Buckhead location again soon. Great experience!
I took our Shipooh to Deena at D'Tails and she did an amazing job. It was money well spent! I could totally tell the difference between a $40 grooming visit and a $65 visit. You pay for what you get, and we will definitely be coming back.  Thank You,  KSD
I have wanted a professional camera for a while now and being in a place where I am starting my own business in consulting and design, it was really important to me that I invest in the right one.   So when my church invested into my new company, my first thought was to get my camera. If I wasn't so impatient I would have ordered it online, but sometimes it can be more comforting to make a major purchase like this where someone can talk through the pros and cons with you.  That's where Shammel came in. He's an employee who was manning the camera and computer section at the store. He was friendly, personable, knowledgable and honest! He also had experience with photography and videography which made him a great person to talk to.  It was refreshing. It would have been very easy to spend less or walk away and purchase at another store if he didn't make me feel as comfortable with my decision as he did. Great job!
Blue Hour is one of those rare restaurants where I can say that I have never had a bad meal.  I've been going there for about 8 years, and have tried brunch, lunch and dinner.  Moreover, my girlfriend and I tied the knot there in a private ceremony/dinner in their private dining space. The food is top notch without being pretentious, which is often the case with French restaurants in the US.  As someone who is actually from France, I can attest to the fact that good service and food do not necessarily have to  translate into obsequious, overpriced fare.  Blue Hour is pricy, but reasonably so.  I like the decor quite a bit, and their private dining room is spectacular: cozy, intimate and completely removed from the main restaurant, it has its own bar and even its own bathroom.  Their staff was tremendous in helping us plan our event- Jillian K. especially.  I highly recommend Blue Hour!
Homewood suites by Hilton knows how to provide comfortable rooms and excellent service for decent prices.  I was here for work and enjoyed the extra living space that allowed me to get work done after hours. The hotel itself hosts a happy hour that provides snacks and beer and wines. The parking is close by and plentiful and the staff are very hard working and welcoming. The shuttle took me to and from other areas that were within a reasonable distance and there was no charge but I recommend you tip. The kitchenette was great too but I didn't use it as I had a daily allowance for meals... Though I would have felt fine using the stove, pits and pans and utensils. I would return to this location and brand if on another business trip. Thanks Homewood Suites for making me feel like I was at home for the duration of my stay.
Sapporo used to be 5 star on my book, but recent trip made me think they have lost some touch. They are still good, but something is missing. In bean town this is a gem and I still go back there, especially in cold winter days.
What a great burrito!  The staff were very professional, they took great pride in the preperation of the food, and the restaurant was very clean. We will be back again very soon for more burritos.
I honestly found Hopdoddy to be a little too intimidatingly hip when I first walked in there, especially since there's a "way" to order that isn't immediately obvious to a newbie like myself.  But while the place does give that ultra-hip vibe, its important to note that the staff were actually quite friendly and helpful.  The atmosphere may not necessarily be my cup of tea, but the burger I had was pretty darn tasty!  That's even when I ordered it without their signature sauce (which honestly sounded gross), but that's the mark of a great burger, when it can be really good without any bells and whistles.
I brought my Iphone 4S in for repair and it was fixed within 45 minutes. Once I brought it home I noticed the camera light wasn't working so I contacted J at gadgetworx and he told me to bring it in so he could take a look. I was expecting that I was going to have to pay for the repair but to my surprise and delight, J replaced my camera free of charge. He told me because I had my screen fixed at his shop and the camera, which was working properly prior to the repair, wasnt working properly after that he would fix it free of charge. J runs an honest business and the next time I have an issue with any phone i will be bringing it to him. I highly recommend his shop
Superb!  Took the family the Friday after Thanksgiving.  Service was impeccable.  Food was superb.  Restaurant was beautiful.  Won't go on too long because the other reviews say it all.  Just adding my humble opinion on this wonderful establishment.
Woah. So glad I discovered this place. Really tasty food, super friendly staff, great live music, and an atmosphere that's so laid back I think I'll do some studying there.   Protip: couch in the back is super comfortable.  Music almost every day, or just hang out and enjoy the relaxing scene.
These guys were fast!  I called in the afternoon on Thursday and they were at my house by 10am on Friday.  Not only that but the tech (Jon) called when he was 20 minutes away just to let me know his ETA.  Jon was courteous and quick; 20 minutes after he got there the problem with our dryer was solved and he was finished.  I also liked that they emailed me the receipt - very efficient.  These guys get a solid A+.
Came here with a friend for breakfast-- got the breakfast burrito.  SO good.  Great portion.  The server came by often to warm up the coffee and the prices were reasonable.  Plus, it wasn't overrun like so many Portland restaurants for breakfast/brunch.
The menu is very limited, but everything is well made and delicious. As long as you like fried chicken, you'll love this place. And if you don't, there are 2 or 3 other spots attached to it. So you're guaranteed to find something you like. The fried chicken is perfectly cooked and tender. The sandwich itself has homemade slaw and pickles that absolutely make it. Pick up a side of Dan Dan fries to split with someone, and you're in for a great lunch. R.I.P. Gary Busey
I found Zona via a Groupon, and was so fortunate to get Nicole as my stylist. She was warm and welcoming, very knowledgeable about everything from what cut would be flattering to my face and awesome color / highlights, which was handy since I wasn't sure which direction I'd go with my hair that day. I got so many compliments on my 'do!  I've now been back twice, and am so glad I found my go-to stylist. Nicole is a 5 star stylist.  The atmosphere is pleasant, industrial chic. They have a fully automated appt.  system, so you'll get emails when your appointment is approaching, as well as a phone call. Ample parking.  **A caution to other Grouponers, make sure you are a new client and have not purchased another Groupon from them in 6 months. They have a policy which, since the time of this review, was not updated on the site.
Really good. A kind of gourmet farm to table restaurant.  You could tell that all of their ingredients are fresh and local. Love it. Our waiter, I think his name was Kevin, was an older gentlemen that was really smooth and excellent. Everyone should come here.
Dinner Review -- Loved the food! We had the non-veggie app platter, spinach and cheese, chicken and shrimp curries as well as chicken vindaloo. We went traditional, but they had a large menu with many modern Indian dishes as well. From the apps through the whole meal, everything was prepared perfectly.  Service was attentive. My only complaint was that there wasn't enough space on the tables to put all the delicious food! So glad there is a new excellent restaurant in Brookline which can deliver to my home as well.
If you like dumplings this is the place to go for sure! We take out frequently, the service is ehhh when you dine in.... but the dumplings are fantastic and the rest of the menu is decent!
We stopped in for a quick haircut and a pedicure and had the most fabulous experience ever! That was seriously the best pedicure I have ever had so if you are in Beaverton and you need a haircut or your nails done, stop and get a cup of awesome black rock coffee and then go to Azuer nails for an extra special treat :-)
Great attention to detail! I liked working with Philip R and his crew. To begin with I got precisely what I asked for - a very detailed estimate in a very short amount of time. Really liked seeing in print precisely what they were going to do before they did it. They power-washed my house (4 sides stone so they were painting trim, chimney, gutters etc.) after a Creeping Fig vine left its horrible stickers all around my garage door. Then they did a lot of hand sanding to remove the dried remainder of the vine (never plant one). Finally they painted everything the exact shades I chose. They did this quickly and cleanly, leaving me with no trash, clean windows and a great makeover on my 14-year old home. I would recommend them and use them again.
I initially came to them via Dub Academy to sign up for some DJ classes, something I'd always wanted to do, and an awesome way for me to blow off work stress. Through complaining about other potential DJ's, they set up a time with me to chat about what I was looking for and the price was just right! Barrington, Jamin, Anthony, Scrooge and the rest of the team were so organized and made everything totally customizable, enjoyable, and memorable, and I loved every minute of working with them! I got to request all the songs I wanted, they had my schedule of events down perfectly, they were good at communicating with me throughout the planning process, and were super professional. My guests and I had a blast, and now after the wedding, I am back taking more DJ classes. :D! They were able to do my indian/mexican wedding, and at the last minute we had to change from outdoor to indoor and had some rain issues which they were totally adaptable with.
Highly recommend. Pho is authentic and have quite large portions. Never too busy too so great place to stop by anytime.
This place was absolutely amazing I don't know how anyone could rate it less than 5 stars. The steaks were out of this world and the Mac and cheese side was fantastic.
Steak was cooked perfect service was amazing the greens were very tasting clean and friendly I order a ipa witch was amazing fun nice chill place.
This place rocks.  If you want to attend a church that believes God loves you no matter what give them a try. Plus my kids love playing in the NE indoor park and playing drums at the end of service.  Nice cadre of kids to play with, welcoming to young, old, married, single, GLBT, straight ...
I had been adrift without a regular stylist for years before I decided to try Twist based on a recommendation. I am so glad I did! For the last 6 months Jill has been treating me to great cuts and most recently gorgeous, natural looking highlights. The studio itself is adorable and all of the folks who work there are so sweet and fun. I'm so grateful to have found Twist!
Amazing Caribbean food!!!  Live music was great, he played some good Jamaican tunes.. great atmosphere!
Our lunches were good, tuna in tomato, Greek salad, and Mac & cheese side. However, the PBJ French toast with maple syrup dusted with powdered sugar on the kids menu is too sugar laden. We're sorry we let our 5 year old order it. There was no explanation on the menu and we didn't fathom the hyperactive plate we got. The adult beverages were clever.
I think this a must-go to place for me everytime I go back to Austin. It's absolutely delicious Thai food. My friend Hanh took me here and I've been in love with the food ever since. Even took the parentals here one night for a late night bite and they enjoyed it.   The Tom Yum Soup comes in a hot pot...its tangy and just the right amount of sweetness. Love it! We also had the the Goat Yellow Curry...the sauce is yummilcious but the duck meat was a bit chewy. I recommend sticking with chicken meat. The boneless fried fish with tamarind sauce is something to also try.   Oh...I love the service! They are very attentive and our waitress was so sweet! She even broke out with Vietnamese phrases to my mom. It really made her night too when she would reply in Thai. It was a fun awkward time.
These guys are the best! If you need a period costume or just something for fun, this is the place!  The staff is friendly and knowledgeable.  They are priced fairly and are prompt and helpful. Their place is organized and there are plenty of choices for each theme.
I got my the engagement ring for my fiancée here and couldn't be happier! I went into the store knowing next to nothing about jewelry and Phil did a great job patiently  explaining everything and answering every single question I had. After multiple visits, phonecalls, and emails (All of which were answered promptly) Phil tracked down a beautiful diamond and designed a custom setting that was a perfect match to the image I had in my head. Even though I wasn't breaking the bank, Phil was friendly, professional and helpful throughout the entire process. I  couldnt have had a better experience and I recommend Phil and Morgan Jewelers anytime I tell my engagement story.
This place is fantastic, Traditional and new age Japanese food in tapas style where you can try everything. Also very friendly staff.
I stumbled on this lady by accident.  I have taken several things to her and she has always done a great job.  My items have always been ready when she said they would be.  She has even came through when I needed something rushed (during prom season).  I will never go anywhere else in Columbus for my alterations.
Clean.  Warm.  Welcoming.  100% vegan. Many gluten free options. The menu is large with lots of options.  We were treated to a starter of tomato soup. It was very good. Entrees are served family style. Our party of four shared a plate of Spicy Cha Cha, Guru Fried Rice, and Teriyaki Angels. All were flavorful.   The owner is the sweetest man and it is obvious it is his honor to please you and make you happy. Definitely a "loving" atmosphere. Give it a try!
Holy Lacy Panties Batman!  This place deserves 5 stars for the name alone - but the badass boudoir-wear is more than worthy as well.  TFB (hmm, that acronym is already taken) has a fine selection of tasteful novelties, fancy girly-britches and lots of femme-fatale fashionable frocks in which to get your freak-on.  Grand Opening is October 22nd, but they're open now for all your bedroom bidness needs. I think they also do those 'sexy party' things, where a bunch of chicks get together for a cosmo and dildo party... but I'm not sure if thats underway yet or not.  Woo-Hoo for another cool local business on south first street - and double a Double-Woo-Hoo that they carry sexy underthings!
Love the service great customer care from the staff. Food had very good taste and it wasn't cold. I would definitely go back to eat there.
neighborhood friendly place with taste exactly what you would expect.  Yummy and real Italian feel.
This is probably my favorite Cuban place to eat in my area o Altamonte Springs. I had the roasted pork with congri rice and for the sides I had tostones and a side of salad. Great prices and the best part is that they serve breakfast all day long.
$10-$15 a plate. Vegan and Vegetarian options. Happy service. Drinks looked awesome.  Biscuits and jam are amazing!  Artichoke sandwich was wonderful.  Burrito bowl with corn tortillas was awesome.  10s all around.  Happy hour 3-6pm, $2 off small plates.  Puppies welcome!
I got the #30 - Vermicelli bowl w/ chicken  (I changed it to sliced pork) and spring roll.  I opened the container and there were two spring rolls inside! The pork was also seasoned amazingly. LOVE LOVE LOVE IT
You will be well looked after here by the friendly, knowledgeable, and stylish baristas who love coffee. Very comfortable space with a nice and quiet upstairs area, I would totally go here and hang out for a while - to read, write, or just admire the interesting art on display and ponder life.  Several brewing methods are available, and the coffee list is focused and simple.  Espresso, french press, pour over.   They also make their own shortbread cookies, and when they are in the oven, the whole place smells like a cookie heaven.
Sometimes I can be dumb.  If the outside of a building looks old or weird, or it's next to sketchy taverns, I just assume it's no good.  And so, after driving by JaCiva's for 16 years, never going in, not knowing how to pronounce the name, etc....I was finally coaxed into entering this   ***absolute dessert heaven***    and haven't looked back.    Everything we tried was wonderful....the desserts, the chocolates, the little cupcakes....check out my photos.    A chocolate expert behind the counter asked us if we wanted to tour the little chocolate manufacturing area in the back.  Well of courrrrse we would! She even gave us some of the "scrap" to take home.  Yum.
I like this bar you can watch your favorite sport and enjoy a good beer, the servers are professional and very nice, also I like that nobody smoking inside or outside, so if you want to relax after long day ,I recommend this place!
Get the spicy curry catfish and pad kee mao, both so incredibly flavorful! Service is always really friendly! Love this place!
Visiting Austin from LA and never will I ever get this quality BBQ in LA. My friend and I split the platter (pictured). We got pork ribs, brisket, sausage, potato salad, mac & cheese, beans and a banana bread pudding. All the sides are cafeteria style, so you serve your own. They cut your meat in front of you and is priced by weight. The bread & butter is at the very end of the line and is self served. Every single meat we ordered was juicy, tender, and slid right off the bone. Would move to Austin just so I could eat here everyday.
I've been meaning to get my wedding dress cleaned for several years but too scared to trust any business to do it right. SoCo Cleaners & Alterations did such an amazing job that my dress looks better than it did the day of my wedding. They removed 10 year old stains and fixed the clasps on the skirt and then they even gave me a hanger that holds the dress upright perfectly and in place to protect it. Thank you SoCo Cleaners!
This is HANDS DOWN the best salon I've ever been to and I even managed a different salon for three years. The beds are state of the art and always clean. I use a level 3 bed.. A mister & aromatherapy... AND an additional 4 minute on your face & shoulders?! Not your average tanning experience. The manager Cassie is phenomenal. She is SO friendly and personable but 100% knows her stuff. I had been to the salon over a year ago and recently went back and they were so accommodating about going over the different a beds, lotions etc. The best & most relaxing 12 minutes you'll ever experiences.
I went to visit with all the kitties today. I would have visited with the bunnies, but I was not there for the bunnies. even though they too are super cute. I just can't cuddle and play with them the same way i can with a kitty. As long as you are nice to the staff. they will be nice to you. Just say hello. I did not feel pressure at all from the staff. I did feel pressure from the kitties though. I want to take them all home :'( I did not find the right kitty in the room where they were ready to go, but I did find one in the stray room. So I will post a picture. A cute little calico female =) Its ok though I won't have the 75 dollars for her until saturday. And hopefully I will get some help with that from family or friends cuz I only work part time at Dominos, but if I have to pay it all myself then i will. I can afford a bag of food and kitty litter every week though. I get to go by there on Thursday to play with my kitty before I get to take her home on Saturday. Now I just need to think of a name for her.
El patrons is an Orlando gem that is easy to miss.  They make everything by hand and you will find yourself craving it after you leave.
Excellent! I would reccomend this authentic burger place to anyone.  Get the spicy mayo SERIOUSLY DO IT ITS BETTER THAN WATERSKIING NAKED IN HEAVEN.
Food was excellent and quickly prepared. They use top quality ingredients and serve large portions for a great price. I highly recommend!
Pretty cool little shop. I definitely would return to there given the opportunity. I finally got to try kvass!!
Didn't have the yeti cooler I wanted but called the manufacture to find who did in town. That's going above and beyond in my book.
Comedor is one of the better tapas restaurants in the Greater Boston Area.  The fried brownie was amazing.  The drinks were great; no skimping was done on the alcohol!  Wait staff was attentive and friendly.  It's a small-plates setup, so you order several menu items and they come out as they're ready.  My favorites were the lamb meatballs and the fried brownie--definitely recommended!
Coy and his crew were very professional. From the home inspection/estimates to the end of our new AC installation, they kept in constant contact and were courteous the entire time. Coy responded to all my emails and the installation crew were extremely attentive and pleasant to work with. I have no doubt I'll continue to get top notch customer service from these guys; plus they'll locally owned and have been around for a long time. I highly recommended Dayton AC & Heating!
In Atlanta for a few days, I Yelp'd for a local restaurant and couldn't believe it when an Ethiopian restaurant came up as one of the best around!  Living in L.A., I love going to Little Ethiopia on Fairfax and enjoying many of the restaurants there (with Nyala being my fave).  So I thought I'd give Desta a chance. It's a beautiful little restaurant with indoor and outdoor dining.  There were more people sitting outside, but since it was around 94 degrees outside, I decided to eat my dinner inside.  This was a very different-looking menu compared to other Ethiopian restaurants I've been to.  I settled on the filet mignon tibs, injera, Shiro (chickpeas), Gomen (collard greens), Tikel Gomen (cabbage), Miser (spicy red lentil stew), and a Harar Beer.  Everything was delicious, but it was much less spicy than I was used to.  Great service as well!  Full bar too!  Everybody inside and out was enjoying big plates of food and this is a great place to check out if you love Ethiopian food or are just curious about it.
Exactly what Crosstown needs- Something Healthy!!  Best protein smoothies and burwiches ever!  You will never get bored as they have tons of menu options.  Delicious guilt free food-Love it!
Making Out On Monday. Chicken & brie folkartshea (focaccia) tasty enough to inspire an expletive or two served by wait staff laid back enough not to mind your foul mouth. By midnight the music is making folk rub their bums on their chairs and on each other when convenient. PBR pitchers for 6 bucks or so. A good Guinness pour. Service can get slow. Did I mention the music on Monday night? Good. Best thing about the place is all the proud, shiney freaks who come out in every color and covering imaginable. This kind of thing only happens at very special global coordinate points. And Cabbagetown's got 97 stories still to tell.
Yan's China Bistro is the sit-down restaurant version of the already outstanding Yan's Cafe in Lynn.  The Bistro brings the friendly staff, delicious menu, and prompt service of the Cafe and adds the only thing the cafe is missing - space to sit down and relax with friends.  With comfortable booths and tables that can be re-arranged for larger groups, Yan's China Bistro is the perfect place to get affordable, well-cooked Chinese food in a casual atmosphere.  Yan's wife, Karen, spearheads the restaurant and ensures that things run smoothly.  The kitchen is clean, ingredients are fresh, and the staff is incredibly kind.  Plus, it's inexpensive and in a great location by the water.
I had the Something Nice, my friend had the Something Naughty. I didn't even eat my eggs, I was too busy inhaling the perfectly cooked bacon, the deliciously fried potato pancake with sour cream and chives, and the eggy bread french toast with berry compote concoction. I had a cup of coffee which was great, as well as some whole milk to wash it all down.   I could do without the dogs as it just added a touch of chaos to an already sort of noisy atmosphere, but I guess that's part of their vibe. Note: at no point were any of the canine friends causing a ruckus, but trying to get them situated with their owners was interesting because it's not an incredibly huge place, this covered patio they have.   Random: the server station is designed to look like a big blue tardis. Whovians probably ***** themselves at the sight of it. To keep Yelp decent I'm not adding a photo of it. (It might actually be because I didn't get a good chance to get a pic...)  Overall great food and chill staff. I'll be back.
We stayed in the Animal Kingdom Villas which were hands down, my favorite Disney property hotel thus far. I am a huge animal fan and for anyone else who is, you MUST stay at either the Animal Kingdom Lodge or the Villas within the lodge.  Nothing is more amazing then stepping out on your balcony and seeing animals. We had a balcony with a pool view that had luscious greenery abound with some animals in the distance. If you stay here, or even if you just go for a meal at Sanaa, Jiko or Boma, take a walk around the property! That's an order! Outdoors is absolutely beautiful. It is so fun going around checking everything out from the animals roaming around to the cool rockers placed around the firepit. They read stories some evenings. Also, when night falls, be sure to go to the night viewing spot and check out the animals with the night vision googles. It's a lot of fun!  The hotel itself is beautiful as well. The lobby is magnificent with amazing decor throughout. Get a tour of the AKL if you can!  There are super comfy chairs everywhere. We relaxed while waiting for a Boma dinner one evening in the couches, just taking in the atmosphere. There are some comfy chairs around an indoor fireplace which my friend actually fell asleep in front of as I was reading the story behind it. Plus, there are a couple of big balconies that overlook animal viewing areas which make for some fun!  We stayed in a Studio Villa which was huge! It had everything we could need...free Wi Fi (this is villas only), coffee maker, microwave, sink, fridge, all the mini kitchen fixens. We had our big bed plus a nice couch, table, flat screen tv, tons of space for the two of us. Plus, I loved the Animal themeing to the rooms (I will post pictures). The beauty was in the details of the room and hidden Mickeys were abound!  I loved Boma their 1 TS restaurant, Jiko their 2 TS restaurant is simply amazing, I haven't yet tried Sanaa, and Mara their quick service area is great as well.   The pool is so beautiful! It's as if it's plopped write in the middle of Animal Kingdom---trees and greenery everywhere!  They have the usual great Disney staff throughout. I love their gift shop, as well!   The only downfall is it's one of the few Disney Deluxe Hotels that you have to take a bus everywhere. It's close to Animal Kingdom but not too close to the other parks so there are no boats, monorails, or walking paths to the parks. However, we had zero problems with waiting forever for buses here or anything like that.
Writing this on behalf of my 17 year old (ASD) son who loves all things Lego :) wonderful place with knowledgeable and helpful staff when it comes to Lego ~ but most of all, they make him feel comfortable, answer questions, offer fair trade in and assist with sale.
No pictures b/c I ate everything before I remember to take pictures! We got the pizza slices: tomato scallion, tomato squash, and ham.. mmm! It tastes better if you pop it in the toaster oven for a few min. Also had the cinnamon bun... MMMMMM! I'm drooling a little now.   Will be back.
Came for  quick meal on a cold Thursday night I had the beef shawarma plate and my bf had falafel wrap.. It has been a while since we came here - new owners, very hospitable. AND food better then ever!! the sauce that was with the shawarma was outstanding .and the fries the best that place ever had. We would definitely come back to try their other Lebanese specialties.
Good appetizer sampler, nice beer list, really nice dining room views. Good for a low key weeknight out.
I like this spot you can really save sometime running around with your head cut off you can get all your party needs here and some
I loved Finz.  I'm always skeptical of tourist destination restaurants, but Finz just happens to be a great seafood restaurant stuck in the middle of Salem, the city of witches.  We ate on their wraparound deck on the waterfront on a perfect Saturday afternoon.  The food was great.  I had the Seafood Paella which was nicely seasoned with tons of fresh fish including tender scallops and surprisingly tender calamari, in addition to clams, mussels, white fish, etc.  My girlfriend had the Shrimp Enchilada and that was equally good.  And special note to the owners on the music: GREAT! I never would have thought jazz at the avant-fringes would work in a restaurant, but it did.  I kept perking my ears up, "Is that Coltrane?" Fantastic.
Solid haircuts, solid atmosphere.  I've been going here since I've been a sophomore at the local high school at least once a month, and I'm two years graduated now. I highly recommend getting your haircut by John, who is the owner. He will give you a good haircut provided you tell him exactly what you want. For $20 a pop (16 plus four dollar tip), a bargain as well.  I continue to come here because as you would imagine for an old-school barbership, loyalty is rewarded. John is more than willing to give regulars a shape up or a neck shave, which I love. Have now moved to Boston and I still plan on getting my haircut here every time I visit my parents.  The only reason I can't give them a complete five stars is because I've had some less than perfect haircuts with barbers other than John. But there are several good barbers here, find one you like, and if he's not working that day, just turn around. Calling ahead is a good habit.
Truly enjoyed this place! Our first time in Boston and we were recommended to come here. The reviews were not what I expected but we gave it a shot and we were so happy we did. This place is such a gem! You look out at the water with amazing food and an incredible atmosphere. I ordered the snow crab and it don't disappoint. If you are looking for amazing crab you'd very much enjoy it here!!!
We came here on Christmas Day (blame my parents, who wanted to eat out...). We did not have reservations, and the wait was long (close to an hour), but they took our phone number and we were able to walk around downtown, which was nice. When we did finally get a table, we waited a while for our food, but luckily everything was delicious I had the Mac and cheese on the special Christmas Day menu, and we also had the brunch burger and turkey tamales at our table as well.   Everything was delicious. The Mac and cheese was garnished with ham and greens, which were both seasoned well and added a lot of unique flavors to the pasta. Our waiter was pretty attentive and helpful, which was nice even though it was crowded. If I'm ever in town again, I'd love to check out the regular menu.   Side note, this is actually a hotel restaurant, so the bathrooms are upstairs in the lobby, which felt odd to me. They were nice, though, and I also got a chance to see the lounge area they have upstairs, which would be a nice place to grab drinks!
Best Chinese delivery in Austin! Quality food and huge portions!!!
Cheap prices for good soft serve ice cream-if you get a cake cone. I used to get the pineapple vanilla soft-serve ice cream on cake cone. I say used to because they discontinued it! T_____T it was the best flavor combo that I've ever had! I was soooo upset and sad that they don't have it anymore..but that shouldnt keep me from deducting stars...PLEASE BRING IT BACK
Great little cafe in Austin. There's usually a wait here but you can leave your number for them to text you when the table is ready, which is great since there's so much to do in the area! Great service from the waiter who was verify attentive and knowledgable. The interior is very nice and would definitely be a good place for brunch.  Tuna tartar- so refreshing and delicious! It's only 4 chips though.  Brisket Hash- it had a lot of flavor and the right amount if kick. I wish there was a little more meat; there was a ton of veggies in it.  Duck Confit- the duck was tender and moist. The dish is a little Asian and it's served on a French baguette. The flavors were there but I thought it was a little dry and needed more sauce. Fries it comes with has a kick and were delicious.  Come here if you're trying to do brunch. If the weather is good, it will be very busy since there's so much outdoor activities.
So much to like. It's really closer to a 4.5. This place is so old school, in the very best way. Reminds me a little of The Big Top Shoppe when I was growing up in CT.   I was peckish on the way home, and had been wanting to try this place for a long time. In the middle of nowhere Columbia Ave. among all the other monstrosities but not far at all from my house. I had a $20 bill (which was technically not mine but my roommate's), four $1s, and a debit card. Unbelievably, I got my dinner for exatcly $4.  A baby burger is $2. Comes on a bun with pickles, tomato? and sauce. The burger is very tiny but good - and only $2! The fries (also $2) come in a huge order! Easily enough for 2 so bring a friend when you go. The fries (with skin on) were a little greasy but simply deliscious.  I think this place is a gem and I will go back. The inside leaves a bit to be desired in the following ways: the floor was quite untidy and I really wanted the inside of this place t feel super fun or family or something. But on an empty Monday evening - no such luck. I took my food and went home.   So price: 5, food: 4, look: 5, inside appeal: 3, service:4.  And again - they ONLY take cash.
Had an overall awesome experience here as we celebrated my wife's birthday. We had a large party of 13 and the staff seated us within 15 minutes of our arrival. Needless to say this was on a Thursday night and the place was extremely busy. The service provided by our waitress (Bethel) was world-class and exceeded our expectations given the large party. And YES the food was amazing...our dishes included chicken & pasta, Tibs fish, Tibs lamb, Tibs chicken!  The house dressing on the salad was spot on as well!  This was our first visit and now we want to become regular customers!!!
Here during SXSW, so it was a Zoo. Great Bird, Great Fixins.  Great prices. A totally enjoyable feed...
Best pizza money can buy. The East Boston one is more of an experience, but this is the more convenient one. Gone are the super long lines heading out the building, this place has a huge lot and plenty of seating. Pizza is just as delicious as the East Boston place too.   Service, just like the Boston location, is just as bad. Take small sips before your pizza comes out, you're probably not gonna get a refill. However, this place still gets 5 stars cause it's THE BEST PIZZA YOU CAN BUY.   Garlic Sausage & Hot Peppers is the best combination you can get. Go for it.
Oh my goodness... 180-some types of salt, salt from literally every continent, including Antarctica.  I asked for a salt that is... well... less salty, not so sharp, so overwhelming.  And they outfitted me with Sugpo Asin and Tsushima No Moshio, two salts that perfectly fit that order and are excellent on more delicately-flavored dishes such as fish.  Expensive?  Well, more so than Morton's, that's for sure.  But this is finishing salt; you use it by the small pinch.  And it adds so much to the dish.  So, it is expensive, but well worth it.  Plan to spend a half-hour or so just chatting with the knowledgeable staff and tasting the salts; it will be time well-spent and an amazing, broadening education.  They also have an amazing selection of chocolate both for direct eating and also for cooking.  This comprehensive selection -- doubtlessly the best in Portland -- includes some world-class entries.    This is the sort of store that America needs about two of, one in New York and the other in... hmmm... LA?  San Francisco?  We can be very thankful that the second (actually, the first) is in Portland.  This store is a very important culinary resource for Portland.
James is a rockstar in this business.  You are foolish to look anywhere else.  He works on kitchen and laundry appliances.  He is responsive, on time, fair, and just a darn good person.
Kongee Dinesty has one of the best congee (rice porridge) in town. Their menu is kept simple, which allows them to keep consistent with the quality of their food and service.  I have been back to Kongee Dinesty half a dozen times for brunch and lunch and still have not been disappointed.  I have found their menu somewhat unappealing for dinner items however, hence I never came here for dinner.    One of my favourites is the build-your-own congee option from their lunch menu (from 11am - 2pm).  You can pick and choose the contents of your congee and side dish to your likely -- very much like the many build-your-own noodle dishes at places like Deer Garden and Cattle Cafe.    I have referred several friends to Kongee Dinesty and they share in my opinion that this place is worth a visit when you want a taste of your mom's homemade congee in a relaxed setting (with plenty of parking too).
Had a coupon for 5 free boneless wings so I decided to try this place for the first time. Well the manager was very friendly, told me exactly how much it would take to get my order (6-7 minutes, which is good, they cook to order). Quality of he wings was very good. Nice crunch. Generous portion. I'll be back!
Wasn't too hungry but had to at least try their clam chowder.  Different than what I'm used to.  I enjoyed it.  Lots of clams, correct amount of potato.  Perfectly warm.  Then had a Marionberry cupcake for dessert.  It was pretty tasty.  I have to remember it's gluten free.  The whole place is which is super!  The cupcake tasted like it was fresh frozen if that makes sense.  Not a big fan of that.  But for gluten free in this area, I'd order it again.  Almost forgot to mention staff.  Great service!
Been here twice now and like the 4 stars say, "Yay!  I'm a fan."  Our go to brunch spot is normally La Provence, but after driving past Babica Hen multiple times and always seeing a large number of people waiting outside on Sunday mid-mornings, I decided to check it out.  The first time I went with my two girlfriends.  After about a half hour wait, which really isn't bad compared to other wait times I've experienced for brunch, we were seated inside and promptly greeted by our server.  I ordered the Dungeness Crab Benedict, which was delicious!  The eggs are local and farm fresh, the potatoes were perfectly seasons (not too salty), and the fruit was fresh.    The second time was with my boyfriend and his two friends from Seattle.  Our wait time was about 20 minutes (also discovered that they have self serve coffee on the bar for you to enjoy while you wait) and got a table out on the patio area and got to enjoy the sunshine (although it should be noted that due to the flowers that are outside, there are a few bees flying in the area).  This time I ordered the Shredded Smoked Pork Benedict (if you can't tell, I like eggs benedict) and once again, I enjoyed it very much!  It was served on corn bread, rather than an english muffin, which was an interesting twist, but a good one!  Overall, it is another great brunch spot in LO and I will definitely be going back!
Feta fire! This is one of my favorite things. Try it on the pita nachos. The fries are awesome. Only negative is that the last two times I've tried to call ahead for carry out no one answered the phone.
The interior at night is a bit dark, but the food is unusual and outstanding.  This is not the normal Mexican fare, and each dish has its own unique seasoning and flavor.  The service is good too.
My girlfriend and I thought to try out a new place and had a wonderful experience at Stella. The food, service and ambiance were all superb. The server we had was nice and attentive but never intrusive. Ambiance was also fantastic, Stella has a nice size patio with ample seating. Wile the noise level is a little higher outside the rstaurant still feels very intimate. Food also scores high marks. We dined on parmesean arancini, pan seared sole and tagliatelle bolognese all of which were mighty delicious. The bolognese however was quite heavy and its a big portion so come hungry if you get it! All in all I enjoyed Stella and will certainly return for another meal!
Blech, another tapas place... oh wait! They have tacos!! And good ones at that! Yeah, this is more of a tapas place, and EVERY time I have gone there it has been slam packed; BUT the good thing about that, is you get to stand outside in the patio and drink up! The drinks are big and strong, but are also kind of expensive, and the sangria is divine! I don't think that I would go here unless someone in my group wanted to go, but every time I have gone, it has been good!
I was led to this place by the phantom gourmet. I saw their Italian sub on T.V. and thought it looked very appetizing. So naturally I decided to go here and give some of their subs a shot. First I've tried the Steak Bomb. It was great, the bread was very fresh and soft. The steak was quality, and tasted great. Probably one of the best sub shops in the area. The calzones look incredible, just have not tried one yet. Next time I will for sure. I didn't try the Italian, but it did look great, and from word of mouth it is as good as it looks. The portions are a good size, so I have not left here still hungry.  The dining area is a little small, but all the times I've been here I have not had any problem being able to sit and eat. But, I could see at lunch time it running out of seats pretty quickly. The staff is friendly as well, which is always a plus. I look forward to trying more food from their menu.
Have been looking for good lobsters for a long time since I got to the U.S.  New York is always a shitty place to get real food. A skinny stinky probably dead lobster for 50 bucks in Chelsea market?! Check out this place! Nice view next to the river. Really reasonable price, live lobsters, fat oysters, amazing service (the water helped me to pick out meat from the joints I missed) and nice drink.
You wanna know where the heart of West Campus is? It's here, at Cain and Abel's. Not only is it the best college bar on campus, Dollar Beer Tuesdays is a religious experience. You have to experience it. Go in with some friends, order a bucket of 6 bottles, grab a table, watch some sports or play some pool upstairs and have great conversations. If beer isn't your thing, get a few margs or a Texas tea. One of those teas will mess you up good for a fun night. Stop by and check it out!
Great food, good prices. It's around $10 for HUGE burritos. It can get busy but waitstaff handles it graciously and does their best to expedite wait times. Staff is friendly and service is pretty quick. They also deliver which is a huge plus.
Our cashier Sam was great! Their staff seems very knowledgeable and willing to lend a hand.
My favorite spot to go to. Dark and very pub feel, but still a lot of room. Bands are always fun and you can't beat the happy hour
Just as I expected, Uchiko found its stride!  We went back for our second visit last night, and the experience could not have been better.  Every dish was spectacular.  The service was flawless.  We didn't even order from the menu, we just told the waiter to bring us what he thought we'd enjoy, and every bite was delicious.  Don't even THINK about dousing any of the food in soy sauce-- the flavors are perfect just as they are.  If you're a sushi lover, you need to experience this.  Treat yourself.
My favorite part of Beantown Pho is the atmosphere and the thai tea of course.  Their drunken noodles are in chili basil sauce but it was definitely worth trying. I'm honestly craving them again. Next time I'll definitely tell them to make it spicy though and the portions weren't too small.  Thai tea is a definite. Not just because they're in cute mason jars/mugs, but because it's actually really yummy!  P.S. outdoor dining and indoor! The place is pretty big and the waitress we had was especially really nice.
Love Thai food and this is one of the best (if not the best) thai food in Austin.  Who cares about ambiance when the food is so good.  The wait does get long during the weekends so I typically order takeout for the family.  Everything is really good
The location of the building is ideal in South Boston. There are a bunch of great restaurants and our favorite diner just down the street. As current tenants of 11 W, we honestly don't have a single complaint. The elevator is a non-issue, as it has been up and running without problems since we arrived in June. We had a minor problem with a shower head, however, we contacted Dave Simons and he personally came and replaced the unit on short notice. Overall, 11 W is a great place to live and we have nothing but great things to say about the building and management.
I've been eating at Curra's every week for over 15 years. The mole enchiladas are perfection. I'm a lifelong mole fan and search everywhere for good mole: Curra's has the best. I get mine with chicken AND cheese inside - you have to special order that.   Looking at the few bad reviews on Yelp: Curra's just isn't about chips and salsa... they're not Tex-Mex... and they get SLAMMED during peak hours, so factor that in if you have a big party or are in a hurry. Otherwise...  Excellent hand-made tortillas. I often get the pork tamales for takeout. Their justly-famous avocado margarita is perfect and unlike anything you've had anywhere else. The breakfast items are very good and served all day. And sometimes I get the chicken soup, which is a BIG bowl and very good.   The owner Jorge is almost always on site and is a great guy. He seems to know everyone. A lot of celebrities eat at Curra's.   The food here is far better than that other fancy place in Austin that specializes in Central Mexican cuisine, with way better prices.   Parking can be tricky when they're busy... then you have to park on the street around the corner. Tip: best bet for the best experience is to go to Curra's at an off-hour... it gets really packed at peak hours. Or at peak hours, just call in the tamales for takeout.
This place was great the food excellent the character were great. Pluto was begging for my food. Goofy was a ham with us. I!!!!!don't know why people complain about this place it was excellent !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! went there for dinner .
I was on my way home today from a poker tournament in Gresham when I stumbled across Reo's Ribs. What a great find!!! I had the two meat and two sides combo plate consisting of two ribs, two slices of brisket, mac and cheese, and fried okra. My cousin had the one meat and two side combo plate consisting of 3 ribs, potato salad, and coleslaw. Good BBQ is very hard to find in Oregon and if you are on Southeast Powell at 11140, you have found great BBQ. The brisket was very tender and juicy, the meat fell off the bone on the ribs, mac and cheese was very tasty, coleslaw was sweet and very flavorful, and the fried okra was very good as well. The only thing I didn't care for was the potato salad. To me it had too much pickles in it or otherwise it would have been just as good.
Just bought my 2nd vehicle from Southwest Kia and it was seriously, the fastest car buying experience of my life! Wills, Ben and Vance did a great job of setting me up in advance so that I could just come in, sign some docs and cruise off in to the sunset in my brand new car! Thank you Southwest Kia of Austin!
I went to the Joint two days ago and was adjusted by Dr. Nina Pridham. She was awesome! She was the first chiropractor to really tell me what was going on with my back. She showed me some hamstring stretches to do, which will help release some of the tension on my pelvis and with chiropractic adjustments, will get my spine straightened out. When she cracked my back it felt so much better instantly! yesterday was the first day in a long time it felt right to have good posture, usually it hurts after a little while. I see in one of these comments that the joint is the "supercuts" of chiropractic. It is a chain, it is affordable, and I'm sure service really depends on who you get, like supercuts, but this is a classy place, I just hope the chiropractors are the ones making the money here, unlike supercuts or massage envy.   If you go here, ask for Dr Pridham, she really knows what she's doing. I keep telling my boyfriend how good my back feels, I can't believe it!
I have visited this local joint a few times in the past couple of weeks, purely based on its rating on Yelp.  Initially, I visited on a date and had a delicious steak tip salad. It was so good I told my friends about the food. The salad was like no other I had seen at other local bars and I completely cleared the plate.  Then I visited with a colleague and had a club sandwich which was very good, hard to get wrong but still very tasty.  Finally I went with some guys from work for the $5 all you can eat wings. I was surprised by the variety offered as well as the quality, the three flavours I tried were delicious and a steal at just $5!  Great place for all occasions, well worth a visit.
This place is delicious!!!! Everything is made to order, so when you place an order be prepared to wait for the order to be ready (the good thing is she will offer you her card so that you can call and place an order ahead of time). She does get busy in the evenings and on weekends, but with a place this good what can you expect. I'm from here and I love everything honduran (my husband's the catracho) but if your new to Honduran food something really delicous to try is their pastelitos (pronounced pastel [like pastel colors] - eetos).
Fantastic! I got the Chocolate Ganache. Lip smackingly delicious. Ooey and gooey chocolate (in a good way of course) but not too sweet. Tasted uber fresh. Also there was no line!!! Yeah, not down to wait an hour for Voodoo's allegedly mediocre donuts. I regret not getting a whole box of Blue Star donuts to take back to Cali with me.
We have worked exclusively with Donna to paint the interior and exterior of our house.  She is professional, efficient, detail-oriented, friendly, and caring.  It was obvious that she valued our opinion and satisfaction with the job.  This company is above all thorough and trustworthy.  Beyond that, they quoted us HALF the price of two other painting companies.
Great local spot. Closer to a 4.5 star place and depending on future visits may even creep up to a full five star. Two visits so far. Coffee has been good, carrot cake was great and the poutine was very tasty with crispy fries
I have been here many times. The last was the best! Ordered fabulous fish tacos. Service was quick. I thought I already left a 5 star review last week but can't find it. Haha. Anyways, it was great!
Had only eaten at Jason's Deli once before and just started going more frequently since our office is closer and they have some great food. Sandwiches are good, soups that I've tried so far are tasty (broccoli cheese is my favorite) and the salad bar is a great one.   This location is in the same shopping center as Kroger right off 270 and Bridge St. in Dublin.
The establishment itself is homely, however it's run by Buddhist nuns who are probably not focused on creating a "hip establishment." I found it comfortably laid back. When I visited it was clean but I agree that the service was slow. Thankfully I wasn't in a hurry. I ordered the hotpot and it was delicious! The next time I visit Portland, I'll definitely be stopping in for another hotpot!
truffle fries were great, nice fry, great flavor with the garlic. burger was well cooked, tasted fresh, well seasoned.  the only criticism i would have is the bun didn't really add anything to the overall flavor of the burger.  the bun was fine, soft, fresh, stayed out of the way, but i didn't get excited to eat the bun (like i do at in-n-out). beer came out ice cold in a large glass with frozen beer crystals floating around. we came at 1130am on a saturday and waited about 10 minutes in line.  any later and it gets to a minimum 30 minute wait.
THEY HAVE A FULL BAR.   Nuff said.   At the soda fountain you have the option to add different flavors to your soda like lemon, chocolate and cherry. This must be a mid-west thing because we have nothing like that in California.
We drove all the way from Vancouver and this was the first stop we wanted to try.  You can't go wrong coming here....Lebanese falafel jumbo was excellent, fresh ingredients and was what I was expecting too.  Baklava I highly recommend, good value for only $3.50....typical family run shop in a nice area of town.  We're here on Wednesday early evening and the only ones at a table....open until 9pm every day except Sundays, will visit again for sure!
This place is great! We went for my hubbies birthday and had the Curry Duck and Pad Thai with the Fried Mushroom appetizers. Everything was good but we will probably get the curry without the duck next time. It was kind of fatty, but with tofu would be awesome! The four stars not five is because this is the first place I have ever gone that when you said it was your birthday they didn't give you a complimentary dessert. I know that is a silly, but I always find it nice when places do that. I love how they served the curry. It was in this really pretty clay and bamboo bowl. I'm happy we live so close to this place. I'm sure we will become regulars.
There is one bad rating on this site which I have to think the individual who wrote it is from a mental institution. Is she serious?   This is the best place on earth.   The owner is amazing and the food is great.   I have been back over and over and over and over and over and over and over again.   I would absolutely rec commend this place.
i just bought a car from steve lavancy and he was wonderful.  he and his manager bob gave me a phenomenal deal, much better than mcgee or sullivan or copeland!  he also did not pull any typical tactics like taking my keys and not returning them for a long period of time, did not go back and forth pretending to be trying to make a deal and wasting all my time! he just took good care of one of my best friends who was trading in 2 cars and buying a new one--he gave her a much better deal than mcgee on the first offer. steve is honest, gives you the best deal the first time you ask, follows through and is exceptionally nice.  i would send all my friend's and family to him as well as go back myself.  thanks for such a good experience!
Cozy, unpretentious and delicious. The folks here are super friendly. We chatted with our server and the owner for a while after our food came - very nice people. And the food! My daughter got pad Thai and I got the drunken noodles. Both were excellent! Highly recommended!
Fantastic food and service is first rate. Prices a touch high, but for a special occasion, my wife and I agree, it is worth every penny. This is our new favorite restaurant.  We particularly enjoyed the appetizers and cocktails.
I've been here 3 times & all 3 times this place has been great! The food & customer service deserves all 5 stars....
One of my Portland favorites.  Excellent coffee. Their lemon seed poppy cake is AMAZING!! This location is almost always busy so seating inside can be difficult to come by. Sit outside if the weather allows. The people watching is superb.
Salsa great 5/5. Food amazing, tasty, can't stop eating it even when super full. My food called me name with every bite. I had the snapper, with my time and money. My friend had the steak fajitas. Steak was moist, tasty. We also had the chicken empanadas... lovely, juicy.  Guacamole was fresh and amazing. Waiter was very attentive. Staff was friendly and checked to as if we were doing ok. I would recommend this restaurant to anyone. Dang.. actually they need to sell the salsa in the store. I'd invest into the company.
Doug and his team did a fantastic job.  We had our entire exterior repainted (took a little over 2 days) and our house looks like new.   The estimating process was painless and Doug provided an itemized contract with everything spelled out very clearly.  We were having to coordinate the painting in between re-roofing and other items (due to the hail storm in April) and Paul (his office manager) was patient while we got all of the pre-work completed.  He checked in every now and again to see how things were going, and once we contacted him, it was only a few days for us to be put on the schedule.  If you need a honest painting contractor that does great work at a fair price, call Doug Gorton Professional Painting.
I was pretty happy about the fact that this pho place had more than 1 vegetarian option. I have the veggie pho soup, the veggie vermicelli noodle and the veggie chow mein. All were good and full of veg and tofu. The tofu was fried in the noodle dishes and done wonderfully. Soft in the soup. They also had a ton of sauces served with it, as well as available on the table. Portions are nice and large. We paid $38 for 3 plates, and 1 appetizer.
Absolutely phenomenal food and service every time. The grilled mahi mahi is perfection and the mussels appetizer was excellent. Love this place! Always surpasses expectation, the chefs obviously know what they're doing back there.
This place was perfect for a relaxing Sunday afternoon. Laid back atmosphere, casual yet quirky interior (perhaps a bit dark in the back), and good service.   We had the fish and chips, which was perfectly good but not exceptional, and the philly steak sandwich which was really, really good. The beer and whiskey selection was good, too.  I'd agree with the prior reviews that this place doesn't fit into a particular genre, but that's just fine -- it's laid back, inviting, and a great low-key place that stands out in the Pearl for being just a normal, relaxing place.
THE CHICKEN. Seriously, though, the chicken.  It's hot, it's crunchy, it's a little spicy. It's exactly what fried chicken should be.  The sides are filler, so don't waste much money/calories on them.  This place makes food to order, so it's not a quick visit, and you will have to wait a while during the lunch rush. But if you have the time, the chicken is worth the wait.
At Barley Swine you are left in the capable hands of head chef, Bryce Gilmore. He and his team work to create the best dining experience possible. The tasting is $85; we also opted for the drink pairing $45. There were 13 courses that were paired with four wines and two beers.   They take pride in working with local farmers and ranchers to create small plates using fresh seasonal ingredients. As a result, the menu is ever-changing.   Our first trio of plates, were paired with L'Conti Brut/Blanquette de Limoux/France.   Funyuns and caviar, such a perplexing first bite. We were in for a treat.Pimento, this might just be the perfect hors-d'oeuvre. I could eat these all day. Beet Trifle with grilled mushroom and blue cheese cookie. This was oddly delicious.   The next pairing was Adelbert's Philosophizer Saison/Austin. We were hooked from the first sip.  Yellowtail, carrot, pistachio miso, caramel - I thought anticipated this dish as a favorite, it was enjoyable but one of my least favorite of night.Morel, avocado - earthy, rich and perfectly creamy.  The next two dishes were paired with 2013 Weingut Robert Weil Trocken/Rheingau,Germany.  Scrambled egg, crawfish boil. This was positively scrumptious. More, please!Carbonara, I adore it when chefs play with food. Squid noodles and all the flavor of a carbonara.  The next wine was 2011 Gerard Bertrand "Grand Terroir" Tautavel Blend/Cotes du Roussilion, France.Radish, pork fat, smoked cashew - a wonderful surprise of flavors.Duck, radiccio, loquat - this was another dish, I expected to standout, but it was also a least favorite.  Our last wine of the evening was 2013 Franco Espanolas Diamante/ Rioja, Spain.  Sunchoke cereal, was the most unusual dish. It reminded me of Cocoa Pebbles, I mean that in the best way.Chamomile, berries - This was the best dessert that I can recollect. The berries had such intense flavor it was incredible! I ate my husband's too.  The final pairing was Prearis Quadrupel/Belgium.Mesquite bean, chocolate - This play on the churro was very yummy, but I gave mine to the husband after a taste since I wanted to savor the berries from the last dessert.  We were blown away. It was a phenomenal meal and service was top notch. My two least favorite dishes were still wonderful, but they were familiar. I absolutely love when food provokes thought... when each ingredient is allowed to shine, it's truly a brilliant feat and Barley Swine nailed it.
Overall a great experience. After a long day at a conference, it was nice to sit down to a warm meal. We tried the burger and the chicken pasta which were both cooked to perfection. Everything is made from scratch!! Have to come back to try the chicken pot pie!
The service here was 5 stars. Honestly the best service I have had in a long time. All of the hosts & servers seemed young with great smiles & personality's. The food & drinks were deliciously made. My girlfriend & I had some coconut prawns for an appetizer along with some margaritas. Then we enjoyed some of their fish tacos... all very reasonably priced! Their happy hour menu is Fantastic & affordable which is surprising based on how nice of a restaurant this is & how popular the location.
First visit to Metro today, will most certainly not be our last! Breakfast was so good there was 3 of us and we enjoyed the Bissell (pancakes, eggs, sausage, grits and toast) a whole lot of food,  the Italian omlette and the pound cake french toast which was awesome. All portions were huge and lots of bang for your buck! Can't wait to try this place for lunch and dinner. Joseph was our waiter and he was very friendly and attentive made us feel like we were regulars, and you can bet we will become just that!! Have made a second visit to Metro since my review and I totally stand by everything I mentioned food is great along with the service do yourself a favor and try this place you will not regret it!!
Cool owner. Does a great chicken tikka masala. Don't have to go all the way to Cambridge anymore. Also, Try their chicken tikka pizza, it's got tikka masala instead of regular sauce, chicken, onions, and peppers. Really good. Also, I asked for a side of tikka masala sauce to dip some fries in and they gave me like a whole cup and a half bowl of it. Now I got some leftover tikka to make something with :)
First of all food was very good , but like others posted service was poor. Got seated pretty quick then once we did we had to wait and watch others getting served before us that got seated after us. Teach your staff better or hire new ones
My niece and I stayed at the royal pacific resort  for 3 nites and we ordered from garden grocers...mainly breakfast items (fruit, yogurt, bread)  and water. The ordering process is a breeze and they deliver in the time frame promised.  What I am super impressed about is the person selecting our fruits.  We ordered banana, red seedless grapes, watermelon and avacado.  We got all these produce at the peak of perfection especially the avacado were ready to eat immediately.  Very happy with their service and they help us to still eat healthy while travelling.
This was for sure one of the best places we visited in Portland. The women who worked there were so friendly. I got the corned beef hash and it was Soooooo yummy. The potatoes were perfectly seasoned and the corned beef wasn't fatty at all. My partner got the Ruben and a side of potato salad and it was just as delicious as the corned beef hash.
I LOVE wings. Can I make that any clearer? While these are the absolute best...I love the variety of flavors they have and just recently tried the spicy garlic--which was spicy and garlicky...hmmm. The drinks are ok, I loved their jo-jos...that's not what they were called, but that's what I referred to them as. Plus I just love having the ability to watch several games at once. In a great location, very close to shopping. We usually come here anytime we head to Portland.
Wow!!! This place only gets better! Returned for yet another couples massage that my husband and I were gifted for Christmas with. His therapist was Fiona and mine was Deanna! INCREDIBLE! we both left in awe wondering how they used their hands that way. I could've sworn a tool had to be used but it was all her! I had sore everything from running, and Deanna went above and beyond with muscle pain gel, hot stones, hot towels. 60mins was sooo indulgently enough time! I have and will continue to recommend this place for a massage!
It's hard to get friends to venture out with me to Buford Hwy.  This was a special day and the right choice.  Yes, it looks like a barn sitting in a strange lot right next to 285.  But it's a suprise to see a clean, gorgeous smelling, straight up Columbian restaurant.  The menu is all in Spanish, of course, but everything was perfect.  The server was the sweetest lady ever.  The food was in large proportion and well priced.  YUMM.  Can't wait to go back.  Ain't nothin' but Columbian bout this place!
Best burgers in Austin. They grind their own beef and support local ranchers. They bake their own bread and churn their own ice cream. Just a few of the great things about it. The Nutella and Chocolate pretzel shake is delicious.
Cristhian was great! We briefly talked about a cleaning plan and he made the place sparkle! He worked with detail and didn't miss a single spot. Seriously my apartment looks (and smells) better than it has since I moved in.
Got a cold brew (they use a Toddy) and it was delicious! Good ambience although slightly pricier than in used to.
Great Service, we were greeted righted away.  And, the staff was very attentive to looking at my previous pair of shoes, and seeing where my "foot strike" was and what my gait was like to help access a good pair of shoes for me.  The associate listened to what I was looking for, and expecting in the shoes, and recommended something that helped to fulfill my expectations.  The staff was extremely helpful, and even gave my husband and I insight about the race (Columbia Gorge Half & Full Marathon this fall) that I mentioned I was signed up and planning on race.  They also helped get me signed up for the new and updated rewards program as well.  I was also able to find a pair of new shoes that I wanted, that were last season's/last year's model so I got them for a discounted price--that is always nice in addition!!  But, I've been to the other locations, but I'm excited about this spot on the west side, I look forward to more visits back to this shop!
Phenomenal person and phenomenal work. So happy to have discovered Ginger, she's provided such a dramatic improvement. She's a skilled woman with the needle! No redness that lasts more than a few hours and definitely no scarring.   I feel very confident in her hands and would recommend her to anyone looking for permanent hair removal.
The people who work here don't really care hat you're here....because it's so delicious you'll cum anyway. But seriously, at least say hi.
We actually like this place. We've been to other chinese buffets where most of the food is so gross you don't even eat it. I think the food here is decent. It's about 50/50 good and bad. Lots of choices. If your hungry and want to eat a lot it's a good choice. Sushi and pizza and salad and seafood.
Helpful service and huge portions - not only did I find everything yummy my Venezuelan friend did too! Definitely try a mojito with passion fruit
Curra's make my favorite breakfast taco in town.  I always get a potato, cheese and machacado taco. Machacado is like a dried seasoned beef. It is similar to  jerky but softer. I aways ask to sit in my favorite servers section. Her name is Bonnie. She knows me by name and always remembers that I like my salsa warmed up a bit, not to mention that she is a great waitress!. Its nice when a restaurant that you dine at often has a server that you really like. Sometimes there is a line on sunday and the parking is not great. The bar makes a great margarita and has a wide selection of tequilas and margarita variations. I had heard about the avocado margarita having gone here so many times, but it wasn't until many visits until I tried it. It was very good! It almost tasted like a milkshake, slightly creamy, slightly sweet, very smooth. Ill be coming back to Curra's, as I have been for quite some time now.
I had such a great experience with Eyes of Texas Laser Eye Center. They did an amazing job of preparing me for my experience from my initial consultation through post-op. Had I known that my experience could have been so good, I would have done this years ago. I went from seeing almost nothing to 20/15 after Lasik. Dr.  L. Shawn Wong was professional, thorough, and had great bedside manner as well. I would highly recommend him and his practice.
Chicken cabob over Salad.  Adding it to my weekly diet.  Fantastic. First time yesterday.  Well worth it for 7.75.
They have great clam chowder. We went to the Halloween Tea and had a blast! Recommend this place for a cocktail & snack.
Simple yet great food. Misto salad is always tasty and a good selection of wines. Service is efficient and pleasant
Nelda was wonderful and very helpful in getting me into a car when I desperatly needed one and worked with me on the down payment highly reccomend!!
This is my happy place!   I love the smell of new books as I enter.  I can spend entire afternoons there lost in books by myself. I usually go in with a coffee and spend hours there browsing.   There are always interesting titles on the shelves.  I love their card boxes.  Their home, baby, kid sections are well curated and make great gifts. I buy all my friends' baby gifts from here. I wish their clearance section was better value.  I have loved bookstores since I was a child and I hate seeing them disappearing.   Remember to support your local bookstore!
This place just opened -- had to check it out! It was packed !! Delish, fresh food. Great menu & selection! I had a mediterrian salad with grilled chicken breast on top. The chicken was moist and wet and juicy... extremely flavorful and succulent. The "Greek "house" dressing was tangy and really tasty. I would recommend it to anyone. Service was great -- employees were patient and pleasant, took time to explain the menu options. I appreciated recieving service with a smile -- something you don't always get! Despite the crowd, my meal was prepared in a jiffy and I was pleased and would be back! Put this place on your list ! Its kind of like Panera but with more flair and more flavors! Healthy, delish food -- great service with a smile, and fast service! What's not to love! Parking is a nightmare!!  That's the only con!
Came in. Greeted with a smile, sat down immediately. The food came quickly. The indian sweet potato wrap was excellent, as were the cabbage rolls. Even though the ingredients for each dish sound healthy, theyre packed with flavor. I'll have to come back and try more of the menu! Recommended for anyone, not just vegans.
Cute hole in the wall Japanese cafe. Known for their breakfast and lunch, but I was able to sneak in a quick early dinner at 5:30pm, before they shortly close at 6pm. How unfortunate, because parking is a lot easier to locate after 6pm.   But nonetheless, lets get to the food aspect: Ordered the simple basic omurice. Was good. Egg was nicely pan fried, but was still left moist. I guess I would've prefered it if it was a tad bit more fluffy. Taste was there, but of course a bit bland, but thats where you have fun with your ketchup! Omurice, isn't omurice without your ketchup design :) Underneath the nice plain egg, is your lightly fried and flavored rice, with edamame beans. I think the mixture of the rice and plain omurice goes well together. And what an omurice should be like :)  Portions are a bit small for us, greedy westernized folks. But really.. thats the portion we should eat on a regular basis. Plus its only ~$7. :)  Ordered the Macha Latte. Its literally.. Warm milk with macha powder. Very strong macha flavor. Not sweet, wish they added a whee bit of sugar or honey (maybe i'm just too accustomed to the overly sweet green tea latte at starbucks).   Overall: Cute and delicious! Just like a Japanese cafe that emphasizes on brekkie and lunchies should be like :)  Photo included with my review ;D
Friendly service! We were greeted with warm service even though we were all asians (5) none italian We even spilled water and the eaitress was nice enough to clean it for us Food is awesome Will be back
Came for the first time last night with my roommate. SOOO yummy! ( and we are tough critics!) very southern. Small place, old south feel. Everything was delicious! We tried the chicken fingers, Brunswick stew, fries and fried okra! Definitely will be going back!
We've been here many times now. This is the best Mexican food in the area. Everything is fresh and delicious. We've never had anything we didn't like or were unhappy with. We're super excited to have this restaurant within walking distance. The interior is very colorful and fun, casual. Some nights there is a mariachi band which is pretty fun.
The food was amazing. It was quick, fresh, and tasty. The potatoes needed more of a balance between firmness and overall how well they cooked, but that was my only complaint.  The food was really tasty - I had the Huevos Rancheros and those were REALLY tasty!  I will be back again!
What a cool little gem this is! My husband and I stumbled upon this place during our last trip to the Havana Club (which is literally next store) to go Salsa dancing...and we were pleasantly surprised.   We will definitely return the next time we go to Havana. The  service was great, the drinks were well crafted and delicious.   We did not eat anything, but saw some tasty offerings around us that we would consider trying. It has a speakeasy feel which I love.
One of my favorite spots in metro Atlanta for all the best reasons: stellar food, consistent drinks and cheap prices. What more do you need?  Whether or not this place is an authentic Spanish joint is not the point; Eclipse serves such a wide variety of tapas that the important thing is that you'll find something here for everyone.   My personal suggestions would be the pan catalan, which are strips of crusty ciabatta with something that looks like Cheez Whiz but is actually a tomato and thyme purée -- it never fails to get first-timers into the tapas-style meals.   The Costilla ribs are also excellent, roasted in aged balsamic to perfect softness. And if you're a seafood nut, you'll go crazy for the paella negra. The dark, inky color can be a bit off-putting, but tasty nonetheless. Make sure to order it first thing, since it takes 35 minutes to cook.   Naturally, the sangria is a MUST. I've been here three times in the past month and the sangria has been on point each time. Mojitos are another good option. Once dinner is over, head a few store up to Cafe Intermezzo to finish off a very European night.  A few downsides: lighting is too dark, far too loud on salsa nights, inconsistent service from servers who are dressed way too casually in the festive atmosphere, and the extensive menu, which can be a plus, but not when you have Anglos in your party who cannot pronounce Spanish words to save their life.
The Calamari is out of this world! The pasta dishes were great but my daughter's Calamari Pasta dish was on the salty side. We were greeted and seated immediately. The owner (I'm guessing?) was very warm and welcoming. Although there was a mixup on my order, the waitress was quick to address it. The bread in the basket arrived at the table cold and none of us (party of 4) cared for it. Overall, this is more of a 4.5 stars for me because the service was amazing! I can easily overlook the bread because I don't go to restaurants to fill up on the bread basket.
We hired Portland florist shop for our wedding and I had my doubts because I am so extremely picky about flowers. I wanted something effortlessly romantic. I sent over pictures and it was out of my hands ... When I was handed my wedding bouquet it was stunning!!!! I cannot explain how special this bouquet was! Pictures don't do it justice! There were tiny jasmine flowers in it so now when I smell jasmine it brings me back to my wedding day. The flowers on the alter were perfect and my bridesmaids were in love with the bridesmaid bouquets. The center pieces were amazing as well and it was all cohesive without matching too much.  I wanted dusty purple, dark purple, white, dusty pink and bits of greenery and it was all executed amazingly. Thank you so much Portland florist shop for being a part of my wedding. I would recommend them to any bride.
Well Yelpers you were right again! I just moved to the Allston area and needed a new spot for Indian food and you were right on. The food was great. The vegetable samosas and Aloo Paneer was awesome. I wish I had room left to try dessert. Service was great and the food came out, to the table that is, in a reasonable time. I will definitely be coming back here.
Recently moved to Vancouver after some extensive traveling and found la Bottega. What a fresh breath of air. The wine selection is good, the food is always cooked exactly as requested, and the service impeccable.  Always greeted with a smile and treated as though family. In my experience the best resteraunt experience in Vancouver by far. I cannot compliment the staff enough as they always exceed expectations. When we have guests we always take them to la Bottega. Btw desserts are wonderful as well.
I had contacted them to come out, and Colby provided an estimate, and came out 3 days later to do the work. The trees are all old huge ash trees, that desperately needed some trimming, and there were 4 big oak trees. They did a great job cleaning up all the dead debris and small branches. The Trees all look amazing, and I am very pleased with the work. It is amazing for how much was cleaned off, how full the trees still look. I will definitely use their services again in the future, and recommend them to others.
Since I've moved to boston I've come here three times and brought my friend from New Jersey! All the staff makes you feel right at home. The eggplant parm was beautifully done. And all the pasta was so fresh and tasty! You must come here if you love genuine Italian food and service!!!
Vitaliy has an efficient team that gets the job done. I wanted my house painted in the fall. He worked on the few sunny days we had. In the spring the team came back to repaint some metal. I really appreciate the fact that they were willing to work during the off season. High quality work. I recommend them.
I was really bummed to find out that they permanently closed their store inside of Perimeter Mall food court.   However my craving for their delicious Diablo Chicken & Greek Salad got the best (worst) of me, so I started to do something crazy... FOOD STALKING!!  LOL.  Their new name and new location:  Bella's Kitchen  (currently the old sign says Canyon Cafe, the Owner Chef Aryeh said it will be up soon)  350 Embassy Row  Sandy Springs, GA 30328 404-388-7873  As fellow Yelpers indicated here on the reviews, their food is awesome.  Did I mention I love their Diablo Chicken?  It is mouth-burning HOT and full of flavor!  When I saw Chef Aryeh and his friendly staff it was like a reunion.  We all were happy to each other!    Stop by at their new location if you miss their food!  p.s. Embassy Row is near the Art Institute of Atlanta, once you got into the Embassy Row entrance, pass 2nd big buildings on the left, you will see a small stand alone cafe.  That's the place!
This Walgreens is like a Disney store! There's so many good stuff on top of their regularly awesome deals! Cool and convenient!
Boston's Northend  Best Restaurant .Food, Service, Wine list, Bread and atmosphere all outstanding . I have been  coming here with my family and friends over 20 years now and every visit is a true dining pleasure.
I have been going to Nadya for a couple months now. She has given me the best massages i have ever had. Definitely would recommend her!
It's Friday night and I've been asked to get take away to feed three adults and two picky toddlers. My food allergies lead me to a slightly panicked place. After cross comparing three different menus, I finally realised that Thai Away Home actually lists Gluten Friendly (as close to GF as you get) on their web menu! Huzzah! Now I just need to avoid the tofu and I'm good.  So I called at 5PM to order and the pick up was ready 10 minutes later when I got there. Although sadly, I looked in the dessert fridge and no mango sticky rice (which I hadn't realised I'd wanted until then!). Got the food home and we had more than enough with Pad Thai (not sure how it was as it was toddler food and had gluten), Green Curry with chicken (Awesome), Yellow curry with chicken (okay), Thai noodle salad (I was strangely addicted to it and ate most of it), and swimming rama with chicken (mmm), One of the toddlers tossed pad thai into the swimming rama so I didn't get to eat much of it, which was a bummer. Overall, great service, solid food, good price, great health and allergy disclosure, and good food.
BIG, Nice relatively new IKEA store - what's not to like! PS MAKE SURE you bring your own bags!!
I have eaten in this restaurant 2 times. The first time I ordered from menu and that was very good but a bit pricy. The second time I went for buffet and it was not good. So eat and order from menu.
I have hairstylist heartbreak. I called to make an appointment and Ji Hye moved back to Korea without so much as a Dear John note...   My husband has gone in for two great haircuts since then with Susan. My hair is too short to try yet, but will update when I do.  UPDATE: 5/2/12 Scheduled 2 appts, we ended up waiting 30 mins without a real apology. My haircut was quite good and inexpensive, but my man was so mad about the mixup, he won't be back.  Cheers~
I'm an out of towner and here for work. Easily one of the best burgers I've ever had. Keep it up guys!
When I come to Rock's, I only order fries and the crispy chicken strips but I must say it never fails. The chicken and the fries are always fresh. They are always busy but the employees move pretty fast so you're not waiting too long to get your food. I would recommend Rock's to anyone who is looking for a quick bite at Phipps Plaza.
The Food is Awesome and quick. The Price is very very affordable. If ya hankern for Awesome Beef Sliders this is the Place.
I come here often since it's close to my campus. I love the eel rice combo very much! Dining environment is also good!
I'm eating here now. I'm in Boston for a couple days and I was craving injera. This happened to be the closest spot...I'm Ethiopian also, so I know injera. Everything was rich and perfect... the homemade honey wine reminded me of home, and the service was impeccable. So glad I came
Love the food, the ambience and the service. staff goes above and beyond to make you feel welcomed. food is phenomenal. Atlanta needs more places like this! Definitely coming back with more people!
Well, Kristo sure made me feel sassy & fresh. These guys can talk Rock N Roll, Steve McQueen and Hair. I was completely satisfied. Cool atmosphere, clean salon and professional attitudes are all combined to make any Atlanta girl feel great about her new do. Kristo has a flair to his technique that is fascinating to watch and gets the job done. I'll be back Melrose & McQueen. I'll be back...
I backed my van into a tree and took it to Rebreu to get it repaired.  I have to say that Patrick was a dream to work with.  When I got my van back, everything looked awesome with the body work and they even went an extra step and cleaned the interior of my van!  Having two children, it is difficult to keep on top of that chore, so it was a pleasant surprise!
Elegant nails did the nails and toes for me and my bridal party (I am also a loyal customer since they opened ::they rent the spot from my dad:::) everyone loved their nails and toes and the pedicures are fantastic they have great chairs and they do a hot stone massage on your legs....soooo relaxing. Everytime I have strayed it hasnt compared!
This will now be my new spot I see myself being a new regular here. This place is amazing the meats are juicy the corn tortilla isn't dry and the flavors are perfect. Even the sweet tea is perfect. I wish there were more salsas to try and maybe salt and pepper on the tables but this place is amazing!
I have been a weekly client of Ellie's now since November and I couldn't be happier.  I have tried MULTIPLE salons, Downtown, Back Bay, SE etc. and I finally found my place.   The staff are incredibly friendly & professional. I'm extremely picky and Ellie was very patient and receptive to what style I was looking for.  He has such a positive attitude.  I really appreciate you guys!
After an attempt to have breakfast at Jam on New Year's Day, we ended up here instead and it was a wise choice. Avoiding the long wait list, we sat at the astonishingly available bar, on seriously comfortable stools. There was plenty of space for the many condiments breakfast requires and we had lots of elbow room. My friend was pleased with her selection of bagel and accouterments, salad and a consistent spinach mushroom omelet. I almost always go for a farmer type breakfast, eggs, bacon etc. With a choice on the potatoes, I went with the hash browns, rather than the polenta or roasted potatoes. They were cooked to perfection and a perfect amount, not overloading the plate or skimpy, either. The eggs were a perfect over very easy and the generous portion of bacon was crispy and tasty. The service was close to excellent, and the only real drawback was the fact it was so crowded, things were slower than I suspect they usually are. Can't wait to go back and check out the waffle bar on a less busy day. Since I live in Seattle, this could be awhile but I definitely will return.
I loved it! Need to try the pho. I had B6 I believe. Their meat has great flavor. The noodles were cold but it honestly worked. It was wonderful. My friend got an amazing steak and rice entree. So much flavor and yummy sauce. Egg rolls were bomb too.
Love, love, love the newly relaunched L & K in downtown Needham.  Owner Francesco has done an amazing job turning this restaurant around. The atmosphere is hip and trendy, giving the guests and urban vibe in the metro west. Chef Matthew recently joined the team as head chef and you can watch every item being prepared to order and served piping hot from the open kitchen. Menu items are creative and tasty along with an extensive drink menu. Service is outstanding. Francesco cleaned house both front and back and instills a team strategy for servicing guests.  As a result, every staff member works together and everyone is hands on including Francesco who may deliver a tasty sample created by Chef Matthew who may also  be found circling the front of the house to check in on guests. Dining is available in the beautifully decorated dining room, at the open kitchen counter or in the custom designed lounge perfect for sharing a light bite or dessert accompanied by a tasty beverage.  Some of my favorites include the sautéed mussels, crispy shrimp, chili dusted fried chickpeas, the house special risotto and L&K Burger. Wonderful local restaurant providing a colorful, comfortable backdrop for both creative food and drink.
I love this place! Mike and June are really helpful. Customer service is always great and I enjoy storing here. Glad to do business with them. Thankful and blessed to store here :)
The current special blew me away completely. It was a waffle with scallions, cheese, and pork belly and WOW. Didn't know I could have such an emotional reaction to food but I took one bite and almost happy cried. Felt like I was drugged with deliciousness  I've had sandwiches here in the past and they're good but nothing special. Poutine was a bit greasy but waffles are always on point!
Now this is disney's flagship hotel it's WOW. Great hotel but I like the beach club better. To many kids and to far away from things. And hope you like KIDS because that's all who is here.
I enjoy going to the Grind when I have A LOT of work to do. It definitely is frequented mostly by students, but it is nice because much of the time it is dead silent in the back room. The food is alright, the coffee could be stronger, but I love it because of all the big tables and late hours. The bathrooms are a little sketch, but whatever. I'd say the most annoying thing is when you are reminded that this place is not just a safe haven for students, but also open to everyone else. Oftentimes, a loud group (e.g., book club, comicon people) will come to the Grind and settle in the middle of the room and begin loudly talking. It really disrupts the collegiate atmosphere, and I usually end up leaving because it's too distracting and disruptive.
i miss this. ive grown up using this and im really sad its gone. i would love a recipe but this was quick and better than anything ive ever made. perfectly sweet too without being overpowering i even made funnel cakes with these.
Great home cooking especially if your from latin america... Hot sauce is perfect balance of heat and flavor... Great decor
I went to this amazing place on Sunday for brunch and walked away very happy! The atmosphere was very nice; artwork surrounding the walls and flat screens at the bar...not to mention very friendly staff. It's in a great location, but of course it's in midtown so good luck parking. I was lucky to park on the street at the meter parking. I had the fried chicken, collard greens, and home fries. Although everything was amazing the home fries are more like hashbrowns, but they are still fantastic. Mimosas are $3 and well worth it. They aren't too weak and too strong; perfection! I wish they served poinsettia (champagne and cranberry juice), but the server said they don't have them...no biggie I just drank up on the $3 mimosas :-) I'll defiantly want to come back again and again. I love wine and since they are a wine bar, I plan to come back for that! Also, since I love to eat, I also want to try their dinner menu! Although it was cold, during spring I will return to sit outside! The establishment is somewhat small, but very intimate. This place is a MUST try!
The more and more that I come here the more I really like it. We had a wonderful experience last night.  Food was very tasty and affordable. The staff was very kind and attentive the entire night. We had an amazing waitress who checked on us often and provided recommendations on the menu.   I got the pot pie dinner which included endless bread, salad, entree with one side, and dessert. You can make any dinner entree into a 3 course meal just by adding $2 more.  So affordable!   The pot pie crust was extremely flakey which is just the way I like it. The inside was hot and the vegetables and chicken seemed very fresh. I got coleslaw on the side which was great and bursting with flavor.   I don't see why people are leaving bad reviews on here. You're getting great tasting food for a great price and a friendly and caring staff.  Maybe it's because I didn't grow up with a Bob Evans around but this may be my new favorite place for an affordable meal.
Great atmosphere and location! Waited about 45 minutes on a Saturday night but went on a Tuesday and got right in. Once seated they give you free chips with an assortment of salsa which is always a plus! The margarita's are pretty good; I prefer their traditional one myself. I also love that they have corona light on draft. Even if it's busy, service always seems to be good. However, once I sat at the bar and it took about 10minutes to be greeted. Everytime I come here I order the chicken tacos, a little dry but still very good. I recommend this place for a date night or night out with friends!
Gorgeous salon - found them on Instagram and instantly knew I had to come here. It's clean, the technicians are well trained, polite, courteous and they have very high quality products and services. Easy enough to book an appointment, and their location is great if you work in FiDi.  My only complaint is that there is a lot of ambiguity when it comes to nail art prices. It's all subjective depending on the difficulty, but there needs to be more communication about additional charges etc. Their website has a few details, but if you're looking for a more customized set I would definitely request a quote or something next time. I came in to use their nail printer (that I found out about via IG!) but the result wasn't that great - I used a personal image that I sent beforehand, and it the result wasn't what I was expecting. I wish there had been a little more communication about what kinds of pics yield the best results because I would have brought more options then.  I also had some simple nail art done - highly skilled artists that gave me exactly what I was looking for, but paid just over $100 for a relatively "simple" set (no charms or crazy nail art) which was a little surprising. Their quality is top notch though, and definitely worth a visit if you love Japanese nail art.
This iHop is ALWAYS packed, always. Although, this is my first choice iHop to visit, I'm not sure why its always packed. It doesn't matter what time of day you go here on a Saturday - whether its raining or snowing, be prepared to wait.  This time we had Mario who regrettably forgot about us. We sat in by the window so it was cool, we had the chance to people-watch as we chatted a bit about the current news. I've been here countless times.  A time when we got the new guy who had no idea what he was doing but we were patient. Another time when the manager came over to tease my bf about a Falcon's hat he was wearing.  Another time when the manager didn't even remember who he was. That was funny. Another time when we had to approach the manager about an issue. But THIS time was something different.  Anyway what brought me to write this review was because of the celebrity spotting - AmberRose...not to be confused with Yeezy's ex Amber Rose, not Whiz Khalifa's baby's momma Amber Rose, not the Amber Rose that refers to her Twitter followers as RoseBuds but Amber Rosario - or something like that. I heard the voice of a sweet southern girl who introduced herself to her table - "Hi, Im AmberRose and I will be your server today..." All I could see in front of me was my bf laughing, then he covered his face. I turn to my left "OH, OK!" and quickly turned my head before she could see that I was chuckled a bit. It was funny and cute at the same time. She was so sweet. I honestly wished that she was serving us because she would've given us the hookup on some extras if you know what I mean. Even if you don't, you have to go see for yourself.  Besides that Mario was cool. I usually get upset when I'm ignored by my waiter but I didn't even see him walking around. I had so much fun that morning that it didn't even phase me.  The food is always cooked to perfection and it comes out quickly. I always get exactly what I order. I'm really picky about my eggs. I prefer shelled eggs - or country style eggs as they like to call them. I don't care if they're country or city. I want them out of a shell. The pancakes are always good. Although they slip on the hot syrup sometimes, all you had to do is ask and they'll bring it right to you.  The price is reasonable. You may catch a special every now and then. Other than that the staff is great and the atmosphere is homely.   Try this iHop but remember, do not come extremely hungry. There's always a wait.
My garage door has been problematic for years, until Chris got ahold of it!  He diagnosed the issues, came up with an affordable solution, and installed the system much quicker than I expected.  The motor is whisper quiet and a huge improvement over what we had before, and the price was surprisingly reasonable for such a high quality solution.  Chris was flexible with my scheduling needs, responsive to question, and made sure I knew that I could call him any time with issues.  I got a great solution at an affordable price with impeccable service and professionalism.  Highly, highly recommended.
This is my new go-to place! I recently moved to Brush Prairie area and I am very happy I found this place. I tried their lunch Chicken Burrito plate- #4, and it was yummy! Their lunch burrito is more like Enchilada.  Thumbs up for Free chips, salsa, and refried beans. (Very Fresh) The fried ice cream is also really good. Definitely will be back!
I'm usually annoyed by Restaurant-As-Performance-Art. But when it's laid-back, interesting and tasty I appreciate it. Great night out without breaking the bank (too much.)
Though the place is small, but it's not that's bad. It's not too cramped and they actually try to use their space wisely, such as for the box chair, it's also a storage place where you can put your bag inside which is a very smart idea. Keeps your items safe too. The ramen is very delicious  and you can customize it to your liking, such as the firmness of the noodle, the thickness, the richness of the broth and the spiciness level. The add on soft boiled eggs are a great addition to the noodle. It was perfect . Though there's a line up, but we were able to get our food right away.
The relaxing business casual atmosphere makes it a great venue for a bite with colleagues. The meatballs are especially homemade with different types of cheese! Delicious. I wish they offered more meal options, but definitely my favorite place around.
I really enjoy this bar from the drinks down to the atmosphere. Every time I've gone here the staff has always been super friendly and willing to talk through each cocktail. The cocktail isn't aren't cheap but they are worth it. remember the menu changes with the season so you will need to stop by often. I walways recommend this bar.
Not a big fan of the long lines here on the weekends, but definitely worth it for the supreme omelet!
food was great, wine selection is great.  The spinach salad is amazing.  I will say it smells kinda funny in there.
From the choices of seating, to the great food menu this place is a slam dunk!  I like the old wooded feeling on the inside, and the drop ceiling adds a lot of comfort.  Happy hour from 4-7pm is alway a bouns.  Would recommend this to large group or an intimate date.
My fiance and I had a great experience purchasing my engagement ring at Freedmans.  We had very little knowledge about choosing a diamond but Robert made us feel very comfortable walking us through the process.  He was never pushy and always patient.  We are thrilled with the beautiful diamond Robert helped us pick out and look forward to returning to Freedmans for our wedding bands.
The drinks here are cheap and strong. That alone should be enough for 5 stars! It has a "Cheers" feel to it. The bartenders are really nice and attentive
I've been to events at The Palm Door and always enjoyed being there - lovely wood floors, great deck out back, nice long bar so don't have to squish up behind people. It's a hidden gem right in downtown Austin.   But now that I've hosted an event there, I can say look no further for your special occasion. It can be dressed up or down, and can be intimate or holds up to 300 or so for larger events. Staff is professional, responsive and helped make our event a success.
Oh my, oh my. This gem of a restaurant was next to our hotel, L'Hermitage. We decided to have breakfast here. It was an hour wait but we signed up and just waited in our hotel room. I have to say I was impressed in many ways. First, all the dishes on the menu looked tempting. I chose the Fricassee with short ribs, egg, roasted potatoes in a ragout sauce. Yum ! Also had hot chocolate which was tasty, not overly sweet. Secondly, their staff are all smiles and helpful plus they've got the art of handling crowds very well. Unfortunately we live in Seattle so we'll have to wait until the next time to try it again but I've got my eye on their bacon and andouille sausage dish, heaven help me ! I recommend this highly. Don't miss it.
Simply badass tacos and tortas. Unpretentious, cheap, and consistently excellent. Getting a torta and cooling down with an iced coffee at Once Over is my new tradition.
I visited this restaurant 01/20/2018. Had a good experience. Place is very unimposing from the outside but very nice inside. Prices are reasonable, food quality was on point and nice atmosphere with a friendly staff. Restaurant was tidy, clean and I definitely enjoyed the ziti pasta. I definitely recommend it. This restaurant is featured on Florida Stuffed. Feel free to read the entire review at:  https://floridastuffed.wordpress.com/2018/01/21/ziti-night/
Tin Shed is an overlooked vegan gem. Elbow out the meat eaters or come early. Bring the dogs. Almost all the menu items are adaptable to vegan without compromise. For example they have vegan cheese and avocado so when you veganize an item you don't give up several essential toppings and pay the same price as omnis. At breakfast the "how latin" is the major winner, with tofu and vegan sausage, wonderful but oiley sauce, black bean mango salsa, extra toast because the biscuit is not vegan, and vegan cheese grits. At $9 is also among the best values in portland. No more nickle and diming vegans to sub cheaper ingredients that their carnivorous counterparts. Don't forget about dinner, they have a happy hour where you can get a vegan quesadilla or tacos for $4 and a beer for $3.  This place trumps vita for vegan alberta st breakfast, and is the winner for vegan dinner on the street as well. Don't sleep in and get slammed with a wait with all the omnis, go early and bring your dogs, it will be a great experience.  They open at 7am and there is never a wait till about 8:30ish. The only downside is that they don't have soy creamer for the coffee, so if you don't drink your coffee black you may be a little disappointed, i just drink my coffee or tea before going. They do have soy milk but it just isn't the same.
Great burger and fries; good counter service. Also had a shake - really good - definitely leave full. Ate outside with our dog - there's enough shade between the trees and umbrellas to make it comfortable. I would not compare this to In-and-Out since that is more fast food. Compare more to Five Guys - this place is much better.
Showed up for the first time and was welcomed in to a pretty and clean studio.  I ended up being the only person in the 9am Vinyasa class, as I found out this studio has only been open for a few weeks.  However, Eliz was wonderful and really worked with me in all the positions.  I felt very comfortable and safe even though I am new to yoga.  I will be coming back this week!!! I am really excited to try to bar or vinyl classes!
Best dentist ever. So glad they moved out the old building. This place is nice and clean and staff are fantastic - not to mention awesome dentist. And I am completely afraid of dentists!
We enjoyed our meal here as the food was simple and well made.  We noticed while waiting was that the restaurant had a lot of residents dining that night. When locals show up, that's always a good sign to us that the food will be good.  We weren't disappointed as we started with a buratta and antipasto dish. We also had their gnocchi which was wonderful.  We ended things with a piece of tiramisu and as a tiramisu addict, this was one of the better ones that I've had.    The place is small and groups of 4 or more may have to wait a while.  Don't forget to sign in on the chalkboard when you first get in.  Luckily, some nice folks noticed a couple of noobs walk in and explained what needed to be done.  We thoroughly enjoyed this meal and it was one of the better meals that we had on Denman St.
Went there for lunch and food was fabulous. Would be a five star but the wait is too long and you can't make reservations.
This place was recommended to us to Watch some football. Owner and bartenders were awesome!! Great place to watch football and hang in and outside
Fantastic bakery! The staff is friendly and very helpful. Michelle creates wonderful cakes.  We've used them for the past four years for all of our cake needs.  My kids love going there (several times a week) for kolaches, strawberry bread, or just a juice.  We cannot rave enough about rise & shine.
The Waypost is my favorite weekend spot. I walked past it every day for 2 years and always thought it was a vintage clothing store that hipsters drank beer in front of. It is the coziest spot around. It feels like a hybrid bar/coffee shop. The staff make you feel welcome on day 1. I expected that it might have a "members only" feel since there were so many regulars.  It was quite the opposite. Every one of the staff made me feel like I had been coming for years. The menu is small but I love everything I've ever had. The next part of my review might sound pathetic. Yesterday I had breakfast, lunch, and dinner at the way post without ever leaving. And they didn't treat me like I was weird (at least not to my face). They make you feel so comfortable that you don't notice that you've spent the entire day there. I love this place!!!
These donuts are delicious! So fluffy and tasty! I wish it was closer to me. The drive is worth it though. The coffee is a little too light/soft for me? It's hard to explain, but when I took a sip I didn't like it at all. The donuts are amazing though. I can't wait to go back!   It's a plus it's open 24/7!! *insert heart eye emoji here*   We didn't have any problem with the staff, they were nice.
I miss this place already.  I had some really great food!  The elevator wasn't really working so we had to go into another restaurant to use the stairs to get to this second floor restaurant (a little strange).    We had falafel (DELICIOUS - only trumped by the ones i got at a food truck in NY)l, baba ganoush (I could NOT stop eating this eggplant goodness), flatbread - delicious.  We loved the lush seating and yummy food - was only a little bit surprised with the attention we were getting from the belly dancer... (I just wanted to eat cuz the food was so good)
I have been coming here for the almost 3 years and have never had a bad experience!  I see Ilana and think she is awesome! and I have never had a problem with any of the receptionist or anyone else. I LOVE everything about this place!!!
So. Much. Fun.  I have been here (and to the Marietta location) a couple of times now and I always have an amazing time when I go. I always go to their website to check out what paintings they are offering that month and book my time via their site. You can bring your own wine/ beer/ snacks and a lot of times, there are large groups set up with a pretty big spread. There is an instructor who stands up front and walks you through the painting and then comes around offering suggestions/ help where needed.   I highly recommend this place. It is not expensive for the class and you can leave with your painting at the end, no coming back to pick it up and all that. It's very relaxing..they play music and people are just generally having a good time being creative...kind of takes you back to your childhood, you know?  Definitely recommend and I will definitely be back!
Amazing food. A must go to stop for these out of towners. Delicious food. Great service.  Ask for tots to play Tic Tac Tot with your kid. ;)
Deliciously fresh food, top notch service and a charming atmosphere - I feel so lucky to have found this gem! Their was no wait at all (not surprised as it was a Wednesday morning) and I loved the attention to detail with the food.    They were super accommodating with my dietary restrictions and had a genuine approach to providing great service.   Looking forward to my next visit!
I just returned from another visit to this place. I had dropped my  noisy 1972 Pioneer SX 1010 stereo receiver off a few weeks ago to be restored and brought back to factory specs. I have to tell you, the results are fantastic. I am blown away by the clarity and power that has been restored to this 43 year old puppy. He was even able to replace the 8 lights for the faceplate with the original Pioneer light blue colored bulbs. (the previous owner had replaced them with a dark blue Macintosh look- very cool but not original). The price was very fair for the results achieved and I highly recommend Salem HIFI for your audio repairs. I have 2- Dual 1229Q turntables on his bench as we speak and hopefully I will be bragging about the restoration of them as well after he works a little more magic. Thank you Salem HiFi.
I've been to gratzi twice now since it opened and both experiences have been great. We went with a group of 20 people for lunch and they were fast and the food was very good. Everyone liked what they got! The spinach salad add chicken is my favorite.
I can't express enough how awesome this place is. The staff is incredibly nice and helpful. I absolutely love coming here.
After a walk from the Downtown Hyatt thru a little rain and my sweetie twisting her ankle we arrived at the somewhat hidden but quietly shouting it's presence Myers + Chang. I was having a similar difficulty getting the name to pop up on Yelp! Anyway we arrived @ 5 pm on a Thursday to an almost empty but relatively cozy restaurant. Funky but interestingly decorated I felt comfortably ready to enjoy a fusion experience. My wife selected our choice for our dining experience & in my desire to walk into the unknown I lead the way. Our arrival was just before the masses of reserved patrons & their dinner times. I tried to get reservations but the earliest was 9:30 pm & me being of the morning person persuasion I'm usually putting one foot into the sack by that time! My call for a reservation was rewarded with the valuable info that if we showed up early we could sit at the bar in front of the chefs preparing dinner...kinda like a sushi bar. The "waiter / mater d" was very friendly & attentive and provided us the lunch menu (since we were early) and the drink menu with the soon to be ready dinner menu...we got the big spectrum treatment. My li'l woman ordered a sake mojito (darn good but a touch more octane would have been nice) and I ordered a caraf of chilled junmai sake with the green papaya slaw w/ chili, peanuts, lime & cilantro...noted w/ 3 stars as HOT!  I'm a seasoned chili pepper enthusiast  or "chilihead" & found it mild to my palate. Our waiter brought me some of the Thai chilis that they use just to "sweeten the deal" and I grew happier as the experience progressed...yes the sake helped too. Dinner came quickly and we ordered the wok-roasted mussels ...ooooh yeah they were awesome as we're the Taiwanese Dan Dan noodles then came the steamed bao... oooooh so gooood! If I had less control & more room I could have gone further but restraint prevailed. I was very content and so glad we came thru the rain and hurddles to experience the wonderful food and the passion @ which it was prepared for us. The staff was friendly, helpful and informative so this restaurant has my fondness & support so I recommend you get yourself in there and have a good time!
Super friendly service, they even offered to let me smell the tea before I ordered (from a cute little jar, not something others would be served from) because I'd never heard of it.  So I ordered a Small Vanilla Ceylon Tea Latte, and it's like drinking a perfectly sweet, creamy, vanilla flower.  My guy comes here for work happy hours pretty frequently, and I'm so glad he  brought me!!
I stubbled upon this place.... great find... small plates.. family style dinning... delicious food... great service... get the lamb... it was my favorite:) 3 meats, a salad and mushrooms... so 5 plates was a great amount for two people... also self serve coffee... I love that:)
The food here is so good, nope it is great!  The couple that run it are so hardworking and incredibly friendly.  I love the food it is impeccably served and tastes so fresh.  I love the spicy tuna roll and have not found anyone that makes it as well.  My favourite is the sashimi bento box YUM
My first spray tan - scary/weird/cold?! The Hush ladies were so professional and did an outstanding job! I was referred there by many friends and even other Yelpers!   I made sure to exfoliate/shave before hand. It's optional if you'd like to keep a top/bottoms on. They do have free paper thongs you can wear which is what I suggest!   During the spray, which was really quick, the spray tan lady instructs you for each pose so you get the best coverage.  Once it was over, I took a few seconds to dry in front of a fan. Done! I did have some streaking initially, but once I showered I looked like a bronze goddess. It was awesome. I used the Yelp deal so my first spray was $10 off, and it lasted a few days with not too awkward of fading! I highly suggest Hush Hush!
This is by far my favorite Japanese steakhouse! Excellent quality of food and price. Desert included. Staff exceptionally friendly and the chef was outstanding !!! Highly recommend Ray....( he's our fav ) the scallops were cooked perfectly, as well as the steak. For sure would suggest for anyone looking for a dining option with lots of fun!!!
I have to admit...the thought of having ones eyes operated on is no small thing. It's huge, especially as a designer, my eyes are my livelihood! I was blessed to have really good vision for most of my life. Then the forties hit and the glasses covered up the deficiencies age had wrought. The problem was, I never got used to wearing them and in fact loathed them. This loathing inspired me to seek other options which led to extensive on-line research and eventually ended me a the door of Eyes of Texas Laser Center. The answer for me was lens implants. Basically a two week process, one eye at a time. From the initial phone call to the flow up phone call after I had my last lens replaced was nothing short of professional. Dr. L. Shawn Wong has assembled an outstanding staff and he himself is just a delight. A font of information, skill, compassion with a wonderful sense of humor. So how'ed it go for me? I'm typing this on my laptop....glasses free!  From computer length to infinity I've not seen this clearly for 25 years. I highly endorse the procedure and would definitely trust my eyes to Dr. Shawn and his staff if I had to do it all over again.
Love the atmosphere.  Great beer choices.  Great music venue.  Yummy coffee.  Yummy veggie burger.
Exploring East Boston today and walked by his Bakery, typical Spanish Bakery assortment of different desserts some handmade some store-bought I can tell. I ended up trying tres leches which is one of my personal favorites, solid cake not like the cumin Cuban version but still good. If you're looking for a sweet tooth and local bakery around your neighborhood stop by here
I was in Boston for a day and looking for a local place to eat and this place came highly recommended. And let me just say IM SO GLAD! I pretty much love all Mexican food so it's no surprise I LOVED THIS!  It really is a hole in the wall joint. You've gotta be looking for it to know it's there. There were only a few people in there when I ordered but it didn't really worry me since I had read the reviews. They've got a pretty big selection, your typical Mexican foods. I ordered the chicken quesadilla with everything on it. The hot sauce threw me off a little bit but I decided to risk it anyways. It was seriously delicious!   If you're ever in the area and in need of some good Mexican food, stop here.
This was my first time visiting bartaco , and I was impressed.   This was the perfect Sunday for tacos and margaritas.  I was craving Mexican food all week, you see, my family is from California,  and we cali folks love tacos. I can eat tacos for breakfast, lunch and dinner. I moved to Atlanta last March,  and I've been looking for the perfect taco spot. I think I found it!!!  My sister and I decided to have a girls day. We decided to go see the new star trek film. The film was pretty good, but my mind was on food.  I purposely left the house on an empty stomach. The ultimate goal was to stuff my face. Me so hungry! The film ended, and we headed to the exit, my sister said, do you want to grab some food? I said, duh! She said, how about tacos? I said, yes, tacos is good!   We pulled up to bartaco,  and it was time for tacos. We entered the rather clean establishment and a confused gentleman greeted us. I overlooked his awkwardness,  and he walked us to a cute little table. I loved the cruise ship decor, I was pretty impressed, I was in paradise. We decided to look at the menu while we waited for our waitress. I was pleased with the menu selections. I decided on fried oyster, shrimp, and falafel tacos. I was ready to order. Where is the waitress, my sister asked.  My sister decided to get up and look for help. I sat there with a deep hunger. I want my tacos. This is pure torture. I looked up from my menu, and my sister and a handsome gentleman walked my way. He introduced himself, and he apologized for the inconvenience. You know what, he had me at, hello! I love good customer service. Christoph was an excellent ending to a rocky beginning. Christoph explained the menu etc, and he gave us tacos on the house. He left us in good hands as well.   Our waitress Aimee was a breath of fresh air.  Aimee took our order. I ordered fried oyster, shrimp, falafel, and the lobster taco. My sister ordered fried oyster, fish, and the lobster taco. She ordered a mushroom tamale as well. We decided on gaucomle and chips. We both ordered margaritas. Omg, the food is excellent. Everything was super fresh. I'm serious, even the water was good. I was in taco heaven.   I really like how the staff treated us. I felt like royalty.  The manager even introduced himself. He was a real treat. He was a chocolate treat.    I want to thank you all for a wonderful experience. Omg, I almost forgot. The manager walked me, and my sister to our car, you see, it was raining pretty hard, and he took out an umbrella and walked us to the front of the establishment. I got to touch his muscular body. I'm in heaven.
Pizza Hut is great! You get huge pizzas for your money, and the service is very quick and friendly. The breadsticks as a starter are delicious, and you get huge drinks. We were seated very quickly, and our food was delivered so quickly. A great meal.
I hurt my hand while on a business trip in San Antonio. Overnight it got worse so I decided to lookup Urgent Cares on Yelp. Fortunately, I was able to find Remedy. I was able to got to work from the hotel. It was easy to request an appointment. I didn't have to try to find a location in a city I'm not terribly familiar with and didn't waste valuable time in a waiting room while I could be at work. Dr. Spaulding called me on her way, arrived in a timely fashion, spent the time with me to exam me. She did order an X-Ray, and arranged for the imagaing center to take an appointment for me. She did order medication and it was sent to the pharmacy of my choice and I was off to the races. Oh, and they even took my insurance!  I highly recommend Remedy and would certainly use them again if the need ever arises. My co-workers who live locally were so impressed, they said that they would try Remedy as well in the future.
Don't trust the other reviews!  They must have being writing their reviews while stuffing their faces with free appetizers and getting drunk off of the crazy $1 pints and singing karaoke at the same damn time!  If you must know, my secret desire is for this place to remain a hidden gem because I don't wanna share this Boston hideout with people who don't appreciate the smell of sweaty establishments, the sticky table tops, and friendliest servers that side of the Mississippi.  Bless you, Sissy K's and to you, KB for sharing this most excellent bar with me!
Got told their coffee was "not like coffee"   Its better. Ridiculously better.   Long shot Americano, no added water. just pure stretched espresso gold. like, words do not express how good it is.  will return tomorrow. bum first in another 20 minutes.   chocolaty velvety smooth creamy fresh love in a cup.   A+++++++++++++++++++++++++++   Le love.
This place is by our favorite stop after we shop. Right down the road from the mall, we pull in and enjoy our well deserved margaritas. The drinks are a bit pricy but worth every penny!!   We always end up here for happy hour, which works in my favor because we order Sopes. The Sopes here are heavenly. Angelic little tortilla puffs loaded with tinga or chicken. And the sauce? Oh the sauce. That delicious green avocado sauce. I could drink that sauce by the gallon.   The service here is always amazing and they know the menu well. We will continue to come back for more.
It is every bit as good as everyone says it is. I looked up some places to eat for our day trip to Portland and settled on this one, and I'm very glad I did!  I love the little setup they have there with the other food trucks. It can be easily missed so keep an eye out for it.  Now on to the food! The portion is huge. My friend and I were starving by the time we got there and we both couldn't finish our servings. The flavor combination is absolutely delicious. My mouth is watering just writing this review!  If you're going to Portland, you must stop at this place.
Loved this little spot by my house!  We sat outside -they have a few outside tables which was great because it was a nice day! It serves perfect portioned breakfast plates not too big and not too small- just right! Lots of options to choose from  and everything we got tasted fresh! Will definitely be back soon!
Driving down the "off roads" just a bit to get to where Columbus Brewing Company will lead you to wonder a bit if you are making the right choice. While Columbus Brewing Company is slightly off the beaten path (tucked away in - appropriately - the Brewery District), that's where it gets a bit of its charm. It is somewhat of a secret to those who dare not divert from the safe routes of High Street, Olentangy and Lane Avenues.   While the roads there may not be so dazzling, the restaurant itself has a fantastic decor and an amazing menu that is surprising and fun. Why choose the Columbus Brewing Company? If you're looking for the best locally brewed craft beer, look no further. Columbus Brewing Company offers more than 6 different beers (certain beers available only during certain seasons). My suggestion? Get the SAMPLER and taste all of the beers in all of their glory:  The Columbus Apricot Ale and the 1859 Porter range from light and fruity to dark and hoppy, respectively. There's a beer for all personalities. I once visited in March 2010 in which the seasonal beer of the month was the "Arnold" in celebration of the Arnold Fitness Classic. It got its namesake by the very strong hoppy bite it had...I wish it were around all year, but that's why it's fun to go back and see what new beers they have.  The place gets 5 stars not on its beer alone. Its food is all around fantastic. I couldn't decide between the sweet teriyaki calamari or the spinach artichoke dip for an appetizer, so at the suggestion of our amazingly friendly and helpful waitress, I got BOTH and still couldn't tell you which is tastier!  For dinner, my suggestions are the Caribbean style burrito (it comes with mouth watering plantains that everyone should try at least once in their life) and the pulled pork sandwich (I don't recall its name specifically, but it's darn good!).   I never had room for dessert here at the CBC, but wouldn't doubt that it too is great.   Come here to get a true taste of Columbus and some of the best service around. Don't forget to wash down your meals with a beer sampler if you're 21!  PS: Also came here for a Christmas//holiday party for work and had the staff come around with small horsdoeuvres...all great!
I could go on and on about this place but aint nobody got time for that. The sushi is awesome, the drinks are awesome and the service is exceptional. Best happy hour in Vancouver.
Long wait and pricey, but best Ahi tuna burger with avocado that I've ever had.  They even let me put a fried egg on it.
A proper East Coast pizza, the only one we've found in 25 years in the Midwest.
Very delicious   I recommend it for seafood lovers  The service was amazing very fast and polite  I order fried fish with sea soup bowel
New easy kiosk check out. Answered all my questions. Fast and easy return. Cheapest price I found.
I can't believe I've been missing out on this place. Been meaning to stop by for a while and finally made it in. Apparently a new chef has come just on board. I don't know what it was like before her, but everything we tried was delicious, and the care and pride she takes in the food is obvious in every bite.   We've tried the salads - crisp and cold and fresh, great dressing. The Jalapeño burger and the Bronco burger - juicy, fresh, lots of flavor. Best burgers. We ordered the fries crispy, and they were, and they serve them with Portland Ketchup.    Can't wait to go back. Oh, and the service was spot on. They also have a sizable raised bed growing area off of the cute dining patio where they grow some of the items that they use in the restaurant. Sweet!
My bank statement tends to be neatly focused in three categories:  food, bikes, and beer.  Honestly, I'm not living a super expensive lifestyle here, it's just enough to keep me happy and healthy.  The majority of my funds, after paying the rent, goes to feeding myself nutritionally dense, delicious and, as much as possible, local organic food.    I moved literally a half block away from People's 12 days ago.  The second time I went in, I signed up and paid the first (and the minimum) installment for membership (only $30, well worthwhile).  4 days later, I went back to stock up during their 10% on the 10th (of every month) sale.  Additionally, they update their website weekly with additional savings possibilities on all sorts of products.  For what they sale, their normal prices would be understandable.  When you can get them on sale, then another 10% off, you've got yourself a  fridge full of goodness for a deal.       Bulk food mega love.  They sell beans that I've never even heard of, and I like to think that I know my beans.  Gorgeous, *natural* looking produce (the same size and misshapen-ness as if I had pulled it out of my own garden)!  Neighborhood sourced baked goods galore.  ORGANIC FRESH CHOCOLATE MILK IN REUSABLE (old-school) GLASS BOTTLES!  How fresh?  Delivered the day before from a dairy an hour south of the city.  Damn Fresh.    My head, heart and bike-racing body are all fans People's.
Awesome shop!  I just got into town for a couple weeks for work and they set me up with everything I need to enjoy Austin by bike. Rented me a nice bike, helmet, lock, lights, the works.
**My 273rd Review** I went here with my buddy G for a sunday night dinner. Always noticed this area while walking around downtown and this location seemed to have a great ambience for date night/ happy hour. Also perfect spot for a dinner after a movie night.  First off we ordered drinks and it came fast. My pal got coke and I got Passion Fruit Limeade($5) and my drink was so good even approved by G. Then I got 1/2 Rack of BBQ Ribs ($22.50) and G got Fettuccine Alfredo($23.50 after adding prawns and chicken $10.50 extra). Our food was good too. My BBQ ribs were tender and delish. So soft it fell off the bones and sides were also delicious.
Love me some Mama's.  Fresh, friendly service and atmosphere.  Great value and quick for lunch time
I'm an espresso junkie, and this is my favorite place to get a latte in Boulder. Period. Great food too- bagels especially, and the baristas are always friendly and genuine. Great atmosphere, great espresso, great food- on second thought, never go there. It's mine.
Excellent service and communication. No hassle ride home from the airport. I'll use them again without hesitation.
Awesome food at cheap prices in a good setting and a nice way of serving!
The tacos are solid!!!  I would say they were a tad dry but really awesome! We tried the chorizo, pastor, chicken, steak. My girls had a chicken quesadilla and they cleaned their plate! A shining star here is the Guacamole!
If you are looking for authentic pan Asian cuisine, come here! The staff and bartenders are super friendly. The sushi is really good, pho is good, but they need to put the Thai iced tea back on the menu! Also Tues, and Thur it's half off sushi and sake.
This bar/restaurant is pretty good! I came with a group here for dinner on a Saturday night and had great service. Our waitress was very friendly and helped us pick out yummy choices on the menu. The appetizer quesadilla is delicious, we should've order two. Overall, I would recommend this place to family and friends. Fun atmosphere too.
I would have to say it is the best sushi in Beaverton. It is a little pricey, but you are definately getting what you are paying for!!!
I was really happy to hear that Missing Link was coming to Milwaukie several weeks ago. Then, as my kid and I headed out on the bike and trailer for the day, I noticed my back tire was torn and needed to be replaced. We walked in and James, the owner, said he could do it while we waited. He also found a broken spoke, so after explaining to me what spokes are for (turns out it's for more than just holding the spokeos...), he fixed that, too. I've been bike commuting for about 5 years, but I still have much to learn and he was friendly and helpful while explaining things. We were back on the road fast. A week later, 5 minutes into my ride, my rear tube blew out. I was close, so I just walked it down to the shop. Again, James fixed it while I waited and as we talked he realized that he may have been responsible for the pinching of the tube that caused my flat in the first place. He said it was possible that the new tire install the previous week had left the tube pinched and vulnerable, so he fixed the flat without a charge. I'm thrilled to have a very local shop to take my bike to. I'm even more excited to find out it seems to be a business geared toward bike commuting and community.
Very helpful.  Another shop sold me bad equipment and they got me straight away.  Great supplies and variety of stuff
I had never been to this place - I know it's under new management and I have to say, it's a sweet little spot! Indoor/outdoor so I imagine it can get hot - but the food was really good, drinks were reasonably priced. They have a lake view and chairs set up outside to enjoy a beautiful, Florida sunset and it's a nice change of pace from Vanberry's across the street that is always so busy.  It's more of a "beach" style place - casual dining. I'll be back for sure!
I enjoyed my single dinner here. It's a little far to become a regular here, but I would if distance wasn't a factor. The decor is simple, but very nice. We began with the satay (skewered meat) and the tod mon (fish cakes). Both were excellent. Love all the tasty sauce.   I had the Spaghetti Kee Mao as a main dish mainly because there were two little peppers next to the name. I also added shrimp to the dish. Fantastic stuff. Spicy. Opened up my nose. I forget what the wife had. But she enjoyed the heck out of it too.   Titaya's seems to be a popular spot. We had a brief wait of 5-6 minutes. good for them! To me, at least, it knocks Madam Mam out of play entirely. Service was spot on and friendly. And all our dishes came out at the same time.   Wow, and now I am hungry for Thai. I'll be having some Thai somewhere soon. I hope it's Titaya's!
Very clean and inviting shop. Employees are always friendly and helpful-I've never had to wait for a bed, so it's a quick 15 minute rejuvenating "time out" after a long work day!
Went twice during my stay in Vancouver despite long lines and not amazing service.  The food is flat out excellent.  We got waffles and breakfast sides (baked beans, eggs, potatoes) and were amazed.  Great coffee too.
Cute coffeehouse! Like others have said it has a neighborhood feel and also is family friendly. I also love how close it is to Gabriel Park. I have had a latte there and also just regular drip coffee and both were great and reasonably priced. Just be aware they aren't open in the evening!
My co-worker and I were in town for business and she - 4 months pregnant - had a craving for Mexican food. We hopped across the street from our hotel, the Westin, to Lime and we were raving about it for the rest of our business trip!   The service is fantastic. I believe he's the manager (tall guy in a polo) - who was friendly, helpful, and both knowledgeable and enthusiastic about the menu. I took his recommendation for a steak and queso taco and it was...AWESOME. Seriously, I want another. Now. The regular soft taco was less exciting, but no matter - we had a pile of chips with homemade guac (fantastic) and heavenly queso. Multiple people came by to make sure we were happy with our meals and to check if we needed anything. We left full and happy, and the pricing was really reasonable.   We live and work in New York City where there are plenty of great restaurants, but there is no Lime. Please correct this ASAP :)
Love this place, I just love having froyo in the neighborhood I don't have to go all the way downtown for. Kinda felt bad for abandoning my favorite bubble t place that's down the street for this VeryBerry though but it was worth it lol I use to work at pinkberry and always made the best swirls and they'd love taking pictures.
I think this place is great.   The pizza's always cooked perfectly, they have a good selection of toppings, and the salads are much better than you usually see from smaller pizza delivery places.  And, it's pretty reasonably priced.  The staff is always pleasant and they've never gotten an order wrong, whether I call it in or place it online.   It's not much to look at location-wise, but that doesn't bother me, personally.   I'm a fan.
This is a great Applebee's . Ordered baked haddock which was great and the grilled shrimp Thai salad yummy  Clean great servers will visit again
Amazing food and service , good coffee also  Get in early as the lines can be long  But well worth the wait
Had a great meal at Luke's last night!! I was celebrating my birthday with a few friends so they gave each of us a glass of complimentary champagne. I got the pork, two of my friends got the chicken salad, and another got the chicken. We of course started out with the rolls. The meal was wonderful & so was the service. Looking forward to coming back again!
Went here with a friend and highly recommend it. Very clean and polished and not that expensive. Perfect for friends, or a date.   I had the Coconut Lamb Khorma with a side of Poori and a Veggie Samosa for a starter. I put their mango/onion chutney on everything! It was delicious.   All the food I had was delicious and brought out in a timely manner.   They have wine and beer. A decent selection too!  Food was good so I brought my boyfriend back a dish, he was happy that an indian place trusted me when I said I wanted it HOT HOT HOT. He was sweating and loved it. Along the same lines, they are very good on spice control. You want it hot, theyll make it hot. You hate hot? That's fine! You will still enjoy this place greatly!  Service was good.   Would definitely come here again and I look forward to doing so.
Fantastic pub! Great drink specials, Scottish owners, football games on all the televisions and the drinks were ice cold. Mark and Michelle are fantastic hosts and the owner was very friendly and bought rounds of drinks. Great banter and made me feel as though I were back in Scotland. They really made me feel like part of the family. Spent a great deal of my Florida vacation hanging out at Murphys and can't wait to get back!
My son loves his Kindermusik class!  He has been attending since about 9 months old, but many will start their children prior to that. The class is approximately one hour long. They have a structured program with sing alongs, activities, rest time and plenty of opportunity for child-caregiver interaction and participation. My son has fun during each class and shows noticeable development with his milestones afterward.  I have never had a problem with communication from the Grow and Sing staff. I received multiple emails and texts about the 4th of July week being off for example. They send all material and much of the music and sounds ahead of time which helps with repeated exposure and the kids can continue to learn once the class has ended (think of it like reading before class during college). They are quite flexible about missing a class as long as you try to let them know ahead of time and they do allow make-up classes.  I have recommended Grow and Sing to many and will continue to do so.
At a potentially cursed location, the sketchy looking Metro Diner has taken over where a Friendly's and an upscale Carmel Kitchen/WineBar was. So walking in I expected nothing but Denny's quality. Wrong I was!  When we walked in the hostess was very friendly and hip. The interior isn't anything to write home about but the counter stools in one area have a nostalgic feel along with the checkerboard floor. A huge blackboard with daily specials covers one wall. On the table were thin paper placemats covered with ads. A throwback, yes, but kinda cheap and tacky. Super cold inside for me. Needed a sweater by my dining companion was absolutely fine.    Overall, the service was friendly but a little too friendly (not like that!) meaning too much socializing at one table for quite awhile and neglecting ours when we needed more napkins. (The napkins they had were super cheap and useless pretty much. Plus there aren't any dispensers at the tables so ask for extra when you get your food. ) Then ten minutes after we ordered, the server came back and said they were out of English muffins. Should have known that sooner but to our surprise someone had gone over to a nearby Publix to buy some!! You've now got a customer for life!  Friend ordered Eggs Benedict while I tried the chicken and waffles (how could I not?) Friend really liked his and the hash browns had the perfect ratio of crispiness. My dish was huge and could feed two people. Fried chicken was great and the waffles nice and airy. Didn't care for the strawberry butter that came with it as it left an aftertaste. My server did introduce me to the proper way to dip my chicken--hot sauce mixed with syrup. Nice and different and it grew on me.   Fabulous food, local dive-like feel and the best part about this was being surprised that the original Metro Diner which began in Jax was featured on Diners, Drive-ins and Dives!! Will definitely be back.
Gorgeous gorgeous place. Gives such a Boston feel. Amazing food !! People who work here must be given all the credit . Great hospitality
Food was quite good and very reasonably priced, although the delivery driver was very rude.  He got quite upset with me when he couldn't find the delivery address, was a little surprised at how angry he got.  When he finally found the location he acted like he didn't want to be there, very strange, but otherwise good food and good value.
This place is fantastic!  You have to stop by ... the minute you arrive you are greeted with a smile.  We sat in the lounge area which is just beautiful.  The orchestration behind the bar was awesome!  The drinks were fantastic and the menu was interesting and delicious!  We had a great time and will be back for more!
The Pretzel pepperoni pizza they have is amazing only problem is that it is rarely n the menu and when it is it is for a very limited time. The wait is always less than 10 mins.
In a city where tacos are plentiful, this taco truck makes a name for itself! The food is friendly, tasty, feels authentically, homemade and worth the price of roughly about $3 bucks a taco. The tacos are filling too! This is my first time trying this taco truck and I will certainly be back very soon WITH friends.
I think many of you yelpers are being a little hard on Sweet. The store is adorable and the cupcakes are so pretty. They even package up your cupcake in an equally cute little box. The red velvet cupcake is by far my favorite. I have yet to try a "dry" cupcake that many have complained about, but I usually get the red velvet... they seem to have the recipe pretty down pat. I especially love the cream cheese frosting, which has a really nice consistency and subtle flavors (I despise the in-your-face cream cheese taste on cupcakes).  I also love the ingenuity of their "frosting shots" which let you try the varieties of frosting (buttercream, cream cheese, or whipped cream) for a taste of a little something sweet.  Expect to drop a pretty penny on one of these goodies though. If you ask me, you're partly paying for the experience of eating such a decadent yummy in trendy Harvard Square.  If the idea of boutique cupcakes doesn't interest you, I suggest dropping by the local supermarket and making your own damn cupcakes.
The ramen here isn't too bad! I got the spicy tonkatsu ramen with bamboo shoots and it was pretty good! my only complaint is the broth is a little heavy for me.   The Takoyaki was pretty good too but I wish it was a bit more crunchy! The egg salad that is under it, is really good!   My friends and I also got the Lychee Sake which was really nice! If you like sweet things I recommend this!   The wait is pretty long and its a bit crowded but it is okay.
Made us feel like vip's! Had a friend from out of town out with for the night. Security guys chatted him up, let us right in, great music, pretty crowd, and we had a ****ing blast! Definitely going back.
Always a great place to taste some tea with friends. The staff is very friendly and not pushy.
I had to get a dead company van off the street after it had been taking up valuable parking space for a few months (thanks to the note from a helpful local with questionable spelling skills). I called on a Friday evening to get a tow on Saturday and got a good morning appointment. Peter, a very courteous fellow, showed up early with a newish flatbed and we were loaded up in minutes. He beat me to the destination but I didn't tell him that I had stopped at an ATM so lets keep that secret ;). Anyway, it was easy, convenient and reasonably priced. Thank you
On charm alone State Park gets at least a star. Beer selection leans local, which I like. The decor is like a comfortable dive bar without a hint of creepiness. They've added a cool outdoor patio section. I've come here after work for drinks and before a movie. Both times I've had a good time. The time we came before a movie we told the waitress we were pressed for time and had a movie to catch. She made sure to get our dinner order in quickly. Well-prepared food. Sometimes I just wish the portions were a little bigger.
It really is as good as a donut gets. Had a lemon cream filled donut and would love the recipe for the delicious filling that was obviously made with fresh squeezed lemon juice and top notch ingredients.
Thai Dish is my favorite Thai place in close proximity to my workplace. Definitely go there when the Sox aren't in town or else it's packed with fans who order "Pad Thai" because "that's what you get at a Thai restaurant right?". The food is great and they are super welcoming to vegans and they make just about anything vegan friendly. They also fill your water glass promptly.
I like the strawberry mint hookah. The tea they serve is great as well. Parking? That can be a problem. The building is old too. Lots of bums outside.
Absolutely awesome! Great food, service impeccable and waiter super friendly. Will for sure come back!
Fast and cheap! I brought 4 new tires to the shop to have mounted and balanced. They were done in 15 mins and it was far cheaper than any other places I received quotes from. A++
Amazing food amazing place!!! Amanda is definitely one of the best waiters I've had. For sure will come again.
People need to remember that this is a SCHOOL! You will have students of various levels doing your hair. You will pay a much lower price than a salon and you will spend WAY more time in the chair due to this being a school. I have been going to this place for several years. I have never had a bad experience. Have I walked out with something a little less or different than my original plan....Yes, but that happens at any salon. I have also walked out of professional places with crooked hair and other messes. So....I take it with the grain of salt. This is a highly busy, loud, and funky place. (people watching is part of the reason I love going here) Speak up if you aren't happy or if you are confused with what is going on. If you don't like it or are not comfortable.....it is your duty to say something. The only thing that I don't like is when I get a good student.....they are never there when I go back.....but again....it's a schooll, people graduate and move on. I will always get my hair done here! Love you Aveda Institute!!!
I had the loveliest time this past Saturday working with Lucinda. She made the process stress-free, pleasant and so fun! I ended up with a dress completely different than I had envisioned and I couldn't be happier. Thank you for the best day!
Such a well-done and fantastic place! Amazing service with top-notch quality food. I have been there for both, happy hour and dinners and I have never been disappointed. The servers are extremely knowledgable about what they are serving whether its food or drinks. The ceviche during the happy hour is Great! If you are going for dinner, you must try the swordfish and the jalapeno bacon wrap, they are so good!
Honestly, this place is amazing.  Can I afford it? Not at this point in my life. Do I go and admire the flowers? Every chance I get. Everything in Flowerz is a work of art.  If you will notice the other reviews: those that actually went with this florist for their wedding gave Flowerz 5 stars. Please don't write this place off because of poor reviews, go see for yourself. Completely amazing. I'm in love.
I went to Sushi Factory on Christmas for their sushi buffet. The restaurant is clean and sitting is comfortable.  The sushi was good and the price was right for $22 per person.  I think it's worth a try.
Give Tabrizi a shot, this place will surprise you.  As a Watertown resident, I have driven by this place a million times and walked by often on the way to Super Fusion for sushi and the Meat Spot for my fav parma sub.  Anywho, I finally decided to stop into this bakery.  It is a cute little place with baked goods and a small grocery section.  I have a particular weakness to Macaroons and this place makes a killer Walnut and Almond version.  I have tried a bunch of items with mixed results, not every item is always fresh, so you may want to stick to the popular items.  I would give this place 5 stars for the Macaroons, -2 stars for the lack of freshness on certain items, and +1 star for the fair prices.
Had the chicken fingers with Mac, fries, and dirty rice. The fingers were very large, the sides were divine. The fries are curly like the name. Dirty Rice was made from scratch and also great. There's a wait, but its worth it.
Yes!  20/10 now!  so awesome!  and now I barely use drops!  Thank you Dr. Wong!
The latest addition to the VERTS brand is a massive upgrade from their tiny original location on the Drag near the UT Campus.  This location is spacious and modern, something that the campus location could never achieve given the limited real estate. They offer a variety of beer on tap (including several local breweries) and plenty of seating, which should be interesting given they are across the street from Cafe Mueller at the HEB. The doner kebab, VERTS' claim-to-fame, is still as delicious as ever and is a great addition to the Mueller development. Perhaps the most improved aspect of this location is the efficiency of the food-assembly line. The Drag location has always suffered from sluggish preparation that resulted in much longer waits than necessary given the number of people working behind the counter. The Mueller VERTS has a much more well-oiled system in place that results in almost Chipotle-esqe speeds.  Be sure to use your Go Local card!
Did a great job removing the dead trees and really knew their stuff.  Neat and quick and a totally professional operation.  Even helped us save money by offering another option other than removing a whole giant dying tree which would have been very very expensive.
I didn't really know what to expect walking into this place, but I knew that I like beef and sushi and Japanese food in general, so it seemed very promising.  I was very pleased with the food, the service, and the atmosphere. The prices are a touch high for the portion sizes, but that's typical for small-plates places. And if you consider that the quality and sources of the proteins are top-notch, it's tough to complain.  The space is enormous, much bigger than it looks from the outside, and right next to the Hollywood Theater. I hope they thrive here, because this stretch of Sandy is light on good places for dinner.
Jason and Steve are great. They have always bent over backwards to get things done on time for our uniform business . Their embroidery work is some of the best I've seen and they keep our customers happy.
Thanks for getting my bike road ready for a great rate.  It needed some TLC and the guys at southside were awesome.  And they have cute dogs at the shop.  Kudos for the fast service too.
I am a huuuge fan of pavia. they actually put love into their food. I would have given them 5 stars...but oh man...the women at the salad bar have such bad attitudes, I have experienced this at least 20 times, i've gotten so many salads I can't even count..and the salads are really good so I keep coming back..but oh man...those women who make the salads give such a "death stare" and try to rush you out of ordering all the ingredients that is allowed in the salad.    They get soo mad when I get chicken, steak, and bacon on one salad LOL..c'mon! it's a LARGE salad, you're allowed to pick 3 proteins. Over all i'm a big fan of Pavia.
I had a wisdom tooth removed by Dr. Aiken. The staff was friendly starting with my initial phone call. They didn't have an opening when I called but called me immediately once one became available.  I was able to listen to music so I couldn't hear the drilling while getting my tooth removed. Dr. Aiken as well as his staff was very friendly and professional!  The video on home care instructions was very helpful,  short and to the point. I hate going to the dentist but this appointment was by far the best dental experience I've ever had.
Cali BLT, I think I love you.  I learned about this place from my fellow Yelpers, and you did not disappoint.    I had the California BLT (BLT + Avocado) and a side salad - When my sandwich arrived, it looked a little smaller than I thought it was going to be, but that's just because I had no idea what kind of amazingness awaited me.    The bread is so fresh, it slaps you in the face.    The bacon was perfectly cooked, the avocado was incredibly fresh, and all the flavors sang in harmony as they entered my stomach.  So much so, that I almost couldn't eat the second half of my sandwich.  (Shudder)  The salad was also delicious - is the dressing homemade?  I'll be impressed if that came out of a bottle, because it was damn good too.  My only complaint, and this is a personal issue, is the birds outside.  I have to remember to enter through the side door because I am not a fan of the crows/black birds/grackles that nest in the restaurant's sign above the door - kind of makes me think I'm going to get a nice surprise on my shoulder or attacked everytime I walk past them.  If you can get past that (literally), then you should go.  This place is awesome.
Amazing! The walk to terminal E is worth the food at One Flew South.  I enjoyed a blended mushroom and butternut squash soup followed by scallops on grits with a kentyaki (Kentucky- Yakisoba sauce) sauce made with a reduced bourbon. The scallops were huge and perfectly cooked. Prices were pretty steep, but then again, we are in an airport.  There was a VIP client next to me who ordered a $175 bottle of wine. My server, as well as a couple others ventured over to him and ignored us other diners. It was fun to hear them kiss his behind, but annoying as a non-VIP customer.  If I have a long layover during my next stop at ATL, Im heading directly to One Flew South.
I have since fallen in love with this place and come here often alone or with a buddy.  They do change their tapas menu often so if you fall in love with something it may be gone in a few months.  They also changed their tapas time frame which I LOVE!!!!! It's now from 4 pm till close still at bar & lounge.  They do not have any drink specials though but it's fine because the food choices make up for it.    I did have dinner with some friends not too long ago.  I ordered beef wellington from the prix fixe menu.  I have never had it before so I had no idea what to expect and have no comparison.  It was good very tasty and the pastry was nice and flakey.  It is something I will order again.
The most delicious Cuban food I have ever tasted! Roast Pork, Moro, Plantains and of course authentic Cuban Espresso! The owner and staff are friendly and inviting. The restaurant and restroom is very clean. La musica is amazing and there is plenty of seating for family and friends! I will definitely be back whenever I am in Orlando!
I love a good fritter, this place has the best. They mix it up with different fruits for some variety. The staff are friendly and great for some conversation.   I took away a star because they could use a good "mom's touch" and tidy the place up a bit.
Bloc 11 makes a mean London Fog.  On a recent rainy Sunday, I had to get away from the house for a little while to work on something, and the wife and I decided to give this place a shot.  We weren't disappointed!  We were treated to free wifi, plenty of power plugs, friendly service and great drinks- not to mention the food is pretty decent as well.  I had breakfast (oatmeal and parfait) while my wife opted for a salad, and all was tasty.  The place has a great atmosphere, too, so if you're looking for a local coffee shop to hide away in for a few hours while you crank out some work, this is a top contender.
A very well done theme park restaurant, like always the price is high but atleast the meal is filling an tastes good, although the menu is limited but their good at what they do.  Also the decoration feels authentic, until you look out the window or upfront to the lines.
My boyfriend took me here the last time I was visiting him in the John's Creek area. He told me it was his favorite restaurant, and I can see why! The food was delicious, and the service was wonderful. The prices were reasonable, and comparative to other Italian restaurants. The portions were HUGE! In my opinion - a major plus. I got the ziti, and had enough left over for two more meals. It was the best ziti I've ever had! Highly recommended.
if you haven't had wings here, you missing out.  delicious, the sweet tea is like candy haha  it's a great place any time, i like to go when like college basketball is on because it's the kind of place where you can actually strike up conversation with random people watching game, unlike a buffalo wild wings where everyone to their own and its just so huge and loud. and definitely some good people watching there.
I purchased a few packages including a body scrub and mask, massage, and facial for a great deal. The service is excellent. The inside is nicely decorated. Each room is well kept, very clean. It is a small place but very nice. My skin felt so soft and radiant afterwards. The lady was very soft spoken and didn't speak much but was very polite. There is parking in the back. I didn't get pressured into buying anything afterwards. I was a bit early for my appt (about 10 mins) and they were able to work on me right away. I highly recommend this place!
I've been to Uchiko three or four times now and each time has been an amazing experience. I think each visit trumps the last, probably because I get a little more comfortable and adventurous with what we order. :)   Beautiful restaurant, extremely knowledgeable waitstaff, and yes, wildly expensive if you do it right. But we all deserve a special dinner once in a while, right? Right!   The maguro sashimi and goat cheese is a must-order. It's the best thing I've ever tasted. The Shag Roll is another delicious item that we can't skip.   The Bacon Tataki is absolutely delicious and actually pretty filling as far as a tasting plate goes. Very delicious pork belly dish!   The sweet corn sorbet desert is a perfect finish to the dinner. I'm still thinking about it from last night. :)
Love their cream cheese frosting. Cappuccino, yum. Great staff too! Had the luck of having the  friendly girl with the half shaved look.
I got the Falafel and the Fried Paneer Taco... Overall, the tacos tasted pretty good! If you are looking for a twist on the traditional Texan Tacos this is your place. But if you are looking for a TexMex tacos I would recommend an actual TexMex Food Truck.  The Falafel Taco was the better of the two perfectly cooked and blended well with the sauces The Fried Paneer Taco was a little off since the crema sauce overpowered the taco.   I would definitely go again for a quick bite though
Wow!!! That's the first word that comes to mind when I think of this place and the incredible staff that help keep it going.    First off, from the moment we walked in, each staff member we encountered was not only kind but they went above and beyond as far as what I would have expected. They remembered the tiniest details about myself and my partner and info was passed effortlessly from one person to another to ensure that everything went smoothly.    Now our waitress, miss Brandy! Omg.  She was phenomenal.  Period.  Personable, eccentric, FUNNY, attentive, the lost could go on and on.  She was simply the best server I've ever had.  If you go here be sure to ask for her if you can.   Now.....the food!   Holy shit haha. This food was insane.  Two highlight dishes for me we're the pasta and the steak. Get them and you will understand why. Having lived in Houston for years and traveled a lot, we consider ourselves foodies with access to some of the best restaurants in the country.  However, even with all Houston has to offer and all we've consumed during our travels, we have never and I mean, NEVER, had a more creative, complex, and good tasting meal anywhere.  This was hands down the best we've had. To the Chef, thank you for having the passion you do and creating an amazing atmosphere where you offer guests the chance to have a 5 star meal.  It was incredible.    Odd Duck, another restaurant owner by the Chef, was also incredible.     Anywho, go here.  Get everything. Eat everything. Laugh. Smile. Oooouuuu and ahhhh, and unbutton those pants because you're going to be full! Haha.    Love Barley Swine!!!!
This place is brilliant. The decor is fantastic. The food is tender and delicious. The service is fast, friendly, and welcoming. And sitting on the floor in the left room in the tent like setting brought back memories of life in the middle east. (sitting in the floor is for those with an open mind, who want to experience how the majority of the world dines. If you think eating in the floor is weird or bad, go to the room in the right)  GET THE AFGHAN TEA (add two pieces of sugar) and taste bliss.
Okay, now everyone says that they like Chinese food from their hometown, well this place was a close to home as you can get. The food was great. No mushy overcooked rice. It smelled like a restaurant in their and it was actual asian people eating there. That is a big deal. It is 15-20 minutes away from my house but well worth the drive. Yummy. I want some right now.
I had the opportunity to visit Four Points Dermatology today for the second time.  Every aspect of the experience is outstanding from ease of making an appointment to check out.  Both Josh, the PA as well as Dr. Bhatt are the most caring and knowledgeable medical providers I have found for Dermatologic conditions.  All staff in the office have the same sincere care and concern for the patient.  I live nearby which makes this a plus but I'd recommend that it's worth the drive to be treated so well and so capably.
Khadija was awesome!! Love my lashes!  Can't wait to go back, I think this is going to be my new addiction.
One of my favorite places in Boston, as a student I am really sensitive to price and whiskey's is very affordable! $25 for a dinner for 2 with beers!  They have wide range of burgers and the pizza are incredible. It's a casual place where I like to hang out, watch sports with friends...
It is with great hesitation that I spread the word about this little Mexican food truck. I know that as soon as I do, hungry people may show up in droves, steal all neighborhood parking and form very long lines. However, when something tastes this good and is made with pure love, it would be a sin not to share it with the world. I am an Austin native and I believe Flavia makes the best breakfast taco I have ever had in my life. She rolls, presses and cooks the corn tortillas the moment you order. The eggs are so fluffy they float in the sky. Green tomatillo salsa is livened with fresh cilantro. Buttery potatoes and cheese, oh my! Thank you, Flavia!
An old school gym with lots of history. Has all the basics you need and the lack of bench/curl bros is a big plus. The staff is friendly and no one will try to sell you anything.  Competitive lifters are welcome at Loprinzi's just as much as anyone else (hard to find places like this nowadays) and if you're into making some serious progress, you will find experienced lifters here who will be happy to give some tips.  It can get crowded at times due to the small space and if you use a power rack a lot, you might need to wait for your turn occasionally since there's only one of them. Please don't hog the rack if you don't need it for squats or overhead presses by the way. :)
I've never had an issue with them. They messed my prescription up once and They immediately fixed it. Every time I have called with a question or concern they get right back. Chris is the best!
Went in for a haircut and got Britt. I have very thick and wavy hair that was a hot mess and she thinned it and explained everything she was doing throughout the process as it was our first time together. She's a junior stylist but honestly better than most senior stylists I have encountered. One thing I liked was that she didnt take any shortcuts to thinning my hair. Everyone else I have gone to just razors the crap out of it and she took her time and thinned it by hand with scissors. Only reason they get 4 stars from me is because it got cut shorter than we discussed beforehand. $35 bucks and totally worth it. I will be coming back!
Loved the laid back atmosphere of Belmont Station. I am a beer newbie when it comes to craft brewers and I asked for a recommendation and they went into the beer store and selected a beer for me. Very knowledgeable staff and you are bound to find interesting people to talk to there who love beer.   The only drawback is they only served pretzels. I wish they would have had a small restaurant as well to compliment the beers they were serving on tap.
This place seems "ok"  but overrated.  They play records "LP's" and have a superficial crowd of "I wanna be hipsters!"
The best. I got the Wet MOAB. Mother of all burritos!!! See pic. The steak here is amazing! The prices were astonishing low. The climate was hot though because there's a line out the door to get in so people love to leave it open so they can feel the a/c rush pass them. We eat on property weekly but well be going here for Mexican. It's worth the trip.   We vacation in Orlando monthly and hate franchise food. We also hate Mexican food that comes out the deep freezer and onto a plate, then rolled through a conveyor belt oven like most Mexican places do.   You can tell the owner is a local and is making sure only the best comes out Of this place.
Moved to Salem not too long ago and have passed Murphy's too many times not to try it. My husband and I were first drawn to the proudly displayed rainbow flag out front! :)  We finally stopped in for some drinks and appetizers this past Sunday while my sister and a friend were in town. Eric, our waiter was super nice, friendly and funny!  The sangria was DELICIOUS.  We just got some fried pickles, fries and chicken wings (it was an eat and drink all day and don't feel bad about it kinda day!) all were great. Service was a little bit slow, especially since it wasn't really busy- but wouldn't hamper us from going back.  I also did notice staff trying to get passerby's to come in- however, from working in the restaurant business and noticing there not being too many people- it's most certainly the owner/manager telling the staff they have to do that, clearly there want more business so that's one way they are trying to go about it!  While munching I was saying that it's just a little too not in the middle of downtown and seems to get forgotten which is a bummer. Because we had a very nice time!
OMG!!  This place gets five stars for their out of this world Cheeseburger Pizza.  Pizza crust with mini hamburger patties, pickles, shredded lettuce, onions, ketchup, tomato, American cheese, and FRENCH FRIES.  It is the coolest pizza ever.  Wash it down with a glass of blueberry beer and you have got yourself quite the meal.
Thai Kitchen offers wonderful, multi-course meals at extremely reasonable prices. The atmosphere is cozy and very friendly. . . and the dishes are very tasty and wholesome, indeed. I'm an old Cambridge kid, now living in San Francisco near some of the best Asian restaurants in the country. When I am back in Cambridge I always enjoy visiting Thai Kitchen. If they were located in San Francisco, they would be right in there among the most popular restaurants in the Richmond District.
So excited to see this business continue to thrive. I remember getting burgers when they were a small food truck out in San Marcos, TX!  I got the Ahi Poke Plate, which was not only delicious and savory but also plated beautifully! The rice was firm and able to really balance food on it. The poke was so fresh and delicious. They offer a small side salad with it. I got the Maui Cole Slaw, which was very cool and refreshing.  My friend got Kalua Pork Plate, which also came with their Ginger Macaroni Salad. The pork was tender and so full of flavor! It also came with rice. The macaroni salad was very fresh as well, it tasted like the ginger was definitely chopped same day (not out of a jar).  We got a little Spam Musubi to start the meal with (think spam sushi) and it was delicious too.  I will definitely be returning and continue to bring friends to enjoy this. I love this restaurant because not everyone is a fan of poke and raw fish, so it gives other options as well such as the pork for those who want cooked meats.
Have visited twice now, wonderful breakfast, try the egg pie, wonderful. Only complaint would be some of the waiter,s.  If you decide to eat here often buy a cup, bring it in with you for a discount. Reasonable prices.
Man, this place is awesome.  I'm  directionally challenged, so for my fellow "suck at directions" ladies/gents, do not go into the garage to park here, if you can help it. I had the hardest time trying to find The Posh Spot from the garage. LOL! Make sure you turn at the QT, as if you're going into the apartment complex, THEN make a right into the plaza. You can park right in front of Posh Spot there. I listened to my GPS, which told me to make a right before I got to the QT, and... just... no. Don't do that. Make a right at the QT/apartment complex.   Anywho, did I say this place was awesome? IT IS. I had a gift certificate to come here, and I finally decided to use it on my week off from work. I absolutely love going to nice places on weekdays, because it's not all crowded and dirty. It was very quiet and peaceful. I had Ms. Stephanie, who was running a few minutes late, just like me. So, that was no big deal at all. She got started right away on my "Perfectly Posh Signature Pedi" with added Whipped Shea Masque- which lasted a tad bit over an hour.   She was very gentle and thorough, not rushy at all. I love how the chairs sit high and elevated above the floor. It's as if you're walking onto a throne of some sort to get your toes done. ;) One of my favorite parts was when Stephanie put some lemony smelling scrub? on my feet and then put them inside of a heating pocket for about 5-10 minutes or so. I'm sure that contributed to my feet feeling like a baby's bootay afterwards. The leg/foot massage was awesome, as well.   The prices are not too shabby, a little bit above the regular ol nail salons, but it's worth it. Plus they offer so much more here! I'll definitely be coming back on my next off day! 2 weeks later and my color hasn't chipped yet- nice.
I loved their vegan donuts! The ones I got were more like cake donuts so if you prefer that for your donuts this place is perfect. My friend got the normal donuts and she was really pleased with them. The atmosphere was great and the staff was nice.
My mom and I were perusing Park Ave on a Saturday afternoon and decided to stop for lunch. Most places we walked by were slammed and had a wait for a table so we decided to go with Bosphorous. That lamb is so good. I got the Iskender Kebap and it's so tender, flavorful and mouth watering good. We also got the Lavas which was just perfect.
Lovely hotel, modern with stunning views! The lobby and restaurant area is quite nice. They have a Starbucks on the first floor, a souvenir store, and bar and restaurant Tamo, with a lovely patio too.   Indoor pool and we are enjoying our trip. I definitely recommend this hotel for your next trip to Boston.
Rogue is a great place to get running gear whether you are starting out or your an elite runner. Their staff are very knowledgeable and friendly. They have really good shoe and selection gear.   They have great programs for Beginning Runners to Advanced Runners and people that are interested in Trail Running. Also they have a travel program for people who want to go running in certain parts of the world. Rogue is behind this great non-profit called Marathon High which encourages middle schoolers and high schoolers to become runners.   So yes Rogue is a great place to go for your running needs.
I have been a client of Sarah's for over two years now.   I originally started seeing her after multiple rounds of doctors could not determine what was causing and immense, burning, acute pain in my right side. They went over everything from ovarian cysts, appendicitis, tumors, to intestinal perforation before a resident at OHSU recommended I check into chiropractic and massage therapies. I have always been skeptical of both... I have heard horror stories about chiropractors and have only ever been to a few "spas" where I've paid a stupid amount if money to have someone lazily rub lotion on my back while listening to Enya.   So. Glad. I. Did.   Immediately after my first appointment with the chiropractor, I was referred to Sarah. After one appointment, I was hooked. She was able to locate the source of my physical ailment and after a few more sessions, no longer experienced the pain. After all those invasive tests and procedures, I just needed someone to realize my muscles and tissues were very deeply crunched up. Her deft hands have kept me in check ever since.   I refuse to see anyone else or recommend anyone else. Not only is she remarkably intuitive and talented, she is incredibly well-priced... And centrally located in a quaint, soothing historical Victorian loft in the Alphabet District. I keep her business cards in my purse at all times and dutifully maintain my emotional and physical well being by seeing her monthly.    Whether you are experiencing pain, have been in an accident, you are crunched up and stressed, or just need a little rest and relaxation... you are missing out in your wholistic health if you deprive yourself of Sarah's services any longer.
Cafe Lapin is a nice French bistro in Buck Head.  The food has always been very good at each visit whether we get fish, meatloaf, pork, or duck.  Everything we have had has been fresh and well prepared.  The real gem in my opinion are the cakes for dessert.  Their carrot cake is the best I have had since moving to Georgia from Texas a year ago.  We get it every time we come here.  Many folks also say the coconut cake is wonderful.  They usually have 5 or 6 different types each evening.    The only thing I will say is, don't come here if in a hurry.  This is a very laid back place and they do not bring out the food quickly.  This is a place to sit a while visit with friends or family, and eat and drink like folks do in Europe.  The service is very friendly and attentive while you wait.  Also, once a month they have live jazz, which is a nice touch.  The music was quite good when we caught it a couple months back.
This is my favorite fried chicken in Austin--love the spice added to it, it really tied everything together. I watched the Women's Soccer World Cup there last year and it was a blast. Their mac and cheese is alright but didn't really enjoy their coleslaw, which was a shame.   I can see bringing my entire family here and them having a great time!
Perhaps not a five star in an urban environment but the menu and wine list here for an airport make it worth a diversion. If I can squeeze In a longer layover this is a dining stop. There are loads of chains and fast food at ATL but a real meal is here.
I was hungry for lunch in the Lenox mall and was directed to the Which Wich sandwich place.  The girls behind the counter explained the process to me and I checked the Menu to see what I wanted. Basically, you select the brown bag of the meat you want. From there you check off anything else you want added to your meal. I grabbed the bag for Ham and checked my options.  Double meat, cheese, size, dressing, etc...  They are an assembly line of sandwich preparing. One person starts it, passes it to someone else who passes it down again.  At the end you have exactly the sandwich you ordered. truthfully I didn't expect much but my sandwich was FULL of meat!  They weren't cheap at all with the fixings either.  Needless to say i was full after this meal.  Too bad we don't have these in NY.
This is the best bloody Mary I've found in Portland. The bartender does his own jalapeño vodka infusion, and mixes a lot of the ingredients in the glass. This dude gets it.  The food is on another level compared to typical bar fare. MASSIVE PORTIONS. I had the nachos, which come with pickled jalapeño and avocado sour cream. Yeah. It's exactly as awesome as you're imagining.  Dogs allowed, live music, and tons of games. Also sports, if that's your thing. It's not just a backwards baseball cap sportsbar type sports bar, but there are like 8 screens rocking pretty much whatever game you're into.  ALSO, they're adding a big ol patio out front, so summer's going to be awesome.  And that bloody mary. I'm going to be awake fantasizing about it for like a week.
A fun ride that beats all the other 3D rides (with Star tours being a close 2nd.  Great place to go when your feet start hurting.  Lines are short for such well put together story.  Donald Duck loses Mickey's sorcerer's hat and must go through the many Disney movies to find it.
Perhaps we just got lucky, but I have a hard time understanding the mixed reviews for this place. This was, without doubt, the best Italian meal I've eaten in Portland. To contextualize at the risk of sounding pretentious, this is Italian food as served in Italy, rather than "American Italian" food, which is really a spin on nineteenth century regional (southern) Italian food with ingredient substitutions based on what was available to impoverished immigrants on the Lower East Side. Emphasis here seems to be on selecting superb quality fresh ingredients and putting them together in interesting and mildly experimental ways. I've never eaten better spinach than that which formed the base of my spinach salad, neither eaten a more comforting dish of gnocchi anywhere west of Sorrento. Just what the doctor ordered on a 20 degree Portland evening. I tend to benchmark Italian restaurants by the quality of the gnocchi; here served with pesto and crisp pancetta; just perfect.  The service was very friendly and helpful, but a little slow. They comped my wife's cocktail when it arrived a course too late. The ambience is really wonderful, reminds me of little restaurants in my home town of Brighton, bijou, full of character and knick-knacks. Intimate, homely and relaxed.  Will definitely come back.
This was my first time ever eating at cracker barrel. I came in on Thanksgiving day late in the afternoon and this place was packed! Meanwhile I waited I So I did a little shopping in their store. They have some of the cutest things especially for christmas ornaments and for good prices. I even bought some christmas gifts. The Thanksgiving meal included everything you would normally eat in one plate. Turkey, ham, mashed potatoes, gravy, stuffing, cranberry and free drink and apple pie for just $9!! The food was really good and their raspberry tea is so good!! I can't wait to co e here again!!
The sliced beef curry with extra potatoes is the best meal they have.  Service and atmosphere isn't 5star, but you don't go here for fine dining.  so good!
The hotel is great. We came a couple and got the double bedroom. We asked to change for one king bed and got an amazing room! Very clean, with everything you need.   The only thing that is a bit disappointing that BF and shuttles to the parks aren't included (unlike many other hotel in the area)
So glad I found this place! I originally was just looking for a place to meet a friend that I could bring my brand new puppy that can't be left alone yet. I didn't much care if it was good or not. Turns out this place was a quick and easy drive from where I live in North Portland and I loved everything about it! Their indoor, dog-friendly patio is such a savior during the colder months. They have great veggie/vegan options, if that's your thing. I usually don't like veggie burgers, but their house recipe is just awesome. I think I've ordered the same thing every time I have gone just because I'm not sick of it yet. Their doggy menu is adorable and my puppy loves it. Check this place out if you're dog person, a veggie person, or just a person that likes cute Portland eats spots.
My happy hour go to spot. Tina is always there ready to take my crews order with a smile and the food is amazing. The location is also very convenient and the atmosphere is exactly what you would expect from the area.
My favourite pitch and putt in the Lower Mainland!  Although the greens are a bit "hairy", the course is interesting and challenging. I love all the trees surrounding it, and it is just beautiful to walk and play.  It is very well regulated. They have a person who is very diligent about keeping the place orderly.  If you ever wanna play, I'm totally down!
one of the staples in boulder.  fabulous space downtown on walnut st.  you need reservations!  sometimes you get lucky with a seat at the bar, but don't count on it.  brunch, lunch, and dinner are all great.  reminds me of balthazar in nyc.
I really like this place, love the decoration, layout, the fact they have a bakery next door is pretty sweet. Again creature of habit here, i seem to always be here on Thursday where the lunch special is chicken fajitas or carne de puerco. I have had the fajitas which are excellent but the pork with green sauce is out of site! Great deal as well from 11-2 the daily lunch special is only 4.99! It's worth a trip if your in the south Austin area
Our favorite sushi place in the city. The NY Strip roll and Up the Stream roll are the best and we keep coming back for more. High quality sushi and fair prices for the amount of food you get. Nice ambiance and plenty of seating. If you want more casual seating you can sit at the high tops in the bar area.
How do you generally feel about good things?  Delicious things?  Well then, go to Pattycake.   I recommend the chocolate cupcakes, lemon cupcakes, and pumpkin cookies sandwiched together with pumpkin spice frosting.
Still the best place around to get pizza.  Don't let the bar scare you off, the food is worth it.
Kick Drum Burgers are the absolute best. All natural ingredients and housemade sauces top off fresh beef on a eggy brioche bun. They are delicious!
I like it, kinda wish them sell taiwanese food snack too.
Better than average pizza and popular with the young families! We met friends for dinner, both had our kids with us, and pretty much everyone else there did too. We were also early so I imagine as the night goes on the crowd changes. The place is currently pretty small, but they told us they were expanding to add more seating in the space next door very soon. Originally their intent was primarily take out and delivery, but they are adapting to what the neighbors need - very nice. The food was well priced, and tasty. We had a great spinach salad to start, and a half sheet pizza fed 4 adults well. Some canoli and tiramisu were a nice finish. House wine was good and cheap. We will visit again! Also look for the real Emmy Award statue on the wall - not something you stumble across every day.
The food here is great The service is great. I love the atmosphere they created. Also had an outdoor patio which you don't find downtown that often anymore. Also has a great bar with very nice and attentive bar tenders.
With almost 1,000 reviews, it seems nearly pointless for me to give an in-depth review, as I agree with so many of the other Yelpers here.  Favorite burger: Ahi Tuna burger, as RARE as they'll give it to me. I love me some raw tuna. yumm.  PROS: - almost the epitome of an Austin restaurant. a must go to for visitors. - no matter what burger you get, it's going to be awesome. - the majority of their ingredients are organic AND local, so again, Austiny! - their way of seating parties is unique, and can be a pro OR con. - MAINE ROOT SODAS - GET THE QUESO.  CONS: - SO loud... don't go on a date here expecting to have a nice, civilized conversation. The proximity in which you sit to other tables allows you to hear almost anything you want, and the multitude of TV's in the dining area further hinders productive conversation for me. - Seating can be a pain sometimes if your whole party isn't present. They won't even let you in the door until your whole party is there (sucks on a summer day... done that).
I might be a little biased because this place rocked before bottle shops were cool (and Arlene is mighty amazing), but I never skip the chance to head to By the Bottle. I was sad when they moved into the new location a few doors down, but Arlene is doing wonders with the layout. She compliments the brewpub well and a few days ago I was treated to some great live music outside between them. You can buy at BTB and drink it in the brewpub now for a corking fee (worth it).  If you want someone who really loves what they do and makes it a point to stay knowledgeable (and who brings great events and life back in to downtown Vancouver) please visit By the Bottle.
Our family has been coming to Dave's for years. They consistently go above and beyond in meeting our car care needs. In 2010, our daughter moved away to Corpus Christi to attend college and her car broke down. Dwayne not only helped find us an honest mechanic in Corpus, he stayed on the phone with her until she was safe. Anytime we bring our vehicles in for service, they will make a recommended list of maintenance items or bring up issues in need of urgent repair. I like how they give them a priority order and let us know how long each item needs before it would become urgent. Our vehicles have been running strong with few issues because of their wonderful maintenance. It's hard to find a mechanic you can trust and when you do, you want them to know how much you appreciate them. Thank you, Dave's Ultimate Automotive, for being a caring family for our cars. :)
Love, love, LOVE the Texican on Manchacha! The salsa is out of this world, Texican Martinis go down smoothly, & the beef fajitas are the most tender in Austin. I've never had bad service, in fact our waiter last night (Hunter) was very polite & attentive. HOWEVER, I will NEVER again step foot in the other location toward Mopac. Our waiter was training a new hire, trying wayyyy too hard to be cool, & insulted me in the process (basically calling me a pig for eating so many chips- FOR THE ENTIRE RESTAURANT TO HEAR).  But if you want authentic Mexican food & an enjoyable environment to eat it in, then the Texican on Manchacha is your place!
Casa Del Matador has a bit of that polished, chain-y feel, with its food, service and atmosphere, yet technically it only has a handful of restaurants in the Pacific Northwest, so we shouldn't feel too guilty about enjoying its reliable pleasures.  The best thing about this restaurant is its happy hour, so check out the early evening and late-night menu with great deals on your basic Tex-Mex fare and some quite dandy house margaritas. I recommend grabbing a seat around the indoor fire-pit and making some new friends while munching a copious plate of nachos and sipping Negra Modelo.  Otherwise, lunch and dinner here can be a bit pricey considering what shows up on your plate, but then again the free chips and salsa are quality. And the hand-wrought ironworks and dim, candle-lit atmosphere makes for a great chill-out spot.
Yum!  If you know me, tacos and breakfast are my favorite meals so I know a thing or two about them. So, if you like authentic Mexican tacos(or even the Americanized version I got) you'll want to hurry here.  It's in a small unassuming shopping center but it was definitely worth the trip from my place in Audubon Park. We were a party 7 and ordered a few chips and salsa and cheese dips for the table.  The service was quick and friendly and the food was great!  I'll definitely be back!
This place has always been good, but I feel like they have even gotten better as of recently. Better quality fish, the rolls are well constructed, the rice is on-point, and the price is unbeatable.   Almost did not want to review as I would hate for it to be too busy, they always have my order ready in 10min no matter what.  Pretty cool.
One time, I came out of here after happy hour and a bum made fun of me.  I miss you Bean!
Exceeded our expectations!! We just had our entire home exterior painted and it looks amazing! We are so grateful to Damian and his crew. We first met with Kathleen, who was prompt, professional, friendly, and answered all of our questions. The crew worked so hard all day in 100 degree heat for three days and were awesome, friendly, professional and clean. My wife and I are very, very happy and highly recommend 360 Painting.
Hands-down, Splash Mountain is my favorite ride at Magic Kingdom. Great story and animations on top of being a thrilling ride. ProTip: make a beeline for Splash Mountain after the fireworks and you'll have not that bad of a wait and you get an amazing view of the park lit up before your 50 foot drop!
Great spot for good authentic CV food and great drinks.  Has a live band  which is awesome and a very warm and welcoming vibe overall when you enter.   Quick tip: Thursday nights are the live nights and it gets pretty packed with people dancing and singing and having a great time. Its simply amazing.
Friendly staff, awesome beer selection, tasty food (especially the poutine), and Barbara Roberts is a regular. This place is everything I love about Sellwood.
Tried this place for the second time and I'm not mad that I did. I always fall in love with the patio in the back. The Baja & cauliflower tacos were good! Loved the guac too. It's a bit spicy, so be aware.
I purchased my gutters and Master Shield, April 2018. I also purchased a new aluminum roof for another company at the spring home show in Portland.  I had to have the roof installed first and it was scheduled for August.  I contacted Leafless to let them know the tentative install date. Was told it was not a problem, just let them know the roof install date and they would schedule right after. A representative came out to the house to inspect the house to see what would be needed during their install. Then the long wait. It was September when the roofing company came.  Called to let Leafless know the finish day for the roof and we scheduled a week out.  Told them if any cancellations, I would take it. The day after the roof company left the Leafless crew was at my door.  Was I surprised!! Crew was very professional and polite.  Went right to work. When done the area around the house was cleaned up, like they had never been there. Now to see if the Master Shield works. To old to be cleaning my gutters anymore.  THANKS to the crew.
Came here with a friend and I love the service provided. Everyone was very attentive and helpful. They would often fill in task for one another. I started off with a guy, he was great. Then it was Thanh , great job; very attentive especially with cuticle removal and french tips. Would definitely return for another mani/pedi.  I tried the waxing service here and was utterly disappointed! I have received many brow waxes before and I always ask for arches. With this place, or lady rather she cut them real short which made them come out really thin after waxing. She blamed it on the original shape and lack there of. I blame it on her incapability as Ive never left a salon with half a brow.  I'll be drawing them in for the next few weeks. NEVER AGAIN!
Small place, great owner, best lamb gyro in pdx all for $7.  The seafood salad was also great with lots of fish and shrimp.  I will come back and try the hummus and bacon wrapped dolmas.
i have seen the sun rise so many times over this pond. the mostly-paved trail around fresh pond is a great place to go for a two-and-a-half mile run early in the morning. it's a beautiful slice of nature in the middle of cambridge.
First visit I had the Chicken Crack Empanadas. OMG they are so good. They come with a ranch-type dressing that makes them even better. However they also stand up on their own. Very unique flavors and very fresh. It comes with rice  and beans.  The beans are great , rice is so-so, cokes perfectly just not a lot of flavor. I ordered chips and salsa on the side. Their Salsa can definitely use a kick. It's good but pretty much tomatoes and cilantro. Kick it up with more peppers guys and I'd give 5 stars. I highly recommend Tomatillos.
Great interesting drinks and gave me a vibe similar to the cosmopolitan in las vegas and good food. Small portions but really good
I lived in Atlanta for 3 years and never knew that Il Localino existed.... and I am super bummed about that, because it is AWESOME!  My friends who still live in ATL discovered the restaurant and go all the time, so we came here with a group of 12 girls on the Friday night of my bachelorette party weekend for dinner and drinks.  I literally couldn't think of a more fun restaurant atmosphere and am so grateful for this place!  The restaurant is small and cozy, and looks like your standard authentic Italian restaurant.... if that restaurant was drunk (and I mean that in the best way!)  Everything glows red because of the rope lights everywhere, and there is SO MUCH TO LOOK AT!  Framed pictures and posters and signs and paper lanterns and chairs hanging from the ceiling....  And there are racks of hats throughout the restaurant that you can not only borrow to wear during dinner, but are seemingly encouraged to!  Everyone in my party borrowed a fun hat - mine was a sequined cowboy hat with a rhinestone tiara on top!  They play their music pretty loudly, and it's upbeat and fun.  The disco ball will randomly start spinning and when you least expect it the fog machine will go off.  And in the back room where we were sitting all of this organized chaos was offset by a large TV screen showing scenic and peaceful views of Italy.    The food itself was average at best.  I started with the fried calamari appetizer and it was okay, but tasted a bit under seasoned.  For my entrée I got the "classical rendition" fettuccini alfredo, which was also just fair.  The noodles tasted homemade, but the sauce was also under seasoned and very oily.  Also, this place isn't necessarily cheap for the food they're serving - the fettuccini was $22.95.  But I think you honestly pay for the atmosphere and good vibes there, and that's why I'm giving this place 4 stars instead of 2 or 3.  That food for that price would have been disappointing if I wasn't having such a blast in such a fun place with my friends!  The restaurant also gave us all complimentary limoncello shots in honor of my bachelorette weekend, which was delicious and so very nice of them!  The bottle of limoncello was frozen in a bucket with a bunch of lemons, which makes for a pretty neat presentation (though it probably doesn't make it the easiest to pour).  Basically, this was the perfect spot for this weekend and we all really enjoyed ourselves.  They welcomed us with open arms and made sure we had fun!  Sure the food isn't the best ever, but really Atlanta isn't even known for having amazing Italian food so this should be no shock.  Come here when you want a place where the food is second to the atmosphere, and consider Il Localino for a fun birthday or bachelorette party dinner!
Was really apprehensive to take my Lexus in to anyone but the dealer, but I know how overpriced the dealerships are!!  I had heard about Bearden's and looked them up on the internet, saw these great reviews and gave them a call. They were very helpful over the phone to help me understand how highly trained their technicians are and they could certainly find out why my check engine light was on.  They got me right in and had me fixed in a few hours with a very fair price!  I highly recommend them and their courtesy and knowledge was excellent.
*Great service  *I had the Saumon Fumé and it was delicious.  My husband had the Tagine and he was also super happy  *We ordered a couple of the Liege-Style Waffle for desert.  One with dark chocolate sauce and one with the peach & bourbon butterscotch sauce.  Our favorite of the two was the peach & bourbon butterscotch.  The place gets busy but the food was really wonderful.
Recently dropped off a cake to surprise a friend who was coming here for dinner. They were extremely friendly and helpful and even went above and beyond to really make their birthday experience special! Shout out to their manager Sal he was a big help!!! Looking forward to try their food very soon!
Quotes " All of us. very impressed. Over-indulged and satisfied "  I'll be back to do the Taj brunch rooftop again
My family, friends and I just spent our 4th of july in a private reserved area here. Ivy was a pleasure to work with from the get go. She was speedy with her emails and beyond accommodating to our needs. When we got to Relax Grill she greeted us right away and ended up being our server as well. The whole staff assisted us and made sure we had everything we needed. THANK YOU SO MUCH RELAX GRILL. our 4th of july was fantastic!!!!
I had a great experience with My stay here. The service was excellent. The Team members(most of them) were really nice. I got a little attitude from one of the Old broads during breakfast but there's haters everywhere. I Especially loved the guys at the bar Downstairs. I had a terrible hangover one morning And I called down and told the bartender he made me tomato soup, warm bread and gave me two pitchers of ginger ale. That alone was enough to make me return. Its that type of hospitality alot of places lack these days. Oh yeah, there's one Guy that works nights who was HIGH as a kite everytime I seen him, he was slow as hell and suspicious acting but I can deal with a pot head or two. Doesn't change the way I feel about the place! Great customer service
Love Hyde Park Bar and Grill! They have wonderful fries... and great all around food, especially the asian chicken salad! Their mango margaritas are the best, and they have great service - you are seated quickly even if there is a crowd, and the food comes out quickly.  My only complaint is that I miss the huge thing of fries that used to sit on top of the fork outside... what's up with the weird heart? sometimes the earth is up there too... i vote for the fries!!
I went to Meritage with a close friend for restaurant week - we could only afford to go to one restaurant so we searched through all the menus and thought Meritage would be the best place. It definitely met our expectations! The only bad thing was that it took a while to be seated, but we weren't in a big rush. We both had a glass of wine, which was great. The first course was a summer tomato soup - so flavorful and delicious, and they also served bread with the best whipped butter I've ever had. For my main dish I ordered  pan seared scallops served with pea greens and grapefruit butter, which was deliciously flavorful but not too rich. The scallops were cooked perfectly - not too rubbery. A highlight of the meal was my friend's dessert cheese plate, which was absolutely the most unique and flavorful cheeses I have ever tasted.   I also found out when I was there that the restaurant does a $25 wine + plate tasting every Thursday, which is themed each week. I will definitely be going back for one of these events soon!
excellent small family owned Greek restaurant. I've been to Santorini Greece several times and can attest for the authenticity of this place...not to mention the warm welcome we get every time we walk in the door.
Went here yesterday- the food was awesome and the service was good. Will be back again soon!
I was apprehensive about trying Pattycake Bakery. I'd heard about a few times from different sources, but was unconvinced  that vegan baked goods would be edible. I asked a vegan friend who assured me they were delicious, but really, what was he going to say? What other options would he have for vegan cupcakes and cookies? I figured his tastebuds might have gotten a little warped from milk and butter withdrawal.   Finally, I heard about it YET AGAIN and decided that perhaps the Food Gods were trying to tell me something. I hustled my 3-year-old into the car one morning and told him I had a surprise for him. I needed a partner in crime on this particular excursion.   OH.  MY.  GOD.  Seriously! This stuff is AMAZING! I mean, it's not just good by vegan standards--it's GOOD, period. Honestly, I had a fleeting thought while I was there that perhaps they lie and really do use eggs and milk. Then I realized there were an awful lot of people working in the back and at least one of them would have spilled the beans if that were the case. That good.   I tasted the chocolate cupcake (amazing), the lemon cupcake (good), the Toll House cookies (how in the HELL can these be vegan?!), the pumpkin whoopie pie (swoon), and the vanilla cupcake (delightful). Yeah, I brought home some stuff for the rest of the family.   Don't be afraid. Go and try this place! And take some home for your vegan-phobic loved ones so you can say, "Isn't that cookie amazing?! Yeah, guess what? IT'S VEGAN!!" Not that I did or anything. No. I would never do that.   The people here are really nice. Excellent service, and they didn't mind my saying, "I can't believe this is vegan! It's so GOOD!!!!"   If you go, you might want to plan on getting your order to go. They're short on dining space (as it turned out I was lucky my companion was a little kid). The space exists, but this definitely isn't a place to linger. That hardly matters, though. Go and enjoy yourselves and let me know if I was the one who finally got you to try it. ;-)
I am a bit of an oddity in that I never used to get my hair cut at the same place twice (even if I liked it).  That all changed after I went to Ritual Salon. Suzanne has been cutting my hair for a few years now and I am staying put.  She's chopped it all off, colored it, made it look like it has volume (which is miraculous) and several other things for which I am super grateful.  I hesitate to recommend her as highly as I'd like for fear that I might have to fight to get an appointment with her in the future, but for the greater good of good hair, I will do it anyway.  Try Ritual and try Suzanne S.  Both outstanding!
Crowded, loud and absolutely fabulous.  My first time in the area.  I'm always looking for a good pie.  These pizzas are HUGE!  Both in size and flavor.  I try pizza everywhere I go and was skeptical about a place named Ryans, but it was worth the trip and I would go back again if in the area..
Our 23-year-old A/C unit was running on its last legs, slowly leaking increasingly-expensive freon that needed charging on an annual basis.  We finally decided to bite the bullet and replace it with something newer and more efficient that wouldn't give us trouble every year.  I called five - yes, five - different companies.  Four were recommended highly by Yelpers; the other was recommended by a friend.  Mr. Cool said he'd give me a quote (without even bothering to look at the system we had) - I never heard back.  I got three quotes from three of the other companies; the fourth gave me the "we can show up between 9 a.m. and 1 p.m." song and dance, and I flushed them.  After much research on the systems that were being offered (and after e-mailing Luke several questions, which he promptly answered), I chose Austin Air Dynamics.  Their price was competitive.  They arrived exactly when they promised they would, with the equipment they needed and with several guys on hand so they could get the job done in one day and wouldn't leave us without A/C overnight.  Everyone was extremely polite, very good-natured, and didn't for a second make me uncomfortable about being alone in the house with them for the entire day.  They worked their butts off pretty much all day, got the job done, cleaned up after themselves, and were gone by 6:00, leaving me happy and cool with my brand spankin' new A/C.  Luke gave me a 3% discount for paying with a check and filled out all the paperwork I needed to get my rebates from the City and the federal government.    I'd highly recommend Luke and his crew for all your A/C needs.  Responsive, reasonably-priced, competent and professional - when it comes to home maintenance folks, that's all I ask, and Austin Air Dynamics delivers.
This hotel is amazing! Everything and more you would come to expect from a Disney Resort. Grand Lobby, gorgeous pool, and amazing views of the lake in the rear of the property. Monorail and Ferry stops on site, very easy to get around!
A foodie's paradise. I've been to The Ravenous Pig 10+ times and it has been great every time. This is easily the best restaurant in central Florida, and more than likely the best restaurant in the state.  Just a sample of some of the deliciousness enjoyed at TRP have been Foie Gras and Donuts, Bone Marrow, Wagyu Ribeye, and you can never forget BACON ICE CREAM! If these sound a little too adventurous for your taste, you can tone it down with some Lobster Taco's, Shrimp & Grits, Steak Frites (truffle fries are to die for), or a simple yet delicious ravioli dish. While their beer selection is top tier, I would recommend trying one of their featured mixed drinks.   TRP's servers are knowledgeable and well versed with the menu and drink selections. Many will recommend pairings of beers or wines with certain selections. The decor is sleek and elegant, yet unpretentious and modern. As you walk in, you typically notice the packed bar and smiling hostess, but if you look up you'll see large framed pictures on the ceiling portraying neighborhood cookouts.  As for lunch, there is an assortment of different sandwiches and salads, which are good, but your opinion of the restaurant should not be contingent on a lunch experience.   Go to The Ravenous Pig with a group of close friends, because the experience is too good not to be shared.
* Solid HK style cafe *  This spot which used to be Sun Fat Cafe has been reborn as the BT Cafe.    It is a nice HK style cafe, with the usual HK cafe type dishes (everything from baked rice & spaghetti dishes to fried noodles to sandwiches to congee).    The place seems recently renovated, with an overall clean look for this type of cafe.  The booths are nicely cushioned and the tables were fairly new looking.  I tried my staple test dish of beef chow fun.  It had good wok hei, and the noodles were done correctly without breaking apart.  The beef was very tender, and there was a generous amount of it.  Very good dish!  It came with a complimentary hot or cold drink, and I had cold HK milk tea.  It had a nice strong flavour, and was spot on in terms of flavours.    Very reasonably priced at $6.50 for the chow fun and cold milk tea combo.    Service was extremely friendly, and the customers all seemed to be enjoying their time chatting between tables loudly in Cantonese with their friends.  Seems like it has already turned into a bit of a neighbourhood hangout for middle aged Cantonese speakers!    I'll definitely be returning!
Had a great dinner. The piaea was fantastic. Great flavors, full of chicken, shellfish and flavor! Big enough for two to share. My wife had the barbecue chicken which was also excellent. Started dinner with a couple of cocktails (Hammer and Cycle, and Mohito) both excellently done.  We are ready to come back again.  Great Job.
Very clean little restaurant with great Mexican food! My daughters had the Chrizzo burritos and they were huge and had excellent favor. The carne guisada, rice, and beans were awesome! The only thing they are missing is homemade tortillas, hence the 4 stars not 5.   The staff were all so friendly and inviting, I'm sure we'll be back before we leave Austin!
Come for the food, stay for the head. PIGS HEAD TACOS THAT IS!!!  Other than that was a huge fan of the biscuits and the crudo.  The meal ended with quite the tale. PIG TAIL DONUTS THAT IS.  4/5 to the Ravenous pig. 5/5 this review.
What can I say! Super friendly, amazing tea, and delicious soup dumplings. My wife and I from out of town, we walked past this place the other day from our hotel nearby. Gave it a shot today. Was not disappointed! My wife and I will return before we leave!
As noted by other reviewers, the fans of MONKEY WRENCH BICYCLES keep coming back for old school customer service and no-jive advice.  I returned a defective pump the other day and, instead of an exchange, was given an upgrade to the model used by their bike techs. Transactions like this define a well-oiled LBS and keep the customers rolling back in.
Loewy Law Firm is a dedicated, professional and experienced team that offers top-notch service. They are caring, knowledgable and above all, trustworthy. I would trust and recommend anyone to Loewy Law Firm.
Stellar cart food and consistently good. Shelly is always very friendly and attentive. The portions are insane. Small would feed most of my family. Okay, well at least two of us. :)  There's usually a line, but it goes fast and it's worth it. There are options for dairy-free, gluten-free, and even her utensils are the compost-able kind. Nice.
This is the best restaurant I've ever been to.  After making reservations with the Open Table app on my iPhone, my wife and I went there for dinner on Saturday March 19th.  We were impressed with the  modern looking building made of cinder blocks, glass and steel blending with the warm and inviting decor due made possible by gentle lighting, beautiful wood tables and warm red seating.  The oversized door welcomed us just as warmly as the manager at the front desk.  I must say I was very distracted (in a good way) by the open kitchen right as we came in.  I'm a huge fan of open kitchens because I think that people working in good restaurants are very talented, and I love to see how clean everything is and how hard they are working to give us a wonderful meal.  After being promptly seated our waiter came by and introduced himself and asked for our drink order.  I made the innocuous comment that it was our first trip to Roaring Fork, and did he have anything that were house specialties.  His already pleasant demeanor peaked up a bit, and he made several suggestions for drink, appetizer, and entree.  We were given the perfect amount of time to peruse the menu, and I ended up ordering a Grey Goose Pear/Amaretto martini, an off-menu NY strip, and the green chili mac & cheese (I'll let my wife, another yelper, tell you what she had).  We asked to split a fried avocado appetizer.  A few minutes later the sous chef showed up with two "tasting" for us to try since it was our first trip.  I was deep into my first drink (fantastic!), and didn't quite catch what everything was.  It was a piece of seared Ahi Tuna (my first), a poblano rice (?), and a tomato sauce of some type ... doh!  I wish I paid attention!  I tried to look on the menu when I got home, but it isn't on the menu.  Well, it was wonderful.  When the fried avocado showed up they were perfect, too.  A warm avocado with a thin crispy coating served with a bit of spicy crab remoulade.  Dinner comes, and they ask me to cut into the side of beef masquerading as a NY Strip.  They flashed some light on the middle, and it was underdone.  They whisked it away with an apology.  The waiter came over with an apology.  The manager brought my steak back with an apology.  I was starting to feel bad that they cooked my steak to rare instead of medium like I asked!  "No, no... it's okay.  It's fine.  Thankyouverymuch" (I'm almost done with the second martini at this point...)  The strip was wonderful since they treated the steak the way you are supposed to treat any good steak.  A little salt, a little pepper, some wood-fired heat, and enjoy.  And boy did I enjoy.  The green chili mac was fantastic, too.  And with all of that I wish I had ordered what my wife got!  (but, that's her review to give, not mine.  Check out "Deanna B.")  They comp'd a dessert for us, and although pleasantly full we couldn't refuse.  We tried the cornbread pineapple upside down cake.  (I'd seen too many photos of it on Yelp not to try it.)  Warm moist and sweet cornbread with pineapple rings and a scoop of Amy's vanilla ice cream.  I LOVED that it wasn't an overly sweet mess.  That was my kind of dessert!  I wish I could live the life that offered the ability to have this quality meal every day (but not necessarily this QUANTITY!)  I said it several times, and I'm going to say it here, I have a new favorite restaurant - the Roaring Fork.
Very cool and Arabic place. I enjoy their food and hospitality very much. I would give five stars but the meat portions usually a bit small. Other than that, its great!!
One of the best restaurants in Vancouver! Authentic atmosphere, authentic staff, authentic food.   Mussels & Fries - Only served on Wednesdays, which is why we literally only come here on Wednesdays. Tastes as good, if not better, than what we've had in Europe. Assiette de Charcuterie & Assiette de Fromages - Absolutely delicious. It's really hard to find good charcuterie so make sure you get some while you're here.
I ordered the beef tacos (pretty basic of me) and did not regret it one bit! The beef tacos are amazing and seasoned well. Definitely recommend this spot! The price is very reasonable.
I have been going to this Barber shop about every month and a half for the past two years. Naji is an incredible guy who is always very patient as is equipped with great conversation. Cuts hair with great consistency so I know what I am getting every time. As long as I am in Austin I will come here for a cut.
Amazing food, and great service. Was a little busy but that is their fault for having such delicious meals.
This is definitely one of my go-to brunch spots. The atmosphere was comfy and quaint, and the decor and art make it a fun place to be. Old books, antiques, message boards and banners give you a lot to look at while you wait (though we were seated immediately). Our waitress was very polite and responsive, and our food came quickly. I ordered the Chipotle chicken flatbread and wow, oh my, was it delicious. I'll likely order it for lunch again (and again). The drinks come in cute mason jars, which is a unique touch. Price was affordable, too, especially for breakfast. Expect to spend between $6-$10 for most of the dishes. Serving sizes are probably average size, but not huge. Overall, I was very satisfied though. I'll certainly be coming back again -- and bringing friends along!
I really like this place.  It's a decent bar, but it gets a kick up in star value for the decor.  Aside from the fact that it has a coveted patio, the place inside is cool, with big tall red velvet booths and pillows at the bar, cool red lights glimmering in nooks and crannies, mirrors in specially placed areas and unique signage every where you turn.  The lights are low and it's a place to relax with friends, or get intimate with a date.  The staff is pretty chill and they have some great beers on tap.  Rasputin?  Yes, please!  Looked like they had some interesting food I need to try (roasted corn mac and cheese and oysters!); I always just come here for the booze and ambiance.  One of my favorite places to pop-in in the neighborhood!
Recently opened a seaport location about 2 months ago which is so much more convenient for me than the back bay location! Great, friendly staff! Chris the optometrist was SO HELPFUL. It can be so overwhelming to pick but he really knew his stuff and made the process easy and fun!
My favorite place to go for vegetarian chinese food. Always tastes great and a good deal for the amount of food you get. The owners/staff are friendly and the service is great. I recommend the dumplings and any of the vegan sushi.
We made reservations at Tiffins on a Saturday night for dinner.  The restaurant  has three dinning rooms and is very spacious so we didn't have wait long for our table. During the short walk to our table we got a brief description of the room we would be dining in. We dined in the Grand Gallery which was very decorative with beautifully designed lantern animals on the wall that followed an animal/planet conservation theme.  We were then greeted by our server who gave us a rundown of the menu. I had made sure to mention to her that it was our second time dinning at Tiffins, just in case there were any changes made from our previous visit. (We liked it that much we had to come for a second visit). She informed us that there had been a few changes to the menu such as replacing the Duo of Lamb with the Duo of Venison and switching out the Grouper for a Swordfish.  After thinking long and hard about the menu, we finally decided on two entrees: The Pomegranate -lacquered chicken and the Seared Hokkaido Scallops.  As we waited for the food to come out, the server brought out some complimentary bread for us to snack on. It was Pomegranate Focaccia bread, and let me tell you, it was very unique and delicious. It was not too fluffy, but a slightly more dense type of bread. It also was also lightly glazed with a molasses sauce which gave it just the right amount of sweetness. In addition to that, there was a dipping sauce made of molasses, balsamic vinegar, olive oil, and hints of pomegranate which gave it the right amount of tanginess. The server had told us to use it sparingly because a little went a long way. But It was so delicious! We even got seconds on the bread.  My entrée was equally as delicious.  The food was plated beautifully and the taste was on point.  The chicken was nicely flavored and moist. It pretty much fell off the bone and went great with the Sweet Potato Pap. The Thumbelina carrots were also super cute and yummy.  The Fennel salad was a great compliment to all the flavors and textures of the dish.  I tried a piece of the scallops and they were so good! We also ordered a side of Brussel sprouts which came in a pretty decently sized considering it was a side.  There were bits of bacon pieces in the Brussels which made it even better!  Overall, an excellent dinner filled with great food, great service and a very warm and welcoming atmosphere. The prices are a little on the higher end, but all very worth it. Located right outside of the new Pandora attraction. It's perfect if you are looking for a fine dining experience in Animal Kingdom.
The salmon is an absolute must try!  The food was very full of flavor and savor, and I am quite tempted to go back again tonight.   The wait wasn't that bad either.  Our server was very great and very attentive to our table.
I've been missing Pietro's Pizza since moving out of Southern Oregon.   Great Pizza, lots of games for the kids.
Plain and simple, you will not get more bang for your buck in this area of Orlando.  Most other hotels do not tell you that they are also going to charge you for parking, or a resort fee which comes as a surprise when you check in. Typically you can add another $30 to your bill just for these fees. This is not the case at Drury Inn which not only does not charge you for these things, but also provides free internet, HBO, wifi, hot breakfast with all the fixings, and always very polite and helpful staff along with the cleanest facilities you will find around. There's a reason out 358 hotels in the Orlando area this one consistently ranks in the top 5. We enjoyed our stay and plan on staying at other hotels in this chain in the future.
This is place is awesome! Great atmosphere, clean picknick tables and now that the weather is cooler it's a great place to hang out.  The food is great. Traditional Lebanese food cooked with love. The owners are very nice and welcoming.  I'll for sure be back; andI'd recommend anyone wanting some delicious Lebanese food and a laid back atmosphere to check it out!
Went to Dots a few days ago for the first time and had a great experience. The atmosphere is funky cool SE Portland. Dark lighting with velvet walls and awesome paintings. We ordered the the cheesey jalapeno fries along with a couple of cocktails and two burgers. The food and drinks were awesome and the service by our waiter was really good. Overall had a great time and we will be going back again!
I'm new to Portland. Moved here in Dec 2010. I found this store soon after and have been back a dozen times now - first to furnish part of my apartment and then to furnish my entire new office.   Contrary to the reviews below, everyone who works here is way cool, helpful and most importantly, not in your face trying to sell you things. I think what some interpret as aloof and not acknowledging the customer is, how I see it,  really just a respect for the customer desire to shop without feeling pressure.   The second I asked for help, all 3 people working there jumped. None where Asian and none were stoned as per Kyle's experience. Sometimes it helps to first ask if someone works there.    Anyway, I've bought art, tables, desks, chairs, lamps, lighting fixtures, knick knacks, credenza and much more. They are really workable on price. And I found them to be just genuinely nice people.   I'll keep going back for more.
Really impressive museum. Visually stunning. The nautical displays are exceptional. I was a bit underwhelmed by the 'Wedded Bliss" exhibit. They had some great peices but I would have liked to see more. More dresses, more paintings, more jewelry etc. The staff are very friendly and the museum is well maintained. Definitely worth a visit.
Puzzled by the negative reviews. This fried chicken sandwich was the best I've ever had (and with a reasonable price) with good service and a unique environment.  People are saying the chicken is bland- not sure what you are expecting out of fried chicken. You have crisp breading, tender juicy chicken on the inside, solid meat to breading ratio, appropriate salt, and somewhat sweet/buttermilk flavor from the breading that I can't quite put my finger on... pretty much everything you could ask for from fried chicken. It's really, really good fried chicken.  Dan Dan fries are also a creative new take on loaded up fries that tastes very good and is very filling. Bottled soda with real sugar is a nice touch. Check this place out if you want to get full on affordable tasty eats.
This is our go-to for nights we don't feel like cooking (and often many other times as well). An everything bowl, is heaven in my mouth, and it's quite affordable too. Their bowls are delicious, healthy, gluten-free and quite flavorful (OMG that tali sauce). This place will always have a spot on our regular rotation.
My favorite Ethiopian place! The ribeye tibs layered over Shiro and a *bunch* of extra veggie sides (I especially love the potato stew...atter?) we come every time we are in town and it never disappoints :)
Love this place. Old school - reminds me somewhat of the Northend joints in Boston. Very good food and very good service.
This is one of my favorite places in Columbus. My friends and I come here for drinks and table tennis all the time. they often have live music so it always has a fresh atmosphere when I come. For food I always get the burger, its not the best burger in the word but it is pretty good. It's very open so causal. just the way I like it.
Good healthy food, good selection, and good value.  Tofu Bankok Curry was really good.  Great location in the Pearl District.
Again this is my new go to place for entertainment! Watched Atomic Blonde! I can't get enough of the spicy tuna on crispy rice! No other movie theater gives me the bang for my buck like this place does!
I've brought my two dogs here before and their cuts were great! I was able to get a last minute appointment with no problem. Picked them up in a couple of hours. So I thought I found a great new place to take my dogs. But After my recent appointment was cancelled last minute by dot dogs (I can only assume because it was around the holidays) i was left a little confused. I'll give them one more try because of the previous service and good location. So we will see how things go.
This place has an ultra cool atmosphere and beautiful decor - not to mention the impressive-looking bar. The service was excellent, too. Maybe even just this side of overbearing (The hostess (or manager?) dropped by several times to check on us, but I'll take that over being ignored and having to chase down a staff member any day).   We shared the tuna tataki appetizer, which was good quality and very flavourful. My Pacific salmon salad was excellent. The salmon was perfectly done, everything was fresh, and even the roasted potatoes (normally not my favourite) were well-cooked (ie. not too mushy) but not too oily/crunchy, either. The coffee was fresh and sufficiently strong, too.  In short, this is what you would call a "classy joint" - a good place for a business lunch or dinner date. In other words, somewhere you can actually hold a conversation.
Went on Wednesday for after work drinks. The vibe is nice, dark and warm. Service was good. Didn't eat. Heard they have live music on Friday and Saturday nights. I'll be back.
I rented a trailer here once to haul a large appliance for my business. They had a great selection of rental trucks and trailers and the prices were great.    I also liked that they had everything else I needed, (and didn't know that I needed) to hitch the trailer to my Jeep, available onsite for purchase.
I had a great experience here.  I arrived and was quickly greeted by a woman. She showed me the guest area and was very courteous. My service was quick.  They vacummed my car and didn't offer me services I didn't need.  The only thing I would change is that I didn't care to have my car waiting for me in front, running (with the key in it) and the door wide open.  It's still the city so I wanted to rush to my car before someone else saw the opportunity to grab a car and go.  I also don't like the door wide open because... bugs.  That said, this was still a top notch experience and I will return.
My 1st Dosa experience- had eggplant, lamb vindaloo and chicken dosas - all 3 very tasty - lamb had good luck. Also a coconut curry chicken - pretty good. Definitely going there for the dosas. Chai average. Service ladies very kind. Overall reasonable price and good food
The gelato is always delicious - it never disappoints. Every flavor tastes like the real thing, and they've got amazing rotating flavors. I just tried a double scoop - one Prickly Pear and one Meyer Lemon - and they nailed it. Both were so good.  They do food here, and beer and wine also. The quiche and soups always sound good, but I only stop in for the gelatto.  They usually only have one person working, which causes a wait at times. Hire another friendly employee to help scoop and I'd bump my rating to five stars.
Stopped in here last night, didn't have to wait for a table. The interior is warmly lit and spacious enough that you don't feel cramped. There are a few tvs above the bar to watch sports.  Our server was super friendly and attentive throughout our meal. She was very helpful and proactive by telling us what was already sold out for the evening and offered recommendations for drinks and food.  We ordered a flight of Oregon bourbons, some beers, a small beef brisket with mac, collard greens and a chicken and dumpling dish.  The food was all very delicious and we didn't have to wait long for it to be served. We finished our meal with the sweet potato beignet. Deep fried doughy balls of heaven dusted in confectioners sugar with hot syrup for dipping.  Will be back!
Always the best food and best service. No other indian restaurant on scott rd can compete with Tastys.
I really enjoy this studio. The vibe is consistently positive and welcoming. The ladies are engaging and really encouraging; they make you gain so much confidence in your work. I love how they know each person by name (even when you are new) and take the time to adjust you when you missing the mark :) I absolutely love that the place is always looking clean and pristine, that the classes start and end on time. I love that the teachers all look SUPER great and range from younger to more mature and deliver the same amount of value in each class. It's more than a workout studio, they are building a community and you feel embraced and welcomed as soon as you walk-in and participate!
Happy his place has everything you may want: refined cocktails, coffee and tea drinks, tasty snacks and a cool Southeast Asia meets New York vibe. The service is friendly and professional. We enjoy spending time here in the evenings to top off a walk, or in the mornings for weekend brunch, or pretty much any other time of day for a sweet pause. It is so relaxing to sit street side in the summer and really cozy to grab a couch or an upstairs table in the winter.   Come in and grab a cocktail with some marinated olives or a chai with a warm chocolate chip cookie.
Dining Services location, deliverable to dorms. Includes a small C-Store to get snack/grocery items as well as pizzas, subs, and wings. Breakfast and lunch available for pickup. Overall great quality for low price.
I just had my first class here, which was the Indo-row class. It was absolutely amazing. It started at 10:00 am but since I was the only one signed up we started a couple minutes early. Bob was wonderful, and made me feel so comfortable and excited about class.   I should probably note that I'm not very athletic, and rarely have the motivation to go to the gym or a class. Bob explained everything multiple times to be, he was patient, and I'm actually excited to go back and workout at this studio.   I can't wait to come back, and have already signed up for a Bike Burn class!
Excellent experience from start to finish. Chris Gonzales provided great service in linking me up with Brian Wong, the best salesperson I've worked with yet. They were both instrumental in helping me build the perfect X5, from letting me have multiple test drives to advising me on features and financing. Highly recommend them both for an efficient and pleasant purchase. A rarity these days!
I ordered the one lbs of crab legs,  corn,  and potato salad.  I believe I chose the everything mix seasoning.  The food was really delicious!  I will definitely order from there again when in the area.
Excellent craft beers. Not just one or two, but I tried five and they all were good.  And I have been to dozens of craft breweries across the US (and many beer festivals).  They dont have an 18% beer but the ones they have are solid representatives of their types (IPA, stout, red IPA etc).  There is no food yet, but some will be coming in the near future. The place doesnt open till 3 pm.  The bar tender was polite and knowledgeable. All in all, a good craft brewery bar.
Mooooooo! Cheers to Texas de Brazil for satisfying my craving for a good meal to end my trip in Orlando.    The Salad Bar was up to par and so were the sides and the Lobster Bisque.  We made sure not to fill up on too much fillers so we could eat our share of meat.    Our server was excellent, very informative and made sure we had everything we needed.  She also informed us that if a meat was too salty to our taste, we could just let them know and they would provide us with a less salted piece of meat.  She requested the filet migon guy to come back to our table so i could finish with what I wanted.  We did have some room for a bit of dessert. My weakness..pecan pie. Just be warned that if they heat it up for you, the inside will be hot and takes a bit to cool off.  Other than that no complaints, very satisfied and left feeling like cow.  Dont let the price scare you off, because from my knowledge this is the usual price of a decent churrasaria.  Sometimes you just gotta live life to eat the finer things in life.
Definetly my first pick when it comes to pizza places. The quality of the food and prices are great, and the owner is the sweetest guy youll ever meet!
Came here Saturday night. Loved the atmosphere and food. Favorites were shrimp and grits, beet salad, and cornbread. The service itself was good, but our server (Samantha?) was miserable. No thank You's, no personality, rude in her responses. I'm a server, and to make your tips, you have to have good people skills. This was lacking. I would go back for the great food and good ambiance.
I've been here a few times and have been really happy. The owner even remembered me from a few years earlier! They do good work, are quick, the price is good, and they're easy to work with. Enough said! I highly recommend them.
Amazing food! The Adobo fried rice was really good. Pork was tender and very flavorful. Tacos were good, as well. But the best part of it was the Lumpia. I grew up with a Filipino relative who loved to cook, so my expectations were high. Challenge accepted and met!  Customer service was exceptional! The chef really loved what he was doing, and it really came across in both his attitude and his food.
This is probably the only Mexican Restaurant I go to, coming from a very Mexican family where we cook really good home cooked meals, its hard to find a good place that almost tastes like home and this is it. REAL GOOD MEXICAN FOOD.
Eye Adore Threading is such a cute little threading shop in South End. As someone who has never threaded or waxed her eyebrows and only lives by tweezing whenever necessary, I was hesitant to visit any threading shop. However, Akriti was so friendly and reassuring. She had a conversation with me as she was threading my eyebrows and she could easily be someone I sat down and talked to for over an hour. Yes, threading hurts a lot - but no pain, no gain. It hurt more than slowly plucking each of my eyebrows, but Akriti offered to let me take breaks whenever. I just decided to get it over with without any breaks. Threading also lasts 3 weeks whereas plucking... two days maybe. I was very impressed when I opened my eyes. A flawless finish - I have never seen my eyebrows look so good before! The best part is that she did not change the shape of my brow at all and only did the cleanup that I requested (I have read and heard about many horror stories elsewhere in which eyebrows came out too thin or just terrible). Akriti knows what she's doing! She left a few hairs at the end and let me know she intentionally did that so I can grow out the ends of my brow. Will definitely be back!  No appointments, but walk-ins should not be an issue!
I went in to find some parts for some drum hardware. I thought it might be a challenge but Matt located everything I needed in about 7 minutes and everything is a perfect match. It only cost $3.25 too, what a great value. I almost felt bad I wasn't paying more because it turned a $35 item back into a $70 item. thanks guys
The signs of Sobo gentrification abound.  The promise of coffee and gellatto shops catering to the fiscally fortuitous South Boston condo dwellers just took took another step toward reality with the appearance of Sophia's Cafe on shady Dorchester Ave.   The interior is a bit sterile, not unlike the giant PC-like McCallen building it resides in.  Some inviting furniture and soothing colors would make a more relaxing destination for soaking up caffeine and Wifi.  The service is a a bit slow as they iron out their process and train staff, but that gives you more time to chat with owner, Jen, whose daughter the cafe is named after.  The sandwiches aren't superlative, but they hit the spot and there are daily specials along with all the coffee and tea options.  All things considered, Sophia's is a slightly above average cafe, but the neighborhood is happy to have a spot that serves soy lattes and isn't a Dunkin Donuts.
On the eve of Chinese New Year, We tasted  the mostly renowned Boston lobster with shaking sauce at Shaking Crab. Love the taste! Gratified for the prompt service! Feel great!
I've lived here for about two years and in comparison to the apartment-manager-from-hell at my last complex. the staff at the Marquis have been helpful, nice, mostly competent and seem to enjoy their jobs.  The 24-hour maintenance request guarantee is great, and it's so darn quiet.    Free booze at parties, a slightly older crowd than I would imagine is average for apartment complexes in Austin, a pet sitter on-site (Gayle, awesome!) and great proximity helped me to decide to renew my contract for the next year.  They're generally awesome.
This is a revision of an earlier review which revised a yet still earlier review.  The decline in food quality I noted in August of 2012 has been dealt with, and the food and service are both now top notch.  The service people are very attentive, and though I like to order sushi on brown rice, they still are quick to prepare most dishes - in a sushi time frame, that is.  The basics are very good: a fine miso soup accompanies most dishes, and they now offer Korean style condiments, like Kim Chee, potato salad, shaved radishes, etc. with Korean dishes, such as the Korean barbecue.  Favorites of mine include udon noodles, either in soup or sautéed with seafood in a spicy sauce, as well as their specialty sushi rolls.  This restaurant will hold its own against any downtown Japanese restaurant, and you will enjoy both the food and the ambiance of this Newton,  four-corners, location.
Have been there a couple of times and love the lunch Bento boxes!  $15 not bad for a corp. lunch.  Sushi, spring roll, rice and entree!  Had crispy beef this last time good but not the best.  Was a little chewy but tasty. The seafood items, softshelll crab beto are excellent.
Blink and you'll miss this wonderful, subterranean hole-in-the-wall restaurant with its cozy yet minimalist decor that makes you want to sit and chat with a bottle of wine for hours on end.  My friend had the Chicken Parmigiana and I did the 3-course prix fixe for $35, starting with the Fra Diavolo. Both were insanely delicious. Huge portions, wonderfully cooked. Her chicken was meaty and juicy. My Fra Diavolo came with a generous helping of perfectly-buttered lobster, thick, fabulous spicy tomato sauce and chewy noodles. It's one of my favorite types of pasta (how can you go wrong with seafood and spicy sauce?) and Grotto's was fantastic!  Also treated myself to a Bellini, the only cocktail they serve. It had all the peach puree-y goodness one expects from the classic cocktail, though at $10, it was a tad pricey for the amount.  Service was consistently great, from the beginning where we were the first customers, to the end, when it got packed (on a Monday night!). This is the perfect date spot, friend spot, family spot....any spot! And the 3-course prix fixe, which allows you to choose from anything on their menu, is one of the best prix fixe deals around.
Herrell's has a fun, funky scene similar to Espresso Royale, except here they also serve ice cream. The enormous magnetic words on the wall give it a creative an artistic vibe, but the music is sometimes so loud it's hard to hold down a conversation. However, after eating breakfast there on Sunday morning, I had to update my review. Herrell's is a GREAT place for a leisurely weekend breakfast. We sat on a couch in the corner chatting and reading the Sunday Globe and waiting for our huge Belgian waffle and blueberry pancakes (for a grand total of $9!). The breakfast food and the atmosphere is as good as homemade, and best of all, we didn't have to clean up afterwards. :-)
This is the first authentic German food I have had in years and it was awesome!  The sauerbraten and spaetzle were fantastic.  We got there about 10 minutes after open and it was already starting to get packed.  I wish I had more time to spend there as I would have liked to sit in the bar and try the different beers.  We immediately recommended it to friends to try!
A true beer lovers bar!! Hundreds of options from a light ale to a triple Belgium, a gose to a stout. You will find something for anyone and everyone. While the tap list isn't as long it's still good and varied. If you are unsure the bar staff is more than welcoming and willing to help you discover something new. It's a little pricey but for the beer and vibes it's totally worth it. They also have a decent pub food menu and games to play. It's a fun place to hangout. Make sure you check their calendar as they frequently have events :)
Reliable & scrumptious pies, that are memorable & inexpensive. Sounds like a winning combination, right? RIGHT!   White Pie & the House (w/o olives) are my two favorites. By the slice or in a variety of sizes.   This particular location is my favorite, but I've had consistently great food & service at locations throughout at Atlanta.
Wow! I just went to Craig for the first time and five days later, I'm still saying Wow! It's taken me a long time to find the right haircutter in Austin, but I am truly impressed by my cut. I love their bumble & bumble products, too.  http://www.topazsalon.com/stylist.php?stylist_num=25#bottom
Went here and got a blueberry smoothie with grass jelly. The flavor was great, and I definitely enjoyed it. The texture wasn't perfect, as there was a little bit of flavorless ice at the bottom, but not too big of a deal. In the past, I'm pretty sure I had lemon jasmine tea with boba and this was great too. It would be nice if they had more flavors, but those that they have are quite tasty. Also, be warned they are cash only.
I really enjoy the food here. I have had various types of chicken and pork, and each was spicy and tasty. There aren't many places in Austin where you can get Cuban food of this quality. I love me some plaintains, and they have them on lots of things. The prices are reasonable for the quality of food as well. They have special Cuban beer (which I have not tried) and various special cocktails, and of course a full bar. This is yet another place that does not put prices on the drink menu, tsk tsk....
Healthy delicious baked goods are very hard to find, so when you do find one you affix yourself to it as tightly as possible. No. Seriously. If you're planning to chain me up somewhere, let it be here! In fact... I don't think you need a chain. I'll just hide in the kitchen and nibble. What I wouldn't give to be able to magically be two inches tall and stealthy.  This place really pulls off what they're meant to do well. There's little more to say. Its the perfect cookie place if you're feeling guilty about living sustainably. The business is run as green as they possibly can.   Now I have a date with a Peanut Butter Chocolate Chip cookie. Shoo.
If you like subway you will love firehouse. Firehouse is pretty much a higher quality subway.
Great customer service !!! I bought tickets and realized they would not be delivered until the day of our flights. I emailed them and they got my tickets delivered via email.  They provided instructions and helped me all along the way. My girls are so happy to see Hamilton. Thanks so much !
I absolutely love this place. I have to hand it to them, they are really doing it right and working their butts off. This place is PACKED and she was so sweet about letting us try the flavors. All local, all delicious, hand made Ice cream that is perfect for a summer night. But really i would stop here any time of year, add in some awesome coffee and sweet snacks and I'm sold. Caught the owner working on a busy night all alone and just smiling away serving this treat. My husband had the sprinkle cookie (which was a sweet tooth's heaven) and I had cherry and co. It was sweet and juicy and had an amazing savory aftertaste, all flavors of fresh ripe cherries. The texture is unlike anything you will get in a store. Typically, I go for hard ice cream and this just had all the feels and taste of a hard working, love for the art. I love to see local businesses like this flourish and these guys got the goods
Smiles on Sandy changed my view on dentistry. Before discovering this practice, I hated going to the dentist. Since I moved to Portland I was going to a chain store dental practice because I thought it was cheaper, which is definitely not the case, and I was treated as a number. In short, no one really cared.  I love this practice because it is just the opposite, and they have the perfect combination of professionalism and familiarity that I enjoy -as much as one can enjoy going to the dentist. You can tell that Dr. Daby and his staff work hard in making the experience of going to the dentist not only bearable, but somewhat pleasant. They take time to talk to you and explain you everything you want to know; from medical procedures to financing. Overall, I encourage anyone to give them a try. You won't be disappointed -and also, it's a great way to support local businesses -if that is something you care about as I do.
He  was doing his Cart years before it was COOL. Best fast in town. Great chili dogs, the best ever .....
It's been to long coming back here,totally awesome. Met friends for lunch Ozzy our waiter was great. Thank you Ozzy. Will come back sooner than later.
Nice open area in the back, great location on N Alberta street. Came here to grab a couple beers and some black bean nachos - very satisfactory way to end the night.
Went in today (Saturday) around 2pm. Appetizers were good, we got the Board and Fries. Nice tap list with like 21 options including 3 on nitro and 2 ciders. New ownership (per our server, it's the same as North 45, Circa 33, etc.). Head chef is apparently into pickling, so almost all dishes come with their house pickled veggies (which were delicious on the Board). Sat on the patio which thankfully was half shaded since it was hot today. Service was attentive, almost too attentive (and chatty). Overall, a great spot. I hadn't been to the original Produce Row, but had heard good things.
Michelle was extremely professional and welcoming which are two major things I look for in a business. I would love to have been a regular client if I didn't recently take a job in the Midwest. I will be back soon!
Never had a bad time there over many years.  Great for drinks and bites or dinner    If you come to the rainy city come to the Pearl and give it a try.
Very knowledgeable and attentive staff!! I came in the other and asked one of the staff about riesling recommendations, and he not only explained the different types of riesling to me, but he also recommended a bottle that is now my favorite riesling EVER!!   Overall, my experience has been wonderful each time. The staff is very kind and they are always willing to help you find what you need and they all have a positive attitude and a smile on their faces. Love y'all!!
Oh I love this place, very low key but their food is amazing.  We go there at least once a week and eat.  The food is so tasty and clean, it doesn't give you a "heavy" feeling after eating.  Our go to is the Beef Shawarma Over Rice, Lamb Kebab Wrap, Hummus and Falafel with extra pita.    The meats are marinated very well and the spice come thru, the veggies and rice compliments the dish.  The hummus is very well made and the Falafel is going to take some time as they fried it fresh every time we order it.  Very moist and tasty.  The place is very low key in that you order and the order comes out in to-go boxes.  You can wish to stay and eat at the tables or just take it home, the food still taste very good.
Allways consitent, always tasty, allways warm. We love this place. the service is very natural.
The best spaetzle in the southeast.  No question!   Come for the food, stay for the dinner show.  It's Octoberfest whenever you want!   If you dig the German beer, be sure to bring a designated driver!
Extremely knowledgable. A huge local resource and exactly the type of grassroots businesses we should be supporting - especially this day and age.  I started going here a few years ago when I was in college. The ClayBrite toothpaste blows synthetic whitening toothpaste out of the water and I love the hair & skin products.  The herb blends like brain mix, ultra male and liver mix are my favorites. Clearer thinking, more energy, better skin and overall a healthier feeling.   I wish more people would take charge of their health these days and this is a great, affordable first step. Go Leaves and Roots!
Very high quality service! Beautiful work and extremely good communication with me, insurance, and rental company. Highly recommended.
We give it a DAVLIN rating of 23-Food 25-Decor 22-Service  (0-30 possible score)  Updated review: just went there a second time. Not good. Don't go here on hot days!!! Their Air Conditioning is NOT sufficient to cool inside, it was miserable and they had all windows closed and manager (she) refused to open windows early evening when it was windy outside and cooler than inside!! Scratching my head in that decision. Carne Asada Fajitas were great but flour tortillas in enchiladas are like 'Rubber' very disappointing and it was the same comment from two different people other than myself!   Well after reading some of the negatives it reminded me that bad news travels fast and good news travels slow. If you're reading this you should remember to read between the lines and differentiate if you can, who's being accurate and who is not worth listening to.   The other reviews made me realize that there are a lot of people who live around here that have no concept of attending an adult restaurant. I always scratched my head why some parents bring children to restaurants that are clearly for adults when they SHOULD be taking their children to Denny's or some other 'family' restaurant! The last thing people want to do is to go to a very nice place and listen to annoying children being loud!!!! Or worse, a baby crying!   The fact is this is an obvious restaurant geared for adults. Our kind of place. The first compliment I want to give is to the ambience.  It is fantastic--from the decor to the very large windows that open to the street on both sides of the building. The staff was very friendly and down to earth. Prices were inexpensive, I think they should raise their prices! This would help keep a more high end clientele. In viewing the menu I knew the food was going to be good just based on their flavorings and descriptions. 95% of all Mexican restaurants make generic Mexican food! Yes, that food is good as well but, once in awhile you will come across a rare find. The only other upscale Mexican restaurant I have found is Javier's in Newport Beach, CA.  At Matador, the food was good. I like how you can choose a traditional dish but then they have variety of flavors and spices from which to choose for the preparation. The Queso was just ok, it's more of a bean dip with some cheese. They need to reverse it and have less bean dip and a lot more queso. With the Street Tacos they should allow you to pick what meat you want inside. Here they give you 5 tacos, each with a different meat and flavor. We found we preferred 2 of the 5. Chips and salsa were good. Salsa could be a bit more spicy. But the way they make it will allow more people to enjoy it. I would recommend having 2 salsas and let the customer get what they want. I like spicy, my wife doesn't.  The best plate I had was the Spicy Mexican Shrimp with habanero sauce and a Jalapeño Corn Bread. This plate was amazing! At the end of the day I told my wife, "Why would we go to any other Mexican place when we can come here for the ambience?" Most people take pics of the food. To me it's all about the atmosphere.   We just moved to The Pearl and have not been to another Mexican restaurant in Portland prior to The Matador. No need for us to look any further!  We'd like to thank Corah our server. We enjoyed her company, very friendly and knowledgable.
My family and I recently moved here as of July 15th. My leasing agent Deanna is absolutely the best hands down. My husband and I visited McNeil Ranch shortly before my lease was to expire at another apartment complex, and we were drawn to the small community feel that McNeil has and the fact that the schools are in Round Rock ISD. It's been almost a week living here and I have put in two minor work orders and they were handled the same day. Excellent service and communication. The parking issue is less than ideal I will have to say. Unless you are renting a tri level apartment you will have issues finding additional parking space when it comes to visitors. Overall this is a pretty decent apartment complex and I hope that the same can be said when our lease is over next year.
The cold brew coffee is excellent, the staff are very friendly and helpful, parking is reasonably easy, it's not too loud or too quiet inside, the wifi is fast (8 mbps), and there're 3 wifi networks from which to choose (in case one bogs down).  What more could you want?  I'll tell you....longer hours...they close at 7pm, so this isn't a good spot to get some night time work done.  still 5 stars.
i love this store and that the women there are so nice to me.  they make it fun and positive  and  they don't pounce or force items on me. i just love that their unique clothing  improves my mood.  i most always leave with something because i can find what fits me and looks amazing on. it's one of the only boutiques or places in all of boston without nerdass clothing.  it's really the only place i can count on that's a sure thing.  in addition, i like going to coppa across he street for wine and snacks beforehand, and then i can go play and shop in flock. awesome, awesome daytime thing to do!!
This BHLDN branch is a beautiful little store with some really beautiful, well priced options. My only (minor) minor negative is that the fact that BHLDN is just a section of the Anthropologie store makes is a lot busier feeling and not as quiet. Also, make sure you bring your list of dresses you want to try! One of the dresses I wanted to try wasn't initially pulled and that's the one I ended up getting for my rehearsal dinner!  Aside from these tiny drawbacks, Whitney was really awesome to work with! Quick, helpful, positive, and responsive, Whitney pulled the missing dress as soon as I asked, listened to the pros and cons from me (and the group) and helped narrow down dresses. She was even so kind to put me back in the favorite dress to snap photos after I forgot to ask before I got dresses. To top it off, she followed up with an email checking to see if I'd made a decision and when I resurfaced months later to order the rehearsal dress, she immediately responded and helped me wrap things up.   BHLDN is definitely worth the trip if you love their aesthetic and/or price point and I definitely recommend requesting Whitney if she's available!
Great pizza. Not a ton of seating so hope you don't show up on a busy night. We had the chicken broccoli Alfredo pizza it came out fast and was very flavorful.
Such a cozy restaurant! Love the food. The owner is always there at dinner time since they opened 8 years ago. So you can expect nothing but amazing service. Interesting celebrities go there because the food and the quiet and cozy atmosphere. I love the sushi rolls. Really good qualities with good price. Will go more often from now on!
This is my favorite place in Cambridge.   It's so much more than a cemetary - it's also a botanical garden and a lovely, peaceful place to stroll.  there's so much history and the variety of trees and plants is amazing.  Definitely worth a visit if you're in town, especially during spring or summer.
Just tried this place for the first time and loved it! Had the Kashmiri roll which was fantastic. My friends ordered food which all looked good too. When you ask them to make it spicy, they actually do which I appreciated. Everything on the menu looked really good so I have no idea how i'll decide what to get next!
Came here at 6pm on a Saturday. Totally missed that buffet was lunch only. Despite this, I sat down anyway and ordered the lamb curry.   The food was solid, a nice flavorful curry with a bit of spice. Lamb was slowly cooked and melt in the mouth.   Staff brought the food over, but didn't interact with me else wise. That's okay. I had a nice audio book going on.   One weird thing was the use of the yelp free drink promo. They didn't seem to recognize it. I got the free drink anyway so no issues there. Also, I wish I was able to see my receipt. Just good practice I think to itemize what your customer is paying for.   Ultimately, food was good. Since it's so close, I'd consider coming back.
This Hotel is amazing. I came for a work conference. The rooms are everything you want and and very clean. The pool is wonderful perfect for the family. One of the coolest parts was the mirror in the bathroom has its own tv in the center the food is a little on the higher side for cost. However 5 minutes away there are a wide variety of places to eat. Would highly recommend.
Fantastic selection, beautifully presented, interesting exhibitions.  This is one of the finest poster galleries in the world.  The proprietor, Jim, is supremely knowledgeable, and knows his enormous inventory cover to cover.  The posters are extremely well curated, and very fairly priced.  They have never steered me wrong as I build my collection.
My wife bought me a DJI Phantom 3 from Drones Plus, and I am having a blast with this! The people working at the store were very helpful with the initial purchase, and walked my wife through all the features of the different models - which was incredibly helpful since we were completely clueless about drones! Their after-sales help is also great - they walked me through how to use the Phantom, showed me how to use the DJI app, and even helped me to upgrade the firmware, even though the store was very busy! If you want to buy a drone, this is the place to go!
A few friends and I visited this restuarant the last time I was in Austin. I arrived a little early, so I sat at the bar and waited for my friends.  Since I was in  a Cuban restuarant, I ordered rum.  They had a small but diverse rum selection including some very good rums.  I ordered one just as my friends started to arrive.  The bartender was very friendly and attentive. As my friends arrived, we were seated at a table.  The waiter gave us menus and took our drink orders.  One of our group had not been in a Cuban restuarant before and had some questions which the waiter answered.  The waiter returned with our drinks and took our dinner orders answering any and all questions.  The food was very good to excellent.   One of my friends and I had the paella for two and we both enjoyed it. In all, our visit was a very good experience.  I hope to visit again the next time I am in Austin not just for the paella, but there another rum I would like to try.
Brigham's is a great classic New England ice cream joint which hasn't changed much since my youth. My delicious sundae was simple and tasty, and the decor is just right for those of us that remember the 1960s.  Sure, Ben and Jerry's is delicious and more modern. But Brigham's remains a special place where my great grandparents would go. And so will I.
On the positive side... I found the front desk staff lovely.  Lucy did the services for me and was excellent. I began the toning machine and found it a bit uncomfortable. I was also not informed about its effects and it's kinda intense. Then I had a full body exfoliation. Followed by the fondue wrap..  I was surprised to have to rinse the mud off in a tub without a washcloth or brush. I think more verbal instruction information prior to the services is required.  I did feel more detoxed and tightened after the services.
Recently became a vegetarian and looked around for some places to eat. Came across the restaurant and decided to give it a try. When I walked in I was sat promptly. Once the gentleman came to the table he had water with a pitcher in hand for the table. He asked if it was my first time, I told him yes. He explained for lunch the only do the thali plate and explained to me what it would be. I agreed to the thali. The food came out within a few minutes, very fast. Once he sat the plate down he explained to me every thing on the plate once again. He even gave me suggestions on how to eat the thali. Service was very fast and friendly. I will be returning back!!
I love going to spas. Who doesn't?   That being said, I have been to some bad spas and some dirty spas.   The Spa at Coldwater creek was neither of those.   First of all, its relaxing the moment you walk in. The receptionist is calm and collected, and is nice. I was given some water and a seat while my information was taken. Then I went into the locker room where I changed into a nice and plush robe and plush slippers before being whisked away to the relaxation room for a foot soak and some more water. This room was very relaxing and prepared me for the massage. The masseuse came in and we talked about what I wanted done before going into the room and receiving a wonderful massage. An hour later I was putty. After being given more water and another 15 minutes or so in the relaxation room I left to go home.   At no point did I feel rushed or pressured.  This is what a spa should be.  I will be back for sure!
Obsessed with this place!! The Pamloma margarita was amazing and I am not a big tequila drinker but it was so good!! Hider served us and he was as nice as can be. We came with a group of 45, sat outside, and had the best time!!
One of my favorite brunch spots in Portland, located on Alberta. Be ready to wait if you are going on the weekend, but you shouldn't have any trouble getting in on a weekday. The place is dog friendly too, and even has items on the menu you can order for your pets which is kind of cool.  The bloody mary's here are some of my favorite in PDX, I usually order the cajun bloody mary which is super good. As far as food, The Cure is my go too if I'm feeling especially self deprecating after a night of bad decisions. It has buttermilk biscuits topped with bacon and either smoked bacon or rosemary gravy. I'm not vegetarian or anything but the rosemary gravy is actually better than the meat gravy in my opinion.
I LOVE this place. The owner is the sweetest gentleman, and makes sure everything you order is exactly how you ordered it. My coffee was fantastic. The whole experience was made that much better just by seeing the owner's smile light up the room. Would HIGHLY recommend
Our First Choice at 7pm on Friday was Kalamata not seating till 8pm. Stop Two Martini's line was out the door. So we Walked West on Broadway till we came to Cactus Club.   The Hostess said it would be 20 min's but we were seated in 10. We succumbed to the Martini special although tasty I prefer their Cesar's instead.  We both had the Salmon Bowl with Veggies and Brown Rice. Its a tasty & light meal if you have the sauces on the side.   The Restaurant was packed but the service & meal were good. I had orded the Salmon Bowl once prior its was better prepaired last time. Ended the meal with a Peanut butter Chocolate bar dessert that was dense a maybe a little frozen but still mighty tasty. Overall this Chain Resturant was able to have us seated and served us a meal in a timely manner when other restaurants in this area were over capacity.
Another great stay, the ducks are gone,but the property is still great the pools are awesome,  the staff is over the top friendly.  A few things I would like to see change and would make them better.  1. make your food and drink prices realistic $17.00 for a burger that would be $6 at five guys or red robin.  People would stay on property and eat there $6.38 for a beer ridiculous   charge $7 for a burger and maybe $2.50 for a beer sales would go up 800% and profits would soar 2.  The $27 a day for Valet parking and the cluster when parking is very chaotic and pisses people off.  get a system that works and this should be included in the resort fee $23 a day so take that $60 a day in fees and give people something for it food credit in the restaurant drink credit for use at the bar, Something !!!   3. stream line check in. never should it take 30 min to give someone your money, a lot of room to improve here maybe even have self check in kiosk set up for people that are tech say enough to type in and swipe a credit card.  I think with a few common sense changes this properties revenue could go thru the roof.
I have frequented this place for over 20 years, and there have been many changes in management and food quality.  The current operators have hit a high mark.  My havorites are the soups and Thai salads.  The chefs take on hot and sour is more hot than sour, but bursting with the freshness of the ingredents.  Likewise with the squid and green papaya salads.  I requested my papaya salad Laos style and it was just as expected, with good chili heat and savory saucing.  The sushi offerings, fhough limited, tasted much better than nearby restaurants at Camp Creek Marketplace.  Must check it out if visiting the area or you work or live nearby.
Great place for the price! Great for large groups and great for one-on-one sushi too. Cheap place but not cheap atmosphere or food. A+ highly recommend!
Pikes is my top day to day place for getting plants and just general plant-lusting. I love this Pikes. I like all of them, but this one is just the one that makes me happiest. (Being fairly close to me doesn't hurt of course.) Nice layout, excellent stuff, and some very knowledgeable staff - especially the flower gal (Catherine?) with the salt and pepper hair. She's been able to point me to all sorts of specific plants I've asked about, and also been very good about quickly knowing when Pikes just doesn't carry something (like Carolina sweet shrub.) I rarely go to Lowes or HD for actual plants - they have a lot, but a very limited, big box selection. Pikes has a much great range of stuff, and they try to buy from responsible growers. I've always been confident I'm getting healthy plants, grown by producers that do their best to limit their use of heavy chemicals.   Its a small  perk, but the coffee machine really is nice too. I always stop for a little - makes me happy, and I have no doubt it helps the owners' bottom line since it keeps me coming back.
Beautiful park that's full of trails to walk or run. You can definitely spend an entire day here so pack a small lunch and some water. There are even logs for you to climb across.
I love Uchi and Uchiko ( I mean how could you not). But here is a tip to those that are worried about the cost: check out Sake Social Hour! It is a great way to try a variety of menu items on a budget. Sake Social is daily from 5 to 6:30. There are $6 and $3 food options and sake for $3.
OK people, close the door behind you when you go in and out!! I know, it's not your fault that the door doesn't auto close; but hey, it's family run business putting food on your table. They have 5 space heaters going on in the petite dining area which stirred me into trying to find a central heating system. I saw no vents nor baseboards. Is that even legal!? You can rent out a space with no heat?  Anyways, this joint has become my go to for Thai food in Quincy. I love their spring rolls cuz it comes hot burning hot and not greasy at all! A-OK on the Pad Thai, good texture and good tasting sauce. If it was a tad less sweet, it would've been perfect. I love their curry cuz it freakingly tastes like curry!  As for the service, the jack of all trades did a fine job for considering everything she was handling. Phone, pack take out, service dining room and took care of take out customers. She was basically doing everything except the cooking and delivery! Takeout/Delivery orders were super busy. With all that going on, she was able to clear our table between courses and gave us clean dishes for dinner. On top of that, she came by to check if dinner was OK!  P.S. Gov Deval Patrick is a regular here.
Wonderful little nook of a restaurant...the ambiance of the cozy 12 table room was not lost on my solo dining experience.   Small but good wine list. They were also willing to splice the appetizers together so I could try the squash blossoms with marscopone and the bruschetta. Delectable! The bruschetta had this amazing cooked spinach and a large melty piece of fresh mozzarella on top. I'm never a veal girl but completely went out on a limb with their homemade veal ravioli with brown butter sauce with pancetta and sage. Truthfully, I think all I heard was brown butter cream sauce and completely forgot about the veal. It was lightly creamy and not overly decadent in richness...and oh how I wanted to lick my plate.   I would have given it a 5 but the desert recommendation I went with, nutella breadpudding, was cold, thick and well cold. Thankfully they had espresso to suppress my disappointment and the 24 hour pastry shop is across the street!
Fish and Chips.  I love fish and chips. There are a number of establishments that feature this item, and many are quite good. None, however are in the same league as the fish and chips at The Pub. The portion size was huge - easily enough to share - (although I didn't) the fish had a wonder flavor that was firm and hot. The batter coating was sensational. Golden, crispy and lightly seasoned. Great beer selection, great prices, The Pub is now first on my list.
My husband and I had a great dinner here last night. We split the vegetarian and meat combinations so we could taste as much as possible in one meal. It was all delicious, particularly the beef and yellow lentils.   The highlight of the meal though was the drinks. I had Asmara tea, which tasted like Christmas, and he had banana juice, which is possibly the most delicious juice of all time.   Even though we were more than full after the meal, we split the Coppa pistachio for desert. No regrets, that was amazing too.   Service was also well-timed and the atmosphere was very pleasant. Both of the people working in the front of the house were very friendly and patient and informative. I'll definitely be back and highly recommend Asmara!
A great big shout out to Jose and his crew for being honest.  They call to say when they will be late, they will be respectful, and won't try to sell you a bill of goods.  Thank you for being a company I can trust.
All the hype about this place is TRUE!!!!  I won't belabor this review since all the other 500 plus 5 star reviews are right on.  I would rank this in the top 5 of my all-time favorite meals.  One tip, from 5 to 6:30 they have a lot of their items on their menu for either $3 or $6 which is unheard of for the quality of food that you get. My wife and I had 14 dishes with a glass of wine for $150 dollars.
One of my goto places for Ramen in Austin. The broth may not be filled with flavor but after adding some of their hot and soya sauce on the table, it does taste good. I love the Wonton Chicken Ramen which has nice dumplings in it.
Visiting Orlando we found this place on yelp. Had a craving for wings being from Buffalo I have to say they were very very good the mahi-mahi appetizer was excellent,  two-for-one drinks,  final word,  recommend this place great if you're in the mood for a good All-American meal.
This place was amazing! It was extremely busy but we got our food in less than 10 minutes and probably was the best burger and fries I've ever had...ordered more fries and they brought them out before I even sat back down. Also the best customer service I've experienced. Will come back every time I go to Portland!!
You've prolly heard, there is a duck parade here.. go check it out..  Great convention space.  There are 2 towers of for hotel rooms. Get into the new tower. Its nicer. There is bar with a patio , sorta overlooking the pool.. the patio is a good place to smoke a cigar..  I can;t remember a thing about the food..  I do remember having a cigar every night there for 5 nights and the service was attentive and professional..
Fantastic dinner! We had a great meal at Oba, and were taken care of by server Thaddeus. All the dishes we had were terrific. I tasted my in-law's meals, and hubby and I split a number of the tapas plates in order to try more things. I think my favorite items were the Columbian Chicken Empanada, the Arepas with Yucatan Pork, and the Puerto Rican Shrimp Fried Rice. The fried rice has a distinct coconut flavor, which I liked a lot. Not too many shimps in it though. Also really liked the coleslaw on the crab cake plate. My son had the Anticuchos, which is skewers of marinated flank steak. They were super-flavorful and he really liked them too. My sangria was fruity and refreshing, and not too strong. Overall, the food flavors and presentations are excellent, and portions are about right for the money. We left full but not stuffed, and even took home some leftovers.  The space is decorated beautifully, and our server was attentive and helpful, even though it was only his second day. My only complaint is that it's a very loud restaurant. On a busy Saturday night, it was packed and extremely loud and hard to hear at our own table.
I an from Portland and I was referred by a coworker. I was obviously nervous about getting eye surgery. The office is very easy to get to (right off of 205) and it is really asthetically pleasing and comfortable. Better yet the entire staff is so friendly and supportive. Dr Crews is very confident and makes you feel at ease from the moment you meet him. He has been doing this so long and his experience shows when he is examining your eyes and when he does the surgery. I was out in 15 minutes without a hiccup and could see 20/20 the next day. I hardly felt any discomfort and was so glad I had lasik done here, don't let nerves cause hesitation it is so simple and worth it! Thank you Dr Crews!
Modern restaurant over looking the creek/river/currently dried up body of water, there is an indoor and outdoor seating.   The portions are filling enough, and the ingredients are very fresh. I ordered the Capellini with arugula and tomatoes, added chicken. I do want to note that it comes with a very scrumptious toast, soft and toasty. It was definitely a great touch to the white wine and butter sauce.   The prices are better than average for a downtown restaurant.   The only concern I had were the gnats and small flys that swarmed our table when the food came. It was not great for entertaining guests. However, if you focus really hard on the person sitting opposite of you, you can almost pretend they're not invading your space like the Californians are invading Austin. Just kidding, I love Californians. :)
How does one review a bridge?  It is beautiful, it has excellent pedestrian and bicycle access.  It allows our wonderful light rail to cross the Willamette, it's less scary to drive across than the Sellwood.  It's unique in the world as a double layered drawbridge, with the lower pedestrian and train bridge able to lift independent of the upper roadway.  I suppose that is what makes the Steel Bridge one of the greatest bridges in Portland.  But I don't think I can put into words what makes it the best.  People will argue for the St. John's Bridge, and I might flirt with the Fremont now and again... but for me, the beauty of our Steel Bridge is always there, waiting for me to pay it another visit.
Came here with my boyfriend to visit our friend who works in the kitchen. The service was mediocre at best, we were greeted when we came in, but not sat for over 3 minutes after being greeted even though it was slow. We sat at the ramen bar so we could chat with our friend, and I was impressed at how great the kitchen looked! Everything was clean and polished.  My boyfriend ordered and I quote "a Sapporo and a hot sale so that I can do sake bombs," 10 minutes later we were approached by (who I'm assuming was) the manager to let us know that they don't serve sake bombs but that he's welcome to order the beer and sake separately. I tried to withhold my giggle as the server then proceeded to tell us sheepishly she didn't know what sake bombs were. Ok, totally forgivable. 3 minutes later my cold sake was brought out... in a beer pitcher filled with ice water because the bartender had "just restocked and the sake wasn't chilled yet." It's okay, I'll take it.  Almost 10 minutes after ordering the appetizer they let us know they were out of the Jinya Dynamite so we got the Tempura Brussels, which were phenomenal! We also got the Bun that was on happy hour and it was absolutely perfect amount of fat on the pork. Probably my favorite thing there.  My boyfriend got the Sprouting Up Ramen and I got the Tonkotsu Black. Both dishes were phenomenal , as we added egg and more meat to both.  Absolutely no complaints on food, but the service needs improvement.
Where do I start?  This is not a place to get a meal, it is place to get a culinary experience. Starting with the service which was excellent! My wife and I felt welcomed from the moment we walked in. Great suggestions by our serve for not only food but also cocktails (awesome) and Sake (super-awesome).  The food was just incredible. Long gone is my statement that "once you go to one sushi place you have gone to all of them." The chef here is quite imaginative with their dishes and if is any indication of this place, there was no soy sauce on the tables and it was never needed.  We had a couple of Nigiris and couple of rolls as our more "normal dishes" and in all my years eating sushi I have never tasted better rice! It was not "vinagry" it was just awesome!  To finish the meal, we had two desserts (one complimentary by the way) and both were out of this world! I have no expectations to find a marginally good dessert at a Japanese restaurant and Uchiko blew our minds and taste buds with their desserts. Who would have known that a cilantro sorbet will pair with anything remotely called a dessert?   This was our first time in Austin and I have to say Uchiko alone is the best reason to come back.
I first tried this while attending a Braves game at the Turner Field last year. During my Atlanta trip this year, I made sure to put it back on the list. This location is within the Food Hall, among some of the other classic food options at PCM. At $12 for the double cheeseburger, it is a bit pricy. But the burger is really well made, the service is wonderful, and the speed is fast. I would recommend this place if you happen to be in PCM and have some serious burger craving.  I got the burger to go to meet up with the rest of my group but there is seating area available at the restaurant.
Skidmore Bluffs is the perfect place to sit, chat and daydrink with a bud. Like, *the perfect place. I wanna say this is Portland's Dolores Park, but on a sunny Saturday afternoon in July there were less than a dozen people there. How completely perfect.  It's kind of unkept (which I like!) and features a view of industry (the train tracks!) and also of downtown and Forest Hill park.   Just remember, there is nowhere to pee. Not only that, there is nowhere to pee discreetly. Give yourself & your bladder time to make it to your car and then a toilet.
Been do'in Richi's for years.  Best cart on the west coast.  Fresh, delicious, well prepared food.  The cabeza anything rocks.  And reasonable.
A warm and friendly staff who were very attentive. Explained question about the menu clearly and accurately. Large portions (huge dumplings) that were flavorful and hot (not just in temperature). The menu is fairly standard in its Chinese fare, but there are some interesting surprises such as Szechuan Spicy Noodle with Pork.   I'm not kidding when I say the portions are HUGE in both the appetizers and entrees. The waiter recommended ordering a combination platter for a smaller portion with a choice of rice. The standard entrees don't come with complementary rice. Despite this, one would probably want to avoid the additional carbs as a side dish to the heaping amount of sodium that comes with every order.   Overall, a great restaurant in terms of food and service. A gem in an otherwise depressing strip mall.
I used to go to the Butterfly Bar more often. I went back last night for a meetup, and remembered how much I love this place!  Excellent patio, great bathrooms, cheap beers, nice bartenders. I really can't ask for more than that from a bar...but let's go back to the bathrooms. They have curtains instead of doors and it makes me feel like I'm peeing in a swanky lounge. Seriously. I love their bathrooms.   And let's also go back to the patio. It's one of the best patios in Austin. The bar itself is tucked back away from the street, so the patio is like being in a friend's backyard...except the friend would have to own an enormous patio and decorate it with lights.  If I lived in the area, I'd be here often.
I am here for a short term assignment. A nice spacious, comfortable apartment in a very central location. I am very happy here. Management and staff seem very nice. The one bad thing is the terrible comcast WiFi. It makes skyping home a difficult experience
Surprise happiness. Funky and interesting neighborhood. Plenty of street parking. Good vibe inside. Very tasty coffee drinks and friendly, warm, accommodating staffers. The food looks great, though I didn't try it yet. I'll be back!
I had pretty much ruled out Chinese food because it's always so disappointing. I went to Lucky Bistro last night with my family and we were all blown away, might be the best Chinese food I have EVER had. We will definitely be going back.
This place is just amazing! We came around noontime and they said they were sold out. The owner was kind enough to get more ingredients to make five pho bowls just for us!! We had chicken pho and the noodle and broth was delicious and very fresh!
This is my once a week go to. Love this place! My friend ordered level 20 today, and her nose is still running. When they say Ultra Spicy, they mean Ultra Spicy!
Good hearty menu, good variety, big ass martinis, nice servers, good sweet potato fries, baked potato salad yum, good Reuben, awesome chicken pot pie, amazingly delicious grouper sandwich.
Competent and friendly techs who really know their stuff, and they put you at ease as much as possible. Its quiet and I liked it much, much better than another center I went to.
Great food and good experience. Worthy of trying more times and first time for everyone! Beautiful plated flood and tasted great!
I miss this ride from California Disneyland when they replaced it with Rocket Rods and unfortunately with Rocket Rods the ride shut down due to the high maintenance.  The people mover is a little different than the one from California. One thing is great is the lines are always so short and the ride is relaxing. This is one of the first rides we went on which was nice.  You get a tour of tomorrow land and get to see a preview of each of the rides which is nice.
Best Super Market in the city!  It's big, clean, and has super friendly employees.  Whether you want standard groceries, fresh food made to order, or beer & wine this place is for you!    Unlike many grocery stores in the city that are cramped and crowded, this Whole Foods is spacious and well staffed.  Even when it's crowded on Sundays there are plenty of registers open and friendly people ready to guide you to find your product.   Here are a few tips for you:  - Make sure to stop by the cheese station because there are always tons of free samples!  - Juice bar near the produce section is a must try  - Meat and fish are fresh.,.. look for what's on sale!  - It can be PRICEY... but that goes for any Boston grocery store  - Tables and lounge area in the front where you can eat or get work done  - Bathrooms are clean and right at the front so you can stop in even if you aren't shopping!  - To avoid crowds don't go Sunday NIGHT... (especially if you have a car... the parking lot turns into a war zone!)
Dj was great. I think he was trying to charge for requests but he gave in. I liked my experience though. I give it a chance a 4/5
We really enjoyed our stay. It was very conveniently located off 35, and was only a $15 Uber drive to the bars downtown.  Knowing it was South Austin, we were a little nervous but we felt very safe. Will definitely come back!
Checked out Snooze this morning for some brunch with the wife having no idea what it was about. After waiting a modest 20 min we were sat and the fun began. Our server, Gloria, gave us the best service I've experienced in some time. By far made the visit over the top. The food was amazing as well. Will definitely be going back!
Interestingly cool dressing for the Greek salad. I got the chicken kabob sandwich since it's not often that you see one. Thumbs up for that, but then again every time I get something besides a gyro at a Mediterranean place I always end up wishing I got a gyro. Chicken kabab sandwich was good, just too dry for my taste. The wrap itself is pretty dry; the sauce helps but the feta crumbles from the salad is what I really loved adding.    On one hand I don't really mind if a place has plasticware instead of silverware, but in this case it was hard to get at the Greek potatoes. Which were 1) not really traditionally done but 2) crispy and delicious.   All in all good food at an inexpensive price. Can't complain. Will be back for lunch soon.
Great little hole in the wall. Not well known except maybe for the locals. Great prices, service and large portions. Roast lamb is my favourite here.
Best sliced brisket you'll ever eat!! Order the sliced brisket sandwich and you will not be disappointed!
Took my 2007 Mazda 6 here for routine maintenance. I was impressed by competitive pricing, extraordinary customer service, & time taken to complete the work. There were honest about what did and didn't need done to my vehicle so that I didn't end up paying for unnecessary services or repairs. They provided a very nice loaner vehicle from their lot when I ended up having to leave my own. Jim Parrot was my service tech. He went above & beyond to answer all my questions & address every concern. I will definitely return here for service/repairs. Highly recommend!
So, here I am at this really great pizza place, and I order a burger. Me the pizzaholic. Go figure. But I needed a burger really badly. I ask the waiter if the burgers are any good, and he does not hesitate. "absolutely". Will you cook it medium rare? "sure will". Burger it is, then. The rest is history. That was one perfectly cooked, amazing burger. The only problem is that I love Uno's pizza. Deciding what to have next time I come here will not be easy.
They have a great butcher with excellent cuts of meat, a decent seafood section, and a bread slicer they'll use if you ask them to slice the Iggy's bread in the bakery department.   It doesn't have everything I need, but those three bonuses above make me like this better than the huge Stop & Shop I used when living in Brookline Village. Not a fan of the customer service desk, but the employees on the floor are very nice & helpful.
I found this restaurant on Yelp. It was a beautiful night and we sat on the patio and enjoyed the view of Lake Dora. We could hear a bagpiper playing on the dock.  I had pork loin over lobster Mashed potatoes which was awesome. My husband ordered sea food paella which he really enjoyed. For dessert we shared the Key Lime cake which we got free for "checking in".It was a great meal and we would come back.
Third time I have been to TEN - the service has been great and attentive. The food is straightforward and satisfying. So far everything i have ordered as been good. Had a great lunch on the patio Saturday, and our server, Adam, was phenomenal. The pasta special was great, and I would order it again. The indoor space is challenging, given the configuration, but I think that it is workable and the servers help make dining there a pleasant experience.
A restaurant, dedicated to grilled cheese.  Nothing about this sounds bad to me!  The WIN however is the fact that they have an AMAZING Tomato Basil soup that is ALWAYS on the menu. YUM.  I tried it on Saturday with a friend who was in town, and we loved it.  Hidden surprise was their milkshakes.  Liked it so much my boss and I went back on Tuesday cause she'd heard about it, and I was more than willing to chauffeur!
What can I say? My fiancée and I stopped here for breakfast on our way out of Portland on Monday 4/8/13 at around 9:00 AM, and it was EXACTLY what I wanted: Unpretentious, simple, relaxed, great tasting, hearty vegan food. I had the "Superhero" which was a tofu scramble with veggie sausage, tomato, and spinach. It was served with potatoes, and toast. I've had a lot of tofu in my day, and this tofu was really flavorful. The service was super friendly, and our coffee cups never ran dry. The interior is pretty small, and I can imagine it getting busy on a weekend morning, but Monday morning was no problem.  Another bonus: It's in a residential area, and there is ample free street parking.
The Sultani, Kashk-o-Bodenjoon, and flat bread at Persepolis compare to the best Persian restaurants in Glendale, CA - and if you know anything about Glendale, CA - you know the best Persian restaurants in America live there in abundance.   There are other Persian restaurants in Atlanta - but they all seem trendy and seem to serve smaller portions - so I have not tried them - and there has been no need because Persepolis has delivered for over a decade in my opinion.   The food and the portions remind me of a more traditional style and the flavors taste classic. The prices are on point for what you get - both in quality and quantity.   The other menu items are solid as family and friends have said so when we have gone out - but I personally am vouching for the Sultani, kashk, and bread. That would be my last meal and I would gladly take Persoplis'.
Have been coming here for years and love the food! It doesn't get any more authentic than this Cuban food. Great sangria, toasted Cuban bread, empanadas, chicken and rice...so delicious! Be careful if you order the chicken and rice, as it does have pieces of bone in it.
Awesome fries! Crispy, hot, salty, and delicious. Make sure to get at least a couple sauces--we got the cheddar, garlic, and mustard and couldn't decide which we liked best; they were all delicious!  The sandwich we tried (chicken satay pita) was fine but nothing to write home about. The fries are where it's at! Next time I want to try their beer floats... :)
One of the most fun aspects of this place is sitting at the low seat bar and watching the staff make the dishes, whilst of course conversing occasionally with the gents making the drinks.   The plates are artfully assembled and pack a punch of strong, uniquely combined tastes. My wife and I shared the Gulf Shrimp, Stuffed Pasta, and Ribeye. It was delightful to savor each individual flavor, but so much more to experience the explosion of them all together as they hit the tongue at their various times and textures.   The drink menu is not for those who like sweet (a good thing in my opinion). It's strong, tart, yet smooth; if you get sweet be sure it will be followed by bitter. Sipping beverages.   It was a delightful experience to take in the modern, trendy decor and music generating a cool, comfortable, not pretentious atmosphere along with the dishes and drinks assembled for adults who want beautiful blows of taste in the tongue.   For my wife and I, I believe this may be our new date spot!
Coming from the cafe country of the world (Australia) it has been hard to find decent coffee in the USA. After stumbling into Render one day, I now have renewed faith that American's can make good coffee.   I only drink espresso coffees and the way they prepare it is up there with the top barista's in the world.  - You see the barista clean the portafilter before every coffee - Espresso shot is pulled correctly  - They don't burn the milk - They don't let the espresso sit around too long - They pour the steamed milk over the espresso correctly  Admittedly they don't have the speed of the Australian baristas but they know what they are doing. Refreshing from the usual crap served at other cafes.
No too bad. Service was quick and courteous. The food is flavourful. Will come back to try other things.
Delicious!  Beautiful spot!  Service was great!  Food was better than delicious!  I think this may be a regular stop for me in my new neighborhood!
Great cafe. The staff that work here are so nice and each dish is prepared with love.
I fancy myself somewhat of a wing snob and had been told it would be worth overlooking the shabby interior to  try the baked wings at Jacks. They were actually pretty good. We tried several different flavors and I liked em all. Every night they have different drink and shot specials so you can get your drink on without depleting all the jingle in your pocket. The pizza is the same as when this place was Johny's so if you like Johny's pizza, have at it.
Damar, the store Manager, is wonderful to work with. He goes above and beyond to ensure your experience is great. He communicated with me very frequently during the rental process for my wedding and made the process accurate, smooth, and free of issues.
Dinesty opened about a week ago, ambiance is simply beautiful inside.  What's even better is their food was absolutely deeeelicious!  Price are very reasonable.  But the main reason is to come and eat this! http://www.yelp.com/biz_photos/dinesty-on-robson-vancouver?select=qGyEqXD6uhsMyFHAtRMHqg#-4c8pxdpqEwAPnRxwwxCRQ  You must come and eat here!
Loved everything about the experience - from the amazing decor including the genuine salt block 2 story pillars, the cocktails the food, and the very attentive staff.   The unlimited varieties of Moscow Mules that Russel whipped up for me kept me guessing what could be next and loving each one.   The fried beans are a must have and the steak tartar was one of the best I ever had.  Worth exploring even some of the more unique dishes in the menu including the pork stuffed squid.  Great for a fun night out with friends or a quiet date night.
The selection of smokes are good,prices fair, the service very good and the views of the women walking by can distract and interrupt your conversation.    A neighborhood of eclectic patrons "regulars" from that share the common interest of a fine cigars and discussions that involve the usual stuff ; sports, politics; and the sometimes question as to who has the best Pizza in town. Tourists who happen in are welcomed and frequently caught up in the banter.    The only hiccup is that because it's a cigar bar  every time you visit one clothing worn need to be Martinized?? Really the industry needs to invent a smoke eaters that works.
Oh Summermoon, how do I love thee?  Let me count the ways: 1. You always have exactly what I want and willingly go out of your way to modify my drink every time I ask.  2. Your location is wonderful and the inside of your cafe makes me feel like  I'm important and quiet enough that I can get whatever I came to work on done, no problem.  3. There are still just about the right amount of people who know about you that I don't have to share you with too many others. Shhh, you're my little secret. No, don't tell anybody else how incredible you are! 4. You have a phenomenal bean and creative secret ingredients that always keep me guessing.  5. You're just my style and I'll always rave about you to my friends, even if they do start visiting you all the time, I can't help myself. You deserve all the positive attention you get. :)
Wanted to try this place for over a year. Finally made the time to come to North Portland. I so wished I would have come sooner. We loved it!  My daughter loves the French toast and the virgin coconut mojito!
Friendly staff and good food.  If you are looking for a quick bite, this is a good option.
I've been here a half dozen times so far and have always had a good experience. The coffee was surprisingly really good (I think I was used to the previous tenants) the owner said they roast there own . The pastries/bagels/food are anything but an afterthought like you often find in coffee shops. They are well chosen, many gluten free options and delicious. It was only recently that i tried the juice- FANTASTIC! I had spinach, kale, parsley apple and lemon. I'm very excited to have a juice bar in the area. On my last visiti I witnessed an uncomfortable situation involving what looked to be a homeless man asking for lots of favors from the barista/owner (phone calls, etc). It was refreshing to see her treat him with not only dignity but also never ending patience. She was under no obligation to help him but she chose too, all the while keeping her professional boundaries. I can tell the owner really cares about her business. I'm happy to have Nectar in the neighborhood, great addiction.
Pizza was very good but a bit over cooked. Nachos not so much. Loud atmosphere geared to a younger crowd. Was very pleasant though after an evening in hot Fenway.
I'm so glad I stumbled upon this store before turning to Micheal's. Their collection of rubber stamps is amazing. You have a choice of  there different TYPES of ink pads, paint brushes for just about any type of art project, and paper galore.  You cant beat the customer service.  The best part is, I'm only 4 blocks away. ;-)
The store front sign caught my eye as I drove by, Heo Eatery and an image of a pig. Heo means "pig" in Vietnamese (pronounced like "hell" soft L). Always down for Vietnamese food, so I dropped by later in the afternoon to try it out. The interior is clean, modern, outlets and USB ports everywhere. I was warmly greeted at the counter and ordered tumeric fish over rice with an ice coffee.  Food came out in about 10-15 mins, nice presentation, unfortunately the only utensils available were these flimsy plastic knife, fork, and spoons. The rice was cooked with leek and garlic, that's a new one for me, I wasn't able to taste much of a difference compared to white rice. May have been from the overpowering flavor from the tumeric fish. Fish was good, roasted veggies were fantastic albeit a bit oily, and the pickled veggies were excellent. Vietnamese ice coffee was pre mixed, very strong, you might want to let dilute itself in ice.   Had the lemongrass beef banh mi on another day and it was disappointing. For an $8 sandwich it was pretty small. There wasn't enough pickled carrots and daikon to balance the meat out. Nothing remarkable about the lemongrass beef, the bread was standard and oven toasted, the sandwich came with a side of tater tots which was a bit strange.   Parking is limited in the front, you might have to back out into traffic, there's a lot in the back that might be the better choice. Clean unisex bathroom, plenty of tables, good Vietnamese food. Will I be back? Heo yeah
Lobby is appropriately named since it's essentially in the lobby of the new TWELVE Atlantic Station Hotel & Condo building.  Upon entering you pass by the circular bar with its wood fired pizza oven brightly lighting it from behind.  The dining room is cleanly lined, accented with simple candles and lazy susans (!) on the tables.    Our appetizer of a charcuterie plate came with the appropriate meats, cheeses, and olives, with some onion marmalade and zesty aioli with breadsticks.  I had a delicious entree of steamed bass with saffron vegetables.  The fish was tender and flaky with just the right amount of saffron atop a pile of steamed and saffron infused vegetables.  Entrees also make use of that nifty little lazy susan - vegetables of the day (4 in all) are places on geometrically inset plates for sharing among the table.  Ours included a chick pea and cinnamon mix, garlic mashed potatoes, creamed cauliflower, etc.   Our dessert of the marscarpone cheesecake was a bit nontraditional but absolutely delicious:  the warm, sweet cheesy mixture was piled next to a dollop of warm blueberry compote.  Yummy.    The only complaint I had about the experience was our server's lack of training.  He was chatty and well meaning, but couldn't answer much about the wine list or menu.  We went when Lobby was fairly new, though, so I think this will resolve itself.
It took me back to my days in living in China. It made me very happy.   The mala pot taste was spot on and the hot pot had plenty of meat and vegetables that brought all the more memories of living in China.   Since I came back from living in China, I have been dreaming about the mala tang, but now I have a place to go when I am craving the tongue numbing mala pepper.   Price was reasonable for the size of the pot. It really was a hot pot for two.   Start with mild and move up slowly if your tongue or stomach is not used to this kind of pepper spice.   There I was surrounded by all Chinese international students, I felt like I was in a local food court in China.
Food good...upper east side drink delicious nice atmosphere. ..uuumm but keep the music going during the band taking a break...
E. Boston - Good food & service. Just don't like the parking & waiting 20+ minutes when visiting.  Compared to the new Peabody one - think I like it.  Peabody has parking, clean, didnt wait & the food was amazing. The waitress was AWESOME!!!
It's super tasty!!! I loved the empanadas and lomito. But beware of the prices they charge for everything even a side olive oil. Coke was 4 dollars for a can, this place has theme park prices ridiculous.
This review is for jewelry repair only.  I was really impressed with Long's. They have a jeweler on staff so repairs and fittings are very quick - and surprisingly inexpensive! The first go-around to resize my ring didn't get the right fit. Long's happily took it in again and fixed it at no cost (without me asking).   My only qualm with this place is that it doesn't open until 9:30AM - which stinks with the work day. But, I guess, who really buys diamonds before breakfast??
I have to say we came here again tonite and so far the service stated out horrible yet again, but after I said something about our past experiences with service, our server Suzi was on it not only did she show us that they can change, she told her manager Apsen that we have been experiencing bad service out past few visits that they paid for our entire meal and Apsen came over to our table to apologize personally and said she prides herself on the service of red robin and she wants us to have a great experience and come back, her and Suzi were great! I appreciate it and we are frequent red robin customers, we will be back!
I went here last week for a team lunch.  I had the "Dazed and Confused" pizza just because I wanted to try something different.  It's not on their regular menu, but it came with goat cheese, pecans, red onions, roasted brussel sprouts, dates and some other stuff.    Dates and brussel sprouts on a pizza doesn't sound great, but it worked and was delicious.  I'll definitely be coming here again.
Great stuff! Like everyone's said, it looks like a sketchy, divey bar from the outside by inside it's a hip, clean Cantabrigian hotspot.  I've been here a few times for drinks and once for food, and I always leave pretty happy. The cocktail list is great, with tons of (changing) creative and delicious drinks usually priced betwen $7.50 and $8.50 -- pretty reasonable considering the quality of cocktail.  They do seem a bit slow with drinks - but I've only been here when it's been fairly busy and ordered drinks in the dining room, I'd assume you get faster service sitting at the bar.  The food is very tasty, somewhat upscale fare. I had the spicy clam stew and sampled some of a friend's gnocchi (prepared vegetarian by request with absolutely no drama) and both were quite good.  I will certainly make it a point to come back, sit at the bar, and sip cocktails while eating charcuterie plates and snacks with a friend or two. Mmmm..
Still some of the best Indian food we've ever had. We used to come here when we lived in Austin and every time we come back to visit we make sure to eat here. Still consistently some of the best Indian we've had across three continents and easily some of the best prices we've had as well. Wish we could take them with us!!!
I love the Vegan Nom! Their tacos and sauces are so flavorful and unique. We also tried the quesadilla and it was to die for. A really perfect vegan breakfast or lunch. I just wish they were closer to where we live in North Austin... or better yet, in a real brick and mortar store!
Pretty tasty burgers with good options and drinks, but the typically endless line is what kills hopdoddys for me. I don't think it is worth the wait, but still good food. If you are a local check it out when it's not busy.
Tri Tip sandwiches are the specialty and they DO NOT DISSAPOINT. Huge amount of steak with onions on a fresh hard roll. Small updated bar area with good happy hour and specials during Blazers games and weekends.
I've come here quite a few times for their Sunday jazz brunch. It's affordable, big (so plenty of seating), laid-back ambiance and the food is pretty good and service is fast. Brunch is my allll-time favourite meal and I wouldn't necessarily call it the 'best brunch food ever' but it's standard in terms of what you can order and I go more for the ambiance. I usually get an eggs benedict or omelette and am always happy and full with my food. Also, the oatmeal that comes with most of the meals is really good. Last trip, my friend had the fried catfish and eggs which was decent.  Finding a place for Sunday brunch that doesn't require an annoying wait in the Boston/Cambridge/Somerville area can be hard, but I've never had a headache here because it's so spacious. It'd be great if they had outdoor seating now that it's summer!
We love EVERYTHING about the YMCA of Boulder Valley! Classes are excellent. Facilities are clean and well outfitted. Staff is friendly and always personable. My kid LOVES child watch. The pool is fantastic in the summer. The yoga room & instruction is outstanding. I especially like that they reach out to the community offering programs that help people through every phase and stage in life. We will be members here forever.
Oh, man! I got to try Voodoo Doughnut for the first time, and it blew my mind! From hearing Tool as soon as I walked through the door to watching a procession of beautiful, quirky snacks spinning behind glass, all the way to my first bite into the raspberry cream filled Voodoo Doll, I was and am in love. Definitely going back soon!
Cafe Josie is one of my favorite restaurants in town.  I've been going there for years and the food is always amazing.  The olive oil, garlicy goodness on the butter with great warm bread is amazing.  The Pepita Redfish which is always on the menu Rocks!  I order it lots.  The soup changes every day and Chef Mayes never makes the same one twice.  They are always awesome.  The tenderloin is amazing and I've never had a fish special I didn't love.  I do love spice and many dishes come with some heat, so ask if you aren't heat friendly.  I have always had wonderful, perfect service.  After taking a cooking class with Chef Mayes a few years back, my waitperson told him that a customer had attended his class.  I was entertaining guests from out of town and Chef Mayes came out with gratis desserts for us all.  Mad points for that!  There is additional parking in back.  update:  Cafe Josie hosts a monthly Wine me Dine me dinner , usually 5 or 6 courses paired with wine.  They are very reasonably priced and always outstanding and fun.
Like most things in this world, auto mechanics are not binary and easily lumped into GOOD and BAD, but rather somewhere in between.  Fixing a car is science but running an auto mechanic shop is an art and Paul is very good at bridging the gap between the two.  I have been bringing my 528 to Paul now for nearly two years and while we have had a few minor hiccups (replaced the wrong pair of tires ahead of schedule, windshield washers disconnected), my car runs wonderfully well for having over 110K miles and I have no doubt that it will go another 50K more given Paul's services.    Are they cheap?  No, but neither is any BMW maintenance.  Are they skilled?  Sure, I have yet to find a mistake in their work and been very happy with it.  Are they timely and considerate of my time?  Absolutely.  As long as I communicate when I need my car back and listen to what they estimate, and we followup later, I have not been disappointed.  Are they trustworthy?  Paul and his team have done nothing to betray my trust and everything to earn it.    There may be less expensive options, but Paul's is close to my office, he and his staff have been extremely helpful and nice to me, they have gone out of their way to help me numerous times, and I trust them with my car completely.  If you want the dealership or chain repair shop experience, go there because Paul's is different.
5 star review for a...Subway?  Yup, it's not a mistake.  This is THE best Subway I have ever been to.    During the weekday lunch rush, this place has 6 or 7 people lined up to make your sandwich and get you in and out of there FAST!  You can have a line to the door and still walk away with your food in 5 minutes.    They have online ordering and do deliveries as well. The customer service here is definitely top notch and better than what I've seen in some restaurants.    Unlike Jennifer L., I never saw any smoked salmon or mini-pizzas, but I'm going to have to ask about that next time I'm there.  However, I did see free cookie samples for people waiting in line.  Other Subways in the area need to learn from this place.
I live in Rhode Island and went down for Halloween in salem and this place was absolutely amazing I had a great server the margaritas were excellent and the food was even better. Since coming back home to RI I have been craving the Pastor chimichanga I may go back to Salem just for the howling wolf
I love the fact that this store is close to home so I don't have to drive to Washington Square.   The store is clean and well organized. During sales the sizes are always clearly marked which makes it easier to find what I am looking for. However, we all know that when people are rummaging through items, they sometimes place them in the wrong place so we cannot blame that on the sales associates.  The sales associates are always friendly and helpful, and even when the store is busy, they do their best to ring everyone up as quickly as possible.
Vij's Restaurant is an excellent Indian restaurant in Vancouver with exceptional service and exceptional food for an exceptional time!  I came here with a group of six on a weekday evening about 20 minutes before it opened. There was already a long line going down the sidewalk and if we had arrived any later, we may had to have waited to get a table. When the restaurant doors opened, Vikram Vij himself, the owner of the restaurant, greeted everyone individually as they walked in. He also would stop by our table a couple times throughout the meal to ask us what we thought of the food.  My favorite part of the meal occurred even before my table ordered any food. The servers stop by the table with a tray of goodies where one could just grab a piece to eat in a single bite. Each one is flavorful in spices in its own unique way and they really do end up whetting the appetite. One of these things they bring to the table is their chai tea which was particularly excellent.  For our entrees, we ordered a bunch of dishes which included samosas, eggplant curry, mutton kebab, and much more. What I loved about each of their curry dishes is that the sauces are different for each one and are quite distinct from one another. Three of the more memorable dishes for me are their lamb popsicles, portobello mushroom curry, and spicy goat curry. The lamb is super tender and has it's signature gamey taste laid atop a pool of yellow curry which was my favorite sauce amongst all the dishes. The portobello mushroom curry includes a thicker and creamier curry sauce with meaty and hearty mushrooms that were cooked perfectly. The spicy goat curry was great in that.. well... unlike the other sauces, this one had a nice spicy kick to it. I felt that this dish paired well with the mango lassi which is thick and refreshing.
By now it's no secret to the Ole Latte staff and owner that we really love their coffee. Last summer they served me a seasonally available blueberry iced coffee that was so fresh and lovely I am still craving it. The coffee itself is buttery, with notes of chocolate and fruit. I have a small restaurant. When we inquired with a few roasters around town about serving their coffee we weren't taken seriously and even blown off / snubbed. Todd, despite or in addition to having some of the most delicious coffee in town never underestimated us. Now that the restaurant is gaining some notoriety, I can TRULY say, thank you Ole Latte for believing in us and making us part of the family. We are huge fans. 5 stars. I would recommend them to anyone seeking a small batch roaster who includes true hospitality in every single bag or cup.
I was pleasantly surprised. I ordered the prime rib which was excellent and my husband enjoyed the signature plate chicken and ribs. The server was very attentive.
With the economy being about as fabulous as a root canal right now, I've been on the lookout lately to cut spending. Being that I usually spend around $75 or so on a haircut, I figured this was an area where I can try to cut costs.  I contemplated going to a SuperCuts or HairCuttery, but thanks to fellow Yelpers' horrid reviews, I opted against it. I eventually stumbled upon the glowing reviews for Coco Head Hair Studio in Chinatown. Being that I work a mere few minutes walk away from Chinatown, it was worth a try.  Ernie was my stylist. He took a look at my hair (which I hadn't cut in about 5 months--I have a bad habit of doing that), asked questions, communicated his thoughts and vision for what to do and why, and always checked with me first before proceeding with anything. He was very meticulous with his work, and my haircut turned out great!  My hair somehow even looks healthier because of it. I can already tell that it's one of those haircuts that will continue to look great even as it grows out. Definitely worth the $38!
Normally I'd not post a review of my car dealership, but I saw the incredibly negative review and felt the need to write my own given the largely excellent experience I had last Friday when my car died, required towing.  Of course my car died ~10,000 miles after the (excellent) 72,000 mile warranty ended.  Having no clue what was wrong with it (sorry ladies, I'm not a car guy) and stranded at home I was dependent on Hyundai for updates, information, and fair treatment.  I got all of the above.  With the dealer opening at 7:00am, Charlie called me at 8:00 to let me know they were busy but they'd get it in - he also informed me of a significant recall that they'd look into while the car was there (I apparently missed the memo, though I admit I've moved 3x since getting the car.)    Calling me back no less than 3 times during 8/13/10 with updates Charlie was great - the issue ended up being related to the battery and some wiring (yeah, again, not a car guy) and he noted it'd all be fixed by Saturday morning - and it was.  He also noted that the recall did indeed apply to my car and they'd need it back for 36+ hours during a weekday at some point soon.    While my review relates to the service department alone, I've loved my Tiburon since the day I got it and aside from one set of tires I'd never had to pay for a repair up until last Friday - I'd gladly buy from them again.
Got the meatball and "eat your veggies." Loved both, but especially the meatball one!
Went there last night around 6:30. Greeted at the door and were sat promptly. Took the recommendation of our server and ordered the margarita. Our drinks, food (meatloaf w/ mashed + collard greens w/bacon bits) were delivered promptly. Service was excellent, not overbearing, not gone and never to return, just right place at the right time. This first timer was very happy with the overall experience.  Will go there again !
Great food. The pizza is phenomenal. Delivery is very fast. They are also inexpensive. Definitely will order from here a lot more!! So glad I saw the advertisement on their delivery van one day and decided to order from them.
I'm speech less about this place! So good! just be ready to wait for a table or I should write be ready to sit at the community table with other people but I'm telling you its worth it!!! The food is excellent! every dish than they brought was better and better! The staff very friendly and charming! Love this place! I can't wait to go back!
We just ate an amazing meal at this restaurant. It's menu is sort of similar to Rumi's kitchen and Zaffron, but the taste and flavors are different. The service was excellent, and we will definitely be back! PS. I just read the other reviews, and yes, the parking attendant was super nice as well!
The kid's menu pizza is a great value and you can't argue with a playground to keep them entertained. The best part of the meal was our service. Rylee greeted us with a smile, seated us immediately and then proceeded to provide excellent service.  Thank you Rylee!
This restaurant is in a great little spot and they have excellent food! I got the shrimp teriyaki for lunch and it was heavenly! The teriyaki had the perfect spice to it and the prices were spot on as well. I can't wait I go back with my husband!
How can you complain when Allie and manager Nicole are watching the kitchen and jumping right in when the backed-up cook staff got slammed and our meal got delayed? Awesome customer service! Five stars for making two hungry guys happy.  Edit: Forgot to mention: Pork Two Ways--crispy pork belly and juicy pork tenderloin, cooked just the way I like it. Fresh veggies layered on hot jasmine rice with a savory dressing. Fantastic. First time trying Peanut Butter Thing--lived up to its billing.
I have found my favorite Chinese!!!  All of their food is so flavorful with fresh vegetables and delicious rice!! Dining in or carry out are great experiences!  I usually order chicken and broccoli ( boring, I know) but im always soooo happy with my choice!  Everyone we have taken there has always loved their dishes.  They are really big portions, with is good for family style or eating leftovers for a few days
I loved this place we went here in may it was so nice, clean, all your amenities are close by no need to drive there's rester aunts right in the Disney resort, the rooms were very clean and free wi fi in the rooms, no charges it was a great stay I love Florida !!!
For the price, this place is great! At lunch, you order a dish and then hit up the soup and appetizer buffet. Our waitress was very attentive to our large group, she was knowledgeable about their gluten free items, and she had no problem with me ordering the Basil Fried Rice gluten free. Also, the manager came out and showed me what was gluten free in the buffet line: Tapioca, Tom Yum Chicken Hot & Sour soup, spring rolls, and salad. The Basil Fried Rice and the Tom Yum soup were the highlights!
Great classes and instructors.    It is a judgment free environment to get your fittest and enjoy your workout.    There is everything to chose from ranging from traditional cardio, to strength, to pole, silks, hoops.  The staff is friendly and energetic and is always there for you.    Thank you, Foxy Fitness.
This is my second time visiting The COOP! And it has not disappointed today I order the tacos for taco Tuesday! You have a choice of getting chicken, catfish, and shrimp. And of course I got all 3 because I wanted to have a variety! They were decently favored tacos. Out of all of them I would say that my chicken was my favorite it was seasoned the best. My least favorite would have been the catfish. However, I was still satisfied with the food and service. If you want to switch up your taco Tuesday trend hit up The COOP for a new take.
Why haven't I been here before?? Amazing happy hour menu, super friendly service, delicious cheap margaritas, great vibe.. pretty much all you can ask for. I'm excited to go back and sit outside and people watch. Love all of the vegan options too - would love even a vegan cheese sauce please!
Love this chain and this location in particular.  The multiple soups and extra-long salad bar are great.  I always try 4 or 5 of the soups on each visit.  The staff is friendly and the place is usually spotless, although their sanitation suffers a tad during busy peak times.
Fresh ingredients, crispy, light crust. Loved it. The flatbreads are good too.
Not-So-Good: Vendors did not ever come to the 300 level Burger station said "30 minutes" to get a veggie burger ready  Good: Every employee was very friendly Easy to get to via MARTA Actually serve vegan hot dogs (which I had) and veggie burgers (which I did not have) Free programs (unlike my hometown Gillette Stadium) Seats are roomy  Overall, I would come back here. The friendly service made it an enjoyable time for me. Fortunately, I sat with lots of my fellow Patriots fans making the 'visiting' experience more enjoyable. Good luck, Falcons!
Just went to tight tacos and WOW it's melt in your mouth good!!!! Couldn't even leave the parking lot before inhaling my carnitas. Best tortillas I've had in a long time. Great service and vibes! I think I found my new spot!!!!!!
Super hard option to beat.  You want old school Americanized Chinese food done right?  They've got that.   You want something a bit more upscale?  They've got that too.  Dim Sum?  They were one of the original Dim Sum places in Austin.  Sushi?  They've got a great sushi menu too.   Whether you want fried rice, Kung Pao chicken, or a variety of sushi, this is the place to go to have it done right.  Ronald Cheng is truly a first class restaurateur and his passion for all things Asian continues to shine.  Not only is Chinatown an Austin institution, the variety here beats the Asian fusion types at their own game.
Great atmosphere, awesome equipment. The instructors are very knowledgable and very encouraging. Best of all they promote veganism! Beyond Fit is where it's at.
Love this cozy, busy spot.  Got in at a sweet spot time between late afternoon/early dinner with no res after a massage down the street and am so glad I was able to snag a spot at the bar.  Soft shell crabs were perfection.  Sparkling rose a perfect pairing.  Done and done.
I stopped by for the cheese cake based on a friend's recommendation and I was very impressed. The cheese cake was awesome with a drizzle of raspberries sauce over it. I can easily pass on my friend's recommendation. If you want a great cheese cake (one of the best in Portland), GO to Bugattis. My waitress name was Anne, ask for her as well. She provided great service with a wonderful attitude.!
Excellent place to eat Brasilian food.  They have a great variety of food, steak, chicken, rice and beans, sandwiches, coffee, juices and an amazing bakery.  You have to try the brasilian Ham, egg  and cheese sandwich.  I live about an hour away but go here as often as I can when I am near Orlando.
I came to see the Muppets and had a great time. I don't get Portland Yelpers.  People in Portland always go off about having to shop and spend local and then they get pissy that they don't get fancy treatment from an independent business.   1. Cash Only - Hey, carry some cash. You bitch about ATM fees but are you aware that the merchant has to pay about 10% on every card transaction. It adds up for a small business.  2. Small Staff - Yeah, I waited in line for a coke but they didn't start the movie until the line was gone. They 2 people working were going as fast as they could.   3. Customer Service - Fine by me if the guy is reading when I come out for a refill mid movie and he finishes the paragraph he is on before helping me. I was back in my seat in less time than it took Kermit to sing a song.   Bottom line is I got to see a fun movie with my best friends, get a soda and popcorn for about $11.   Bonus - No commercials before the movie and only 1 trailer.
We got in here by chance, and it was a truly magnificent experience. We were doubtful of the 'Asian fusion', but this, now looking back, silly thought was instantly banished from us. Everything was so flavorful and delicious, the fusion enhanced every aspect of what was already well-made, fresh ingredients. The Mapo Tofu is by far our favorite, with a slight hint of spice, the tofu exploded with flavor upon being chewed, it's aftertaste lingering in your mouth, making you crave for more.
This is pretty much an obligatory stop whenever I visit Boston now.   It's a small little restaurant tucked away inside the shopping center, yes, and there's been a wait to get seated every time I've visited. That said? The line moves quickly...and, as long as you're either alone or with a small group, getting seated won't be an issue.  Someone usually comes through the line early enough and gets orders anyway, so it's a short time from when you're seated to when you ultimately get your ramen.   It's a simple place, but efficient - and the food is delicious. I've had both the miso ramen and the house ramen, and both are delicious. The broth is flavorful and smooth...and definitely filling, the pork is delicious and the noodles are tasty.  An especially awesome meal for those cold, winter nights when you need something to warm you up. :) Bring on the food coma!
Although the burgers are a little on the small side. I honestly have nothing bad to say about this place. Everything on the menu that I've tired from the Chorizo burger (which is my favorite) to the Patron XO Shake has been extraordinary. The servers and hostess are surprisingly very friendly. If you have the opportunity to check out this "burger boutique" ask for LaLa she will take great care of you.
Nice little hotel.  Rooms kind of on the small side, but well taken care of and clean.  Desk staff was helpful and kind.  Great free breakfast and a really nice surprise of free dinners with beer and wine.  Overall, I was very happy with my stay here.
We've been back a couple times since I wrote my first review.  The dinner service is much better than the lunch was.  Maybe I just caught them on the wrong day.  Anyway, four stars for the dinner shift.
Amazing spaghetti and meatballs.  Best Italian restaurant in pdx.
Love this Bar! It's basically what you would dream of doing with your own house if you could. Ha Ha. Very low key, relaxed with a very cool unpretentious crowd. Ping Pong table outside is a winner!
I started getting massages here over the winter when I was gifted a groupon. I was very hesitant because I have lower back problems that flare up regularly due to working on my feet and being lazy with my workouts. I couldn't be happier with the results and have recently become a member.   I have only been seeing kelvin because he is extremely knowledgable and has a great understanding of what my body needs every visit. He can tell what I have been doing at work just by feeling my Muscles. He is great with teaching and educating me on best ways to stretch and keep my body healthy. I've never had body work done before coming here and I recommend it to anyone that talks to me about body pain.   Only reason I'm not giving 5 stars is because it kills me every month when the money comes out of my account.
I can't believe people are downstarring this place based on the noise.  If you want a romantic-quiet dinner, make it at home, or find a specific romantic-quiet restaurant.  Went with a big group. Our waiter didn't write anything down.  Amazing how he remembered everything. He was top notch. More on the staff later.  All the windows/doors were open so it was a gorgeous setting and the place just had an awesome vibe.  I love the high exposed brick ceilings.  This place is nice.  We ordered some pizze and appetizers to start.  Pizze were delicious.  The fried calamari was cooked perfectly.  Arancini were ok but the sauce they came with was fresh and delicious.  The bruschetta was very good, especially with the added fresh ricotta cheese.  For entrees were ordered a slew of different items.  Tagliatelle with rabbit, Agniolotti, gnocchi, cavatelli, steak, swordfish, and some more pizze for the kids.  Everything was delicious.  I tried all of the above except gnocchi and it was delicious.  I was told the gnocchi were excellent.  For dessert all good - the tiramisu was light and not heavy, cannoli were delicious with very good filling, and the chocolate cake was divine.  Espresso was excellent, not thin like you find in many restaurants. It had a thick quality crema on top.  American coffee was just as good.  The staff here was superb.  Our waiter, I don't know his name was just excellent.  He was right on top of everything and extremely friendly.  He answered every question we threw at him.  It's refreshing to find a place like this where everything messes so well.  I'll go back here in a second and I highly recommend it.  Split a pizza. Split a pasta dish. Try everything. It's delicioso!  --Galvanting G.
Stayed here multiple times for baseball. Clean, friendly and across street with multiple options to eat.
I'd like to give Clark Lewis 3.5 stars. So, I will err on the side of more rather than less.  That being said, we were there with a group of 8 on a Saturday night. Great set-up and sweet to be accommodated. Allow me to set the mood: the night was hot. It was a scorcher. The room large with beautiful dividers made of wood and bubbly glass. Lighting was romantic. Garage doors that open into the night air... but those doors being open on night like this last Saturday was not too terribly enjoyable. In one word: SWEEEAAATTTYY. The wood chairs do not help that situation one bit.  The wine selection was pretty good - not too much in the way of entry-level choices though. There are SO many good cheap wines out there that I'd like to see at least a couple available. Okay, granted, I am going to drop a good $50 on dinner... so I guess that it just comes with the entire package - but I'd still like to have a good wine to drink while I'm waiting that doesn't cost a million dollars.  The food was great. I had the beat salad and the halibut. The beet salad was awesome because it had goat cheese on it... and quite frankly you can top a pile of crap with goat cheese and I'll probably like it. The best part about that is that the goat cheese was PILED on there. Yeah, baby... just the way I like it. The halibut was cooked to perfection. Moist and the flavors were fresh and clean. Really a great dish for keeping it light so that I could finish it off with the dark chocolate mousse. Did you say dark chocolate mousse? Oh, yes I did... and it is GOOD.  The waiter was VERY average, and that is, in my opinion, a HUGE downer in a place like this. I mean, I'm dropping some serious cash on dinner - please send me a waiter that has got his shit together. He was knowledgeable about the wine/beer/food, but didn't get me a refill on the coffee when he gave everyone else one. Also when we showed up (after everyone else already had a drink), he didn't come over to find out if we wanted a drink. Um, yo - what are you doing, dude?  They switch up the menu often, and they also do a Prix Fixe menu for $56. Seems like that'd be the way to go if your group were up for it. Overall good experience... but I needed a better waiter and some reasonably-priced wine selections. Then it would have been top notch.
Dim Sum...dim YUM!!!  Happened upon this treasure while driving around looking for inspiration this holiday weekend...didn't want anything heavy, since we were going to 'do it up' that nite for dinner.  Let's just say that the drinks alone set the stage for a romantic prelude apres dejeuner!!  I ordered the sticky rice, the bulgogi (korean beef) and the shrimp and chicken steamed dumplings.  The sticky rice portions were two small packets -- and were a little too "tea leaf" flavored for my tastes..but, they were still very well prepared and presented.  Loved the moist dumplings and the slightly sweet bulgogi...My beau had the california rolls (tightest roll and best flavor I've had recently,) roasted duck dim sum plate (crispy and nice salty flavor) and fried squid (lightly fried and tender.)   Service was lovely, the setting had all the ambiance of a japanese water garden repleit with those huge gold fish-like koi and lovely waterfalls.  The scorpion that we shared (or really, two) were just right for a lazy afternoon meal.  Loved this place for dimsum, authentic chinese and sushi -- great food, great atmosphere, lovely service!!
My boyfriend finally convinced me to stop being superficial and try this place out; I can't thank him enough. I recommend this place to everyone and have throughly enjoyed myself every, single, time.
I was delighted to see they have an entire vegetarian menu. There were so many delicious options I knew I'd have difficulty deciding. Then, at the end, was exactly what I needed: a vegetarian combo with all the choices above included. Bingo! I highly recommend this option if you're tempted by "all the above." The serving size is huge. (I couldn't finish) There's plenty injera, but if you need more, you need only ask. Service is courteous and helpful, and the ambience is quiet and leisurely. I'm stuffed, but satisfied.
I've made a decision. That decision is that I am bearish on eating at the restaurant, and bullish on takeout. We have done delivery from Haru a half dozen or so times now, and we love it. The food IS good, I just thought the space and the service was sort of lacking. Now we just have Haru come to us, and it is a much much better experience.
Great place very relaxing.  very affordable  sliding  scale  price. I go there about  once a month.  I use it as preventative  alternative  medicine  healing. Call them and check them out.
This is the best hair salon I have been to in a long time. My hair looks amazing , I called this morning freaking out to get my hair done before my wedding Monday. They sure blew my mind away!!!! I look amazing!!! Thanks Tasia!!!!
This location is a bit small and very busy on the weekend. The double baked almond croissant was amazing!!! I waited 20mins for it to come out fresh from the oven. :))  Tried their crispy chocolate raspberry cake.  Its smooth and not too sweet or bitter!  They also have a variety of chocolates, pastries, cakes and savories!  The gift boxes looks nice n'fancy!  Staff was nice!
Called to make an appointment. The receptionist (guy) was polite enough. Definitely sounds like he's capable of being a douche bag but he was informative. I can't wait to go get my tat on Saturday.  I will update my review after I get my tat.
A really beautiful labor of love.  It reminds me of portland in the late 90's. Great owner hosting interesting shows and the place has character up the yin yang.  A fun place to both see and play a show!  Never had the food but it does have a small meñu.  Just vocals through the pa generally in which the owner has run the sound when i've been there.
This is the best Greek food I've had in Austin. Prices are fair, and the staff was very helpful and patient. I got the regular Gyro, but my friend go a Gyro plate and that seemed to be a better deal. It's also a wine bar, and they have half off wine/$3 sangria from 5-10! The owner even gave us a plate of the Greek Beignets on the House because we said we wanted to try them. They were delicious by the way, so I highly recommend you get those. The entire place is really kid friendly, and there is outdoor seating in case you maybe want to bring a dog. I HIGHLY recommend this place.
Bloc 11 is part of our routine, in between local shopping trips, or as a break from working around the house. The staff is always friendly, the coffee great and strong, and the sandwiches and soups are well made and flavorful.  About a year ago, they pared down their menu to stick to local ingredients and they honestly haven't suffered at all for it. Union Square is becoming a locavore hub, and it's great to see another business hop on the wagon. They also removed all trash cans, using all recyclable & compostable products for take-out cups and napkins.  The noise levels can vary from normal conversation to very quiet, depending upon where you sit, but except for the busiest of days, there's rarely a wait to find a place to settle down. I do wish they had some more variety in their baked goods, or perhaps just a few more cookies.
I just got back from the best facial ever. Thanks Coco! Lovely Spa is clean and affordable, I highly recommend!
Love love love ! Dr Colon- Bengoa and his staff ! They are awesome ! Friendly and professional. You feel like part of their family when you with them !
Don't think of Mangia as a pizza place.  Think of it as a neighborhood restaurant that happens to serve pizza. By doing such, you accomplish two things.  First, you won't be disappointed by the pretty good pizza.   Second, you'll see the other things on the menu including burgers, pasta, and sandwiches.  For the record, I highly recommend the pasta with marinara sauce and grilled chicken. (FYI, the garlic breadsticks they serve with the pasta are reason alone to order pasta.)  As an appetizer, I highly recommend the Mangia Fries which are battered before cooking.  I think they're among the better fries in town.  The service at this location also excels.  Our waitress kept drinks refilled, delivered our order promptly, and was friendly without hovering.  On a final note, unlike the Mesa Drive location, this location doesn't seem to be the gathering spot for Little League and kid's soccer teams.
Updating: a couple of years later, happy to say the shop has grown beautifully, filling out its yarn offering to cover all the bases, and supplementing their yarn and patterns with perfectly in tune accessories and non-knitting grace notes like the most delicious smelling candles and embroidery kits to make you want to add a new craft to your repertoire. Now one of my indispensable shops.
Best described as Very Nice!!!  The Pub  Burger was fantastic. Cooked perfectly, and had that great grilled flavor. The truffle fries were just ok with me. I prefer seasoned steak fries in canola oil. Also the lobster taco's were just ok. Our server Adam was the best. All in all a great restaurant. We will be back.
There are too many Cubans and wannabe Cubans in my life here in Boston, which is why it was a terrible shame that I didn't make it here until 2012.   It's not like Versailles of Miami (or the knockoff Versailles in LA), but man does it come close!  We got the Croquetas, Papa La Reina, Yucca Fries, Ropa la Vieja, and Ropa de Pollo. The two main items came with tostones (crispy plantain) or maduro (sweet fried plantain) and rice and Cuban black beans.   Not all items were amazing (frankly the Yucca Fries left much to be desired. Seriously, what the hell was that dipping sauce?), and despite claiming to be a Cuban restaurant, there was certainly a smattering of other Latin American culinary influence, but hey as a business you have to cater to the crowd right?  There's no doubt in my mind that I'll be coming back here if the Biff or P-Dog have anything to say about it.
300 Saratoga Cafe gets better every time I go. It is now my favorite restaurants in East Boston! The steak tips are tender and melt in your mouth. I recently enjoyed the delicate baby lamb chops that had amazing flavor. My friend had the fish special and loved it. Their portions are generous, presentation superb, and the side dishes are very good. There are so many dishes on the menu that I want to try like the pork chops and vinegar peppers. At The Saratoga Cafe, also known to locals as BYOB, has no corkage fee when you bring in your own bottle of wine!  Update June 2018: The lobster diabolo was enough to share.  I ordered the sauce on the less spicy side and was perfect. I substituted the pasta for veggies. The lobster included 3 big shrimp, calamari, clams, and mussels! The sauce was so flavorful. This was a special and I wish it was on the daily menu. For $30 it's a steal! My husband had the ribeye with fresh grilled veggies. He ordered medium rare which was very pink on the rare side. A true medium rare. Order medium if you want pink and not cool in the center.
Dixie Crossroads has the best clam chowder I've ever had in Florida.  The Royal Red Shrimp, Lobster, and Snow Crab were all delicious.  The only thing I wasn't a fan of were the scallops. The only scallops I've ever had were the Northern scallops, which are larger and richer. The scallops here are found around Florida and are smaller in size and have a much different texture and flavor. There was nothing wrong with them; they were properly prepared and broiled. I just didn't like them. I'm not the type of dude to complain and cause a fuss, but our server noticed that I didn't touch the scallops. The owner came over, apologized, asked me what I didn't like about them, and offered to bring me something else or to take them off the bill. It was a generous gesture from a kind person that understands what's really important about running a restaurant: making sure patrons enjoy their meals. I truly appreciate any business that operates the way Dixie Crossroads does, and I'll be going back to enjoy more clam chowder the next time I'm in Titusville.   Overall: great food, good service and phenomenal management.
Came here with 3 friends (for a party of 4) on a Saturday night for happy hour.  It is BUSY, so expect to wait, as the happy hour is only available in the bar area on the right of the hostess table. If you venture to the left, it's a full price menu. I was lucky enough that the table I was "stalking" didn't seem to mind (after I asked them of course), and even let me sit with them while they waited for their credit card to come back from the waitress.  The food is terrific, especially for the price. I ordered the skirt steak skewers, and they were delicious! My husband chose the Oba burger, and he devoured that thing (it's surprisingly large for a happy hour burger). I also ordered a Prickly Pear Mojito, which was a little on the sweet side, but still refreshing and well sized. I really appreciate the speed that food came out, and the fact that our waitress gave us a happy hour last call. I'd definitely come back again for happy hour!
Spicy migas had a green chili holliadaise sauce that was tasty and rich. The hash browns also had spice that made them different from traditional fare. I really enjoyed the pimento cheese hush puppies-it was a pleasant surprise and delicious. The food was flavorful. The food was flavorful. Service was great. The environment is modern diner with barstool service. I would return and I would recommend it to others. Great for breakfast and lunch.  I'm giving it 4, instead of 5 stars because there are 2 issues I would change.   1) Install a door for the kitchen/prep area. We had a full view of servers scraping dinner plates into orange Home Depot buckets and it was unappealing.  This is small... But 2) offer tortillas with your migas or southwest dishes. I paid extra for fresh avocado in my dish and I get it, avocado is expensive but I'm glad I did because if I didn't add this green item, then my dish would have been a white plate of food (unappetizing!).  This is a fair review.
Customized pasta is $8, and a glass of house wine is $4. This is the best deal ever in Kits! Generous portion in terms of ingredients and the cheese is freshly grated too! There are so many choices in terms of sauces, pasta type, veggies, meats, cheese and herbs you can choose from, I would definitely swing by for a great tasty high carb meal if I was in the area. 1 order can serve me 1 dinner portion and 2 lunches to pack to work!!
This is the place in Columbus to pick apples. The bags that you pay for when you first enter the orchard are reasonable. My mom got a 20 lb bag and got well over 50 apples in it. You definitely have to stop in at the market to get a variety of veggies, apple cider, jams, etc to take home.
Good sea food. They have amazing melt-in-mouth scallion pancakes. We loved their spicy dishes. I wish the staff was more friendly.
Amazing. Lavender latte - such a treat. Love this place for lunch or brunch!
The ghost burger was awesome. Best use of ghost pepper in a sauce that I have ever had. I love flavorful hot sauces!!
I had a wonderful vegan treat here, it was a slice of blackberry cheesecake and it took longer to decide what I was going to have (they have a wide range of vegan and organic deserts and savory treats to take or eat at their mini cafe) than to eat it!   The Daily Grind is nestled on the "other side" of SE Hawthorne, and it keeps it feeling like a hidden gem, but with such an amazing produce selection, and yummy home baked goodies I don't think that it'll be hidden too much longer.
Daito features handcrafted soba noodles, dashi with both heart AND soul and totally impeccable, 4-star service. Tiny and dimly lit, jazz standards playing and chatter at a very comfortable level, Daito could go date-night or friends catching up-style. I'll dream of the snap pea tempura, elegant little morsels served with salt you don't need, on crunchy edible noodles. My Kitsune udon was beautiful, simple but complex, and totally memorable. I'll dream of this broth when I'm back in Seattle,  and my city is no slouch in the udon department.
One of my favourite places to grab a bite in Coquitlam! They have great service and amazing quality food. Their pad Thai with chicken is so delicious. Nice big servings and every bit is better than the last! Be sure to make a reservation if you're going with a bigger group. My family had a table of 7 and we were very thankful we reserved a table, because it's a small restaurant and it fills up very fast!
Excellent bouillabaisse , huge salads, light healthy fare in addition to their famous chicken and waffles.  Wide choice of options.  Friendly staff.
We stopped here for drinks just because it "looked cute" and I'm so happy we did!  They make their own tequila and make everything we fresh squeezed juices.   Omg!   I have no clue how the food is but these drinks are unbelievable!!  The marg was deeeelish and the red sonya tastes like a spicy pink lemonade.  Sooooo good!!   Our waitress Teagan was absolutely amazing!!!
Being from California, my husband and I are always on the hunt for some authentic Mexican food, which we have a very hard time finding living in the panhandle. While on vacation in Orlando I took to yelp to find us a good dinner after being sick of eating theme park food for three days! When I saw border grill I was sold. Hole in the wall local places are my favorite! Especially considering I work in one so that might make me a little biased:)  When we got there it was packed and it made me so ready to eat some good food! All the reviews I read said you order at the counter so we walked up and stood there for a while while the girls were busy behind the counter filling drinks and using the register. We patiently waited but no one looked up.. Maybe they were too involved in their work, I don't know. Eventually a girl walked by and said have a seat anywhere you'd like. Okay, so we sit outside at one of the only available tables in the place. I made eye contact with our waitress (the one who told us to sit anywhere so she knew we were wanting to eat there) at least 3 times and still she never came out for AT LEAST 5 minutes. Being a waitress this is unacceptable leaving a table sitting not greeted that long. We listened to the table behind us complaining about the time they had been waiting for their food. Finally they wave her outside and she talks to them, apologizes for the wait and gets their food out promptly. We then think... Okay this is it she's going to acknowledge us. Nope she just walked by again. Finally when she brings them some drink refills she walks by and says are you wanting to order? Um well we need menus we've never been here and she says "oh you want to dine here?"  Who knows maybe sitting outside means you want it togo but I was assuming we could sit anywhere like she said and that was the only place that had open tables.  After we got menus and drinks everything went smooth from there-  We used yelps check in deal to get free chips, salsa and queso! Added bonus- we got a little guacamole too! My husband is a huge queso fan so he devoured that. I was partial to the guacamole so we were both happy with that. we both ordered the Chicago burrito recommended from fellow yelpers and they did not disappoint! I ordered mine with shredded chicken and my husband ordered the al pastor(pork) we were in HEAVEN!!! They also have a caddy of different hot sauces that we poured all over our burritos! Super good. The hottest one is the bright green and it wasn't so hot I couldn't handle it it was very good! Try it you won't be sorry! After the other tables left our server was way more attentive so maybe she was just overwhelmed and the food was so good we left very happy. I wish I could pick up this place and bring it home with me. The food was THAT good. Try it, just maybe sit inside so you get service a little faster.
Fast, friendly and reasonable prices through my autobody shop. They've always had availability despite calling laat minute.
At first bite I was angry because I didn't understand why all other sandwiches I'd eaten in my life didn't taste as good as this one.
One of the best sushi experiences I've ever had.   High quality offerings with the perfect balance of rice and taste. *They upon request can rice pad your sushi order with sushi rice for no additional cost*  Today I ordered their spicy tuna and salmon Don (yummy on rice). I also ordered an Ebi sunomono. You can choose to sit by the bar to admire the many figurines behind the glass or the food as it arrived to the tables around you. I wish I lived nearer so that I can certainly visit again. Food was fantastic.
Everytime that I have visited Swan Spa, I have left feeling refreshed, tension free and relaxed. I don't normally write reviews but this time it was a must. I suffer from chronic pain due to an injury that usually acts up in the winter months. The combination of deep tissue massage and traditional Chinese massage has greatly help with alleviating the tension in my problem areas to the point that when I walk out of the spa I am pain free  I usually go in for a 90 min massage. What's great about the spa is its convienent location in Coal Harbour, most rooms are equipment with a full shower, and they have their own infra ray sauna too!  Regular customers can also take advantage of their value massage packages.
Let it be known that I had never had poutine before this. But good Lord this was incredible. To my knowledge poutine was hearty and stick to your ribs typefyi food. Once I saw the words "vegetarian gravy" I was concerned. But we went for it and holy crap it's amazing. This was the perfect balance of salty, savory, and hearty. Love it. Simply love it.
This review isn't about the food, which is still pretty good.  But their policy of not giving out receipts unless you ask for them hits a sore spot.  There's only two reasons I can think for doing that:    1) So an employee can deliberately cheat you by charging food to your card that you didn't order.  2) It's an honest mistake, in which case it wouldn't get caught until you get your next statement, and how are you to tell it's wrong without a receipt to compare it to.  In either case, it's a lousy idea, which probably saves the operator $.02 in printing costs.  Check your receipts!!
The food at this place was good. If you're looking for a place to jam some hip-hop music, smoke hookah, and enjoy bottomless mimosas this is the place. I ordered the red waffles and fried chicken it was good with the strawberry syrup but there definitely should've been more chicken. The service was kind of horrible/slow. The waiters made promises they couldn't keep such as the bottomless mimosas time slots. Other than that It was a cool spot to jam out and eat brunch. I support black owned businesses!
Awesome Brookhaven find. I went to Pour last Thursday with a girlfriend and we're SO glad we did. We enjoyed a half off bottle of wine ad well as a melon mule. MUST try. It's a very refreshing drink! We ordered so much food and everything was amazing. The white truffle macaroni was perfectly cooked and nice and creamy. I'm not a huge seafood person but the Jumbo Lump Crab & Artichoke Dip is to die for! Probably the best thing we had. Wonderful charcuterie and cheese plate. Prosciutto & Fig flatbread was awesome. We probably sat and drank wine and ate for almost 3 hours. We had great service the entire time and never felt rushed. We will definitely be back!
Great option in the hood, especially later at night. I stop in if I'm on my way home after a few drinks. I'm not vegetarian but love their stuff (all vegetarian or can be made vegan)- the Blair Stanley is my current favourite. Cheap, cheerful and satisfying. I usually add hot sauce at home though, the hot option is not that hot FYI.
Looks like the next time we visit Portland we will be sure to include this as a stop, or multiple stops, on our itinerary.  Our server was awesome and such a sweetheart.  The choice between potato cakes and grits is an absolute tough one as they are both tasty.  I went with a basic menu option of 2 over-easy eggs and the apple smoked bacon.  I was happy with this simple choice since my side of grits paired well with the perfectly crisp bacon.  My girlfriend ordered the Veggie Pesto which was a breakfast creation neither of us have ever tasted.  She claims it was the "best breakfast" she's ever had! I wouldn't go that far but it was definitely exceptional.  The self-serve coffee was a hit for us since it was a cool, damp Portland kind of day.  We'll have to come here for lunch and drinks next time as we observed some pretty sweet concoctions coming from behind the bar.
I really like this place and have it in my rotation.  The food is traditional Irish.  Nothing fancy and fairly priced.  Decent beer on tap.  I love the curry fries.  I haven't had a bad meal here yet.  The thing I love most about the place is the quaint, quirky  design of it.  There are crevices and corners to explore or hide in.  Whatever your choice.  The are 2 bars with tables in each area.  I'm not a huge fan of when they have live music since the place is a bit small, but to each his/her own.
I cannot say enough wonderful things about this awesome, intimate little bar!!! You can't just stop at 5 stars- this place is that awesome!!   It's not at all as I expected, but I'm glad that I'm not the kind of person that bases everything on high expectations. If my friends say this place is the bomb- then it is. lol  They have an impressive selection of beers & wine. I selected the red sangria (I'm off beer for the month of Jan). I found the sangria exceptionally refreshing. I so wanted another glass!!!  I'm truly looking forward to returning to Thirsty Topher ASAP!!! The staff is amazing, and more importantly, they know what they're talking about when it comes to all things beer & cider.   Kudos boys
Alright, after my last experience, and Luke T.'s constant ranting, I have to up this place one star, not just for the pizza, but for the experience too. I never knew there was a restaurant open at 3 in the morning that could still be so packed! After a wild night of karaokeing, my friend needed something to soak up all that beer in his belly, so we headed over. Somehow, at that late hour of the night, the server was in good spirits, on point, and efficient. We grabbed a table and ordered our food, with drinks following promptly.  Here's where it got interesting. Some Brittish girl who designs for Abercrombie came over while my friend was in the bathroom and asked if she could sit down. I have a hard time saying no to a pretty face, so before I knew it, she had invited her friends to sit down, my friend was kicked out of his side of the booth and was sitting next to me, and I had given away half of my pizza.(Which was much less greasy this time).  It was definitely an interesting experience, and I don't think I would get it anywhere else. Can't wait to come back!
I have eatten at Harvest over fifty times and it is consistently good. The atmosphere is casual comfortable elegance with warm colors and dark woods. You can chose to dine at the bar/lounge area, the dining room or in the outdoor garden area during summer season. The bar itself is great when you are alone. I eat everything on the menu including varieties of fish, steak, poultry, oysters, salads, soup, hamburger and small bites at the bar. They have a full bar and a wine list. Sunday brunch is excellent but be sure you very hungry as it is three courses. It is great place for a date, casual conversation, drinks, dessert, or a special occassion.  All the waitstaff, host, and bartenders are very professional and polite. This is one my favorites in Boston/Cambridge. Keep in mind a average dinner is about $75.00 a person. Parking in Harvard Square is difficult unless you valet park.
My absolute favorite Broad Street eatery. I once had lunch here three weekdays in a row. (And I'm not ashamed to admit that that was just last week.)  Dua is admittedly not the most "ethnic" restaurant out there -- you won't find an expansive menu with all sorts of obscure Vietnamese eats. But then again, this is downtown Atlanta, not Buford Highway. What you will find is a simple menu that appeals to most, if not all, palates, offering up many varieties of pho (a noodle soup), bun (a cold noodle dish), com (a rice dish), mi xao (a stir fried noodle dish), and salad.  I've had the opportunity to try quite a few of the dishes here, and they're all quite good: - #1 Beef Pho (regular $6.25, large $6.95): A good-sized portion, though not the largest I've seen. The flavor tends to be consistently spot on. Garnishes, however, are limited to a small plate of sprouts and basil leaves. - C3 Grilled Shredded Pork & Eggs ($6.95): One of my favorite dishes here. The pork is juicy, tender, and flavorful. But it's the runny fried egg on top that brings everything together. Note that this dish ought to be pretty inoffensive, even to those completely unfamiliar with Vietnamese cuisine. - B1 Bun Thit Nuong Cha Gio ($6.95): I can't get enough of the grilled pork here. Here, it's served over cold vermicelli, very lightly dressed with, among other things, fish sauce (I think). Served with a crispy, chopped egg roll. - M1 Pork Mi Xao ($6.95): Stir fried noodles. Given the nature of this dish, it's a bit blander and a bit less satisfying than the rest, but it's still quite good.  While Dua, like most casual downtown eateries, is only open for lunch, it gets absolutely slammed at that hour. The result is that their operation has grown to become pretty efficient -- stand in line against the wall, on which multiple copies of the menu are plastered; order at one of the two registers, where you pay and pick up a number; get your drink, silverware, and napkins; find a seat on the main level, outside, or downstairs; and wait for your food to be delivered. All very business. Note that most of the tables are designed for one or two diners, so  you might have to go outside, go downstairs, or move around some furniture for larger parties.  I'll definitely be back -- maybe next week, I'll try for four.
These are my favorite wings!!! The lemon pepper have SO much flavor- sometimes even too much but I get them every single time I come (about every 2-3 weeks). My second favorite are the buffalo - they have a different take on their buffalo sauce because they actually put some of their BBQ sauce IN the buffalo sauce. Delicious.The place is dark and dingey but you come for the food, not the atmosphere. I love that they have outdoor seating and tell everything I think this is where you cam find the best wings in Atlanta. They also have a great beer selection that always rotates and has something new to offer! For appetizers, definitely get the boiled peanuts and give the fried okra a shot!
This best our 1st rodeo here.   We just remembered to check it! Great Smokey dive bar.   Ask for Daniel in the evenings.  He makes great drinks!
Excellent find! We stopped in for breakfast on a Sunday morning. The place was not crowded even by 9am, but the meal was excellent. Walk up counter service and a good eating space. The menu includes several specialty crepes and also offers a custom "build your own" option. I opted for the "Sunday Morning" breakfast Crepe; including bacon, ham, egg, spinach, mushroom, tomato, & a Cajun remoulade (which was not really spicy at all). They make the crepes on the spot and then fill it with the requested ingredients. My wife ordered the  "Sweet Tooth" crepe (which I tried a bite!). The Sweet Tooth included strawberries, bananas, Nutella, & peanut butter. Great sweet breakfast treat. Overall this was an excellent experience; the staff was extremely friendly & helpful.....most importantly the breakfast was delicious!
I love going to Buenos Aires Cafe. It is a high-class casual spot with delicious food. If you love savory plates that are well thought out (rather than just pretty), then you will like this place.   And there's the wine list - long enough to have plenty to choose from, but not so ridiculously long that you feel overwhelmed.   Service is slow, but not in a "they are ignoring you way." Rather it is more like the relaxed atmosphere and slower pace that we should all be at while out to dinner.
I have been getting my hair cut at 22 Changes for over ten years now, and I have never been disappointed.  I first tried them out on the recommendation of a friend when I was looking for a place to donate my hair.  After having a really positive experience, I decided to go back again.  And again.  And again.  And... you get the picture.  Over the years I've donated my hair twice, and I have never had a more fantastic grow out from a dramatic cut than from the stylists at 22 Changes.  These days I see Cynthia, and she is AMAZING.  She's been cutting my husband and my hair for the past two years, and we always look and feel great after we leave.  Personally, I like to talk to my stylist while getting my hair cut, and if you also do, you will have a really fun time talking with Cynthia.  She really cares about what I want, and she puts me at ease so I don't feel awkward if I want her to change or add something.  They are a bit expensive for a cut, but it is absolutely worth every penny.  Cynthia gives me haircuts that are so manageable I can wash my hair, let it air dry on the way to work, and it still looks fantastic all day.  Give this place a try, and definitely give Cynthia a try.
My new favorite taco place in Orlando! Finally authentic juicy, greasy tacos! I meannnnn they were blowing my mind.   Just so happens that we were going to the barber, and the wait time was 20 minutes. We wanted to grab some food, didn't really know where. So we looked on yelp with this gem right across the street.   It took a while to get our tacos but the place was busy. And you know it's good if you see Mexican folk flooding a taco shop.   We got our tacos to-go, individually wrapped. Then all wrapped in foil once more. They stayed fresh and very hot!   Cabezza and asada were amazing!!! The cabezza was juicy and soft, while the asada was crunchy and savory!   Their tortillas are oily and perfect in size! Small but packed with a punch of flavor! I have been here twice and can saftely say these are my favorite tacos in Orlando!
This is a dream come true!  I'm fresh to PDX so I've never seen anything like this.  You just take your bike and fix it yourself with volunteers helping you along the way.  Theres some bike wire parts in good shape that you can use for no extra charge.  The tools are all included.  Its only $5/hr or $20/month!  I went not knowing how to fix or manage my own bike and left knowing much much more!
WOW!!! This place has the best salted French macaroons I've ever had. (2.50) a piece. Their tiramisu was of strong coffee flavour and their chocolate eclair is fluffy yet loaded with chocolate flavour. This service is friendly therefore making my experience a 5/5 stars!
Really cozy place and the person working was so nice. Not sure if he was the owner or not but either way he was nice!
After reading the earlier reviews,  we considered not going to this location. We decided to chance it,  and I am glad we did!  Food was tasty--and servings ample. My husband had steak and I had chicken. His was a little skimpier than mine,  but still an adequate portion.   Also,  the crew worked quickly and were friendly as the went about their tasks.  The only thing that could have been better was the server's hair being tied back/up more than it was.   Tables and the floor were being cleaned as customers left. Appeared clean overall. Not sure why all the negative reviews earlier.  All-in-all we had a good experience. I wouldn't hesitate to go back.
My fiancee and I had purchased antique Cartier platinum wedding bands from a third party jewelry store and needed to have them authenticated.  I went to the Cartier store on Newbury St. and met with a sales associate.  My sales associate, Amie B., was quite helpful and informed me that my platinum wedding band bore the old exterior hallmarks that showed that it was made in Paris for export some time ago and my fiancee's platinum eternity band was an older version of a modern design.  After assuring me of their authenticity, I needed to have my wedding band sized and engraved.  She measured my ring size and took down what I wanted engraved.  She quoted me a price to perform these services and gave me a receipt for pick up.  Throughout the process, Amie B. was professional, available, and seemed genuinely interested in my satisfaction with the result.  I cannot speak regarding the experiences that others may have had with a single point of contact, but my experience has been wonderful and I appreciated the personal nature of the transaction.  I suppose that the overall satisfaction that I felt with my entire experience at Cartier was that after quoting me a price for sizing and engraving my wedding band, they did not require payment for either when I went to pick it up.  They honored their piece and performed all the services that I required FREE OF CHARGE.   It is rare to find dedication to service such as this and I would like to thank Amie B. for her efforts.  I will definitely return to Cartier in the future for fine jewelry.
We've made it a tradition to come here on Sundays. Dim Sum Sundays! Their food is delicious, and I love that the dim sum still comes out in carts. The staff is friendly and always has a smile on their face. My favorites are the Crystal Dumplings, Sui Mai, and the Chicken Knuckles....I can't wait for this coming Sunday!
So much to see and experience. Give yourself plenty of time in the rooms and take advantage of the informative cards for each wall. These cards share insightful tidbits and provide a glimpse into Isabella Stewart Gardner's vision & life. Every visit brings new discoveries - so come back again and again.
Everyone one was amazing and friendly, and had very clear communication on what they were doing and what they saw. I have a history of sensitive teeth and my hygienist, Rachel, was very careful and made sure I was comfortable the whole time. I would highly recommend calling them and setting up an appointment.
My son (8 yrs. old) hates getting his hair cut. Took him to Cookie Cutters for the first time today, upon walking out when finished he smiled and asked if we could go there every time. They make the kids comfortable while cutting their hair and after she was finished she asked my son if he wanted gel, he said yes, and she applied gel that smells like chocolate. We will be back!
Love it here.  Best steak tips around! Food service wine cocktails atmosphere... New fav place to go!
For my 400th review, I had to unleash my inner goth and write about the Mount Auburn Cemetery. The planning and execution of this cemetery is stunningly poetic and heart breakingly beautiful. Walking through the grounds, it's easy to feel entranced by the eerie calmness located in the middle of such a fast paced, dog eat dog metropolis.   Edward Gorey's Mystery trailer must have been based off of Mount Auburn Cemetery, using its elegant and occasionally whimsical memorials for the perfectly creepy introduction. The antiquated names on the headstones find their way into my "name vault" for future children: Lavinia, Dahlia, Mercy, Silence, Hiram, Levi, Amos, Wesley, Ira (Okay, Ira was a joke - that's not really a name I'd choose, but it makes me smile - serenely, of course). The urn sculptures and the detailed ironwork have an ethereal creepiness matched only by the New Orleans cemeteries I've toured, but in the Mount Auburn Cemetery, the light through the trees makes each resting ground look somehow welcoming, like a reward rather than a VERY permanent address. The trees twist and turn their manicured limbs every which way, with their naked branches creating a collective hushed "oooooOOOooooooOOOO" sound from the cold winter wind. The sound is wonderful.   Taking the uphill route on nearly every road leads you to the tower, with a commanding view of Boston and her neighboring cities. You can hear the muffled sounds of the cities making their way to you, letting you know you're still alive and breathing. Looking down you see the snaky paths leading you around the property, writhing between ponds and tree groves, chapels and elegant sculptures. Spend an afternoon or a whole day reading tombs and contemplating this mortal coil, realizing the most horrible tragedy is that you will never earn enough to secure your own final resting spot in Mount Auburn Cemetery.
This review is purely aesthetics, and does in no way comment upon the care or service received at LEH's newly birthed wonder. Opened officially for business on February 26---I had the privilege of being in town during this period to witness my former workplace absolutely and miraculously transformed. At the time I had left, there was much hullabaloo regarding its plans and development. Surveys were disseminated among the employees to capture all ideas. Now come to fruition, the new children's hospital is really truly gorgeous. Inviting, swank, modern, thoughtful, and spacious!  All of the various units are locked units, meaning unless authorized and allowed in by a nurse, visitors are relegated to the outer hallways and lounges. There are nice Samsung tvs and HP desktops to prevent those from twiddling their thumbs. Individual rooms for all patients, and Randall has now added a bit shy of 10% additional new capacity! HIP HIP HOORAY  What I can comment upon is the "legacy" and tradition that I worked in and amongst during the years there, laboring alongside my fellow cohorts. This hospital stands for quality. It is an environment filled with people who are truly kind, proficient, and imbued with lots of love. The specialists and their competence is vetted and trustworthy. I wouldn't hesitate for a second to endorse this hospital. Having worked for and with multiple care teams, I can authentically testify to this fact.  There is a tunnel now connecting to main, and though a downstairs cafe available, all hot food (like those yummilicious breakfast burritos I long for) and soups are back at main's Heartbeat.  PS So excited for them: http://www.oregonlive.com/health/index.ssf/2012/02/a_crowded_childrens_hospital_g.html
My family ordered scallion pancakes, soup dumplings, pork and cabbage dumplings, braised pork belly sandwiches (which I advise to get) and the butter miso noodles, which I think are really good to get if you have kids. I didn't love the soup dumplings but my mom liked them a lot. I think kids would rather get regular dumplings instead. Also, the scallion pancakes were a little too crispy. However, the service was really nice and it's cool how you can order at a counter and sit down at a table. Overall, I really liked it and it's a great place to go with kids!                 Bon Appetit!               KidKritic
This street is close to downtown and is full of small old houses that have been renovated into bars, eateries, and other cool businesses.  I wish I had more time in Austin to bar hop here. There was this one bar that had their entire back wall behind the bar full of beers listed by the number. Very cool place to hang out and drink a few beers.
I don't know why people say that Chinese food in is "so good" in San Francisco. Personally, it can not compare to Vancouver Chinese food.   My proof? Ningtu Restaurant.  Shanghi dumplings Chinese fried donuts Fresh soy milk...  There is so much more! Unfortunately, I am massively lacking in my Mandarin speaking skills, so I cannot tell you what to order. Make certain bring a family member or friend that speaks Chinese.   If you are an omnivore - you'll love this place.
Wow. Best service I have ever had. Slight wait on our reservation so the waitress gave us cocktails and an app on the house. Devin our server was very attentive. Totally a must do in boulder.
Came here for some Chinese breakfast because it's close to the airport. Their specialty is congee and it comes in a set with a side dish. It's not dim sum though, so don't come expecting that. When you search "dim sum" or "yum cha" in Yelp, this comes up, but it's not really.....
Great experience at Bride N Belle.  In my dress search, I went to 11(!) different bridal shops across MA and NH looking for a dress $1,800 and under.  I found a dress here that I liked for under $1,000!  They have a larger selection of dresses under $1,000 than any of the other stores that I went to.  It is very much a mom and pop shop, and they are very patient with no sales pressure.  They were also not off put with my price point, unlike some of the other stores that I visited.  I enjoyed being able to browse the dresses instead of just having the sales person chose a few for me to try on.  With that said, the dress I chose was actually one that the salesperson chose for me, and probably would not have been a dress that I chose myself!  They also matched a beautiful veil with it that I purchased as well.  It was very sweet that they gave me a bottle of prosecco when I said yes to the dress!  They also gave my mom a mini bottle so that we could have a toast when we got back to the house.  So far, I am very pleased.  Note: You cannot park in the small lot to the right of the building, but I had no problem finding on street parking on the street to the left of the building.  I will also update after I do the alterations.
This was a recommendation from our hotel we stayed at - Hyatt.  This probably has been the best brunch that I have ever had! We came there on New Years eve and they were sure to get us in even though the wait was long and they closed at 2 pm that day. My friend and I both couldn't resist the lavender latte and the most popular item seemed to have been the waffles. OMG!!! They were to die for! Made in house from some magical batter!  I don't think I will be ever able to taste any other waffles. Simply heavenly! I ordered the paella and it was absolutely worth it!!!! I full until dinner time - 9pm!!!! The service was great! I can't wait to return!!!!
Ask for Nancy! She's so sweet and gentle.. And gives the best gel manicures and pedicures!
When I got my hair cut here, it turned out great! Although it's a bit pricey, I would come back again. When I came in, I was greeted very warmly by Farzad and Noriko. Noriko cut my hair and she paid close attention to how she cut my it, she seemed to take her time, making sure it turned out well and I was particularly impressed by the fade, and overall, how cleanly she made it look. And on top of her great cut, she also made good conversation. The place gets quite busy, so I would call ahead of time. I had an unexpectedly relaxing experience. If there's one suggestion I would give: it would be great if they had some sort of online booking system just to make coming more convenient, but it's not really essential. Would definitely come back again.
Been here several more times because they have great happy hour specials (in the bar area only). I found my niche -- soups, salads and flatbreads. All delicious, made with fresh ingredients. I've also discovered their cocktail list, which is straight out of 2002 (e.g., the "Flirtini"), BUT it's full of tasty treats that are fun to drink ala Sex and the City -- inexpensive at $5 each during happy hour.
Good place for high quality tools. Great staff, good dog, and they have endmills. They're one of the few places you can find quality endmills in Portland.  Only gripe, I couldn't find a US made ball-peen hammer there once. Vaughn makes hammers in the US guys... Just a tip.
Best Sushi I've had anywhere in the Portland metro. In addition to their amazing dishes, they also serve beers from their neighbor business, Roscoe's (typically 20+ beers on tap). Always a great experience in terms of food, drink and service. Bonus that it's located in Montavilla neighborhood.
Had their white chocolate raspberry pancake and it was just AMAZING!!!!! The place is always packed but the food is worth the wait. Highly recommend
Perfect lunch spot. Perfect rotating craft/rare beer selection. Perfect selection of lessner known but high rated/reasonably priced wines. Red or white wines! New owner who extremely friendly and knows his beers and wines. Excellent chef and compliments the wine menu. Friendly, the best dog friendly as well, on Park Ave.
Hello Everyone We are having a fabulous special this weekend: 1 whole Pollo combo, fries, and your choice of salad ( house, greek or caesar) with a 2 liter of Inka Kola. topped with a delicious crema volteada for only $32.00 ( includes tax) ....Get it while it last!  Have an awesome weekend and see you here to try the only PERUVIAN ROTISSERIE CHICKEN inTOWN!!!
The Greek burger was delicious. The flavor combination was perfect... it had tzatziki sauce, pickled red onions, feta cheese, arugula, and cucumbers with the lamb meat. We also ordered the chili cheese fries. For 5 bucks, we got a huge bowl of thin cut fries with chili cheese on the side! They also have chipotle ketchup, horseradish mustard, and these very tasty pickles to accompany your burger.  The service was great and the restaurant's atmosphere was nice. I will definitely be back!
Great quiet place for a cup of coffee/tea to escape Downtown Crossing. They have great sandwiches but what keeps me coming back is the service! The first time coming in it was pouring, the (I believe) owner handed me a towel to clean up with and by my third time my tea was on the house. The following week I brought several friends who ordered drinks and food. After hanging out there, the same worker came over with a complementary plate of fruit. This is a great place to visit and will recommend to anyone looking for a cafe in the heart of downtown!
I don't know why this place has such low reviews. I just went yesterday and stayed for four hours on a date. Time of my life! It was Monday so they were running the $10.95 unlimited bowling, pool, laser tag plus a game card per person. Talk about a good deal. My date and I played bowling til our thumbs hurt, I whipped him in pool and we even did the gravity ropes. It was kinda scary for me but fun nonetheless. This is a such a nice date spot!   Afterwards we had food and OMG the wings were sooooo good! If you're into wings try the sweet baby rays flavor. You won't be able to stop eating. Also...don't get me started about the cinnamon sugar donut holes. I was in heaven the whole time I was eating them lol. I didn't expect the food to be so good at an entertainment center of this size but they did not disappoint!  I will most definitely be back. When I have kids I'll bring them too ;)
Went for lunch one day and was instantly greeted. Staff is really awesome, and they make sure you are good! I decided to try the half sandwich and soup. I wasn't really too big on the lobster bisque it really tasted like it came out of a can. My chicken salad sandwich was very tasty and the bread was freshly toasted. I chose to eat out on the balcony which looks over congress, or you can eat on the back balcony. The vibe here is super chill.
This place has the best $2 salsa verde and amazing and very inexpensive tacos in the eating area. Kind of like a South Austin secret.
Great place and great customer service burgers are are always juicy  not much more I can ask for...great job guys
I can't say enough good things about this vet hospital   The vets are fantastic and know their stuff   They don't talk down to you and they explain everything   When recommending treatment they have never pushed anything on us  The staff is always helpful and friendly and knows our doggies   Have been bringing our dogs here for ten years.
Greetings,  A dozen birthday partiers recently attended Ben Bailey's late show. Nice selection of snacks, a good beer selection, and very attentive staff were highlights of the pre-function in the north bar. Blazers game was on the television.  Reserved seating provided a good look at the stage.  Warm-up acts were entertaining.  Headliner was really funny; lots of local humor, too.  Prices were reasonable.  Great evening for a date of group outing,  We will  be back!
PERFECT FOR YOUTH - TWEEN BIRTHDAY PARTY  I booked my daughter's 7th bday party online with MVP with ease.  We had never been to MVP, so we visited the place a week before the party-- the staff was very friendly and showed me the party room/ laser tag 'arena'/ arcade.  I appreciated that.  On the day of the party, we arrived and were greeted just as we walked in and teamed up with a staff member (Marina) who was going to lead the party-- and she did a great job.  The party ran like clockwork, with all decisions in my hands.  Marina told me what was up next (laser tag game, pizza, cake, another game) but let me decide when I wanted to move to the next step.  Not once did I feel pressured or stressed out (and with 4 kids of my own, that happens quick!).  We brought our own cake, but that is all that is allowed-- no outside food, so I couldn't offer snacks to the parents waiting during the laser tag games.  It's a minor thing, but it would've been nice.  The pizza provided was good, but the ice cream was DELICIOUS!  Big servings enough to feed two!  The parents who passed on the cake couldn't resist the ice cream!  MVP was definitely a good choice for 7+ year olds.  The laser tag area is 6000 sq ft with two floors-- it's a series of many, many rooms instead of an 'arena' with obstacles.  The laser tag transforms to a haunted house during this time of year, and the creepy skeleton heads, etc spooked a couple of birthday guests-- either that, or they were just scared of the dark ;)  The 'arcade' mostly has games that give tickets like at Chuck E Cheese-- definitely not the biggest arcade, but it was nice to leave the party room's door open and let the kids run back and forth between the rooms.  We didn't play mini golf due to the weather, but MVP gave us a pass for future visits as well as discount cards for all of our guests.  The parents were more than eager to take one!  It's a cozy place so you won't lose your kid, it's clean, and the staff is very energetic and friendly.  We would definitely do it again.
I've had many beauty services done by Kiki and she does a very good job. She's very professional and educates while she engages your beauty. She's my "go to" makeup artist and always makes me look stunning. I had my eyebrows shaped and tinted last summer for vacation and the tint lasted the entire time I was away so I was pleased. It was very easy, I didn't have to worry about shaping my brows (which takes a while to make perfect).   Lash extensions: I love lashes, and I've gotten the natural set and classic full set which both came out very nicely. She also suggests that you use a special mascara that won't effect the lashes, and she gives you a lesson how to maintain your lashes.  I appreciate when people can educate their clients it tells me that they really have a passion for what they do and care about how their special gift can make others happy.   Her studio is very clean and sterile. It's very peaceful and comfortable. I must admit I've fallen asleep a few times. But more importantly I always wake up more beautiful than I was! Lol Kiki has a great personality and I highly recommend her services.
Weirdest dining experience in a long time. First of all this place looks like a pretty close replica of the bar from True Blood, except Revere style. After waiting for the bartender, who was working the crowd, I had the feeling this is the kind of place where everyone knows your name. By the way the staff was attractive. About 10 minutes into my visit this guy comes in with a backpack full of porn he was trying to sell, hasn't he heard of the internet? Next what looks like a kickball team walks in, then some guy setting up karaoke, and a table full of old school birthday hats on an empty table   Besides the entertainment above the food was pretty good:  Steak Tips - The tips came with a really good marinade, some grilled veggies that I didn't eat, and these fried that reminded me of Burger King fries.  Pizza - Believe it or not the pizza here is fantastic and they have a $4.99 special on them on Monday, Wednesday, and Friday. I'll definitely be back for that.
As previously mentioned, Wok N Roll is cheap, so fast it's scary, and pretty damn good!  This is definitely not the "take your parents to dinner" place, but if you need some good, cheap food, Wok N Roll is your place.  A huge portion of chinese duck and rice for around 5 bucks? Count me in!
Medina has a nice classy-but-casual vibe, making it an ideal spot for lunch with coworkers.   Even though I'm not usually a waffle fan, their pistachio-rosewater-white chocolate sauce is really heavenly.  I stopped here yesterday for an early workday lunch and ordered the paella.  It was delicious, but be warned -- it's not a traditional version.   While I certainly can't call myself a paella connoisseur, Medina definitely makes a loose interpretation of the dish.  Theirs consists of chorizo, watercress, avocado, and a fried egg on a bed or orzo. The orzo really surprised me, as I didn't notice it when I read the menu, and I wasn't expecting to have pasta for lunch.  Also, the big chunks of watercres were awkward to eat. But hey, it was really yummy in an upscale comfort food kind of way!
Awesome food,  quick service, polite, very clean had the chicken enchiladas excellent. Tomato basil to die for.
This restaurant is hands down the best restaurant I've ever been to. Our server, Sarah, was amazing. We wanted to get a margarita pitcher and she recommended the blood orange which was delicious. I ordered the Paella de Oba and oh my was it delicious! The portions are large and well worth the price you pay. There is nothing worse than going to a fancy restaurant and paying 40$ for your plate and still being hungry after eating it. You will NOT experience that here! Every single plate we had on that table was packed full of flavor and was so extremely delicious I will go to Portland just to go to this restaurant. I am praying they open one in Seattle!!
Where else can you enjoy a full dinner menu at half past eleven pm while enjoying the sounds and taste of my guilty pleasures playing in the back bar; Kesha, Gaga, Britney and of course, A warm pecan pie with a scoop of Vanilla Ice.   Fun crowd, great service, great food and a wonderful time in Boston.   A must: spaghetti and meatballs just how it should be. Soup of the day with fries. Truffled mashed with a piece of medium rare filet.
The salon is located by CVS and Edgewater High in College Park. The salon is in the middle of a chain of other shops with parking in the back and parallel parking in front.  Salon is really nicely decorated, serves wine/water and is customary to other College Park salons.  Seeta did my hair and is now my go to stylist. She cut, colored and conditioned my hair and did a great job! Very impressed! My hair stayed soft for about a week after which is extraordinarily long so love that conditioner.
been here a few times now, mostly for drinks, every time I've had great bartenders and even when they're busy, they are pretty good with getting to you in a timely manner.  food has even good too.. maybe typical tourist spot, but a good place to venture to if you're entertaining guest. (great view of the pier too.)
Upfront confession:     I've only bought one other car in my life, and that was in the days when it was still appropriate for my dad to go with me to the car dealership. Buying a car can be an intimidating process.  I've had my heart set on becoming a Fiat owner since back in June, which is when I first learned of their re-entry into the US market. And the awesome folks at the Kelly Fiat Studio couldn't have made it easier to make my dream come true.  I have to seriously wonder if the salesman I worked with, Dave S., is psychic.  Armed only with the information that I wanted a standard transmission 'pop' 500 model - he led me to the exact car that I had been building obsessively on the Fiat USA website. Creamy white, with a two-tone red & cream interior and a panoramic sunroof. I was doubtful they would even have one in those exact specifications on the lot!   I was comfortable throughout the entire process - from lot, to test drive, to financing, to the moment two days after my initial visit when I returned to pick up my new love.  Every open, responsive person I worked with helped to create a fun, no pressure, no drama environment. The Kelly dealerships motto is "we make it easy", and they do.   I'm committed to dealing with Kelly Fiat for at least the next three-years of service for my new car, and I look forward to updating my review as I work with the service staff. I also have a feeling that I may continue a much longer relationship with the folks here as the past three months in my new car may have converted me to a true Fiat devotee.
Great food and service. Beef Milanese and Duck Breast were outstanding. Baked Brie appetizer needed to bake a bit longer. Reasonably priced for what you get
The beds at this location are decent.  Bulbs work, buttons work, no issues.  The people who work here are pleasant, friendly and remember me which I really appreciate.  If there is an issue, they make it right. Also, another appreciation is that they don't try to pressure me into buying lotions. I am allergic to them and have been told at other location that I won't tan as well if I don't use them.  Which is a load of BS. So, no pressure = happy customer.  Keep up the good work here, thank you!
Loved my suit! I've gotten so many compliments for it...Kathryn Walsh helped me pick from the various options; she's very knowledge and helpful.  I ordered 4 shirts, and one was delivered and after confirmation of fit, the rest are being tailored. Once I get these I'll update my review along with additional details.
After visiting for the 2nd time, I'm bringing this up to 4/5 stars. Our previous "not so great experience" was due to the service issues and NOT the food! Went again with a friend on a Saturday night last year, and we had a great time! Food is ALWAYS great & I recently just got take-out from there without any issues or complaints at all! Excellent tasting food with decent pricing & portions!  Thanks
Their breakfast tacos are HUGE and only $1.95 per taco! I thought I had accidentally ordered a burrito when I first saw the chorizo, egg, and cheese taco I had ordered. The salsas are fresh made and delicious, as well!!  Also try the huevos rancheros, great choice! :)
A nice find, recommended by our Airbnb host. Friendly folks and great food!!! Danny was our server (lived in Redding too) he was great, friendly and made great suggestions!!! Ask for him!!! Amazing food!!! Great environment... don't let the exterior keep you away!!!
Great breakfast spot for not a lotta money. Basic and solid breakfast menu.   The side potatoes about did me in. I'm usually not a fan of what I call 'filler food' on my breakfast plate, but these potatoes were addictive. I figured out why, the potato wedges are deep fried. Genius.   Genie's features a hefty selection of breakfast cocktails, from which I didn't sample. Seemed like drinking at 9:30 a.m. on a Wednesday may have slowed down my day. Although the rest of the dining area appeared to be imbibing. Guess I need to jump on the Portland morning drink bandwagon.
OMG I just love this spa! Caroline is the owner and really knows her stuff. She turned me onto some wonderful organic products by Dr. Hauschka. I have to say my face has not looked this good since probably before puberty.  I also have had several hydrafacials and have loved the results. Leaves my face fresh and clean looking.  If you are looking for a place for overall improvement of your skin and new knowledge about what works best for you, then I highly recommend Bali Spa!
They always have great fresh food and large helpings for a great price. If you want somewhere to sit down and have a hearty meal with family or friends then stop in and dive in to some great food. They serve different main dishes through the week so it is good to go a few days to see the variety or just ask them. They have great fresh brewed sweet tea to go with the meal! The desserts are pretty awesome too. One of the things that I really like is you can see them prepping and making the food right in front of you. This is real cooked food not prep and shipped for mass heating and selling. The sizes or the sides and main dishes are large as well so be ready to take home some leftovers.
It's simple: If you're looking for dynomite pole heels (read: the prettiest and most upscale selection of stripper heels), pole fitness outfits, or cute lingerie, this is the spot. Peiod. No "adult toys" sold here. No nonsense, just a soothing and well curated boutique.  Micah (sp?) the owner is particularly rad and familiar with this town so she's as good as giving "try this on" advice as life advice.  Get there!
I contacted Jeff Kelly from Kelly legal for helping me in a dispute about a property that I recently purchased. Even in the initial consultation Jeff had provided me with key inputs to help me with this and the next steps that I need should take. Thank you Jeff and will be in touch with you for next plan of action on this.
An offshoot of the mother restaurant downtown, this location offers a limited menu with pork/veggie/chicken and seafood ramens.   I don't eat pork, so I'm happy report that their AKA-Maru (ground chicken with seafood--actually, shrimp with heads on) is excellent, at about $14. Comes with a wedge of lemon. The ground chicken "gunk" really gives you an excuse to lap up all the broth.   The kids ordered the Shoyu (around $10). The noodles paired well with the broth, which is on the rich (but not oily) side. Daughter likes the fact that the toppings include green and red onion.
My best friend treated me here for breakfast for my Birthday and it was good. Be sure you try get the strawberry orange juice!!!!
Best cappuccino in Portland, hands down.
It's an classic style italian food. I like, you can't expect a super surprise nice meal, but you will also not being disappointed ! Good place to celebrate.
Ice cream with alcohol in it!! What's not to love! I tried the ButterSCOTCH and loved it. So tasty! I would like to come back for the RUM Raisin. Dessert with a kick! Yummy! Also, the interior was has Adventures of Tin Tin comic and that's pretty cool too!
Pizza hut is great in USA, its a different menu this prices are really cheap.
Great luxury and friendly staff! I love the luxury setting and the comfort it allows you to splurge on! No other theater will ever do!
Popped in on a cold, cold night. As a Texan out of her element, pizza was a warm comfort food I was more than willing to partake in. It's kind of a hole in the wall on Pearl Street that sells pizza by the slice or as a whole pie. The crust was satisfyingly doughy and the red sauce is tangy and warm. Perfect for the biting weather. The dude behind the counter gave a strange answer when asked what his favorite was: cheese pizza with hot sauce. Really? I'm not going to order cheese pizza with hot sauce lol.   Our friend took him up on it, though. The cheese pizza was good. It had that melted cheese pizza smell that would make the ninja turtles crap their pants, if they wore any. The "hot sauce" was a warmed cup of buffalo sauce. Gross! We got the supreme pizza and a Hawaiian pizza. The supreme pizza was loaded with bell peppers and olives. Our other friend loved the Hawaiian pizza (I'm not a fan of warm fruit).   The water and soda is self-serve. There isn't much seating in the back. Little pricey at close to $20 per full pizza, but they're big and filling slices. Nice job workin' the ovens, guys!
Best cocktails. Didn't eat but the Irish coffees were the business. Love the decor and we were quickly greeted and served.
I think I saw an advertisement of it, but may be not. Just remember oyster bar in Salem, than  find it on Yelp and It was really a place where I want to have Saturday lunch! I love oysters and it was a great deal of it, I tried different types there. And a main dishes was also big and tasty. A lot of people but it is easy to have a table for two.
I tend to avoid wine shops because I don't know a lot about wine and I feel like an idiot when I walk in the door.  But House Wine has a feel to it that's not intimidating, and the people who work there have no attitude whatsoever about the wine ignorant.  They offered me samples, and showed me around, without ever pressuring me to buy anything.  It was a Market Day so I got a Wayward Fizz and sipped it outside on their little patio and it was a really nice end to my morning.  I didn't get a chance to try the cheese plate, but it was nice they had a few food items you can buy, and I am sure I'll be back.
Chili's is one of my all time favorite places to go and it has been for years!! The avocado steak is the bomb too!!
Just had my first Roxy's Grilled Cheese.  A-mazing!  Absolutely loved it, great idea & great food!
Good Thai curry, especially red with duck and yellow with pork. Tempura was cooked perfectly. The spider roll was delicious and desserts (coconut custard and sticky rice with mango) were amazing. Service was less than superb, but got the job done. Over all a great place.
This place is fantastic!!!!!!!!! I have been here a few times and its wonderful. Try the Nutella milkshake! And all the burgers are wonderful... Sweet potato fries too..
A shop like this is a dangerous, dangerous thing to place on a university campus.  When finals roll around and the stress is high, a line of anxious students piles out the door in hopes of sweet sugar therapy.  My favorite remedy is simple: vanilla on vanilla.
It was snowing and we were cold. We stumbled upon this wonderful restaurant. The food is delicious, especially the Thai Red Curry. The pho is also quite good and service was great. Overall, a wonderful meal. We will definitely come again.
Best pedicure ever!  Tina is very good.  I did not have to wait and she took her time.
Food was delicious, specifically the tagliatelle pasta dish. Service was excellent- our waitress, Missy, recommended a great bottle of wine to go with our meals. We live in the Benjamin and will definitely be back!
These guys are amazing, they saved me thousands of dollars today, and may have saved a life!  My daughter is looking to buy a first car, she found a nice looking car she really liked, so we took it to the team at Midas for a pre-purchase inspection, and thank God we did.  Joe and the team found all sorts of things wrong, and not just little things, turns out this car was a death trap.  Several thousands of dollars would have been spent on this car, and that's assuming the car didn't kill my daughter first...  THANK YOU MIDAS, YOU GUYS ROCK!!!!
Very upscale - I took my mother here for lunch and was wowed by the decor, the renovations certainly spiffied the place up.   The food was very good - in large portions, but was not cheap.   Nice bar area, lots of flatscreens all around. All in all, I would probably come here again just for a beer and some bar food, not for a full meal.
Love this place!  Great neighborhood sushi place.  The service is stellar, the owner makes this place.  I eat here a least once a week!
The BEST and most AUTHENTIC Italian cuisine around!!! My FAVORITE SPOT!! My fiancé and I came here on our first date and the night was nothing less than perfect!! I would HIGHLY recommend coming here!
Food was fantastic and service was quick. Yama was our chef in hibachi and he was great. Can't wait to comeback.
The food may seem a little pricey for the pizza itself, but once you factor in the restaurant's ethos (pay and benefits for employees, quality sourced ingredients), it is worth it! They are also a pleasure to work with when catering for lunches or dinners. The 4 vegetable pizza was the favorite among our group, after that the 4 cheese. Plain, margarita and sausage and onion.  They also have sandwiches and salads, if you want to eat a bit lighter.
Absolutely my favourite go to in Gastown. Everywhere else is nice for a short while, but the service and menu has always been consistent and optimal. Warm interior and really friendly service staff. Absolutely 10/5 stars. Seriously... Go in with a great attitude and an empty stomach and leave feeling like a superstar.
I was very sad to realize a childhood favorite, Wellesley House of Pizza, had closed.   But Cooks Window is a worthy successor of the space.   Delicious pizza, fresh meats for sandwiches, (fantastic  Italian in particular) and fast, friendly service.   Fair prices too.  Great spot!
Oh Jeez. I came here with my boyfriend not expecting too much. I love sushi, but my experiences always yield mixed feelings because sushi is usually really pricey and I always tend to eat too much... Also, I'm from San Diego so cheap sushi comes by pretty easily and often. I think what I love about this place the most is that it is able to be affordable, AND it has some of the freshest sushi I have EVER had.  Most of the time when you pay 8 bucks a roll for sushi...you're gonna get what you pay for...but not at Fish Market! We tried 2 of their Maki specials-  the flaming maki and the scallop and sea urchin maki -and we were BLOWN AWAY. The one that had fried sweet potatoes...seriously I think I died of happiness after I had a roll.  I have never had raw scallops before and the ooygooey idea of it sort of scared me, but once I tried the yuzu leaves and that cute little bayberry, I was reassured that whatever the texture is, the flavor would make up for. And I was SO RIGHT~! I'm a huge fan of their Seared Salmon Maki as well. They put this really great mustard mayo on too that made me want to lick the plate clean.  Tea is only $1. The service is great- the owner is actually one of the chefs who stands there and makes the rolls. He answers all of your questions and is super nice. Aside from the fact the food is really great, the service is amiable, the ambiance is peaceful and it's close by, I just love small, humble establishments like this. You can tell the owner/chef really takes pride in what he does and he isn't a snob about it. He interacts with his customers and he really does give them the best product he can.
Incredibly good food, and incredibly good service.  We catered from here for a wedding celebration, and Christina and her staff exceeded our expectations.  I would highly recommend Me So Hungry for catered events.
Awesome food and the people who work there are really friendly. You can eat inside at the small counter or you can order at the window. Either way it's speedy service and it's delicious.
Very Japanese - closest to a real Japanese Izakaya so far. For a relatively authentic Japanese experience including the Japanese on the menu and on the walls, a great place. Service was friendly and responsive. Specials were excellent. I actually loved that they focused on a limited number of classics rather than being experimental and "off".   Casual and authentic. Highly recommend for anyone yearning for a traditional and comforting taste of normal Japan.
We went on a super sweltering Sunday evening. I mention the heat because either their HVAC was out of commission or struggling, but it got pretty toasty inside--it could also have been that they were filled to capacity.  Regardless, the meal was delightful! Of especial greatness was the Paella, the Patatas Bravas, and THE FLAN! Oh, the flan! Through some culinary magic, it was like they'd married flan to your favorite cinnamon breakfast cereal. Delicious! We also had their Churros and Chocolate Mousse, both of which were good, but they were plainly outclassed by the Flan.  Service was excellent and of special note was the brilliant idea to have a cook stationed outside the restaurant making the paella in a giant pan by the front doors. It added to the atmosphere and spread the smell of the food through the area, and that guy was the hero of the restaurant.  One final note: the chorizo they use was house-made and more tender and delicious than I've generally found Spanish chorizo to be.
As someone that has lived in Hawaii and Japan for a number of years, I have high standards for Japanese food and sushi. This is the best sushi and Japanese food I have had anywhere in Texas. The staff was great! They met or exceeded every expectation I had for a service staff. Great people.  My first visit was a birthday gift. Less than a month later, I took my wife again and plan on continuing to go and try all of the cuisine. This is a place I highly recommend to family and friends.
Beautiful and interesting museum.  This was a historical gem that I visited since I was a child. Came again to revisit on my vacation. Being on a hilltop, the entire city was fantastic. Although it was windy and cold.  Entrance was about $10 per adult. You get a tour if there are volunteers. I suggest you pay to see the inside. I was still impressed with the home itself. You can tour the groundskeeper home and walk around the mansion. it is totally worth seeing if you visit Portland.  Get there early. Parking may be a gamble.
My first time at bodega since the remodel. The bar moved to the other side of the room... If that tells you anything.  There is no better place for happy hour in this city. 4-8 M-F you get half priced drafts, $3 well liquor, and $2 off wine.  Or to mention that the food is off the chain, although a tad on the expensive side.
you can lost at this place... but they have everything for every room in your house - assembly and patience required ..
I came in as a drop in.  Casey Castleberry is a badass coach!  Even though I wasn't a member he took the time to give me some awesome cues on my push jerk that I continue to use every time I do that movement.  Also, the overall vibe there is super relaxed and friendly, but at the same time you can tell they take their crossfitting seriously.  EVERY SINGLE PERSON in the class (about 15) came up to me and shook my hand before the WOD.  I thought that was super cool.  Highly recommend this box.
Jared is a fabulous place to fill your every jewelry need. As soon as you walk in they approach you in a non-pushy manner; offering bottled water or cappucino.  They're willing to take the time to make sure that you are happy with what you buy.  We purchased the extended warranty and have been back a few times since to have our rings inspected and cleaned.  Every time, they have greeted us with that same hospitality that keeps us a loyal customer of Jared!
This place is really good. They have original rolls that surprisingly arent based off California rolls! The service is great, the restaurant is clean and the food is great. I wasn't a fan of their soy sauce though. Had a weird taste..
Stronghorn is awesome! Austin has tons of gyms, bootcamps etc, but I have finally found a fun, super-intense workout that is quick and dirty.  Not only is the workout great, but there is no commitments, unlike some gyms that have super high prices per month unless you commit for a year, it's still cheaper than camp gladiator with a 6 month commitment.  Stronghorn is still less than 2 years new and growing very quickly so there will be more locations and times soon to make it easier to make a class.  Jess, the founder, is genuinely one of the nicest, most fun people I know.  He is great at motivating you to push yourself beyond what you thought your body could do and making you laugh and smile while doing it.  The group is also still relatively small and has lots of social events, happy hours, and other nutritional challenges.    If you're looking for a new fitfam in Austin, Stronghorn will be a great new home for you.
First of all, this is a beer drinker's heaven, the beer selection is huge and quite impressive.  The food was very good too, just not a huge selection, hence why I only give it 4 stars.  It's basically just small plates, salads, sandwiches and a few other things.  The service was good, despite it being busy.  The food is priced fairly. Overall a very good experience, will be going again very soon.
I saw this place on Unique Sweets before I came to Portland for the first time, and usually when I see shows on television I make it a point to stop in.  Um...worth it!  I ordered the passion fruit donut, the bourbon, blueberry and basil donut, and one with an orange glaze (can't remember the name).  I've only gotten to the passion fruit one so far, but it was delicious.  I know I did the others a disservice by not eating them right away, but I wasn't too terribly hungry at the time of purchase.  Trust me...they'll be ravaged this evening.   Nice work Blue Star!
First had Gus's Fried Chicken in Memphis, Tennessee and I absolutely loved it. When the Austin location opened up, I ran straight there. Really, their fried chicken is amazing. So crispy, juicy, and busting with flavor. The only negative thing is that, (I'm not sure how b/c the Austin location was really good) but the original location in Memphis was a bit better. A bit more crunchier and juicier. But both locations were the bomb digity.
Accidentally stumbled upon this place on a walk.  Went in to escape the rain and get a coffee (cash only and don't look for milk or cream cause it's all vegan). Wow. Certainly an eclectic group of individuals hanging out here. And I do mean hanging out because it didn't seem like anyone was going anywhere or had anyplace to go anytime soon.  A little sad (some people were obviously struggling and on hard times) but also refreshing to know that places like this exist. It's real. I got the sense that this place cares and has compassion toward people.  I liked it, energy was good, people were friendly, music was cool and the coffee was excellent. They also have some games and lots of reading material on nihilism and anarchism and other radical topics. Kidding (sort of) but I'd return. Interesting place.
I really enjoyed the food here. I was looking for just a really great burger and wings and Sidebar had it. I really liked the location too!
From the creators of Hungry Mother...yet another restaurant that can do no wrong for me!   I had the Tabasco honey fried chicken, snappy's famous pork chop sandwich, and the B+B pickles followed by the preacher cookies.   The sandwich was amazing! It had a mcdonalds type bun (in a good way!) with chili, cole slaw, and a tender, thin pork chop.   It was my favorite!   The preacher cookies will be familiar if you've ever been to hungry mother. They're the ones they give out with the check. If you're like me, you've always hoped you'd someday be able to order a whole bunch of them and now you can! $3.50 gets you 3 big squares of the stuff. They're so good, you'll eat them with your eyes closed.   I've heard the ambiance described as "hipster dive bar", but I feel that puts it in a negative light. To me it feels homey. It's an unpretentious dark-ish hangout space with booths you can hide away in as well as space to be rowdy and play pinball and pool!   Be sure to avoid the crazy dinner rush and I'm sure you'll love it too!
Excellent place to be. Above all the service on the restaurant side is excellent. When I can risk the carb count the fried Chicken is the best I have had in Portland. the kickin boot burger is one of my favorites. I am an Iced tea snob and they do it right. the Cobb Salad is excellent. I am not much into BBQ food except on occasion and when I have had it here it was very good.
They have gift certificates at the downtown costco where you save a nice percentage off your meal.
After living in Boston for the past two years, I've heard that Santarpios is THE spot for pizza. I also heard that i should go to the OG location in east Boston for the OG delicious pizza. So i did. And it was amazing. Ordered the lamb tips and 2 pizzas. It was very hungry but thats not why it was so good. The food is really excellent and i liked the atmosphere of the place. I kind of stumbled over my words and confused the waiter and i think i annoyed him a little bit. When we were done i handed him my credit card like an idiot and he reminded me it was cash only. No problem, ATM in the back. I really liked this place and i wanted to support it so i left a bunch of extra cash on the table. Hope the waiter forgives me and my bad people skills. I will be back again to enjoy this fine establishment!
It's not just a moto shop! The cafe is wonderful. So spacious and the people are so welcoming and inviting. The shop and the folks who work in it are not pretentious AAAAND the coffee is phenomenal, y'all. That can sometimes be hard to find in the coffee world. They know what's up. If you're looking for a great space to hang out and get an excellent cup of coffee or an espresso drink--even if you don't know a lick about motorcycles--go here.
I used them clean the windows of a very picky customer of mine last week. Did a great job!  Showed up on time and finished quickly!
Great coffee and patio!  Friendly and knowledgable baristas (is that a unisex term?!).  It would be 5 stars, but they allow SMOKING on the patio and it's awful!  No, I would NOT like a side of poison air with my latte, thanks.   If they get rid of the smoking (and enforce it), I'll be a regular customer!  Until then, I'll probably get some fresh air at Dancing Goats.
Went to Bartaco last night and was blown away! I am always on the lookout for amazing Mexican food in my travels. This is it!  If you are tired of the same old enchilada plates with the same old clump of beans and rice please try this place. The restaurant is perfect,sat outside with heat lamps and blankets. 3 separate people-I am assuming one was the manager came over to make sure everything was fine. Norm are server was outstanding. The flavor of the food was over the top! From salsa to fresh guacamole,tamales and grilled corn cut off the cob! I can't leave out the amazing tacos. We bought the 'tray' option and had a wonderful selection some with pork , ribeye and fish. Amazing! Finished with perfect churros with melted chocolate. Oh wait, I forgot to mention the amazing margarita- perfect blend,not too sweet or sour but with a nice kick. Do yourself a favor and go. I wish they had a restaurant in Seattle where I live!
Undoubtedly the BEST airport transfer shuttle I've used ever, anywhere!  Prompt , courteous, excellent service !  Hawar , the person who drove us, was very pleasant.  We used this service for our ride back from PDX in snowy Dec.  Would recommend this business anytime.
Admittedly, it has been a long time since I was here.  I don't like doing reviews like this, but I rode by tonight while in town and the same lady that worked the counter 10 years ago was there tonight.  This place made me love Tabouleh Salad.  The other items on the menu are very good too.    There are a few tables or you can take out.  They make everything for you while you wait, so it can be slow.  If you're in the Westerville area, this place is worth a stop.
She's great.  She talks to you like she's been your friend for years... which is exactly what you need when someone's going to be exploring all around in there... you know what I'm talking about.
I have been thinking about the Hemp Milk Latte I had at Sunny Day's for weeks now. It was delightful and perfect! I've been drinking soy au laits and lattes for over 8 years  so I was very excited to try something different like Hemp milk.  The barista was very knowledgeable about coffee and the execution of each cup is definitely worth the wait.   Hands down one of my best coffee experiences,ever!
I give this place 5 stars for the atmosphere and wonderful customer service. We also didn't have to wait very long for our food.  SN: This location has free parking and is located outside of Perimeter mall next to Urban Outfitters.
Great service topped off this experience. The BEST lobster bisque I've ever had, and the lobster roll wasn't far behind. The first 5 star rating I've given, and it's well deserved! Next time I'm in the area I will definitely make it a point to return!
Best campus cafe. Perhaps also the healthiest. The rating would be a 4 if I rated it as a restaurant, but this takes into consideration the fact that it is not.
I have had Zoom before (another state) and this experience was quite different.  I didn't feel like I was in a factory. The office was comfortable and clean.  Lilia was very welcoming and her confidence and professionalism is assuring.  She provide a lot of information about the process and after care.  She offered some extra treatment items but was not pushy at all in "selling" them.  Also important, i was more than pleased with the results.  My teeth are pearly white again.  I highly recommend Pro Dental Hygiene and will definitely visit again!
Let me try and explain Gudrun in a way people will understand it.  Part apartment, part school, part kitchen, and part wine cellar where a bunch of friends (the staff) hang out, eat and drink gourmet, while dancing (yes, they did dance) to music on Friday nights. Oh, and the place is a FROMAGERIE. Fromage = Cheese in French. So yeah, they specialize in cheese.  Though a small joint, yes, you will feel the yuppie Yaletown vibe when you come in. I liked it for what it was.  Guys: Gudrun's a major score if if you take date to this place and she hasn't been - and especially if they (or you) know their favourite cheeses, 'cause I sure as hell didn't and definitely needed some staff recommendations from the owner Patrick.  But, if you're craving a steak 'n potatoes type meal, dine out somewhere else in Richmond first and then come back here for cheese, wine, and maybe even dessert. And don't complain about how much everything costs.  When my boyfriend Leo took me here, I just wanted food. And a non-alcoholic drink. I was eyeing the French Lemonade (the closest thing to juice) but it's $12. And I would have rather spent that money on the cheese, which we did. The staff gave us their latest 3-cheese combo from Canada ($22 with Sfilatino Italian baguette, assorted fruits, nuts, and preserves). I was a bit confused because I thought all the cheese came from Quebec (their monthly offerings are written on the chalkboard wall), but Patrick said two of them were actually from Italy and Spain.  Thank Wikipedia for knowing its cheese so I could get this right. Garrotxa - The exotic dancer from Spain. My fav on the plate. Rich and didn't need a companion except for a piece of bread to partner her with. Tallegio - The rare, dark and mysterious character from Italy. Alone, dry, but when combined with the flavours on the plate, a tiger in the bedroom of your mouth. Ile au grue - The reliable cheddar from Quebec, fine alone, but better with some bread or second flavours.  Now I am a woman who likes a party in my mouth while still feeling substantial. And a party indeed it was. I also ordered the veggie panini with side salad ($12) and since we sat at the bar, we saw the chef prepare everything. Salad - so simple and refreshing, a good cleanser for my palate in between cheese tastings.  The panini, with grilled mushrooms, cucumber, and zucchini, doesn't sound substantial, but all held together with gooey camembert cheese (Where from? Who cares?), it gave me the 5th star for this review.  If you're intrigued by the - er - intrigue of this place from what everybody else is saying about it, just throw your wallet-watching to the wind and give it a try. Aside from the food and incredible wine list (a rare beer selection too), they have some nice artwork, lighting fixtures and a chalkboard full of stuff you won't be able to pronounce. Tip: Friday special for January '11 is Blue Cheese Sliders.  If you're the type that wants a stomach-filler and doesn't give a crap about what you taste in your mouth, have your Steveston fish & chips and call it a day.
Tales of August 2008 Restaurant Week:  First Stop: Olive's!!!  With anticipation of greatness, I booked my Restaurant Week reservation for Olive's way in advance because it's impossible to get in here otherwise.  And now, I understand why!  I love the atmosphere!  The upscale, Soho-feel interior of Olives blends well with the charm of trendy brick elegance of City Sq.  I loved being able to glance outside and see the Bunker Hill monument.  The tables were all quite close together, which did make it a bit noisy and less private.  I personally feel that the bar area would've been better dedicated to more seating but then again I didn't have to wait for a table.  Then the food and service: Mm-mm good all around!  Thank you attentive staff for clearing my dishes promptly and taking the time to sweep away the table crumbs just in time for the next dish to arrive! These folks get five stars by themselves!  Honestly all the food looked great, but I highly recommend the flounder dish to anyone...the combination with the lobster macaroni and spinach is just awesome.  I was pretty full by the time it got around to dessert but the strawberry rhubarb did not disappoint!  I suspect that the tasty bread and olives (the place lives up to its name) and appetizer are to blame for my later lack of appetite...just a thought.  Olives was definitely well worth booking in advance! I would go back on a regular night for a special occasion, but need to deduct a star for the interior noise.
Easily the best bakery that ever lived. With the best baker at the wheel. I not only love their brownies and lime bars, and their super-sized (Michelle will have my head for calling it that) chicken salad sandwich, but I also loved the cakes that she made for my wedding. So did everyone that attended because there wasn't a crumb left to be seen. She has hired people that are polite and helpful to serve food that is delicious and of the best quality. Seriously, you have to see this sandwich. You will only get over the size of it once you get a taste of it.
Awesome selection of Vinyl Pops! So many that I'd never seen before. If there's one you want and you cannot find it anywhere else then I would check this store. Lots of fun anime and other pop culture items. Vast comic book selection. Nice open space too so you never feel like you're cramped trying to browse. The prices were reasonable and there's plenty of parking outside (it's located inside the East India Mall). I had a great time browsing and easily spent half an hour looking at all the displays.
Best Moco Loco in town! Good food and prices. The owner is friendly and helpful. The food tastes fresh and not like it just rolled off of the Sysco truck.  I am looking to trying the rest of the menu soon.
Best gluten free crust ever I have this pizza yummy!  Nobody can make delicious gluten free better than this
This becoming a go to place for us. We enjoy the setting, which is off the beaten path to some extent. There is good street parking. The staff is friendly and efficient in a quiet way. The menu is unique. The wine list is short, but good. It is not for everyone.   We have done both breakfast and lunch and have enjoyed both. I am sure we will come again.
Located at Mimi's trailer park eatery, The Big Kahuna is serving delicious Hawaiian food. I've never had Hawaiian before so I can't speak for it's authenticity but I can say its DELICIOUS. I would recommend the beef bulgogi with white rice and a cucumber salad. The Big Kahuna burger is also incredible. Its a burger with pork on top with a delicious spicy sauce. But I'm sure everything is good.  The service is great. The couple who owns the trailer (I would assume they are the owners) are very nice and willing to answer any questions.  An added bonus is that they use one of those square things for phones so you don't have to worry about getting cash ahead of time. The Big Kahuna is great and I'm pretty sure the most popular in the park! Check it out ya'll!
Fantastic food, very vegetarian friendly. I got the sweet potato tacos, they were delicious.  The happy hour is half off all draft beers... Amazing! Would recommend and will be back.
We loved this place. Delicious food, great atmosphere, good drinks. Everything we ordered was tasty. The spicy sauce on the potatoes would be delicious on a flip flop!   We will be back and definitely recommend it to everyone. Sit outside, it's lovely.
I admit, I'm a sucker for cute little places like this. The food was excellent, patio seating was nice and the service was really great. We actually visited two nights in a row because while we were there on Monday night, we learned that Tuesday nights are tapas nights, so I insisted we return.  The first night I tried their Monday night paella, I was not disappointed (see pic). Lobster, mussels and clams, oh my! Tuesday night we tried a sampling of the tapas menu, which there was plenty to choose from. All plates were devoured.
Best Asian food we've found in Austin for great prices!! Get the appetizer sampler. Love when they have live music, too.
The Peabody is everything a 5 star experience should be and it certainly comes with the price tag.  I'm so grateful that I got to experience this place via a business trip.  The staff is outstanding.  People want nothing more than to make you comfortable, entertain, and wine & dine you.  What more could you want?    The hotel is massive.  It probably takes a solid 7-8 minutes to talk from one side to the other.  The pool out back with the slide and grotto was nice, but I preferred the nearly olympic sized pool on the recreation level (life was hard making that decision).  There were hot tubs at the pools.  The room was amazing.  I slept on a cloud and watched tv while I took a shower, just because I could.   Beware that dining options aren't cheap but food is good.  Short walk to lots of shopping and free trolley rides to everything.
I liked Regeneration. The place is clean, cool, comfortable and the staff was nice and overall friendly.  I had gotten my first tattoo done here last year by Edwin and it came out really nice. Since it was my frist tattoo I wanted to make sure I was going to a place that made me feel comfortable and that was how Edwin had made me feel when I had gone to check the place out. He was nice, funny, and really attentive.   It's been a year and my tattoo still looks great.
If you are in Boulder and you love sandwiches go here. There is usually a long wait but worth it.
Melissa gave a fantastic massage! Front desk girl was so sweet & helpful! Great experience!
I've been to many Starbucks drive-thrus and this one is my favorite.  The employees are always extra friendly and the line goes so quick!
First time there since they opened last month. I wll be back. Pro's: Big, friendly bar with amazingly light and comfortable stools! Plenty of handbag hooks too  Good beer and a better special-made martini  I got the garen salad and hot dog, and both were huge...much bigger than other places, and fresh, tasty.  Friendly barkeep  Con: my friends burger was a hockey puck. She did order medium-well, but it came out waaay over/well done. She did not send it back but clearly did not enjoy it.  Perhaps the cook is new, or walked away too long, we will just try it again.
My lawn was a mess and the team behind JR's showed up the same day to offer their expertise and formulated a plan that worked within my tight budget and also with my lawn care needs. Dealing with my lawn was so stressful and these guys put me at ease, I'm excited for a beautiful well kept lawn! I have zoysia grass and they definitely sound like they understand what they are working with.
I recently moved to Burlington so have only been to this store a few times. They happen to carry Fromm 4 star, which is what I feed my dog, Piper. . The first time I went in, the lady behind the counter was very friendly and helpful. She even helped get me set up with a frequent buyer program offered through Fromm, which none of the other pet stores I've used have done. Last week I ran out of food. It happened to be during their move and they were in between stores. When I emailed one of the owners not only did she get right back to me, she offered to deliver the food to my home. You don't see customer service like that very often, especially from any of the big box pet stores. These are just the type of places we should be supporting. I would highly recommend this place to any dog owners.
Great delicious food and totally worth every penny! Definitely be returning for more! Yummy!!
The exterior might leave a lot to be desired but this place is a solid dive/late night grub spot. They have a good beer selection and the food is awesome. The best bang for your buck would be a build your own burger. (Try the fried chicken). Service is order at the bar which can get backed up on a busy night but I promise it's worth it. They also have a fun pinball selection.
This is where I take my cat for her yearly check-up. It's really inexpensive which is why I like it. They are open strange hours only 12 pm to 3 pm from Monday through Saturday I think. With extended hours on Wednesday evening. The vets there are knowledgeable but aren't really amiable.
There have been several restaurants in this location in the last 5 years but finally there is one that is meant to last!  One of the best lunch options around. If you are in Cagan's Crossings it in the Four Corners area around the lunch hours (11am-3pm), drop in and get the lunch special. They have changed their specials a little bit you can still get a full size entree for $6.99 (no more free sodas). Pretty affordable at lunch. For dinner, prices jump significantly but they have a decent happy hour to make up for it.   Food is good Mexican food for the area. Central Florida is not known for Mexican cuisine but there are a few hidden gems and this is one of them. If you are a salsa snob, then keep looking. The complimentary salsa tastes like it's from a jar. Otherwise, everything I have tried has been delicious.  They have amazing service and a friendly staff. They are not afraid to customize the food options for you and keep the customer happy. They have mariachi on Thursday evenings which isn't my thing but I know that many people enjoy it and it's free entertainment while you eat. If you are fortunate enough to become a regular, they will acknowledge you and treat you like part of their family. I know I'll be there weekly.
This was my first time and I wish I could give a 4.5 rating. 1. Ambience- was really good. Reached exactly at 5 pm, so they were still lighting candles at center piece 2. Menu -had lot of options espcially in appetizers which I felt was different thanother Thai reataurants I prefer 3. Ordered- chicken Satay as appetizer and chicken fried rice 4. Taste- of appetizer was really awesome.! You get kinda kabob (on skewers) and sauce which has more of coconut milk dominating. I felt its the usual Thai sauce. Entré was warm with right spice and taste, though I felt it had no vegetables except loads of onion and just few green peppers. Usually other restaurants do have brocolli, carrots, enough peppers. Thats only one point I didnt like much here 5. Quantity- was adequate, neither too much to stuff yourself for a dinner nor too less to make you hungry for another 6 hours for sure.!! 6. Price- felt a little pricy still not a complaint. 7. Next visit- i dont think I crave to eat here again. I still prefer another thai restaurant nearby. 8. Recommend- yes I do. Because definitely its good just that my expectation was little high.
This review is of the tower across the street from the main gambling building.   Building and 2 queen bedroom was in great appearance. Convenient access to the Skytrain; about 10-15 minutes into downtown Vancouver. 10 minute driving distance to a row of restaurants; also has a 24 hour fast food area in the hotel.   Other facilities, besides the Casino and concert area, includes a small workout area overlooking the pool. Workout room has cardio equipment (stair climb machines) and dumbbells up to 30lbs only. Pool area (open till midnight) is fun because of the waterslide. Pool is located near; and provides easy access, to the boardwalk.   The 2 negative points I have on this place is that  1) It's not in a complimentary area. I think with a more green area and/or retail stores surrounding the hotel, it would be more attractive.   2) You are near the airport. The few planes that I heard flying over the hotel was louder than I would have liked outside. In the hotel room (11th floor), I barely heard the planes. So warning to all those light sleepers. If you are a light sleeper, this may not be the best place; unless you try your luck with a lower level floor, which may help reduce the sound even more and completely. FYI - they sell ear plugs in the sundry shop located in the main building (which is open till 2am).  Overall, I would stay there again if there are good deals.
Love this place - favorite nail salon in Austin!! The atmosphere is awesome and the staff are all great. Have never had a bad experience here or anything negative to say.
Best deal on beans in town! The Breakfast Blend is sweet like French toast but with a bold flavor that can wake the dead for that much needed Monday morning jolt. Nothing compares to you, Affogato (AKA Iforgotto)
We needed passport renewals for our 13,11 year olds as well as a new passport for our 3 year old.  Came with everything filled out. We were a little worried since we were arriving at 3:20 (they close at 4) We were out of there in 45 min. They were kind and the service was great.  I would highly recommend.
I had a great experience with Austin's Custom Tops from the measuring to the installation. Kevin steered me in the right direction when it came to choosing the right kind of materials for my bathroom countertops. Great communication, always punctual, excellent work.
Took my girlfriend here on Valentine's Day and it was the perfect location. The restaurant is an older house renovated with a European feel. There are about 20-30 tables inside; very quiet and romantic. The lighting and general ambiance is perfect for a quiet dinner. Food is excellent; I had the lamb chops and my girlfriend had the scallops, both were very good. I highly recommend this spot for a quiet evening out.
Best burrito I've ever had in a long time. And I've been to San Diego and Los Angeles. This is a must stop for great Mexican food
Yay! So yummy! I love this place!!! We went on the $5 Pho Wednesday night special. I am so happy we live so close. I know we will be back. The server was so friendly, not just to us but observing his interaction with all the guests I wasn't surprised there were so many people inside. This place on the outside looks so tiny and when you go in, it's huge. We got the small veggie pho and fried tofu pho bowls and they were giant. I saw a woman eating the large and there is no way I could eat that. The small is large enough. Obviously big portions. If you want something vegetarian I recommend the veggie pho not the tofu. It has tons of veggies and if you want tofu, just add it. Wow! Very happy and I look forward to returning. I really hope they keep the time frame of the special till 9pm since I get off work late. Later would be nice too or doing it on other days as well. I have already told friends about this wonderful place. Please go and support this tasty community.
We showed up near closing and this staff took care of us as if they'd shut the place down for us! Excellent food--try the Brussels sprout hash and flank steak-- and drink (that Black Unicorn, tho...) paired perfectly with the amazing customer service here. We were visiting town but all of us wish we lived here--We'd be regulars! Thanks, guys, for taking good care of us!
I always get excellent and friendly service here. This morning is no different. The baristas are always so sweet and on the ball  There aren't many seats here so this Starbucks is more of a take your coffee to go place.
Very warm vibes from this coffee shop on Pearl. Really nice to come here after dinner.   Most places close early, but not The Laughing Goat! After feeling ushered out of the restaurant in which we had dinner, we still wanted a little coffee/dessert. We made our way over to the Laughing Goat.   The coffee was very good and the carrot cake was a solid 7 out of 10.  Seriously consider visiting the Laughing Goat for a great hang out spot to digest your dinner and hold a little more conversation with your date!
wings was great  and friendly place will def visit again... i just hate it's in a ghetto area...
Oh my.  It seems that there are plenty of reviews for Le's but I'm going to add my two cents anyway.   I have been eating at this place since they were Pho Pasteur and have always loved it.  Since they switch to Le's the menu has expanded and there is a bottle of Sriracha on every table.  The soups are great, the hubby LOVES the chicken curry,  But the true gem is the #34 shrimp paste on vermicelli.  So so good.  The shrimp paste is cooked on sugar cane which adds a bit of sweetness.  It is served over perfectly cooked vermicelli with fresh shredded lettuce and bean sprouts.  mmmmmm so delicious.   The service can be spotty and the decor isn't much to look at but the food is great and the prices are absurdly cheap for the amount of food you get.  For me, that is enough to carry the place and earn 4 stars.
REVIEW is for the TAKE-OUT ONLY! I expected to like this place less than I do, only because it is a chain...but I was wrong. It is a lot of GOOD FOOD at a GREAT PRICE.  FOOD: Large portions of good food. The pasta is not homemade, but it's not overcooked.  The one jumbo meatball is soft and delicious, and the Italian Sausage was finely ground, like Irish Sausage.  Get the "Chopped Salad" for only $5... It's got 1/2 an avocado & proscuitto crumbled like bacon!  ONE PROBLEM:  I ordered the GNOCCHI & SAUSAGE online. Their system asked if I wanted spaghetti or whole wheat pasta. I thought, "serving a side of pasta with gnocchi...OK?" I chose "whole wheat pasta."  I received no gnocchi at all...OOPS.  TAKE-OUT DEAL:  Only $5 doubles your entire meal! This is not a little bigger...It's 2 entire meals. Take one to lunch tomorrow...such a great deal.  DINE-IN DEAL: Check in on Foursquare & take home  a DOUBLE of your ENTREE MEAL FOR FREE!
Tai is great. It's a good idea to follow up with him to make sure your alterations get done, but he does great quality work and for a very good price. He's also a really nice guy.
I order here like 3 times a week (fatty status lol). All delivery drivers are nice as they know I tip decent. Maybe 2 out of the 40 pizzas I've order have had bad quality. Easy online ordering so I recommend them
Hahaha, it's so true. The customer service at Dressew is not great, but everything else is! Two floors of fun. This place has fabric galore, anything you could ever want plus a huge bargain section in the basement.  If you're a vintage lover like me, you will be all over the notions department. Tons of old stock from decades ago, and did I mention good prices? Don't be scared, this place is worth checking out! Just don't go on Sunday, it's the only day they're closed.
Andala is one of my favorite places to study in Cambridge. The Kufta is amazing -- the first time I tried it (Sept '13), I had to come back the next day to have it again. Pine nuts on rice, steamed and fresh tomatoes side by side, and very tender lamb make for an excellent dish.   I'm also a fan of their fresh squeezed juices. Just had the carrot juice today and it was very fresh. Don't recommend the mint smoothie -- it was largely pieces of mint leaf on ice. Another must-have is the rice pudding. It's covered in shaved coconut, coconut milk and spices that make it taste remarkably different from usual bland rice pudding.  Not a fan of the service. The key is to go to the bar and chase down a server rather than wait for them to come to you. Today I saw the table next to me wait half an hour for the menu; trying to pay is nearly impossible if you wait for the service staff. Just go to the bar directly. It's a shame the service is so bad, because the food is so good.
A great little place to stop in for a coffee, sandwich, homemade soup or cookie.  Or even stop in just for a candy bar.  Friendly people and fast service.
Excellent service. Good communication. Drivers we had were friendly and efficient.  Took great care with our luggage.  Would use again next time in Vancouver
Delicious beers! Such high quality I would put the six seamer up with anything from trillium and treehouse. Definitely a must visit. Also go to Mystic in Chelsea down the road
- Convenient online ordering system, it allows for easy cancellation too. - Located next to an auto dealer/repair place, there is parking in the back (slightly challenging to get into). - Arrive early, sign waiver, lock up your belongings and jacket because rooms will get stuffy.  - Poor sound blocking inside, there is multiple games going on, and although it was hilarious to hear devastating outbursts from the nearby rooms, it was also very distracting.  - Puzzles have a nice variety, some number based, some letters, some digging around and some just plain luck. They were disconnected from each other, but each puzzle makes sense.  - The workers are so friendly. We were only a small steps away from the ending, so they allow us to finish it after time was up!!
We ordered our granite counter top from The Granite Place. From the moment we walked in to choose from the beautiful slabs and until the installment we had a very positive experience. Scarlet helped us to make a good decision. She shared her expertise without being pushy. We took our time to make up our minds. Once we placed our order, the guys came in to take the measurements in two days.  The installment took place the following week. So all in all it took 1 week to complete the whole process from the beginning to the end.  We are very happy with our beautiful granite counter top! We highly recommend The Granite Place. We're very grateful for the cutting board which we received as a free gift with our order.
Java Cats is so much fun if you're looking to just chill, have a coffee or tea, and pet kitties. The staff are all super friendly and willing to help and answer any questions. They adopt out all the cats so if you find one you fall in love with you can go through the process and take home a cuddle baby. I really enjoyed my time there and the prices are reasonable. We went with a big group and it was a lot of fun. Can't wait for their Marietta location!!
This is a new facility, everything is very nice and clean. Front desk staff is courteous. Beds comfortable. Two queen bed suite has a regular-sized microwave and small frig by a sink counter in the sitting area. Bathroom is equipped with low flow toilet and shower head to conserve water. Free hot breakfast served from 7-10 has everything you expect plus some. I would definitely stay here again!
Taste 5/5 Portion 5/5 Price 5/5 Service 1/5 I've been to this place 3 times, every time I have the same problem with the same waitress.( Short hair lady). She kept trying to take our dishes whenever one of us go to restroom( it's not empty, we are still working on it). I don't understand what's the rush, there are only few customer it's not like someone is waiting. The second problem with her, I was checking out at the front and my whole family stilling sitting at the table and I decided to tip her in cash. After she look at the credit card, she said we didn't charge you tip and I told her I know I am gonna put cash on the table. Then she follow me all the way back to my sit and stood next to us to wait for me to tip her ( Seriously!!!! Something is really wrong with her) once I put on the table she grabbed it instantly and walk away. I know she works for tips, but she shouldn't be that aggressive.
The lines can be very long, especially at lunch. Gotta' say though that this place rocks when it comes to turning out a fantastic burger with good bar selections and awesome fries. Just don't come in a hurry, you will be disappointed. Also, know that you have to go all the way to the back of the restaurant to order and then walk back up front to find a table...kinda' weird but that is just Austin.
True authentic made to order west coast style tacos and burritos. The food is fresh and the salsas are house made. Located on obt in a kind of sketchy area but totally safe during the day and early evening. I believe they are 24 hrs but not sure as I don't usually find myself in that part of town late nights.
For a 2:30am delivery, I am definitely a fan.  It took an agreeable 25 minutes from the time I finished my foodler order to sitting on my bed eating crispy crab rangoon. Yes, I ordered that delicious guilt-trip of a post-midnight snack attack. That and general gau chicken (which I thought was smothered a tad too much with soy sauce, but with a generous amount of broccoli!) The crab rangoons were super yummy.  Hits the spot. Not soggy, not lightly stuffed, and not terribly oily. Just the right amount of cheezy goodness to put this bunny back to bed. It's winter, and I'm ready to burrow. Just lay off the racism in these reviews, would ya? :)
This place is TOTALLY awesome.  The extra cost of the ticket is well worth it.  Recliners with blanket, pillow, table, and free popcorn.  Full bar.  Food.  Great service.  Really good sound system and picture quality.  This is THE place to watch a movie!  They have pool tables, lots of seating on the outside of the theaters, nice, clean restrooms...worth every penny!
I love Btone and the megaformer machines! I consider myself a fairly fit person, and the workouts here still kick my butt every single time. If you're hesitant to go, the instructors are great with talking you through each exercise and make sure you are comfortable on the machine. The studio itself is nice and clean, and there is a shower.
Great park for dogs! And I think the only one in the area. There is a green area where dogs can run and 'socialize' and a small fenced area too. I don't think dogs demand anything else but that:)
Fenomenal. Phat pearls so amaze. If I could drink this everyday I would probably look like Majin Bu from dragon ball in all his pink fat chubness
After searching in an around the Columbus area for authentic and not Asian fusion inspired Filipino cuisine, my quest has finally ended and it has taken me to Kuya Ian's Bistro. Here, you can experience traditional filipino fare without the pomp and circumstance of modernizing culturally distinct "Pinoy" taste. I sampled many dishes such as the dinuguan, a very distinct dish that is celebrated in every province of the Philippines. It can be spicy and tangy or sweet and savory but here they got it right. I also had a chance to savor the lechon kawali, pork belly deep fried well enough to get the skin cracklin. I could go on and on, but I'm afraid I might be running out of space. And don't forget the traditional UBE ice cream. Made from the purple taro root. If your Filipino, this is a must have after every heavy meal. The feeling is truly nostalgic and it will take you back to your most fond memories of Home. Great job Kuya Ian's Bistro!
Don't be fooled by the location.  They have what you need and they do a great job.  Outstanding customer service; they only charge for what they really do after a thorough diagnostic.  They've maintained my clipper/trimmer for many years.
This place is old but that's what makes it the place it is. Coming up on there 50th anniversary. Grandma is the main cook with her daughter working tables and helping cook along with the granddaughter helping out on the weekends. The food is good both breakfast and lunch.  Never have had dinner. Prices are more than fair.  Just don't expect a lot of ambience.
This place looks like a hole in the wall - but don't let it stop you.  Pizza Bianca, garlic knots are delicious.  They make their own salad dressing as well.  Best pizza joint in Orlando!!!!
Great food, attentive servers, and great  for groups. The Hazel Dell Brew Pub is a great place to eat with friends and have a good time for a decent price. The onion rings and Salmon fish and chips are my favorite!
This place has amazing doughnut sandwiches. I came with some out of town friends for brunch and it did not disappoint. I got the fried chicken and doughnut, their take on chicken and waffles, with a maple butter topping. The doughnut had a good consistency, not overly greasy or cakey, almost more like a croissant. The chicken was tender and juicy. Can't wait to come back and try more things!
HipStitch was great! I went with my sister and mom as a Christmas gift and we had such a good time. I'm not the best when it comes to sewing but my pillow came out looking like a pillow so can't complain there! We had a couple different patterns to choose from and there was a lot of fabric and thread colors available which was great. The staff was very friendly and accommodating as well. They even helped with a raffle prize for a fundraiser we are planning next week. I would definitely go back with friends next time I'm in the area.
This place is amazing....such an experience.  Everything is lux and fabulous!  Manicures are fantastic and everyone who works there is pleasant and polite.  Had a massage and it was to die for....spent some time on the roof deck, so relaxing!  You forget you are in the hustle and bustle of Newbury Street!  A little pricey but totally worth it!
Been here a few times and the food is always good!  Definitely a little on the pricier side, but the food is well worth it!
Best waitress ever and regret I do not have her name. Food was amazing and the hush puppies are amazing!
This place is all-around great! The villas are spacious, clean, comfortable, and fully-stocked with washer/dryers and even kitchen supplies. Newly furnished with personal balcony. Each main area of the resort surrounds an activity center that may include a pool, gym, sauna, basketball/volleyball/tennis courts, activity room, playground, or all of the above! A few bars and restaurants, and even a marketplace. The staff is very friendly. The location is great too. Overall, great experience!!!
Heaven and Bliss. Bliss and Heaven. The best espresso based coffee beverages around, Bar None.
The best clam chowder we had while visiting Boston.
I was intrigued by this place from just the cute sign for months before it opened. I finally made it in today and I was delighted and might I say, even thrilled, at how beautifully decorated this place was.   I love the no-wifi no-laptop policy. People were chatting and reading books rather than camping out on computers.  I felt a bit bristly that adding almond milk to my matcha latte was $2 extra. But I'll easily overlook that for the wonderful atmosphere and clear commitment to excellence this place exudes. The free samples of the gluten free banana bread and the olive oil cake were delicious.  As an Austin native, hidden gems like these (not for long) make me fall in love with Austin all over again.
Sigh. Of course these guys are closed now. I will miss those seasoned chips, and having options nearby.
I have been home brewing for about eight years now so I have been to few shops in my time. These guys are great and are always willing to help. Even though I have experience I wanted to talk to someone face to face to feel better about making a significant investment in brewing equipment. I tried two other brew shops before coming back here. I should have just come here in the first place and I would have saved myself some wasted time. I talked to Nick for sometime trying to figure out exactly what I wanted. He even went ahead and put together a price estimate and emailed it to me later that day. If you are looking for good, no judgmental help and advice, go here.
Consistently good sushi at very reasonable prices.  Sometimes there's a long line but its okay because you can spend the time buying yummy treats from the Japanese store next door!  While the service is sometimes a bit slow, the experience at blue fin is usually pretty good.  i love the big sushi plates where you can pick your own pieces...and the lunch specials are a really good deal! check it out
I love Da Vinci's! The staff is always super friendly and helpful, and their donuts are delish. I'm on a gluten free diet, so it's hard for me to find yummy sweets, but their GF donuts are the absolute best! They're small, so you don't feel bad eating more than one (or three!). My fav flavors are cinnamon roll, french toast, chocolate and lemon bar (without the streusel). Be sure to call ahead because they don't have GF donuts every day, but will happily make you some, if you give them a days notice. And, as a tea drinker, they have a really great selection of hot teas, which I appreciate. I highly recommend Da Vinci's Dunwoody!
What we must order when we visit Sushi By Yuji: Ika Mentaiko, Chopped Scallop, Tobiko with Quail Egg, Shiro Roll.  I love how their sushi quality (flavor, temperature, proportion) is always so consistent. Even the size of each nigiri is always just right, meaning I never have to spread my mouth wide open to stuff a nigiri. The quail egg here always tastes so fresh too that it really adds a nice creaminess to the sushi. As for the Shiro Roll, it was so filling and satisfying! It was packed with all sorts of sashimi (probably the ends and scraps of sashimi, but still tasted fresh and tasty!), and it didn't have too much rice. The roll was quite large in size but come on, it's their version of House Roll!
Came here for something familiar but not expecting much. My parents and I were surprised at how generous they were with their tofu and how not msg-filled/salty our meals were (compared to the soon tofu in l.a.). My dad and I got the intestines spicy and it was perfect. Servers were very accommodating and nice. It got pretty full by the time we were finishing up our meal. Thank you for not making us leave with any regrets!
This is the closest Starbucks to my house, thus I came here often to work and sometimes to read. The space is great for working. It's a big and spacious Starbucks with multiple individual table. I often come here to get my usual grande cappuccino and do work in the morning. Then, I would head to my office by taking the T right outside. The vibe at this Starbucks is also great, as most of the times, it's full of students (BU and BC) and young professionals living in the Brighton area.
I had to giggle reading Chase C's review . . . I can relate to much of what he said!  My Mr. Big is pretty spoiled, too, and this is the spot we call his "doggie spa"! Not just any boarding place will do - I've tried three of the Barking Hound locations, all with great results, but this is my favorite. Mainly, it's a combination of two things: they specialize in caring for small dogs (Big is only four pounds!) and they really do get to know and care about their dog boarders and their picky owners!  Apparently, he's better behaved there than he ever is at home, but I think he's just totally entertained. The staff is super-attentive and hands-on with the dogs, and they truly do pay attention to any "special instructions" you have for your best friend. They are also good about keeping careful records of cell numbers and credit cards - so if your mom or best friend is bringing in or picking up the dog, you're all set and they'll make notes of whom to call.   Bottom line- I never worry about him when he's there, and that's worth evey penny!
The cakes here are really good. Fluffy, light and not overpowered with sugar. We got a small chocolate cake and it was superb, even to the chocolate piece on the top for decoration. They are reasonably price too. No more trips to WholeFoods for birthday cakes!
I came here for my birthday for dessert, with 5 of my friends, and I have to say that I was impressed. The service was top-notch. The waiter knew exactly what to ask, when to ask, what type of wine I was in the mood for... I really wanted a window table, but I think those are hard to get! Regardless, I had a really good time and would definitely go back again.
I LOVED it!!!   OK, I see I'm in the minority here as far as ratings go, but I'll tell you what, I had one of the most enjoyable evenings here that I've had in a long time.  And you can't put a price tag on that.  Yes, it's $10 to ride the elevator, $10 for mini-golf that is a so-so course at best, and yes everything costs extra money. And usually I'm complaining about the price of things. But the atmosphere can't be beat, especially if you happen to go when the weather is nice. So beautiful. I can't wait to go back.
If you like fried avocado, you can't miss the Roaring Fork version of it. Simply Divine!
After searching local barbers on Yelp and comparing review information along with opinions formed from photos, I made an appointment with Mike via the Cloak & Dagger website. Easy to do and they send reminders to make sure you don't forget. My first cut in Portland and I definitely made the right choice. Great shop, complimentary beverages (adult, too), super positive atmosphere, and friendly staff. In my New York days I learned the value of the statement, "You get what you pay for." Sure, this shop is slightly more costly than others, but the perceived value matches and far exceeds the monetary price. Great cut. No, better than great. FABULOUS CUT! Mike even managed to blend a part of my hair far superior to any previous efforts, even though it was his first time working on my head. I've had some great barbers and stylists over the years, but Mike is the best yet. Thanks, Mike - and thanks Cloak & Dagger. I will be back.
Had a wonderful experience! It wasn't busy at all. We got two pedicures 60 and 1 overlay 20 with eye brow wax 7. The place is super cute and very friendly staff
I had my favorite sub, an Italian trio with the basil pesto and truffle mayo. These guys are the real deal best subs I've had in Atlanta. Even the organic sodas were amazing. Best of all was the prices and service. Super friendly staff and their recommendations for the sandwich were spot on! I will be making this place my lunch stop anytime I'm in the area.  Make sure that you step around the counter and look at their specialty sandwiches in addition to their build your own sub options.
Went to see Invasion: Christmas Carol last Friday.  We really enjoyed the show.  I definitely recommend it.  Someone mentioned how the pricing on the buckets of beer didn't make sense.  Beers were $4 and Buckets (of 5) were $16, makes perfect sense to me.  Get there early for good seats.  I bought the fancy pants seats for 4 of us but they couldn't seat us in them.  We accepted seats in the back and they bought us a bucket of beer.  We were happy.  If you have an Entertainment Coupon book, there is a BOGO which you can print online, which makes this a real good deal!
Pros: -REALLY cute ambience. It's like a Beauty and the Beast library.  Bookcases, dark wood, fireplace, Edison bulbs, comfy arm chairs and couches, a big farm table, little vintage containers by the sugar and milk serving area.  I think that's the biggest thing going for this place, especially considering it's a multi-national chain. -delicious drinks and desserts, excellent sandwiches that are so good hot and toasty -nice baristas, good at making sure you're helped/getting orders as you're standing in line, and asking how much whipped cream you'd like for some of the fancy drinks (which is great when I don't want much!) -patio seating in the warmer months  Cons: -only 3 hours of free wi-fi -rarely any open seats -not enough outlets near some of the seats, which is unfortunate when I really need to plug in my laptop or charge my phone -a bit pricey -paper reward card stamps can't be added/transferred to the Caffe Nero passport/Level Up app
After having a bad lash application somewhere else, I came to Amazing Lash Studio to have those removed. Brittany was amazing and Drea at the front helped to make sure I was well taken care of. A lot of work was put into the removal since the place I had gotten them done at used a non-standard glue that was very difficult to remove and I also had bottom lashes. Thanks for your help Ladies! Everyone there was very courteous and all helped to make sure the process was done as safe and effective as possible.
This place is great! The service is great, everyone is really friendly and willing to help. I ordered a monte cristo (my fav sandwich ever!) and it was delicious. It came with a side of pickles and a Russian dipping sauce. The pickles were a perfect side. My friend got a French dip sandwich, which had so much flavor. There is lots of seating and it's right in the downtown area. Great location and great price. If you have a chance, definitely stop by here to grab a bite.
Great food, great selection, great location - although a bit hidden so please take the time to find this restaurant and support it as it is truly a good restaurant! Went there with family, enjoyed the diversity of menu options, very tasty selections, every one was happy, the server was honest about the menu and made recommendations that we enjoyed.   Would definitely look this place up and go to it - good for Sunday brunch as well!  One tip - please put your restaurant name on the receipts!
The most authentic Italian pizza I've had in the states. If you love real Italian food (not Italian-American), you will not be disappointed!
Shopping at Market Basket could be turned into a professional sport.  And I say professional because I know some people just aren't up to the challenge.  Amateurs.    Like a good athlete it's wise to prepare before entering into the match.  Like an English Channel swimmer or a wrestler you may want to grease yourself up so you can squeeze through the crowded aisles with more ease.    Take a tip from the pros and think about doing some strength training so that you can do your shopping with baskets instead of a cart.  This will allow you greater mobility in getting around those tight corners and narrow passages between everyone else's carts.    All good athletes know that timing plays a large part of the game.  For me, I've found that 4:45 on the weekdays works like a charm.  I rarely have to wait in line at checkout even when I have more than 12 things. (You'll notice that hardly anyone comes here for light shopping.  Carts are usually packed to an unsafe capacity.  So take advantage of the 12 items or less cashiers when you can.)  Avoid weekends here if you can, especially in the afternoon.  The thing that surprised me most about Market Basket was the high quality of their meats and produce.  Having just moved to this area after being around the corner from both TJ and WF I figured I was going to miss the quality of their products.  Surprisingly, I've become quite enamored with the wide range of selections they have here of their cuts of meat and both fresh fruits and veg.  Not to mention that you're saving a mint every time you shop here.  Some people might want to pay the extra bucks for the ambiance and pleasant smells of a Whole Foods.  I'm no longer that guy.  Market Basket has changed me.  I come out of here with the thrill of victory in my heart like I've just led my troops to win a lynch-pin battle.    You can do it too.  Take a deep breath, plunge in, and keep your focus.  Remain calm and don't let your competitors rattle you.  Be smart and have a game plan.  You will be rewarded.
I just dropped off my car at Paul's. The pre-car experience has been great so far.   I called them yesterday to see if they could renew my baby's face after an accident. Where I bought the car had an opening for May 8th. What is that? Who wants to wait for 3 weeks to get their car fixed? I called up Paul's after some searching and was able to find get a drop off the very next day. They told me it wouldn't be ready for the weekend, but that's fine for me - it takes a few days and I'm fine with that.  The woman in the front who checked in was beyond friendly and welcoming. She took down my information, while managing other things (getting the ticket on, answering a call - I like a good multi-tasker). She seemed genuinely happy for me when I told her I'd be heading out of town for my bridal shower, and already had a car rental in place.   I look forward to getting my baby back soon.
I absolutely LOVE this place!  The food is excellent and Bridgette is AWESOME!!  They have a number of daily specials and the portions are fantastic.  Highly recommend you check them out, you won't be disappointed.
From the moment I stepped on the lot to just look at cars to  driving away today in a brand new Honda Civic; I had a awesome experience with Beaverton Honda & ESPECIALLY JOHN STEVENS!!!  Very polite (also funny & easy going), attentive to detail, knowledgeable on the vehicle, & flexible with our schedule!   Everyone at the dealership was polite & friendly, welcoming, & helpful. One of the managers Christian even took time to thank me and make sure I was happy with the purchase! Their dealership is very inviting and comfortable while waiting as well (big screen TVs, kids play area, food & drinks; popcorn, Popsicles, sodas, coffee..., leather chairs, and more).  On top of this they pull your vehicle into a heated Bay Area for you to look at (don't make you do it out on the cold lot & in the rain).   They give you a very very fair lowest price (had an independent / non Honda broker tell me to jump on the deal!). They don't press you hard on up sells but make sure you are informed, & don't put unnecessary accessories on to boost price. On top of that you deal with ONLY ONE person from start to finish (my man JOHN STEVENS!).   From beginning to end; FANTASTIC EXPERIENCE at Beaverton Honda & with John Stevens!  -Tyler
One of the tastiest hotdogs ever had. The quality of their hotdog is outstanding plus some amazing toppings just make it incredible! I always love crazy hot dog combinations and they definitely lived up to it! Oh and it's a big thick hotdog so one was plenty for me!
The best arepas I've had in Vancouver, owner/chef Yarina, a long time member of the local Vancouver Venezuelan-Canadian community, has brought her "recetas de familia" to the table for the public to enjoy.  I  actually liked her arepas more than at Cacao in Kits, and it's less than half the price! Last time I dropped by there was a lineup out the door, but quick service.  Chevere Eh! is a cute little Venezuelan Latin joint in Sunset neighbourhood 1/2 block up Main St. from Northeast corner of W.49th Ave. This is a rapidly evolving little micro-neighbourhood on the North end of Little India and there's a brand new Persia Foods ethnic supermarket right across the street.   Chevere Eh! has customer parking at rear and ample free street parking right on Main St.  It's a five minute walk from Langara College. Open days and available for private functions in evening also. Cash only.
El Sultan is definitely my go-to burrito cart. Their burritos are reliable, large, tasty, and inexpensive. What more could you want during a Mexican food craving? The owners are also extremely nice. Pretty good setting too. I would highly recommend.
Great customer service! We went in, found what we wanted, and was helped by a wonderful gentleman who's name I can't remember. He and the staff got us in and out in no time. They do financing too, which is awesome! We had our beautiful new couch delivered 3 days later, on time. Couldn't be happier! It was such an easy purchase!
EVERYTHING on their menu is fabulous!! Fresh veggies and spices. Very flavorful and I get their take out all the time. Prices are good too!
This place is great!! The food is amazing, the shakes divine. Expect a long wait, but it's worth it.
Absolutely top notch! As good as it gets really. I don't usually like anything vaguely fancy, but this was perfect. The service really stood out. Attentive, polite, helpful, honestly the BEST I've ever experienced. You never have to ask for anything, it's already done.   The clams w/ chorizo is amazing, and I don't even like clams. Best tartare I've ever had. Everything is great, I can't say enough good things, just go there.
This place makes delicious food. The portion are so big I never finish it, even though I try. The rice is fluffy so far I had the General Tso and Mongolian Beef. This Mongolian beef is better than Canton Buddha. I have been here 3 times this month. One time I went in and they were professional and kind.
Great place to stop while touring the town of Salem. Pizza is fresh and plenty for 2 people to share. We had the local octoberfest beer which was tasty.  Splurged and had the adult root beer float made with not your dads root beer, really good. Service was fast and our waiter Devon was friendly.
I have tried at least a dozen nail salons and have finally found one that it clean, comfortable with great service.  Tu, the owner, is wonderful.  Highly recommend.
In Atlanta for a meeting and this was close to our hotel.  Food was great and fun for us "northerners" to try!  Loved the grits and the collard greens!!  Pair with a great suggestion of Cab/Malbac that I am still dreaming about.  Must try especially if you are trapped for a meeting at the hotels just outside the airport!!
I was searching Yelp for somewhere to eat (since my friends are indecisive af but I love them) and all I knew was that we wanted food truck yumminess. So when I saw this place was not only open (I think it was around 4/5) and it had 5 stars, I knew we had to check it out. Located in a cute outdoor area with 4 (?) other food trucks and multiple tables laid out, some under shade and some not. (Bonus: There's what I'm assuming a community piano in the little area!! So if you have some musical talent, please bless us all lol). There's also a self serve water/utensil station.  In terms of food, 3 of us ordered No.1 Carnitas Al Guero Torta and the other got The Carnitas Chavela topped w avocado. When I took the first bite of my Torta, let me just say WOW. Not only was the meat amazing, there was a perfect amount of flavor (from the meat) and crunch (from the pickled onions) that just blended together wonderfully. Also, I love carbs (I mean who doesn't) and whatever bread they use for this sandwich is DELISH. Not sure if they grill the bread or what, but it's crunchy on the outside while super soft and fluffy on the inside (which is heaven). And, half the sandwich filled me up (although I lowkey just wanted to save it for the car ride home IT WAS TOO GOOD TO SIMPLY SCARF DOWN). Now what kind of friend would I be if I didn't also try the Chavela (a terrible one that's what) and dang that was good too! Pretty much a burrito bowl but healthier AND delicious. I don't know if Portland just uses fresher ingredients or what, but they're doing food right. I didn't feel grossly full after eating here (or anywhere in Portland now that I think about it) but this place is A1. 10/10 will be bringing my family/friends again!
I visited Face To Face Spa previously for a Yelp Elite event so I was pretty excited to return for my premium facial. I'd never had a facial before so I wasn't sure what to expect but Karly was wonderful. She walked me through the whole process explaining what she was doing as we went and it was so relaxing and calm.  My favorite parts were where she used the fan brush to spread cleanser and whatever else all over my face. It just felt so nice lol!  My face was so fresh and new when I left. Facials are not exactly cheap so I wouldn't be able to get them on a regular basis but it would be nice to treat myself every once in a while. I really enjoyed myself so I hope to be back soon.
Being a broke college student, I resisted Bread & Ink's unique charm many times, but recently gave in. After my first trip, I cannot help but return. I have been three times now and have been equally blown away. Sitting outside on Hawthorne with the sun on my back is good enough, but their food is the cherry on top. The chicken & waffles (of course) are a fantastic combination of sugary, pastry like waffles with perfectly friend chicken and rich syrup on the side. A generous serving of a savory, gravy like sauce comes on the side and its topped off with a knife sticking out of the middle for some danger on your waffles. I also had the berry waffles for tangy and sweet, and I ate myself into pure bliss. Along with Mother's Bistro & Screen Door, this is some of the best brunch in the city. Cheers
Great little pub. I've liked everything I've had there. My like that you can make any salad a wrap. Especially enjoy the spicy chicken. Good fish and chips.  Make sure you get the fried pickles.
Ok the Guac is delicious-the service was good. Friendly and helpful. The Chicken hard taco rocked and filled to the brim. My fav salsa was the roasted salsa. Great flavor!!
Came here for a new parents meet up on a Saturday at 4 p.m. Great place to meet, hang out, have a beer and chat. Loads of space for strollers and for kids to run around while mommy and daddy enjoy some craft beer goodness. They have a food truck out front of you are hungry too.
This place lives up to the reviews and friends' recommendations.  I asked for a 12V battery load test because I got a low battery warning when setting the TPMS.  George explained that Prius 12V batteries usually last up to 10 years, but that he'd do the check.  He told me it passed all the tests, explained everything to me, showed me pics of a Prius that had real problems (water in the trunk where the battery is), and showed me how my trunk was fine. Not everybody knows how to service a Prius.  Plus he said they don't charge for diagnostics. The waiting room had AC and very comfy chairs.  What's not to like?
Since my nickname is 'Burger' (long story!) I pride myself on being somewhat of a connoisseur. I was surprised this place wasn't busier at 1pm because the ahi tuna burger I devoured was incredible. I was also happy to be able to have fries and salad instead of having to choose between the two. The lady friends I was with seemed equally happy with their burgers especially the kobe.   The decor is modern and simple which works very well for a high end burger joint. Our server was very patient because with all the girl talk it was probably hard for him to get our attention at times! I would definitely got back and try something else on the menu because there were some pretty crazy looking burgers including crab.  This Burger is a fan of Stackhouse Burger Bar!
Beantown Pho & Grill had big shoes to fill as it took over the space for the only B.Good on Newbury. It has done a wonderful job!  The staff are very friendly and relaxed. There have been a few occasions when I have carried out on a rainy night and they let me bring my dog inside (if I am holding him) so that he would not have to stand out in the rain. That being said, their restaurant is incredibly clean and well planned. it seems to have a lot of seating in a small space, and you are never right on top of anyone else.   The food is great, and the menu is robust! If you are new to Pho, the chicken pho ("pho ga") is a good place to start! Their fried rice and stir-fried noodles are also delicious! I have not had one bad meal at Beantown Pho & Grill and will continue to be a patron!
The best banana bread and chai tea latte of Cambridge. The crew is very friendly, and they have excellent service.
This place has a good vibe! Their customer service is also on point. Shoutout to JoJo, he took great care of my girl and I on Saturday night.
I've only been inside this location once, but we often order it in for lunch at the office. Overall, I think of it as a 'slice' to go - very basic - pizza place. That is until this week. We ordered a dozen pizzas this week and it occurred to me that these are really quite good. I don't know why it took me so long to figure it out, but when you order it and not just stop in for a slice, it kills Black Jack and Dominos. The pies are loaded with vegetables and/or meat with a very nice amount of cheese - I love cheese.   Give 'em a try and you might be quite surprised.
I really feel like boloco is a company that "gets it," in more ways than one: -Burritos extend past the standard "rice, beans, cheese, tomatoes, and meat" fare. I know, it's not exactly Mexican, but Yelp lists boloco as fast food instead of Mexican for a reason. It's nice to have a change of pace in a burrito. -Customer service is always really cool here. I don't mean to hate on fast food/counter service places that hire people who can't speak English... but it's nice to have people that are friendly and can also converse with you. -Getting a boloco card has a million benefits. Spend $50 and get a free burrito, and whenever they launch a new burrito or special event, they'll give you another one just for being you. -John Pepper, the CEO, is awesome. He really seems with it- he'll use twitter (I know, I know) to get feedback from customers, and he actually seems to care about making things right when they go wrong (Consumerist has a nice rave about him here: http://is.gd/5UAd6 )  I could continue to rave about Boloco... but I won't. Try it. You'll like it.
Sad that I just found this place!  I've been passing them for 3 years coming home from work down Monroe.  But now that I know about them it's one of my new favorite to-go places.  Prices are fair and the food is awesome!
I've been to Goldies twice this week!  The pizza here is delicious. I've only had the cheese pizza, but it was one of the tastiest plain slices I've ever had. You can taste the cheese! It does NOT taste like plastic or grease covered crap! The crust is crispy and thin and it isn't overly sauced.  There is a pint and slice combo for $8 which isn't too bad! I think it should be 2 slices and a pint, but the slices are big enough that it isn't much of a problem.  The service is just great! The same girl was working both nights that I went in, she is super friendly and attentive and personable.
These donuts are incredibly good, but very overwhelming, which makes it so difficult to walk out of here without breathing heavily since you just want to try all of the great, unique flavors.  Much like the excellent Dough in Brooklyn, from the display to the size and even taste, these huge donuts are totally worth getting here early in the day and waiting on the line that extends through the store. They close by 3, and seem to often sell out even earlier in the day than that.  Knowing how quick they go, I wisely made it a point for this to be the first stop of the day, for a very healthy breakfast. This allowed me to pick from all of the varieties, which actually made things so much harder since everything looks great.  Not so wisely, we ended up getting a beastly 4 donuts for the 2 of us, which is not advisable before a big lunch. But it was fun. We got 3 of the massive yeast donuts (Chocolate Chipotle, Vanilla Bean and Hazelnut Butter Crunch) and the single cake donut they had, Pumpkin.  The yeast donuts are the way to go, and they were all great. I agonized over whether or not to get the Maple Bacon, but then I saw them bring out a new tray of the Vanilla Bean. There's nothing better/more overwhelming than a fresh, hot doughnut straight from the fryer.  Do not make the same mistake I did, and make sure you eat in (there is a decent amount of seating in the back) and ask for your donuts on a plate. The not so bright guy helping me put all my donuts in a single bag, so I was left with a really sticky mess. The super chocolatey Chipotle one got that melty chocolate all over the other donuts, and there were hazelnuts from the butter crunch one all over the vanilla bean. I didn't mind too much since everything still tasted great, but it was just a mess.  I can't wait to visit Boston again and come here to start my day off right and spoil my appetite.
This is just a great place for sandwiches, pies and a coffee. Friendly service and nice atmosphere. Only small seating area but worth the wait.
Favorite Vietnamese restaurant in boston. There pho is so good as are there fresh summer rolls! Very nice staff too.
This is my go to for pedicures! The service is great, comfortable massage chairs, clean and not to mention they use liners in the tubs for extra peace of mind. I always enjoy my visit! I've tried several nail places in Austin but always find my way back to Great Nails. They offer complimentary beverages as well and offer an array of pedicure packages. I hardly get my fingernails done but when I do they will be my one stop shop.  For the comfort, price and service you can't beat them!
Ive had ADT for several years now my rep Israel Diaz has been very beneficial to me and my ADT experience If you're in the Bakersfield area Id highly contact him if your considering an alarm system, especially the ADT Pulse system it's top notch as far as im concerned.
Very clean, relatively new location. It's in an incredibly popular location so sometimes parking is tough and the store is busy but the baristas make the drinks as fast as lightening and always get my order right.
Me and my sister were driving north on I-95 and I got hungry!!  Called in an order of fresh fried oysters and rock shrimp, fritters and cheese grits and sweet tea. I was stuffed but it was worth the stop. About 10 minutes east of I-95.  Easy access to get in and out if you order takeaway. Place was packed.
This is a hidden gem of a restaurant.  Suitable for couples and families for brunch, lunch or dinner.  The food is superb, locally sourced, fresh with a great variety. The brunch in or outdoors on the patio or for drinks and dinner in the evening is very comfortable.  Superb bar with excellent service and choices.  We have become regulars.
Fantastic experience for my birthday party. Drinks were really great. Food was better than your average bowling place, but a few items we tried were just ok. Staff was friendly and attentive. Would definitely recommend.
Enjoyed our lunch fine. It is as good as every Hardrock. What made this experience awsome  was our waitress Phoebe! Remember that name PHOEBE!! She takes great pride in her work and treats you like a king. Just Wondeful. I'll be back next time I'm in town.
Great tavern in a wonderful area of Boston.  We shared the turkey sandwich with sweet potato fries and lettuce wraps.  The sandwich was thanksgiving on a sandwich served with a side of delicious gravy.  Yum. Good draft menu including ciders.
This place is great, couldn't fault it. The staff were friendly and more than helpful. Just grabbed a slice and a salad but was really impressed. Everything was super fresh, the pizza sauce is awesome and it all came out really fast. This place is on point.
I have been to Green Street a few times, and I have always had good experiences.    This past time was no different, though I should not have ordered as much food as I did.  My friend and I shared the mac and cheese (a HUGE portion - omg), and another dish (I don't remember what), AND a side of brussels sprouts, which was great, and reignited my interest in roasted veggies (and gave me a new taste for brussels sprouts!).  Too much food, but delicious.  The tomatoes in the mac and cheese add some flavor contrast to the rich, creamy taste/texture.  I was intrigued by the cocktail menu, but didn't order anything other than wine, because I watched the bartender make some of those drinks, and they took so long to make, I waited for almost ten minutes for a glass of wine.  I thought to myself, would I want to make a complex cocktail in a busy, Friday night setting?  Probably not.
I stopped in here after leaving the gym one day. Nothing like some wine to refresh you after a long, hard workout.   Unfortunately, they don't stock the wine I was looking for. The store associate did tell me that they can get anythig you want though. All you need to provide them with is the name of the wine and if it's sold in Georgia by anyone else, they can get it.   I haven't been back into the store but it seems like a great place to go grab a bottle of wine or some beer in a hurry.
This past Saturday I rediscovered an old favorite.  We were seated right away upon arriving even though our whole party wasn't yet present.  We started with a "small" order of fries which came out piping hot, delicious, and an ample portion for two.  In the past I've only had their fries with my meal and they never came out this hot or delicious.  After much deliberation and assistance from our wonderful waitress, we opted for the chopped steak with mashed taters and side.  The steak was well seasoned and extremely flavorful.  For dessert we got the peach pudding, chocolate hazelnut, and banana cream pie; we loved every bite of it!
This is the first review I've written. This place is amazing! I am so picky when it comes to burgers, but this place nailed it! Burgers are perfectly cooked and are seasoned to perfection! Fries were good but a little salty (I didn't get ketchup but will have it next time). I will definitely be returning as this is now my favorite burger joint! I had the sellwood and Fremont.
I had a good time there. You pretty much get unlimited samples if you want. I think Sam Adams makes real quality beers and they care about that. My tour guide (Court) knew his stuff. If you are really interested in beers and beer making, ask questions. I've been on a few tours and this one was one of the best. I also liked that it was free but happy to donate to their causes. That's very cool. You get 5 stars Sam.
Fast, fresh, and kid-friendly. We enjoyed the ramen, goyza, and the little one made a meal of edamame and the chicken karaage (which was a large portion). Finished off with monchi ice cream and some goma dango sesame balls with red bean paste that were nice and warm.   Service was friendly and very attentive. The kids liked sitting in the booth with their shoes off.  Definitely will come back.
A great place to go to with friends and have a good time.. Excellent bar service with a variety of cocktails, good food, and fun atmosphere ..
Amazing i love this place so so much very peaceful and everyone is super nice. Very big, please don't bring babies or kids.
So, this place might actually have the best food in Vancouver. The service is, however, as many have pointed out quite slow. I partly chalk it up to it being more cafe than restaurant, but also putting out high quality food with meticulous preparation. Nevertheless the people who waited a long time should have waited longer or gotten up to give their order at the counter - which is what I did when I noticed that there was a long line up.   Food took about 20 minutes to come out, but it was definitely worth the wait. We had the Zucchini Pasta and Marinated Portobello Mushroom Steak with pesto sauce (next time I might try marinara) and the Fresh Addiction Burger. The Pasta is exactly as it sounds from the name, but that you don't really get a sense for how good it is just by reading the ingredients. The Burger has a manga guacamole-salsa, which is fantastic. It's a cucumber wrap style burger, so you won't really be eating it with your hands. It comes with eggplant bacon which was also quite good. The patty is a falafel patty.  The interior is cozy and relaxing. Nice wood tables and a wood tea bar.  The perfect rating I'm giving is based on the fact that the food is to die for. I'm not even a vegetarian (although, I was for many years), but I would definitely say this place can be a contender for best food in the city.
As a patron who has crossed over into the greeted with a hug category - and boy did that surprise me when that started - I absolutely love this place. I'm also amazed and impressed that it seems as if the exact same staff is working there at any time day or night from the waitress to the drink refiller to the busboys. My heart goes out to them! The food is outstanding. Authentic, reasonably priced, and super fast.
Easy access Ample parking Quick seating Clean table Diverse menu Great Thai soup Complimentary soup of day with entree Nice waitress  Quiet atmosphere Clean restrooms Great prices-$13 for 1 person with beverage Free tooth picks
From drab to fab! (Can you tell the difference in the photos?)  A couple of weeks ago I had a not so pleasant experience with another stylist whose name I won't mention for their discretion. None the less, I got an appointment with Franco (the owner), this was my first time booking with him. As soon as I walked in he greeted me with a warm smile, offered me a drink and took my jacket (A+ customer service). He was ready and on time to our appointment (which I really appreciated). He worked his skills and talent and fixed my cut so that I no longer feel like hiding my hair in a bun. He not only exceeded my expectations, but gave me back the confidence to want to wear my hair down again. From the very start there was great and easy going communication between us, he listened carefully to what I wanted and delivered! Wonderful customer service, beautiful clean space. In a city full of so many choices, I can truly say that Workshop Salon (with stylist Franco) is definitely worth it and I already look forward to coming back! Thank you Franco. You
Sushi Katana is the perfect place for your Japanese food experience. Nice food selection, prices are right, great service and quality. This was my best Japanese experience in Orlando!
I love This place.  Good sushi, good entrees, creative drinks. Parking is rough, but that's downtown Delaware in general. My only real complaint is service,  especially when ordering cocktails can be very slow. Seriously order two drinks...
We moved here from Tucson, AZ. The staff Tiffany and Jess were so knowledgable and comforting with both of my sensitive pups. I will continue to visit them!
This place was great; it is exactly what we want when we go out for dinner. The food, the service, the wine, the prices were all spectacular. I had the swordfish special and it was amazing. My hubby really enjoyed his pasta dish. Just go!
With a mix of amazing Japanese food and beers you can't go wrong here. Like a traditional Izukaya they offer lots of grilled yakitori which is delicious. They also offer some ramen, sushi and fun drinks as well besides just beer. Highly suggest this restaurant with a group of people so you can order and share lots of different things! Only downside is that it is always busy and as such very loud sometimes too
we loved this place. very unique. my kids all under 7 enjoyed the talking moose and the popping raccoon over by the fireplace. moose was giving cheesy jokes but my kids really enjoyed it and kept them from going crazy and throwing their usual tantrums. came w/ free warm bread and butter to start you off while your waiting. the food we ordered was delicious. i ordered the ribs w/ 2 sides..baked beans and seasoned fries. loved everything. kids also enjoyed the ribs and my 1 year old loved the baked beans. my husband ordered the meatloaf w/ 2 sides. we also loved that. very tasty and hubby claims it's the best meatloaf he's tried. it tends to get overly sweet in the end since it's smothered w/ sweet bbq sauce but it was still delicious. wait time for food was surprisingly fast but then again we did go on a weekday. only problem we had (but wasn't a big problem) was the waiter never refilled our drinks and water till we had to ask., which was in the end when we were about to leave. price isn't too bad...ordering 2 items each w/ 2 sides and 1 adult drink and 2 kiddie juice..total came up to a little over $40 which isn't too bad. overall a great experience and can't wait to go back for the delicious food.
Best Indian food I have ever eaten, too bad I didn't refrigerate my leftovers and they got bad. Delivery was super fast. The delivery driver was so nice. Will definitely come back for more delicious food:)
Went in to get a collector's set for my husband. They didn't have it in stock but the guy offered to place the order for me, that was nice. The whole process took less than ten minutes. I was in and out of the mall in like 15 min (a new personal record for Washington Sq.!)
Devon and Katy are amazing. My daughter and I go to Evo regularly for facials, laser hair removal and various other services.  They are accommodating with appointments and close to home.  They are knowledgeable and professional,  I highly recommend  these ladies,
Came here on a Monday around 2:40 for the 3pm tour (it was the last tour for the day). Since we had extra time, the guy told us to check out their beer garden. Me and my friend decided to get 3 of their beers to try. They were really different but so good - Sam '76, Hefeweizen, Rosé Brut IPA. $19. Super friendly bartender who helped us choose the beers!   The tour was great & free! And they ask for donations for nonprofits that help out the kids and the community!! The sweetest!! The tour guides were funny and informative. We were even able to smell hops and taste some of the ingredients that goes inside our beer. 30 minutes tour and then another 30 minutes in a room where we try beer samples and get a souvenir glass  Must come if you are around the Boston area!
I often drive by Sandy street, so I was pretty excited to know that a new coffee place is opening (in place of the old KFC)! Walking in, you could see the beautiful and classy interior that are very well maintained. The workers are all very kind, approachable, and helpful! First impressions rely on the people you get, and this place definitely gives you a warming welcome!   Within the counter area is a section where there's the usual sugar, creme, napkins area. There's a couple menus laid here for those who can't see the typical menu above the worker's head! Their menu offers the usual choices that coffee places offer, but also additional drinks that you usually wouldn't find or hear often. They offer many sizes for each drink, and the prices are affordable.   I ordered the Breve (which I've been told is like a half and half) where you can pick whichever flavor you want. I got hazelnut and I'm pretty satisfied with my drink! They also put a piece of chocolate on top of your coffee cup (which I believe is the signature of their drinks), and who doesn't love a bite of chocolate?   Overall, definitely a place I'll be visiting often where I love to seat near the windows and look outside while studying. I'm usually bothered by the music that usual coffee places play, but I don't put on my earbuds for this place to listen to the music.   Beautiful wooden interior and exterior (aesthetics)? Check. Awesome customer service? Check. A variety of drinks in different sizes and good prices? Check. WiFi? Check. Good studying or meeting with friends place? Check.   I definitely recommend this warm, cozy, small place for anyone to visit, and I'm coming back to try all their drinks on the menu!  (They also have a punch card for those who visit often!)
Best "fried chicken" out there, Asian flair or not.  Great customer service.  I also had their grilled salmon salad - not a traditional Korean dish, but was extremely tasty and fresh.  Tteokbokee is also to die for.  Ask for it without the cheese for an authentic Korean taste.
I'm giving four stars because the service was 5 stars and the food was 3.  It was all beautiful and tasted ok but nothing great.  We had the cheese board, oysters, Brie (not great), halibut, and hanger steak.  My husband enjoyed the steak but my halibut was nothing special.  I had an out of this world one the day before at The Kitchen.  Anyway the staff was great but food was ordinary.
They don't carry a lot of stuff. I wanted to buy a Too Faced lip gloss, but they didn't carry that brand.  The shop assistance was very helpful, though.
Started out slowly with our waiter missing our table, but the quality of the meal made it entirely worth it.
These are the only tire / car people that don't rip you off to try to get as much money as possible from you. They are honest, fast, and very friendly. I wouldn't go anywhere else!   We came in 30 minutes before close with a tire that needed to be patched, and they took care of us anyway.  When we went to pay, it was FREE!!!  THAT is customer service.
Me & a couple friends came down for a weekend & saw this place had happy hour specials so decided to stop by. The food was good we got the salmon, angus sliders, bang bang shrimp tacos, & the ribs. The drinks are bomb my favorite was the Orange rum swizzle & the Snowberry. Our bartender was Keenan (sp?) he was the best kept the drinks coming & made them good. I would highly recommend this place to anyone looking for good food & drinks when they come to Atlanta.
It's about time that Downtown Boulder got a real clothing store.  I have a bunch of their stuff and the quality is absolutely top notch.  Super soft and seems like it's built to last forever.    They have great sales, and if you sign up for their email list you get invited to their Friday afternoon "Rock on the Ranch" parties where they have great bands play with free beer in the store for everyone on the guest list.    So happy to have a place that actually has some cool clothes in Boulder!
I came in for second time last night with my roommate because I really liked the place first time I came in and I like this place so much to show my roommate this wonderful place. The surrounding is serene, it's a good place to come in with a group of friends or solo to do your homework or read a book there.   However, their customer services there is sterling. Last night, I ordered a glass of wine then sat down to wait for my wine. When the server came with my wine, she attempted to sign "enjoy" which I greatly appreciate since I am deaf and I don't get that kind of encounters very often. I always appreciate workers interfering with deaf customers because it shows that it's thoughts that counts.  I definitely will be coming back countlessly of times!
Delicious! I keep trying other seafood restaurants in town, but I always end up making a comparison to JP Seafood because it has set my expectations so high. I love the bulgogi and the beef dumplings!
Best seafood in the area. All of their menu items were delicious. If you are looking for good southern comfort food. Look no further. This place delivered every time!   Keep up the good work
I really enjoy the brunch at Johnny D's, it is a great chill atmosphere for a weekend morning and they have a lot of dishes and variety that my taste buds enjoy as well.  One of my favorite brunch dishes is the catfish with grits (with cheese!) and hot sauce, yum!  They also have a pretty fab vegan scramble, and some nice refreshing smoothies.  The staff here is very friendly and I have always had great service.  My advice would be to come early for brunch so you can get a table before the the place starts getting super crowded, and so you can get a good seat to relax and listen to the music.  I have also been here for dinner and enjoyed the variety of dishes, the cocktails and the atmosphere.  Also, have always come on the earlier side for dinner so perhaps we've avoided the chaos of watching performances.  But i've always had a really solid and enjoyable experience and Johnny D's.
I find it interesting that the people leaving negative reviews have never ACTUALLY had their pet cared for by Caliga.   For those of you considering whether or not to employ her, here is a review from someone who has actually employed and interacted with Caliga:  She is fantastic! Nervous about leaving my 5 month old puppy (who I had never left before) with a "stranger", I was referred to Caliga. The trainer at Unleashed has promoted her services, and a friend of mine (who is also a client) gave me her name and number. The friend of mine who suggested Caliga travels out of the country frequently for business, and gave Caliga rave reviews. I trust her judgment and gave Caliga a call. She set up a "meet and greet" for my dog and I so that we could meet her before deciding whether or not she was a good fit. I thought that was a great idea!   Upon entering my home, she got right down on the floor to say hello to my miniature dachshund. He (at the time) was very insecure around people he did not know, but warmed to her immediately. She focused 25 out of the 30 minutes of the visit just interacting with my dog and getting to know him. I know it might sound silly, but it put the both of us at ease. It also made a huge difference a few weeks later when I had to leave him with her for a week. His "stay" was successful and I have used Caliga ever since.   Not only does she care for my dog (and the others) as if they were her own, she also is diligent with dispensing medication (should your pet need it), updating owners about the activities of the day and your pets disposition, and using the commands that I have been using while training my dog. He is now so comfortable walking with a pack (which I attribute to her), and does not return to me having forgotten the skills we have been working on. Every time she picks him up he is excited to go, and he always makes sure to say hi to her, should we come across her while on our walks. He truly loves her and I know she loves him.   It is a shame that the people leaving negative reviews have never retained Caliga. I think it is despicable to leave such horrible comments on a small business owner's page who you have NEVER actually done business with. Observations are one thing - but the fact that all of her clients and their pets love her is another. Those of us who do not have friends equip to take care of our pets, or do not have friends, family, or a significant other in the area really depend on her. I would hate to see her get a bad rap because of the things other people have "run across" or "observed". Lighten up!
Excellent place and excellent oyster is the best oysters bar in the east orlando...  And have a good promotion and happy hours
Ashley is the 5th star because he is the best barista in town and handles the morning rush like a pro. He is the real deal when it comes to customer service. Get to this Starbucks early enough and you'll be lucky enough to snag a good spot on the second floor. Early Sunday morning is the best time if you're looking for a quieter study space. P.S. The counter tops by the restrooms have outlets. SCORE.
So happy to see this place open. Hector the chef owner is such a great guy. The food is authentic and good. It has such vibes unlike anywhere else in the battery. We are very excited to see them open near us by tech square as well!
Hmm...why the low reviews? I'm Taiwanese (not that that should substantiate things) but I quite liked Shiny Tea! I've been there twice and have been satisfied each time.     As for service...maybe it was due to the fact that I ordered in Mandarin, but service was prompt and polite, and I didn't have to wait long for my bubble tea!    Like others have noted, the bubble tea itself isn't anything special, but it's worth a trip if you're in the area!    We sampled the Hanlin Creation, the Pu erh, and the Honey Tieguiyin. No complaints really! And for the honey drinks, the girl explained to me that they don't add any extra sugar, only honey!
Some of the best tacos in town, and the prices can't be beat.  I usually have a hard time deciding what to order (because it's all so good), but I almost always end up getting a fish taco, a chorizo-and-egg breakfast taco, and the cochinita pibil.  Absolutely delicious.  And an economical choice for the Not-So-Great Depression.
Chill place enjoy beer with friends! It's a warehouse setup with suspended lawn chairs. You can sit along the bar or hang out on park furniture (bench with table). There was a nice live cover band playing during our visit. The crowd is pretty representative of the area where you see a lot of yoga pants and bike helmets. The brew is fantastic. The maibock is fantastic. Side note: the brewery connects to a coffee shop, chocolate shop, and some kind of healthy foods co-op, which were not open but looks enticing.
It's nice to have a Thai restaurant in the neighborhood, and a good one at that. The food is delicious, the portions are large, the prices are reasonable and the people are very friendly and helpful. The dine in is simple, comfortable and enjoyable. The Pumpkin Curry is a must have. If you crave delicious Thai food, you can't miss with Siam Grill.
How have I not reviewed this place sooner?! Anytime I have friends visiting from out of town I take them here. Amazing food and great vibe! We had so much fun doing Das Boot!
This is the best friend chicken ever!  I've been going to Old Dixie since I was a kid, and nothing compares.  It's always a family outing going to Old Dixie, my dad actually worked there when he was a teenager.  We all have our usual orders, I get the two piece dark.  Mom loves the chicken breast.  Dad likes the gizzards.  You can ask them to specialize anything, we like our fries extra crispy.  Their side of mashed potatoes and gravy is the perfect dipping sauce for the fries.  Try it, I promise you'll like it.    It gets 4 stars from me because the building is about a million years old and isn't the cleanest place.  They don't even have a bathroom inside.  If I drove by the place not knowing what awesome chicken was inside, I wouldn't stop.  But if you can get passed the paneled walls and sticky floor, you will not be disappointed.    No one has ever been disappointed by Old Dixie.  Give it a try and chicken will never taste the same again.
Epic. That's really all I can say. This is the best burger I have ever had, hands down. So far, I have tried the Buffalo Bill (with goat cheese and avocado), and the El Diablo (spicy, but not painful). Don't be surprised at the prices, you get what you pay for, this isn't McDonald's. The easiest way to tell this is a great burger is that you feel able to move after you are finished.  Trust me, I am the last person in the world to espouse the virtues of organic and local-grown food, but you can really tell the difference here, and it really is worth the price.  They even make waiting in line better than normal. Restaurant staff will bring you water, and once you make it past the door, you can order drinks, including excellent shakes (Oreo Cookie is awesome).  Overall, a classic Austin establishment, you pretty much have to go here if you are visiting, and if you live here and don't try this place at least once, then there is something seriously wrong with you.
Love everything here!! Always fresh Fast and delicious!  Highly recommend the Italian and roast beef subs!
I'm a big fan of brunch.   More because when I'm in Austin I'm usually one degree of hung over or another come weekend morning that I'm not going to be up at any reasonable time.   There are two places to go to still get my breakfast fix and hair of the dog.  Curra's is one of those places.  The sad thing is that I used to live about a mile from this place when I was in college.  Lived at the crappiest apartment complex in Austin (the downstairs apartment was a working meth lab) and I bypassed this place more times than I can count.   I can only thank a bygone friend who introduced me to this place much, much later.  Look....Curra's has award winning tacos here.  Specifically Pastor...that perfect combo of marinated pork and corn tortilla.  Love them, but love brunch more.     And brunch they have.   Migas to die for (advice...don't add the chorizo.  It's good, but you lose the beauty of migas with the power of the chorizo) are the first stop.  Perfectly cooked with just the right combo of tortilla and pico.   Love them with a side of queso.   Then there's the Huevos Curra's.  A combo of eggs and carne guisada!?  Sympatico.  I'll have my eggs over-easy on top of that sublime stew...and flour tortillas on the side, please!  My son, who is 8 and can eat a major hunk of road kill, ordered two chorizo egg and cheese breakfast tacos and threw in the towel with a smile on his face after he got through 3/4 of one of them.    What brunch would be complete without a bloody mary....and they do them well.   Or you can just go full octane and ask your waiter to pair one of their extensive list of tequilas with your meal to sip as eat.     I always leave here happy and not seeing myself eating for at least 12 hours down the road.  Only ding is that parking can slightly suck if they are hopping....but that's true of a lot of places in Austin.
I ordered the Three Cup Chicken, Salt and Pepper Triple and the Roast Beef Roll.  They are all delicious.  Probably the best I have ever had.  I frequent Houston and Los Angeles so I have tried a lot.  The potions are big.  Service is attentive.  Price is very reasonable.  Ambience is nice and clean.  People are very friendly.  I highly recommend
This is such a wonderful experience!! If you want to see the city in the best way possible this is it. Christopher has a type of charm that is unmatched by very few people. He really made this experience for my husband and me over the top awesome!!! Thank you we had a blast :)
I LOVE LOVE LOVE 4 Rivers!! Being one of my favorite BBQ joints in Orlando, I've frequented multiple locations throughout Central Florida. Today I visited the Hunters Creek location and left full and completely satisfied!  I tend to stick with the same meal (pulled pork sandwich, corn and mac and cheese), but there are so many other great options as well! The meat is great, but the sides are AMAZING!! Their sweet tea also hits the spot.  If you're looking for a BBQ fix, 4 Rivers is the place to be !
The Mohawk Stroller - smoked turkey, roasted red pepper, basil pesto, and sprouts on a cheddar-herb roll - is honestly the best sandwich I've ever eaten.  Now I'm not claiming to be a deli connoisseur.  I've never eaten at a New York deli, and I haven't even explored too many sandwich places around Columbus.  But if you at all value the opinion of a college kid who simply loves good food, I implore you to go to Brown Bag for your next meal and order the Mohawk Stroller, or any sandwich, for that matter.  I've only been here 4 or 5 times, so I can't vouch for everything on the menu, but I have no reason to believe that they would serve anything less than stellar.  My meal of choice is half of a Mohawk Stroller, a bowl of Tomato Gorgonzola Bisque, some potato chips and an IBC root beer.  12 bucks isn't bad for a meal of this caliber.
I would have given this place 5 stars but they took the Shrimp and Grits off of the menu.  I sat at the bar and at least 5 people asked for Shrimp and Grits.  What gives?  Otherwise, this is the place to go to relax for a great cocktail between flights and perhaps a light fare.   The bartenders were very attentive and the food was delish!  Since I didn't get the S&Gs the scallops were the next best thing.  Oh, the sushi is not bad either.
Great pancakes! Random spot but old school dinner food is fantastic! Staff is friendly and the food is yummy!
This place has AMAZING flatbread pizzas! I had the gluten free flatbread (and let's be honest - rarely is gluten free yummy let alone AMAZING) pizza with beef brisket, jalepenos, and bbq sauce. I hate to use the word again but really... it was amazing.   I had heard good things about Henry's and wanted to check them out but finally getting there for lunch was a lucky accident... I just happened to be heading south on S. 1st and saw the van (it is bright blue and red and has a cute logo - turns out Henry is the owners' dog!) and decided to check it out. They have a picnic bench set up... and even in this heat... I'd say they are well worth the trip to South 1st and Cumberland.  Henry's ATX - thanks for such an awesome lunch. I'll be back for more flatbread pizzas on the gluten free crust!
This place is UNREAL. The food is great! Go early to get a seat as they don't take reservations.
This location is one of the best White Spots I have ever eaten at. The food has always been good and the service is "spot" on! Maybe it is because it is attached to the hotel. It has a very clean and attractive appearance and the bar looks really nice too. It's pretty much the only location I will eat at anymore.
For those of you who are whining "it's just rice and beans!", or that you can make your own bowl of the same ingredients, you're doing it wrong.  This is a review of The Whole Bowl food cart on 9th and Alder.  And I love it.  The ingredients taste fresh, the bowl is always full of these ingredients - what more can I say?  Oh, I could also say: the tali sauce is perhaps the greatest accompanying sauce in the history of man?  Are you a busy person who works by this food cart and doesn't want to feel bloated from thai food? Check out the Whole Bowl, your body will thank  you.
Absolutely fantastic!  The entire staff is great here and Dr. Aaron really takes the time to listen, educate you about your spine, and feel good about your care.
Daito is such a gem found on the drag. We were looking for some ramen to celebrate my nephew's birthday (the kid loves Japanese food). A popular ramen place had a line out the door. When we heard that Daito had no wait at the time, we rushed over here. Luckily we had no trouble finding some pay-by-space street parking.   Everyone at the restaurant was so nice and helpful! They only have a handful of items, mostly different types of udon broths, to choose from but you don't need anymore than that. All of their noodles are handmade and you can taste the difference. Everyone at our table ordered different items from the cold dipping udon to curry udon. Everything was delicious.   My sister said the last time they found a cold dipping udon was back in Korea and Daito was actually more yummy than what they remembered from their trip. Good news - this place is awesome and affordable. Bad news - we'll be craving their food all the time.
This was our second time dining at this establishment.  My wife loves the ambiance of the place- the music is great, the lighting and decor are excellent for a date night.  We were seated quickly, our server JuHe was excellent.  She went over the menu changes from our last visit and we decided to order a local beer for myself, and my wife had a glass of wine.  We ordered the mussels for happy hour as well.  We wanted to take our time, which she asked at the start of our dining experience.  Please order the Meatloaf, Mussels, Trout, or the Pork Osssobucco.  Excellent dining experience.  Great service.  Great chef and bartenders who know their stuff!
I went here with my girlfriend and brother a few weeks ago.  You have to be from the Boston to appreciate the atmosphere.  Our waitress was very thorough and quite a character.  My girlfriend being from out of town thought she was being rude but I had to explain that's how people from around here talk to each other.  But speaking on that point, order more than you think you're going to eat because you'll get a hard time for ordering too little.  I would say this is the best pizza in Boston.  Everything about it was pretty much as good as can be.  The dough, the sauce, and especially the cheese were exceptional.  I would recommend the sausage pizza, which makes my mouth water when I even think of it.  If I had one slight complaint it would be that part of the pizza was burnt but I'm not sure it's that common.  This is a must try for anyone who wants to look for great pizza in Boston.  Thankfully, due to East Boston's location it's kept the place from being overrun with tourists.  Still a Boston establishment through and through which is great to see.
Absolutely amazing and truly authentic Mexico flavors. Growing up in Arizona and actually spending a lot of time in Mexico I've become spoiled to good Mexican food. Moving to Florida sent me on a search for great Mexican food and I about gave up until I found this place. The food is amazing and the staff ( all family ) are great. I really recommend checking out taco tuesdays. All tacos are just $1 also thursdays is 1/2 off burritos. Everything is fresh and made to order so expect a little bit of a wait. Be sure to check out the house made salsa bar and if you like it extra spicy like me be sure to ask for the ghost pepper salsa they make. Great food and even better prices
Quick counter-serve Mexican. I had the chicken burrito plate with rice and beans. Tasted great, and like everyone says the salsa bar is awesome to do it up how you like. Spent $6.38 and rolled outta there with a full happy belly.
I go here about once a week for the lunch special since it's a block away from my office. Delicious, fresh, healthy, and cheap. Good service and can call in your order ahead of time
Amazing coffee! I was only there for about 5 minutes, but the baristas were so nice and made my drink exactly how I wanted it. If I'm ever back in the area, I'll definitely go again.
The food was really good but worth the price. When calling for reservations if you ask to sit in the lounge area the high back chairs against the wall are more comfortable. However, you can still see and hear the band from the dining area which also has high back chairs. The music is very soothing and the lead singer is awesome!
My current review still stands but want to make people aware that the food is not on the cheap side. It is fresh, natural, and tasty but you are going to pay a premium. The 3 Flashers "chicken nuggets" are gluten free but are tiny in size and cost $3 so basically $1 each. One of my daughter's Flashers were just a little larger than a quarter. Everything is a la carte also so you buy fries and drink separate. My Grain burger was really good but it cost $6.  No complaints with friendliness, taste, or cleanliness of the place. All is excellent. Just know that even though it is fast food, it is priced higher than most fast food chains.
I am really really picky about my hair, I only use Aveda color (it just works best on my hair) so I found this place on the Aveda website and they are close to my house so I decided to give them a try and I am so happy I did.  Laura is the owner and she couldn't be nicer the whole staff is so sweet.  They are a smaller salon (in an old house that is super cute) and every person I met took the time to talk with me and made me feel so welcomed.  Denise did my highlights and cut, she did a fantastic job, the color looks so natural and beautiful.  I have only been in Austin for a few months so I was stressing about finding a new salon, this place was the first one I tried and will be the salon I will always go to.  If you are looking for a new place I would recommend this salon, I'm sure the whole staff is great, they seem to have very loyal customers.  When people go out of their way to make you happy it shows and I am a very happy customer!!
Really great pho! I ordered chicken pho and even though it's not on the menu they will take grilled chicken and add it to any soup if you ask. It's so good!! The price is the same as any other pho place and you definitely get your fill. Yummy.  We used to go to Saigon Fare because it was closer to our house but they would always be closed or not answer the phones during their business hours so we gave up on them.
The best massage I've ever had - EVER! Sheila is amazing. She is able to totally understand your needs and help get your body moving and feeling good. I've had some serious neck and shoulder issues from working at a computer and she was able to dig in and release some of the connection that had formed between some of my muscles, immediately relieving pain I've had for so long! She is amazing and I would absolutely recommend her to everyone I know.
Love the whole cupcake truck experience.  I got the carrot cake cupcake and it was so moist and flavorful!!! I loved the chunks of nuts throughout.  I am still dreaming about that cupcake.  It was a pleasant treat during my visit at SXSW.
Professional, reliable and hard-working, I have hired Bertolli to replace hardwood floors in two of my condos in Midtown Atlanta, three years apart. Let's face it, Metropolis and Spire have LOTS of rules that vendors need to navigate, and any renovation work is no picnic.  Bruno and team were so helpful; especially after  my hot water tank failed and flooded a part of my unit.  They have all of the insurance paperwork on file and are easy to work with. I'm very happy with the results.
This place is very good and the concept is fun!  Easy access to parking and easy to get in out of Easton.  They have a good happy hour. $2.00 off of drinks.
I've only been here twice but each time I enjoyed myself completely. I agree that the outside of the place looks not too stellar but the inside of the place is charming. The service was always super awesome and helpful (including smiley faces and "happy birthday" on my receipt after they overheard my boyfriend and I arguing over who would pay on my b-day).  Both times I ordered the Gang Musmun Curry with tofu (a staple of mine) and each time it was flavorful and filling. I crave it still.  Can't beat it.
Just had my nails by Donna.  She did a great job! Best prices in town.  I'll definitely be back!
I'm so sad how many people really don't like this place.  During the summers, our family goes here for brunch often on Sunday afternoons.  They make the best french toast I've had anywhere!  The place is family owned and run, and possibly overwhelmed with so much family to care for while running a restaurant, it's rather obvious I agree.  On Sunday afternoons their teenage daughter is often the waitress, she's sweet and shy, the atmosphere is pretty authentic and unique for a Cambridge restaurant.  Eating here is like eating at a friend's house, it's not for everyone, I have personally witnessed the service issues, and I can't disagree it could be better, it also depends on the day.  However, I'm also not usually in a rush when I come, it's a family meal, we come to relax and enjoy ourselves over a good meal.    The food I've had here makes up for the service and has always been good.  It's probably also the cheapest eat in town, for a table of three we often only spend $10 before tipping (we tip well, it's a family owned business).  Summers are best here, we can enjoy the seating outside, enjoy the breeze on a sunny day, people watch, and be served outside.  I am all for supporting a local family owned and run business.
I've been dancing Pro-Am in the International Latin style with Leon for about 1.5 years, and so this is more of a review of his teaching than the actual studio (which he is currently setting up as of this date).  With private lessons, you definitely get a lot for your money. He is very focused in helping you achieve your dance goals, as long as you articulate it. He'll also introduce you to new dance styles (if you're focused on one style like me). I like Leon because he not only teaches you at the studio, but he'll also connect with you outside the studio - and this speaks to a person who is serious about improving their dance technique like me. He'll check in with you outside of studio time, provide you with dance resources to make sure you get a certain concept right if it wasn't grasped during your lesson, and make you fully understand the culture of dance (if you care for it)! Receiving lessons from Leon is a pleasure because he not only has a passion for dancing, but you know that he really cares about his students.  Outside of private lessons, Leon hosts outings to various salsa clubs in Boston and Cambridge (usually it's Havana Club in Cambridge). I don't take his salsa classes, but I've gone out with him and his students and it's always a good time.   Lastly, he also hosts a dance video blog (www.passion4dancing.com) where he'll teach certain dance techniques. It's a true testament to his comprehensive teaching style.
This past Wednesday while in town for business a co-worker and I visited for lunch. Full disclosure, this is not in tourist Orlando, so do not expect fancy. What you will get is some amazing food.  I had the fried shrimp and my coworker had the boiled. Both came with corn, sausage, and potatoes and were delicious. My shrimp were seasoned and cooked to perfection and my friends were huge. The potatoes were silky and no butter was spared. Sausage spicy and corn freshly cooked and yummy. To the freshly cooked part, be prepared to wait, but honestly, its worth it in the end. It was a rainy day so no car wash, this time
This is a great place! Free tour of the brew house with a free tasting right after! Tour guides were really knowledgable & entertaining & you get a free Sam Adams beer glass afterwards. Outdoor beer garden is alright, and the bar inside is pretty cool. You can get flights which is always a plus, and there's a little food truck outside the brewery!
I've always wanted to go here but never felt like I had the time and now I know WHY! Soooooo slooooow Do not even attempt unless you have +3 hours in between flights  The Sushi was actually quite good, albeit a bit over priced, but then again it's the nicest Restauant @ Sushi was good I had the $17 small kamakazee roll Took ~1 hour
The ambiance is okay. I just recently had lasik, however, came in here a few months prior 'cause I was strongly considering not going through with it if I were to get some Frames that were decent and didn't make me feel like the girlfriend in Revenge of the Nerds. The lady who was helping me was super nice and sweet, however, I wasn't happy with the frames. It was nothing personal on them but maybe my insecurity with glasses in general. She was patient with me.
Awesome service.  Technician showed up at exactly the scheduled time and was in and out in about 15 minutes.  Would definitely recommend!
I am so surprised to read the other less than perfect reviews! My husband and I actually ended up here because the place we usually go to when we visit Mt. Dora was closed. Boy am I glad! I do agree the prices are a bit high...but that's where it ends. Our server was perfect. The atmosphere was perfect. The food was incredible!!! My husband ordered some calamari to start with. It was delicious. Perfectly done. I ordered a simple burger. No cheese. No toppings. It was without question the most amazing incredibly delicious hamburger I have ever had ANYWHERE!! My husband ordered the jambalaya. He said we could have been in New Orleans it was so good!! We will definitely eat there again!!
No need to say too much. Came in after having some foot pain to find out an injury that happened a year back caused some ligament damage.  Met with Dr Mereau and she suggested an MRI as soon as possible.  After finding out I had multiple torn ligaments, we proceeded to schedule a surgery and knock it out. Its been 7 weeks since surgery and I am getting better every day.  They are always available and very easy to work with. Also, they have a lot of open times in their schedule.  No complaints at all.
Weekend brunch is awesome, best in Boston.  $25 per person is high but kids are free and the seating is relaxing and quite.  Nice to enjoy an extra coffee with a second helping of eggs.
If you have a hankering for Ethiopian, I would recommend Enat on account of two things: decent service and an inviting dining space.  I've tried a few other joints around this neighborhood, and Enat definitely provides the most pleasant dining experience.  The waitstaff are friendly and attentive, and they are clearly proud of the food they serve.    Don't get me wrong, the food is good.  Fluffy injira, fresh greens, stewed lamb, what's not to like?  But seriously, compared to the place above the grocery store and that other place where it might take you an hour to get your food, this place is like ethiopian food heaven.
Great food and service! Again. 4 out of the last 5 weeks great every time.. tuesday and Wednesday get right in.  Always looking to make sure that you have a great time!
Great (dog friendly) patio, nice bartenders. A really easy place to just go and enjoy a night with friends.
finally set foot and tried the supposedly glamorous desserts here.   when this place opened, getting a reservation was thru the roof...every night was full, and it didnt help that they only opened until 6. nowadays, its till 9. they do some pasta and rice dishes in their, typical of a fusion japanese cafe...for tonight however, it was all about desserts!   we decided on trying the mont blanc soufflé! came with vanilla ice cream and chestnut puree. and we had to try the French Honey Toast came with raspberry ice cream, pistachio, and whipped cream!    note: when ordering the souffle, you gotta wait 30 mins ( they will tell u this...its not really 30mins...more like 15-20. ) tells u they make it from scratch.   the japanese souffle was amazing! really soft, light, and fluffy! the texture told me a lot about the impeccable timing and skill of the cook. the vanilla ice cream topped with chestnut puree was wonderful. the taste contrast was excellent..when eaten with the souffle and the whipped cream..it was such a delight! every bite was souffle goodness..  the french honey toast was delicious as well. each toast carefully prepared. came with syrup on the side which complimented the dish well.   the ambiance was nice. nice cushion chairs which looked like a throne. some have rabbit ears and a constant reminder that eating desserts takes stress away! lol  cheers! happy eating!
Service is a bit slow, but the ladies/servers were very nice. I don't mind too much about the slow service since the food is delicious, I definitely recommend the Beef Sukiyaki combination! It's such a great deal for the quality of the food you are receiving. I usually get the combination with California rolls. Definitely recommend you try this place out!
Any restaurant whose premium tequila list dwarfs the wine list and provides the option to eat a whole quail in one sitting is an Austin classic in my book!
I've been with Dr Rust for a couple months now. He's been great and very friendly. The staff are great and helpful,they work hard and quickly as a team even when it gets a little chaotic.. great place if you have to go..
I had great service. Matthew told me costs up front and I didn't pay a dime. They didn't charge for diagnostics or try to sell me replacement parts - whaaaa? And they probably lost money on me because they washed my car to boot. They have a customer for life now. Thanks!
Dr. Henry and his staff provide an exceptional service that I have yet to find at any other dentist. I have been a patient for almost 4 years. Dr.Henry is the first Male Dentist that has been extremely conscience about how comfortable his patient is while being in the chair.   All I can say is I wished I would've found him sooner!
Catch Air is seriously one of the best indoor play places in Atlanta! But, you will not find me anywhere near this place on the weekends, nights or when kids are off school. It's like an insane nightmare! Too many kids!   But!  Reasons I like Catch Air:  1) Great way to get your child to become utterly exhausted! 2) Versatile play equipment!  3) It's clean!  4) Various creepy mascots come out and dance with the kids!  5) Glow-In-the-Dark, Black Out dance parties every hour! Rave on!   I love that all the equipment is great for all different ages. There is a "fenced off" area for smaller children under 3. It's filled with little merry-go-rounds, small slides, ball pit and padded area for babies to crawl.   There's also a jungle themed area for the slightly larger children filled with multiple slides, ball pit, air gun room, and much more.   There's also a dance floor that lights up! This is where the basis of al the glow-in-the-dark dance parties take place! Parents and care givers can feel transported back into their rave days...but without the drugs ;)   There is also a small inflatable with obstacles. And there's a giant slide inflatable as well. And, parents can go down the slide with their children!  There are also two interactive touch screen TV's that have various games for children on them everyday. And music is constantly blasting!   Catch Air also offers food, snacks and beverages for purchase. So, outside food and drinks are frowned upon :(  And socks are a must!  Also, very secure and safe environment! Parent must fill out electronic waiver before entering. Both parent and child are stamped that match one another's and are matched up before leaving. And the front area with desk/shoe cubbies, and play area are separated by a small wall, so it's hard for anyone to slip out unnoticed.   So, have fun and expect to get exhausted!
Amazing food and great service. Friendly owner. Original Tali service. You know it's good when half the customers are Indian. Flavors are addicting. Keeps me coming all the way from Roswell.
I had the duck, the fromage special, and the macaroons. Really incredible!! Beautiful new flavors. Great wait staff! They were quick, helpful and friendly!
unique and delicious food.  good drink selection.  all at great prices.  friendly staff as well, which is hard to find!
I order online and have it delivered! Food always on point and don't have any complaints.
I just moved into my new home and none of my appliances worked. I'm a panic I called GIA Appliance repairs since they 24 hour. They responded quickly and the gentlemen named Jimmy came out and was able  to fix my stove, Dishwasher, washer, and my fridge!! I was so impressed! Thank you GIA!! You saved my night! Plus the cost of repairs was affordable! I will definitely call GIA again.
What a trip! On the way back from Cape Cod my sweetheart and I were faced with that great airport check-in question: "The fight's been over-sold. Are there any volunteers to fly out tomorrow?"  Our schedules were clear and they were offering the night's lodging and dinner money, plus 2 free airline tickets. You bet we said "yes." So now we're in the airport and want to choose the best restaurant there. We find just what we're looking for in Terminal B before you have to go through security.  The Legal C Bar run by Legal Seafoods.  Look: Most airport restaurants suck. That's the way the world mostly works these days. But not the Legal C Bar. It's serves legitimate 4 star seafood and couldn't have been a better find. It's simply the best airport food I've found, literally in the entire world (not counting the airport hotel restaurants you'll find in  places like Singapore, etc.).   So I'm asking' ya, please tell me if you know of some place better, 'cause I want to nominate these guys for some kind of award or something, given the miserable nature of most airport eats.
Shake Shack was definitely worth the $20 I spent just for me. Will definitely be back next time I'm in town.
This is my favorite head shop in Portland.  It really is the best,  I travel from St. John's to come here.  You can't beat the prices and the staff is super cool.  The herb selection is the best in town and the glass is amazing.  Also best price on kratom I've found anywhere yep anywhere Internet included.  Love this place.
Creature Comforts is the Starbucks location in Animal Kingdom. They have it going on! The line moved quick. Everyone was nice and my order came out quickly. Get a Mickey Cinnamon Roll! It is HUGE!
A trip to Downtown Disney isn't complete until we've had a sundae at Ghirardelli's. Even before walking in, the scent of sweetness is drawing you near. No wonder this is such a popular spot, but the line is worth the wait. We all tried something different and were equally ecstatic. From shakes, coffees, sundaes and especially their chocolate dipped waffle cones, you can't ever go wrong. This time I ordered a cone with a scoop of rocky road and java chip. The entrance right next door takes you to their chocolate shop where you can find more than your share of delicious chocolate squares. Love being greeted by the girl giving away mini squares as you walk in.
i went here for a first date last week and it was also my first time there. SUCH a great place. very alternative and grungy, but also super classy and cute. i love that it's open @ night, and there was a guy playing the piano beautifully. its cheap, the coffee is great, and is original. the art displayed on the tables, in the bathroom, and the coffeehouse itself is just absolutely adorable. probably my new favorite spot in Portland.
You need to try the Thai Smoked Chicken hash and Steak and Potatoes. They also have the best fish tacos you're ever going to have. I could come here every night. You know what ...? I might. Don't take my table!
So....I am a VIP member....only because this great card came in the mail....good marketing Duffy's ....it got me in the door with $10 off of my meal.....loved it... I had the lobster roll....it was decent but the grilled zucchini and dip trio took the cake....They have a good variety of food. Not too expensive...my lobster roll was approximately $14...and the dip trio was about $8...the trio included salsa, fresh guacamole and queso....I could have just had that...They have a MILLION tv's....what ever game you are looking for it will be playing at this place....they have an ongoing drink special...241....how great is that....???!!!!! Our server was friendly and prompt...Ill be returning.
I have been going here for about a year and the staff are wonderful! They remember your name, treat you with the upmost respect and always try to accommodate your requests. I see that they are like this with every customer and quite a few men actually go here as well. Wei is one of my favourites and I recommend the deluxe natural mani pedi as it will totally relax your tired hands and feet. I've even went back the next day when I messed up one of my nails and tried to give the lady a tip but she didn't want to take it. They are so sweet and this is the best place to go for nails in the area.
Absolutely the best meal I have had in Austin in a long time! Super staff and friendly people they go out of their way to serve you delicious food. Expensive but well worth every penny.
We went out for a Saturday dinner-date last night at this restaurant, which we'd heard nice things about. Just a 5 minute drive from Harvard Square, it was cozy and informal, and reminded me of Italian restaurants in smaller towns and cities there, such and Parma.   The owner actually came over, took our order, and served us. That was a nice treat. He's from Napoli, and he was extremely accommodating. I spotted a man at a table on the other side of the room eating what turned out to be a squid-ink pasta with seafood. We managed to snag the very last one available after the owner rushed over to put the order in.   We had an excellent cheese, prosciutto and figs anti-paste; squid-ink pasta; and hanger steak with Brussels sprouts and potatoes. A great added thing was they split the pasta and steak into two small dishes for us. For dessert with had chocolate tort with hazelnut gelato, and a tiramisu.   Squid ink seafood pasta with shrimps was the best. Hanger steak was very good. The ambience was laid back and comfy.   Overall, an authentic Italian eatery without any pretentiousness whatsoever. A gem, just as it was said to be. We'll be returning soon. But please don't go! Or don't tell too many folks if you do. A gem like this deserves to remain half secret. ;)
I think people are being a bit harsh with their reviews.  The food here is light years better than other choices in the neighborhood.  I can't comment much on the service since I usually get take out, but my orders have been taken care of promptly.  The food here is a step up from your typical pizza joint.  Classic NY choices, especially the pizza, sausage and pepperoni rolls, won't let you down.  The hoagies were decent as well.  People need to get over the whole NY attitude thing.  We're not still fighting the Civil War, are we?  It's a NY pizza place, so what do you expect?  I want an authentic NY experience.  Considering all the vacant storefronts and fly by night strip clubs in the area, this is a very welcome addition to the neighborhood.
The liege waffles here are amazing (especially with the white chocolate rose water dipping), however be warned that the wait to get in can be really long-- we waited 45 minutes on a Monday morning. Also great was the jamaiquita lemonade. Lavendar latte tasted very strongly of lavendar-- proceed with caution! The main dishes are great if you are a steak lover for the breakfast, but I would have liked it if they had some more lighter fare selections. Overall, great breakfast though.
Not the world's biggest Chinese foodie but I've had my fair share and this place was BOMB! The place was clean inside. Great service. Food was fresh and delicious. Good prices. And late night takeout. 5 stars all day. Ill be back next week.
Such a wonderful prix fixe menu-all you can eat for just $45 but it's worth so much more!  We loved everything from the garlic butter and bread, the best Brussel sprouts in the world, decadent fried goat cheese, grilled okra, fried oysters, shredded brisket to the TO DIE FOR  beignets with butter rum ice cream-we will be back often!!!!!!  Vincent was a great waiter as well!  Here again!  9/8/17 Danielle was Adorbs!!!!  Menu has changed but brussel sprouts still on it!  Phenomenal sword fish, braised pork rib-Yum!  Mac n cheese-YES!
Pure upscale defines the essence of service & professionalism exemplified by licensed Barber/owner Corey Cooper. Nestled in East Atlanta, a posh location with a cozy ambiance. Get your haircut with precision while enjoying a customized appointment, so you always get the VIP feel. For the Ladies, you can get styled by the talented Dani J. This is the only Barbershop and salon I visit when coming to Atlanta.
I love this place! I have checked out ALL of the fabric stores in Boston and Grey's ranks near the top. Grey's has a really well curated collection of fabric and patterns. The store is spacious and clean, and conveniently located near the SOWA lot. Free parking behind the shop too! There are 6 or 8 machines in the back of the shop for lessons or open studio hours where you can just hang out and sew.   Sarah is really patient and great about offering sewing tips. She'll help you pick out patterns by body type and pattern difficulty and you can tell she is genuinely excited about her work. Definitely stop by if you are in the area and if not, it is worth the trip!
Great service and wonderful people behind the operation. The visit was quick, painless and professional for my little sister (13 at the time). I've seen my mom deal with too many dentists who overcharge or provide a poor service, treating it more like a car repair than an operation... Dr. Brandon's is different, and I can tell she couldn't be happier. Plus, if my little sister gave a thumbs up, I know it's the place to go. I'd definitely recommend them for any visit :)
I had the Papis Sandwich with black beans and rice ... Very good! My Bae had the Same with the Manduros (sweet Plantains) ..she gives it a 4.5 & I give the same ... And my fish bowl blue curaçao was on Point! I will be back
All time favorite spot in the neighborhood. Inexpensive and great quality food. Its evident how fresh the ingredients are. Family-owned and they are so accomadating. They really make you feel like part of their family!
It was a firm "No" to our Redbull and vodka request - but that came as no surprise, since many bars no longer serve energy drinks. It was also a "No" to a Spanish coffee, when the bartender realized they were out of Bacardi 151. That was more funny than anything else, since it was his suggestion. What I ended up with was a Deschutes Brewery's' Jubelale - which was festive for the season and a beer I really like. They also had a high-end brand of tequila that my friend really enjoyed.   I was shocked at the size of the "shot", considering it came in a lowball glass poured almost half full. Needless to say, you needn't more than one...a mistake my friend and paid for the next day. lol    The place itself is on the smaller side and has a cozy feel - but it could have just felt that way because it was crowded. Unable to get a table, we sat at the bar and listened to the live music from our bar stools.  The decor is posh and the service was really good. What it reminds me of is a neighborhood restaurant, like a high-end Cheers, if Cheers was classy. It makes me wish I lived in the Pearl and could just walk here on snowy days when the city is standing still.
I went out for brunch by myself after working OT at my job. It's very chic and modern and I would have easily mistaken it as a very expensive restaurant. It's not that expensive. I was glad they didn't mind my casual look and I was able to sit down in the cocktail lounge area which had a view of 6th Street.   I was bummed they didn't have the Acai Berry smoothie and I wasn't in the mood for coffee because the last thing I needed was more coffee in my system. I ordered for appetizer the Fried Point Judith Calamari which basically I'm a sucker for Fried Calamari. It's one of those items where if a restaurant, I'll order it without hesitation. Then I had the Kobe Burger w/ cheddar, avocado and bacon. It was stacked very high and it was guaranteed to fall apart when I take the first bite. The food and the service was good.
When in Columbus, check out Columbus Brewery. Great food, beers. And  "Kate".  Sit at the bar for Kate. She knows her stuff.  Ask for the calamari. & get extra fresh jalapenos. Lightly battered, super tasty.
I went to this location for the 1st time yesterday not really knowing what I was walking into - but I was pleasantly surprised by the variety. The staff was friendly and they had the cutest clutches and bags starting from $8.
Great place! Staff is amazing and the drinks are on point! By far the most beautiful nightclub in Orlando! Was in town visiting and the bartender treated me like a regular that always comes in!
I have been to see Hap the Dentist now a couple of times. Really impressed with the level of service I received. The difference between this Dentist and others was that I felt I was getting a full education about my teeth, Previous Dentists had always just worked on me but not truly explained why or given me the complete scenario of care I needed. So for me the difference was the level of detail and time Hap is prepared to take to give you the options to improve your Dental health. He is also very friendly and personable. Parking is good and the front of office staff very  friendly.
Lily's is absolutely hands-down the best place to get the freshest and tastiest pasta in Boston. They have a wide variety of all-natural pastas, sauces and toppings to choose from. I highly recommend trying the Alfredo sauce with mushrooms, it is superb! The owner Matt always goes out of his way to ensure that you have a great experience and that you leave full and satisfied. Definitely not to be missed!
This place is a definite must-eat if you're not from Austin and are visiting. This place is STILL a definite must-eat if you are from Austin.   I took away a star and gave it 4 stars because of the wait. If you decide to go around 6-8pm (any day of the week) be prepared for a WAIT! The line goes out the door, wraps around the building, and then some. The ordering/seating system is also a little confusing for first-timers, I can't even try and explain it, but be ready to be mildly confused if it's your first time there.  I also only gave it 4-stars because I don't know if I can give it 5-stars since the four times I've eaten there I've eaten the exact same burger... now, is that a bad thing? No, I think it might say a lot for Hopdoddy's since I'm so in love with this burger I can't even try other burgers. GREEK BURGER is where it's at. I'm a fan of Greek food in general, and to combine Greek + Burger into one beautiful mash-up? Heavenly.   So I don't know if that gives me the right to properly review this place. I think the problem with this place is that each burger is so good in its own right, once you try one burger, you can't stop eating that same burger... my boyfriend did the same thing with the Terlingua. He got it the first time, and the next two times he went, the burger was just so good he couldn't even bother try any of the others!  The boyfriend is in love with the Kennemec (spelling?) fries. Me? I think they aight! Sometimes they're really salty, and sometimes they're just perfect. I think the herb-y stuff they sprinkle on the fries makes it really stand out from other fries at burger places.   I suggest if you go here, you go at like 5-5:30PM to beat the rush. And try and go in a big group and have everyone get different burgers, that way you have the opportunity to take a bite into other burgers to try them out. Don't be like me... stuck with the same delicious burger each time I go... woe is me!
Never disappointed. Cheese bomb calzone with chicken rocks. Grilled Caesar awsome. Delivery is super quick!
I am super impressed with my first visit! Nancy and Nicole absolutely killed it with my shellac mani-pedi. Definitely went above and beyond making the experience worth every penny.
I am always excited when a new joint opens in town, and so naturally I had to check this place out. I'll start of with the atmosphere. Being a new establishment, the inside is clean, inviting and classy.   The menu has something for everyone and I think they have a very diverse range of dishes. After coming here twice, I have noticed they have changed their friend chicken recipe - for the better. One of the best dishes I've ever had!   The cocktail menu is exceptional, and like the food menu is unique, simple and refreshing. After dinner and drinks, that's when I got to thinking - the sweets must be awesome. You absolutely have to have desert if you're eating here! My recommendation is the salted caramel cheesecake.  The staff is very friendly and professional,   I love this place and hope it does really well - I will definitely be back for more!
This is your standard Thai restaurant. Nothing amazing about it but it also doesn't disappoint. I had the shrimp drunken noodles which were good and the vegetable dumplings which were good but the sauce that went with it could have been improved. Good spot if you're looking for Thai food in this area so I would recommend checking it out if you're craving Thai.   Overall: doesn't disappoint, good if you want Thai in this area
Took a shitty situation and made it bearable. Dealt with the insurance company, free loaner, and most important quality work.   I consider myself a car guy, so I paid attention more than most. Their shop was spotless. That's huge. Quality work stems form a clean work area. The work done was immaculate. NO orange peel at all. Lifetime warranty on all their work. Great customer service too.   The only thing I can't comment on are the prices since insurance handles it.   I realize I sound like I work for them but I don't, it was just a good experience. And when someone does a great job I want it heard.
Living in California We're spoiled with great authentic Mexican food. It was a great surprise to find El Sazon Latino! There's nothing like enjoying a good meal at a family owned and operated establishment! If you're looking for good food, at a great cost in a great environment... this is the place! Cheers to El sazon Latino...Enjoy!
I went here to the sunday brunch with live reggae music about a month ago, HANDS DOWN the best idea ever. I had a great time and the food was good but the vibe of the place made it better. If you're not a patient person I'd suggest to make a reservation or eat at the bar!
Best chocolate chip cookies in the city.  They're tons of other flavors too that are worth trying, though I stick with the original.  Why mess with perfection?
This is a good reason to move to Southie (plus they now have Starbucks in West Broadway).  It's a nice, quaint restaurant just a block from Broadway T station (Red Line).  We were led to the older part of the building.  A bit rustic but very nice.    We had a very good waitress who was friendly, courteous and who always check up on us every three minutes or so.   She also carried a nice conversation with me and my buddy.  I ordered one of weekly specials, Lobster Casserole.  Full of huge, lobster chunks and a thick layer of crab meat underneath.  There was not much of breadcrumbs in their casserole.  Great for people who are in to low-carb diet.  :)    The casserole had just a touch of fat.  It was not too buttery.  The casserole was lightly dusted with breadcrumbs.  Some restaurants use breadcrumbs to bind everything together and make one solid goo.  They did their casserole well.  For dessert, I had their tiramisu.  It was very good also, comparable to the restaurants that I usually eat in the Financial District where I work.  Yes, there's nothing special about their tiramisu but that's because they did it as good as the more expensive restaurants downtown.  One thing that I like about this restaurant is that they serve fine foods but it does not feel that you're coming to a restaurant that serves snotty crowd.  This is a restaurant where you can eat fine food and still feel relax and comfortable, much like a holiday dinner with family (not in-laws) and friends.
Vintage has a warmth to it even on the dampest days. Interesting cocktails, but what's really great about it is the level of skill and knowledge of the bartenders. It's a pleasure watching them work.
Great service! Needed a new battery for my Samsung, and they did it for a reasonable price. Huzzah!
I love this place for the great customer service! They treat their customers with care and positive attitude! The food is also good. The dishes are big, and food is light and clean, not greasy! I even heard a child saying, that their burgers are better than in McDonalds! Well, I will believe to this one, because children won't lie about the food!
I love Nana's! The ladies are so friendly and helpful. They have saved me with their sweet treats many times in the last year. I have done a bridal shower, birthday parties, gifts, and just a quick pick me up. I have had the tiny cakes and cookies. The boxes for the tiny cakes are perfect for safely transporting them and the 6 pack is clear so the presentation is beautiful. I have tried all the flavors and they all taste great! Plus I am happy to be supporting a local business.
Awesome little place to eat. Breakfast and lunch available. I had the corn beef hash and some pancakes. I am a breakfast type of guy and this place rocks!! Go try it if you love breakfast!!!
Very impressed.  Interesting twists on menu items.  My shrimp cocktail was served as a salad, with horseradish ice cream (!) and a delectable hollandaise sauce to pour on top.  Never had anything like that--fun experience.  Main course was a brisket dish served with smoke appeal (cover was lifted at table to have smoke waft out).  Excellent.  Husband had a cured char appetizer and duck main course.  He enjoyed them so much I didn't get a bite!  We split a dessert, which was a beer/banana ice cream with glazed bananas on a bed of not-to-sweet choc crumbles w/ cilantro dots for garnish.  This chef pays a lot of attention to the appearance of his dishes, and they are exquisite.  Honestly half the price I'd expect to spend for quality food like this.  Next time, we're definitely going for the tasting menu.
Grecio was THE BEST!!  My issue is with Handy.  I tried to rebook my cleaning but apparently, it didn't work so an hour before, Handy sent me a text to tell me that my cleaning was set to begin in an hour.  So to not lose $$$, I had to race home and be there for 2 hours so he could clean.  This is my first time with Grecio and I must tell you, they guy was EXTREMELY thorough!  He cleaned my ceiling vents, every corner.. EVERYWHERE, I just don't have time to go on and on but I want Grecio!  Even my husband was impressed!!  I hope to see him again!  But Handy, don't scam us... It's so unethical!!
Tasty adult donuts. I first discovered them in Portland, and then later ran across a store with great delight in Venice, CA. Interesting flavors. Not as wacky as Voodoo.
Great presentation and quality of food! Don't let the small space fool you!  We stopped by for dinner with a friend and were promptly greeted and shown to our table. The space is fairly small, with maybe 8 tables. The sushi is prepared in the same room you're in and you can watch them make it. I was a bit nervous as the space look kinda run-down when we walked in, but I trusted my friend and the reviews. I'm glad I did!  We ordered the beef negimaki and these little fried avocado tuna boats as appetizers. So delicious! I really enjoyed both. The presentations were really nice and I appreciated the negimaki chopped into smaller bite-sized pieces. I ordered the Banzai to drink, which was a perfectly sweet sake and plum wine mix over ice. Yum!  For sushi I ordered a Rainbow roll and the Walking roll, which I hoped didn't grow any legs. Both were so fresh! Extra spicy mayo on the side and they had brown rice available for a dollar.   I would definitely come back here. Really great sushi.
Beef and octopus tofu soup and seafood tofu soup are both excellent choices. The only thing I don't like about the seafood tofu soup is that you have to peel the shrimps. You can choose your level of spiciness and it comes with a side of rice and egg. Your meal also comes with several side dishes, which are all worthy of trying.
I went here a few weeks ago for a work dinner. I have to say, I was pleasantly surprised how good it was! One of my coworkers found it, and suggested we go. Aside from annoying parking (which is typical in Boston) there was also no valet.   I thought the food was really solid and the service was amazing. The wine choices were some of the best I've seen. I actually commented to the waitress about that, and she said the chef is really into wine, so that was the reason why. The cheese and charcuterie cart that came around was awesome. The buratta, proscuitto and olives were amazing!   For dinner 2 of us got swordfish and another got the roasted chicken. We were all raving about our meals!  (The three of us are always trying out new restaurants, so we are pretty hard to impress).   I heard the restaurant got a bad review from a publication (maybe Boston globe) but I'm happy we tried it regardless.    The decor was cozy and cool. The service was excellent. Food was awesome. Perfect trifecta!
For take out Chinese food, pretty good.   I've had their food before. I was at a girlfriends house and we had our order delivered.  Delivery took 45 minutes, but it was during peak dinner time, I can't imagine they have a fleet of drivers just waiting to bring me MY vegetable chow mei fun!  So take delivery time into account if you're getting delivery.  Otherwise, stroll in, order up, bring it on home.
The food is delicious. My desi parents loved this place and they are super picky about eating outside. Hands down the best kobideh, jujeh and barg soltani I have had in USA. The place is slightly more expensive compared to other halal options but food is worth every penny. The hosts were extremely super accommodating during my visits. I will certainly be returning again to enjoy some barg and kobideh in the future.
Do you miss The Coffee Connection? Miss it no longer. My only complaint is the shop is small--sometimes I can't get a table when I want to hang out.  Best cappuccino in the Boston area and that's not an exaggeration. They know how to roast coffee. If the beans weren't so expensive they'd be the only beans I brew at home.
Last time I was here, it was freezing cold outside, and it was packed inside so I just got an espresso to go and a bag of some GREAT coffee beans (Sipacapa from Counter Culture). Today's weather was perfect, and I remembered Render had this outdoor patio thing so I figured I should check it out today and get some studying/reading done. After I ordered, I was lucky to get a seat in the awesome space in the back where you are INDOORS but all the walls, including the ceiling was glass, so I was basically in a room lit by the amazing sunlight with the addition of the cool air conditioning from being indoors. It's so rare to have a space like this, and I loved the fact that I was studying under the beautiful blue skies and natural light. (How awesome would it be to read a book while it's drizzling outside in this room?!)  Food/drink: I got the double espresso and a bacon & cheese quiche, and both were splendid. The double espresso was pulled perfectly both times I ordered, and with a touch of brown sugar, brought out the bright and tangy flavors (not too much acidity, I love it!). The quiche was not as warm as I would have liked it, but I loved the single portion style of it, with the amazing crunchy crust that holds the whole thing together. Service: I think the fact that they bring out your drinks to you is a great touch to the shop. Everyone was very friendly and genuinely seemed to enjoy being there.  I'm running out of coffee beans at home, and I will definitely be stopping by soon for some new beans here. Love it.
Ok. Put a plate of greens and veggies in front of me and then a nice, healthy helping of incredible chicken salad and I'll be your best friend. Cafe at Pharr has some of the most simplistically executed recipes and iterations of chicken salad(s) that I've had, but they are so perfectly simple and delicious.   Came in for lunch and started with a cup of the chicken noodle soup. It only comes in one size, just so you know you don't have to choose between a cup, bowl, jug, whatever. It was pretty textbook. Nothing too far out of the ordinary, weird, complicated, etc. It's just hearty chicken noodle, brosef.   Then, the salad plate. Greens, carrots, grapes, tomatoes, and some of the tastiest curry chicken salad I've ever had. The chicken salad is so fine, but still retaining thickness, that it's spreadable. It's creamy, but not in a gross way like some chicken salads are -- AKA they don't go overboard with mayo. To add onto this flavor train, the dressing they give you on the side is rather magical. It's a semi-sweet, ginger dressing. I can't put my finger on the entire flavor profile, but it is perfect. I used it in moderation to not overpower any of the other flavors, but man they do it right. I can see that working on a multitude of dishes.   I'm really digging Cafe at Pharr. It's a healthy choice and they do one of my favorite things perfectly. Well done, folks. Keep it coming.
Incredible lunch today. Spur of moment decision and we loved it. Will be back.   Lamb Gyro and Salad.   Very clean and elegant place. Relaxing.
I absolutely adore this place. I have been coming for years and I have NEVER had a bad or mediocre experience. I love the family atmosphere and how authentic the recipes are. The servers are attentive, helpful, and happy. You cannot go wrong with their famous Dill Pickle Soup. THis coming from someone who despises pickles! I get the Rahmschnitzle and its perfect. Their steamed spinach cannot be beat and the spaetzle is just delicious.   Worth the visit. Pure, authentic german food.
This is one amazing coffee shop.  The service was amazing, they were polite and helpful.  The coffee was awesome. Everything was made fresh and fast.  They have a tiny little place, but have probably the best coffee in Portland.  I would highly recommend everyone come here!  PS, Don't plan to sit and chat here though, it is too small for chairs, so they have bars to lean on, or outdoor tables if its nice.  Really enjoyed it!
Charles has a great store and stocks only the finest outdoor sporting apparel, guns, fly rods &amp; reels, flys, boots, jackets, flashlights, binoculars, and much much more.  High end stuff only.  Exceptional quality.  Check their web site!
Yum yum yum! Really interesting choices here at happy hour, and great prices! Loved the Kern Dogs, and especially the Roscoe (sp?). It was fried chicken wrapped in waffle covered in syrup... definitely try it if you go.   I ordered a Cosmo, and it was made great. Not watered down, and not too sweet.   We got quite a bit of food, and the bill was tiny.   Definitely recommend!
This is a small, cozy coffee house with a delicious menu. Also serving smoothies and fresh sweet breads. The owners are mellow and enthusiastic about keeping this historic establishment functioning at the highest and healthiest level. I highly recommend! In a great neighborhood too!
I've been living at 315 on A for almost three years and can't say enough good things! The building is beautiful, the location is AMAZING and the staff is seriously wonderful. From the management team to the service team, everyone is so friendly and attentive, and they do a great job of making the building feel like home.   While there has been a lot of turnover in management, there have been a couple of key staff members that have made remained throughout and have done a terrific job at keeping things running smoothly. Jovan at the front desk is amazing- always friendly, LOVES dogs and goes above and beyond to help out residents and their guests. Scott on the service team is WONDERFUL. Almost as soon as I click Submit on a maintenance request, he's knocking on my door, ready to fix whatever it is that needs fixing. He's fun to talk to and really makes an effort to get to know everyone in the building.
Very chill place to have a drink, play board games and eat. Great service and live music. I loved the Mac and Cheese and the Caramel and Bacon Fries.
One of the best meals I've ever had! Food is definitely a work of art here! We did the chefs tasting with numerous courses, and everything was delicious. We did a drink pairing as well which was very enjoyable. Everything is cooked to perfection, and melts in your mouth. All the portions are small, but it is a tasting. I left feeling full, but not too stuffed. I would highly recommend.
My friend had told me I HAD to go check out this place.  Here family get's a pizza there at least once a week, so after a day kayaking on the water - I was game!  It's located where the concession stand was at the marina.  The counter gals were friendly and took our order.  As I was chatting with the gals (which all of the staff was friendly and VERY accommodating) they gave me a postcard flyer where I noticed they had entertainment there.  Being that I was there on a Holiday weekend - of course I asked about it.  Come to find out the owner, Patt, was on America's got talent.  So I saw Patt (who was very hands on working in the shop) and asked if we would be getting a show.  He said he would see what he could do...  about 15 minutes later (as we were sitting outside on the picnic tables looking over the water, enjoying our amazing hand tossed pizza) Jay Schuurman (which I found out is one of the partners who moved from California for this!) put on a little demonstration of pizza tossing!  WOW!! Then Patt came out and show us how to really toss a pizza - while it's on fire!!  My friend's family came on ordered the cheese pizza.  I needed a little meat and dove into a selection I created - sausage, banana peppers and mushrooms.  They have quite a few "house" specialty pizzas and I will be going back and trying some of them!  Only thing is - I could see going a little heavier on toppings...  but the sauce and crust are great!
B&G Oysters is truly "as good as it gets" for oysters and South End ambience.  The atmosphere is urban casual.  During warmer months, the outdoor space is perfect for sampling great fish, oysters and chowders.  Indoors, sit at the counter to observe the plethora of oyster choices and the work at hand.  Nice wine list and good service; friendly atmosphere, as well.  All good, though I agree that for the overall experience it is a rather pricey meal.  Make a reservation for dinnertime - they are usually booked.
Guillermo was an excellent a waiter I have never expec such a EXCELLENT WAITER in my entire life of dinning! He showed and spoke about the menu (he owned the menu). He gave my son extra attention and special treats. He took care of us like FAMILY, I would come back here the next I visit to florida and I would ask for Guillermo :-) Happy customer and AMAZING WAITER!! GOO GUILLERMO!!
Given the varied but few reviews I had some reservations about bringing my teenager's 2000 Honda Accord here for struts/shocks, possible brake job, and LOF. However, the convenience of making an appointment online, current promotions, and location gave me the push to visit them for the first time. I am very pleased with my experience and the level of service. They reported that the brakes were at 6-70% but, as I already suspected, it needed a full strut/shock job at 4 corners. The avg for such is $175-250 a corner, and with all the promotions from them and the manufacturer, I ended up with labor, tax, etc at about $182 a corner, so it felt like a great deal. They were quick and communicated well. Lastly, they forgot the LOF, and were apologetic, but not a problem, we had some time before it was needed. However, thanks to Chris who followed up with a call and a generous offer to LOF for free. Also he mailed some 10% coupons. I'll be back, and appreciate the customer service, which really defines the experience. Let's face it, anyone can do an LOF. It is the service that makes me return. Thanks!
Always skeptical about Indian restaurants in Boston- iam  pretty impressed by the food here... Very good !!!be cause not all curries tasted the same and look the same !!!
Dear Mr. Pink,  I'm sorry to write this to you in a letter, but we're through.  Mr. Myagi and I are getting married...  xoxo  Very cool Torchy's.  Love the decor and open feeling.  Best queso.  EVER.
Great little diner. I had Mike's Monty, it was a French toast sandwich with egg, Swiss, and bacon... So good. My BF got an omelette and loved it. For a small place with one cook the service is pretty fast once you sit down. The line was out the door, luckily we got there before it formed! Very small so you will most likely have to wait. My only complaint was the home fries.. I am very particular with home fries. I like them a little crispy ob the outside. These were too mushy and bland for me. All in all think its a great little diner!
Affordable good food fast service and a great menu for kids! See for yourself it's a great place to eat  Love it
I love the bubble milk tea here! The tapioca is delicious. I also tried the herbal jelly topping and it tasted so refreshing. Great service and yummy bubble tea.
Walked in for a large Nostra Combo, and the staff was relatively quick in making the pizza. Only took 15 minutes for the pizza, and the pizza was loaded with plenty of fresh toppings. The pizza tasted very fresh and wasn't full of grease and cooked just right and tasted great. The front is a bit tiny and cramped, but took the pizza back home and it still was very delicious.
I only ordered from here because I saw it on grub hub and it was 5 minutes away... Never would have thought the sushi would be so fresh! It's been hard to find good sushi here in Austin, and I will continue to order from here! Very fresh sushi
We recently moved to the same street Zoe's in on, and we were delighted to find out how great it is. We've now eaten at Zoe's once and ordered twice for pickup. The service, food, and prices are all phenomenal. They have always been great about substituting ingredients and making modifications, too, which is a major plus. The beef with peanuts is a must!
Ok, I'll admit that I'm a lesbian who hates gay bars.  and gay coffee shops.  and gay bookstores...and...My friend and I decided to check this place out and I was so pleasantly surprised!  The adorable cowboy bartender called me "darlin".  There were lovely ladies to ogle.  The dancing was a fantastic mix of impressive, hilarious and oh so sexy.  The beer was cheap.  Then I went outside!  Dance music which isn't my fave, but still a good mix.  I was lucky and scored a couch where I could creepily people watch to my heart's content. Everyone was friendly and having a hell of a time.  Nice mix of men and women, young and old, straight and gay.  My friends and I closed the bar....for the first time in many years.  The bad news...while waiting in line for the bathroom, some unfortunate soul had to barf and kept asking her "friends" to turn on the water to drown out the yakking.  The "friends" couldn't stop laughing or telling me in detail what was going down (as though I didn't know!) long enough to do so. oh to be young again.  I was complimented TWICE which made me so happy.  So what one was by the drunken unsympathetic "friend" of the yakker and the other was a totally drunk gay dude.  He said "you're pretty".  His friend said "don't mind him, he's drunk"  I said "I don't care, I'll take it".  Hooray!
Awesome service (we were the only guests at 7pm on a Tuesday), great authentic Mediterranean food. Love being able to support a neighborhood restaurant. I love Tino's but this tastes much fresher and less salty. Great wait staff that greeted us at the door and were just the right amount of attentive throughout. We will definitely return.
Hamel Painters are a high end painting company, I am a Realtor in Boston and referred Matt to a handful of my clients. This company is unique because they can repair water damage. They also specialize in painting Boston condos and townhomes. Do you want high quality work? Call them today for an estimate.
The chocolate croissant was absolutely delicious, the coffee was good and the service was outstanding!
This Papa Johns get some serious Yelp hate.  My sample size is low, but they've treated me great every time I'm here.  Case in point: they made the wrong pie when I ordered, but had already done it the right way AND gave me the mis-made pizza for free.   Pure joy for my inner fat kid/cheapskate.  Yes, Papa John's sauce is mad sweet, but among the big 3 delivery pizza joints, it's clearly the best in nearly every other measurable aspect.  The standard for pizza is high these days. I can't really defend this chain against your favorite neighborhood spot where a bunch of pizza PhDs fire up pepperoni in ovens forged in the fires of Mt. Vesuvius.   But there will always be room in my stomach for PJs.
I've been to both this location and the east side location. As far as I can tell, their menus are exactly the same.  If you go, make sure you're not starving - if it's lunch time, there will likely be a wait :) Although I've found the wait at the downtown location is less, but maybe just because it's now  So far I've had the meatball sub, the pork belly, the day after thanksgiving, and the italian.  The Italian is where it's AT! Mmmmmm. They're all good, but I have a special relationship with the italian.   I don't LOVE the kettle chips they come with so I wish there were some other siide options, but it's a small price to pay for such a delicious sandwich. A little pricey for a sandwich - $8-11, but again - worth it :)
Came here last night with a group to celebrate a birthday. We had no trouble parking in the private lot behind the cafe. We made reservations and were seated right away, arriving just in time for the "mood lighting." We were indecisive about the drink menu, finally settling on a bottle of UMA Shiraz, which we all enjoyed. The waitress was attentive and we did not have to wait very long at all after ordering. For my meal, I chose the pollo empanada and a small organic spinach salad. Both were fantastic! The salad was delicious, especially the dressing, and the empanada with chimichurri sauce was flavorful and a fair size for it's price. Most of our group went for the empanada + salad combination, but some opted for the gnocchi and loved it. I tried a bite of the pumpkin gnocchi--it could almost pass for a dessert.   Speaking of dessert, while I didn't try any, the birthday girl ordered a white and dark chocolate berry tart (and it ended up being complimentary which was a nice touch). Those who tried it said it was great!  Overall we had a wonderful experience. My only complaint is that even though this restaurant seems to have a good atmosphere for groups (also for dates!), they don't split the bill--you have to do it yourself. Additionally, when we totaled the amount we each owed ourselves, we already included the gratuity that was listed but we were billed the gratuity an additional time...which is why I've removed a star.
This place is really convenient and really fast with orders.  It's unexpectedly nice inside and sells alcohol.  It has TVs and feels more like a miniature sports bar but family friendly.  One downer is that the prices aren't the same as other Pizza Hut locations and I think that's because they know the tourists will still pay the increased prices.
Better than I expected it to be.  To be fair, I'm not a Boulder fan so that alone kind of ruins most dining experiences.  But this place was delicious and it feels a lot fancier than it is.  Service was a little slow, but it was also super busy so I can't 100% hold that against them.
This restaurant impressed me in every way. The service is excellent, and the soup is brought to your table in a dish heated by a small flame. We ordered the miso one, and the portion was huge so I could share it with my boyfriend. The soup came with real crab, eggs, and all kinds of vegetables and mushrooms. It was delicious. I recommend this place!
Mango strawberry habanero infused tequila.  Carne asada fork and knife burrito.  Hot salsa that was so delicious, I asked for a to-go container.   Awesome manager that put on the Patriots pre-season game for our table.  Happy girl.
Rolling Revival is hands down AMAZING! We used their services the morning after an epic wedding. In less than 30 minutes on the bus we were ready to take on the day and enjoy Austin without being stuck on the couch with a terrible hangover. I typically can't even move the day after heavy drinking but the IV hydration and headache medication made me instantly feel recharged and back to normal. The team was also extremely professional and incredibly well trained - the guy who helped me is an EMT. I live in the Bay Area and really wish there was a Rolling Revival near me because I would use it ALL the time. We'll definitely be scheduling time with their team next time we're in Austin. Thanks again for everything!!!
Great food. Unexpected for airport. Salad was a bit salty but the trout was amazing. Good French press coffee. Server John was a true professional.
I had the As Gouda As It Gets on a recent visit to Toasted. The grilled cheese sandwich was toasted to a nice crispiness and was filled with gooey smoked Gouda, tender pulled chicken, flavorful roasted red peppers and savory garlic spinach. The side of fries with truffle oil was crisp and tasty.
Brittany was a superb hairstylist!! She listened to my tremendous list of hair needs and worked with me to ensure my needs were met.  Great ambiance and comfortable surroundings.  The only issue was the parking; dodging traffic to cross the street was a bit hazardous.
Okay, it is expensive here.  But it is in Disney Downtown.  So discounting that fact, the service and food were amazing!  I had the farmer's market salad, and it was so yummy.  I was very impressed!  It had red and golden beets, delectable candied walnuts, slivers of watermelon radish...on and on, and oh so good!  The service was impeccable as well.
Love, Love, Love this hotel!  The staff is so friendly and accommodating.  Every time my husband and I come to Orlando, we try to stay here.  The suites and even the standard king room is spacious.  The hotel is down the road from downtown Disney and 25 minutes from Universal Citywalk.  Choose this hotel if you want to relax by the pool or at the spa.
The food and service was excellent!  We had fish tacos, chicken fried steak, chicken BLT and Banana cream pie!  Everything was delicious!
Always has the best customer service. Super friendly and knowledgeable. With a decent variety of juice at a multitude of price points. Which is why we keep coming back over the years.
We went here for a friends birthday and had an AWESOME time. Décor is cheesy, but I loved every damn second of it. We ate dinner in the brig, the back left corner of the restaurant, it was surrounded by steel bars, like you were eating  in a jail cell. The music was weird, I liked it but could see how others may have been thrown off. There are two handy buttons right next to the table, and you push them when you're ready to order.   I ordered the Hells kitchen chicken noodle dish; the waitress had forewarned us that it was very spicy but I love spicy so "I said bring it on." I had also ordered a Dynamite roll, a captain hook roll, and tried a friends cannon ball roll, all of which were exceptional. The Spicy Chicken noodle dish was really good, and definitely stayed true to its spicy reputation. All in all it was a good experience and would recommend it to others.
Went to the Scoreboard last night for the "pre grand opening party" that was open to the public.  Food was great, i had the lobster mac and cheese and enjoyed a $3 Scoreboard Blue which has a nice amount of blueberries. Staff was great, our waiter was attentive without being annoying.  Place looks pretty awesome. All new everything from ceiling to floor. If you've been there before you will enjoy the new look, lives up to the "sports bar" name for sure.
I went to Beau Thai last week at the suggestion of VZ Navigator and my proximity to the place at the time. The place was nice, though empty for a Monday lunchtime.  The appetizer salad came with a dressing that was way too sweet, but the panang curry was delicioso! I would've wished for a little spicier options, though. The prices were incredibly reasonable, too -- it only cost $15 for two people. However, I'm still looking for a Portland Thai restaurant that offers tempeh. Any suggestions?
The Gyro was pretty good. The meat to veggie ratio was meat heavy but pretty well balanced, the lettuce mostly fell off while eating it(as it should). The tzatziki was thick and tasty, the veggies were fresh. Its no Yanni's or (excuse me for getting old school) Nikki's (RIP) but not bad at all.  THE FRIES THO. I could eat all these fries forever. Battered like Rally's but thicker and with no reddish orange mystery seasoning. They were hot, crisp and tossed with some dried herbs. I would go back just for the fries.
Review applies ONLY TO TAKEOUT! I have never dined in so can't comment on that experience.  The quality is pretty good, they give large portions, and have never screwed up an order. Pricing is reasonable and they have good combo options. It's nice that the veggie fried rice doesn't have egg as my wife has an allergy and it's annoying to ask every place!  Overall good Chinese food and our goto place for Friday/Saturday night takeout!
This was my last stop on a self-made pub tour of Salem and we were here around 4:00 on a Saturday. I was expecting it to be far more crowded but it was practically empty. There were a few people who the bartenders knew by name sitting at the bar, and they were pretty friendly to us, who had never been there before. The bartender let me try a beer I wasn't familiar with and was very eager to help me make a beer selection- I'm sure it helped that the bar was pretty slow at that point. All of our beers (4 total) cost us about $24, which isn't too bad! We'll be back. It seems like the kind of place to go watch football. Outside garden seemed cute!
So far my experience has been great. I started looking for a Doggie Daycare last month for my Boxer, Chance. I checked out reviews and websites, then started emailing the daycare's that I felt would be a fit. Jen emailed me to gather all the info she needed. We popped in to meet, then set up a half day trial to make sure Chance would be a fit. I liked that there was an effort to make sure that my dog was going to get along with the other dogs in daycare before we started. It puts me at ease when I drop him off knowing that he's getting along with everyone. The half day went well, and Chance seemed to love it, so we decided to do 3 days a week moving forward. It's still early on, but I think this is going to be a great fit for us.   The price is also very affordable, the location is easy to get to, and every staff member I've met has been great.
Dark and cozy inside with great food. The lobster tacos are amazing! The prices aren't too bad either, since you can get appetizers that can function as small dinners (if you're not too hungry) for under $15.
We had family visiting from out of state and rented several items from Jessie at Z Baby Gear.  Jessie is very professional and helped us pick several items from her large inventory that would work for my little nephews. All the rentals were clean and in great working order.  Overall a great experience.  I highly recommend Z Baby Gear!
This was a fun self guided tour of the mansion built by one of Portland's founding families. The grounds hosted stunning views of the tree line and the city with several walking paths to wonder thru. The inside was well cared for and curated to show a traditional upper class home for the time. Wonderful furnishings and fixtures were set up with great informative and descriptive signs to enjoy. Most of the home is furnished in a way to reflect opulence and wealth but not really how the original family lived there. Most furnishings were far more glam than the pictures of the original rooms which is explained in several areas but I would have liked to see more of the original items or replications of them at least. A great way to spend the morning and an even better way to get amazing pictures of the city and views.
Gorgeous, inspiring, and vibrant art murals span Cabbagetown's CSX Hulsey rail yard walls for several blocks, and all art lovers need to check it out (if they haven't yet). Upon exiting the south opening of the Krog Street Tunnel, either hang a left or right to start marveling at it all.   Some of my favorites include the following: - @RisingLotus' martial art + fantasy mural  - @Sever's rendition of The Giver - @LelaBrunetArt's yellow woman wearing a headdress.  Every time I have someone out of town (who loves art) comes through, I take them here.
Feasted on raw oysters and fried clam strips. All delicious. Beer list was solid. Nice outside seating on the second floor for a good view of the harbor.
Best omelet I've ever had! Feta, basil, and tomato cooks slightly runny with a side of yummy bread. It was on the seasonal menu and boy did it taste fresh and local. Delicious ingredients put together with thought. Worth every penny!
I want to give a quick review for the service. I needed to send a cheer-you-up treat to a friend of mine in Boston. I live in NY and decided to see if there was anything better than a pizza that could be delivered. Thanks to Yelp I found Code 10, who not only had several delicious looking items on their dessert menu and could be ordered directly though Yelp, but their service was great!   I needed to change the name on the delivery, I called and that was no problem. Then, I realized I made a mistake. As the delivery man, Jose, called to tell us he was at the door, my friend revealed he was at another address! Thank goodness Jose was a friendly guy and he drove a mile down the road to the right place.  I can't speak for the food, but I can say the treats did seem to cheer him up! Thank you Code 10!
A slightly limited west coast, Asian influenced menu.  Lovely setting by Ambleside.  Went with another  couple for lunch and it was quite enjoyable.  I had the blackened swordfish tacos which were nicely seasoned and portioned with a nice side of fries.  My wife had the Salmon Zen Bowl which she said was delicious.  The other couple had a burger and the Santa Fe Chicken salad.  Both commented that the meals were good but the chicken may have been a bit too spicy.  The service was very good and relaxed.  A bit pricey but very nice.
I went to DryBar this weekend while I was in town for a wedding - I have previously been to other locations, but this experience was far and away the best. It got off to a bumpy start (seemed like there was a little confusion with our appointment?), and I swear I saw a glimmer of terror in Danielle's eyes when she took the bun out of my hair to discover I have long, extremely thick hair! She was so nice and we chatted a bit as she gave me the BEST blowout I have ever received. She definitely knew what she was doing and modified the "menu" option a bit to go with my hair type and even suggested switching up my part for the day - I was getting compliments all day and night, and I so badly wish I lived in Boston and could go back more often! I cannot recommend Danielle enough.
Another excellent local coffee house serving excellent coffee in a cool funky atmosphere, well as cool as you can get in a strip mall.  Give up the corporate stuff and go here.
Great location just stones throw from TD garden , bars and restaurants every few feet not to mention super comfortable bed.newly done rooms with  Upscale decor.  with a little great bar in lobby. 24 hour room service and complementary loaner bicycles for touring the city
best pizza and roast sausage and lamb in all new england. Period.
A great spot for fades and tapper style haircuts. Got here without an appointment and Sico got me right in. He did a really good job, very attentive to detail (recommend it) the price is a a bit higher than a usually pay in Los Angeles, it was $28 (plus tip) for a middle zero fade haircut but it was on point.
I love this restaurant. It was the first place I ever had sushi (in 2007), and it is still my favourite sushi restaurant. Their special rolls are amazing and my favourite part is that their rolls can come wrapped in soy paper rather than nori/seaweed. I prefer the soy paper because I don't like the fishy taste of nori. The Sushi Bar is one of the only restaurants in Vancouver - that I have found - that has soy paper. Another one is Dream Sushi at Main and 28th.
The place isn't a typical restaurant place (sit down) so we weren't sure how to order or where to sit at first. The pizza is made fresh so it can take a little time for them to make and bake it, but it's well worth it. I was a little wary of this place at first (per the recent reviews). They are wrong. This pizza is amazing! I found the dough to be delicious and the toppings heavy and fresh. Perfect pizza!   I only gave it  four stars since I wish they had more menus (only 3 actual hard copies) and no signage saying open seating. The pizza makes up for the confusion though. Once you find a seat and a menu, It is very good. I will definitely be back.
Smitas boutique is so clean and adorable. Smita is so professional and kind and listened to my requests. She asked about any skin issues I may have so she can work accordingly. Having psoriasis, that means the world. I am very happy with smita. It didn't hurt at all either. I am so glad my friend Kellie from barebottom tan referred me. Love!!
New ice cream place. Good variety of flavors. Lot of good solid originals such as Vanilla as #### and Chocolate as ####. I especially like the chocolate as ####. The chocolate malt is pretty good too. Blood orange creamsicle is also good. They make a good Water Ave Coffee. They also have a few original eclectic flavors. The thai rice is actually quite good. It seems to be a favorite of many. The juniper one was a little too junipery for me but my girl liked it.  The flavors overall are all very good but the ice cream is almost too creamy. You'll understand once you try it.  I still like Salt n Straw better but this place has NO LINES!!
This is our absolutely favorite place to shop for decorations on a dime. You can find so many fun and crafty items to decorate for all seasons and functions!  The last work party we threw was for Valendentgras!  Valentines Day, President's Day, Mardi Gras and Ground hogs day and they had everything we needed!  Plus we got lots.of fun toys when we collected.over the holidays to fill up the bins for Toys for Tots!
Great service from the moment we stepped in the restaurant up until we left!  Mixed grilled meats, steak tips, shrimp and veggie enchiladas - all delicious. Up until tonight, i had only been here for drinks and apps.  I will come back for dinner again.
I really like this place and as far as pub grub, this is as good as good as it gets. This is not fussy dining but solid comfort food with a southern flair. We ate here for happy hour which I highly recommend. The value is really good. Good quality food at a reasonable cost. I had the small chicken and dumplings, my wife had the fish and chips and our friend who lives in the couve but grew up in Louisiana had the fried tomatoes. My chicken and dumplings were a  5/5. The execution was great. As others have said, a little more chicken would be great, but the dumplings were awesome. The fish and chips and fried tomatoes were 4/5. Our friend mentioned that if the tomatoes were more tart it would have been perfect, probably a seasonal thing. They tasted good to me but I didn't grow up in the south The service was great. I opted to rate this 5/5 because in this price range, this is really good food and value. It is clean and pretty nice on the inside and the food, drinks and service are pretty good too. The menu is not huge, it's a little bit of a drive and it doesn't look like much from the outside, but if you are looking for a place to get some really good comfort food without the high cost and attitude, this is it. I will definitely be back.
I had the spaghetti alla carbonara for lunch today and it was a delicious, authentic rendition of this Italian dish. The pasta was fresh which does make a big difference. I think the egg coating could have been a little thicker with more grated Parmesan incorporated into it (not just shaved Parmesan on the top). I thought it was curious that they supply a large spoon to assist with eating this with a fork - this is done only for children in Italy but perhaps this is an accommodation to klutzy Americans who do not understand how to eat spaghetti. It is a very casual but clean establishment and I am sure I will be back to try their other offerings (I wish they served wine!).
These people are WONDERFUL!  Starting at 3 months old, both our daughter and son went to KB and we had the best experience possible!  There is nothing more nerve racking as a parent than leaving your infant with a stranger.  Well, after a little while, those strangers start to feel like family.  Everyone at KB has a smile on their face, a positive attitude and most importantly, care about the children!  They experience little to no turnover so our second time around with our son, we were dealing with all of the same teachers.  Sadly we had to leave KB this fall as we had a 3rd child (not the sad part) and hired a nanny.  Our kids still ask us at least once a week if they can go back and visit their teachers!  We highly recommend KB - look no farther, go check them out and you too will have a great experience!
best boneless wings ever, i moved here from worcester and got it a few times a week there, so i was realll excited when i found out there was one a couple miles from here. delivery takes longer than worcester, hence 4 not 5 stars, but the wings ruuuule. honey mustard w/ranch and ketchup plz and thanks
So far the best Mediterranean I've had here in Atlanta, hands down. When I first went to Krog Street Market I was expecting a long wait but it only took a few minutes to order and before I knew it I had the most wonderful Shawarma in my hands .. yummy very addicting :) If you like this type of food GO HERE!!
Favorite stop so far on our magical self-made tour of Portland! Beautiful mansion and grounds, even on a gloriously foggy Portland day, it was an awesome adventure.  The rooms are beautiful, and the information provided throughout the house was very interesting.  Guy was an awesome wealth of information and we had a blast wandering the house asking questions and marveling in the craftsmanship of the artisans who did such intricate plaster, wood, and marble work throughout the house. Well worth the $10 admission to see a house like this continue to hold a piece of history here.
This is the best homebrew shop in Portland, and the most centrally-located, and it's all-around great. However, my first LHBS (local homebrew supply store) in Berkeley, CA was better. How I miss brewdude and Homer!
I had just had a really hard day in court. So when I arrived and Jazmine made me feel totally relaxed as she checked me in and got me on the table, it was exactly what I needed. Jazmine took the time to talk to me, and she had this amazing ability to listen to my body and read exactly what I needed. I've been to a few different kinds of massage - from the theraputic to the relaxation. Jazmine is a real therapist. She identified issues I knew I had, and ones I didn't. She worked on me - and she even suggested stretches I could do on my own. She always knew just how much pressure to use - it got intense but she always seemed to know just how much I needed. By the end of the massage I felt completely relaxed and I even felt taller! It was like she had stretched me out and snapped everything back into perfect place. I will definitely return!   Soul flower felt like a total experience from start to finish - from the music to the sented oils. It promised a lot and Jazmine delivered! They even have free parking in the back!
Pleasant staff? Check.  Civilized seating and show start times? Check Check  People who actually appear to appreciate music rather than merely playing Hipster dress up? Oh yeah.  Johnny D's offers a great line up- bringing a little bit of Texas flair to stuffy MA. Do you want to have a sexy model type thrust his hips into your face while he croons about long lost love (Rhett Miller)? Do you want an old - crusty - curmudgeon type to remind/yell at you to tip your servers over 20%, because being a server sucks and they are paid less than minimum wage (James McMurty)? If you answered yes  to any of these questions, then, please, come on down!  See Jason L's review for a more comprehensive rundown - but just to add - tickets generally will put you back $15-22. If you want a guaranteed seat - each person must spend an additional $15 on food. Most items on the menu are priced high - $15 for antipasto, $18 for a Rosemary Chicken dish. Food really isn't so grand - try to convince the waitress that your beer tab should count towards the total.  There are multiple shows a night - starting around 6 pm- which sort of hurts your ability to get their early and fight for the best standing views. Abide by the "seating times" mentioned on your ticket. If you have a seat - they won't sit you before that time.   Shows err towards the little bit of country, a little bit of rock n' roll genre. Jazz and folk too. Directly across from the Davis Square T - so feel free to indulge in some libations.
For the price and location, this place cannot be beat.  Right on sixth street and about 40 bucks a night.   They have gender specific rooms as well as 12 person rooms.  Trendy looking with a bar on the ground floor.  I stayed in the 12 person room and it was an overall good experience.  As with many hostels, people are up late.  It was a younger crowd, as well.  There was an incident with one of the guests in our room (he urinated in a corner, apparently sleep walking), but the staff at the hostel took care of it immediately and he was kicked out of the hostel.   In about 30 minutes I was back asleep.  They really couldn't have handled the situation better, and that sort of thing is to be expected from time to time when staying at these types of places.  The one downside is that there is no free parking, but that's to be expected as it's downtown.  We parked in a close parking garage and all was fine.  Overall, great experience as far as the hostel itself is concerned.
My go to place for Chinese.  Amazing rangoons and a huge selection of Asian cuisines.  Not a good dinner idea if you are feeling indecisive.
The food is really good here.  The only reason I am giving it 4 stars is the weird entry way and the just average atmosphere.  There were many Asian diners here, which gives you an indication that it is really good/authentic.    We had crab Rangoon and they were nice sized and you get enough food in your entre to share.  The veggies in the entrees were cooked perfectly!  Next time we are going to try the BBQ.
Oh Bob's, you make me so happy.  I get cold cuts here every week. Their sandwiches are absolutely delicious. The pasta dinners are pretty good, though not my favorite thing here.  If you're ever in the area and looking for somewhere to grab some lunch, you'll be well advised to go to Bob's.
Went on a Thursday evening with a buddy for dinner, whilst visiting the greater Columbus area. We were seated right away, and I was pleased to see a quality beer selection, including numerous Ohio breweries. I had two different beers while there, and both were good. My meal was the blackened tilapia sandwich with fries, and it was plenty tasty and hit the spot. The fries were good but not great. Service was just fine overall, and the prices are reasonable.  Nice place!
I dined here several weeks back with some friends from college. I had never been for dinner or when it re-opens as a night club. We sat in a very comfortable booth in the corner of the room.     Drinks were great, while we waiting for the rest of our party. The menu is quite good, and has many wonderful dishes.    I started with the Rabbit Tagliatelle,  Braised over a Bed of Tagliatelle Pasta finished with Parmesan and Truffle Oil,  which was great, rabbit was tender and very flavorful and just what I was looking for.    For my main dish, I had the duck three ways, seared Breast, Leg Confit and a Taro Risotto with Duck Proscuitto and a Mango Mustard Jus. The breast meat was a little to well done for me, i like it very rare, like all of my meats, but the confit was awesome, very tasty, tender and melt in your mouth goodness.    A fellow diner had the same dish and found it just as good.    Two other fellow diners had the tuna which was just fantastic, very well prepared and full of flavor.    They had a very extensive wine menu, and we ended with a nice desert  wine and the Petit Plat Au Chocolat for Two Chocolate Mousse Brownie Sandwich, a Warm Bittersweet Chocolate Cake with Tonkanese Ice Cream and a White Chocolate Ice Cream Shake. It was huge and shared by everyone at the table.    I was pleasantly surprised by my meal at 33, and would go back very soon...
The store itself gets 5 stars, but I had to knock it down one due to the parking situation. LOVE that there is actually a parking lot for the patrons, as it is way better than nothing at all, but it is pure chaos anytime I go! When they first opened, there seemed to be attendants directing traffic a bit, but now it is a free for all. Anyways, I still continue to go back. Their prepared foods are amazing. Lots of variety between the salad bar, hot bar and other various stations. Compared to other Whole Foods locations, this one seems to have more to choose from. My fave is their mac and cheese (regular or buffalo), Peruvian-rubbed chicken wings and their Indian food. Have also tried the pizza and it was very good, too. For work, we have ordered sub platters from this location and they are always nice and fresh. Despite this store always being quite busy, the check-out lines are efficient and the cashiers are always super pleasant.
Love this place....great staff, strong drinks (depending on the bartender), and fun place for an afternoon cocktail or a night out on the town.
The slightly off marketing campaign aside, 'It's not too late to sleep like a baby' [Really? Who wants to sleep like a baby? They wake up every few hours, cry, pee all over themselves [kinda like a drunk friend], just to mention a few things], I love this place!  Mattress shopping has been a dark cloud hanging over my head for years. Would I find one I like? And how could I know I liked it after only lying on it in the shop? Horror stories of high-pressure salespeople, botched deliveries and poor return policies added to the anxiety. Well the good folks at Mattress World turned my [imaginary] world upside down! Walking into the store on Grand, Brian was friendly and attentive. He started off with a 'sleep test' to gauge what was meant by 'firm'. From there he made several recommendations. Giving space, but checking in frequently the decision was made to go with latex [Cue Jerry Seinfeld...]. Quick interest free financing, scheduled delivery for the next day [which was exactly on-time and took al of 5 minutes], free mattress pad and only one complaint...the bed is so dang comfortable it is hard to get up and out in the morning!
A fashion find.  Ever changing styles from evening attire to lounge wear to everyday must haves.  Gorgeous accessories and gift items for all occasions.  Looking for something uniquely you, this is the place to find it.  The Staff is incredible, friendly with extensive fashion know how.
Went here with a date after seeing a movie at the Kendall Square Theater, it was the closest eats and it was freezing cold so we were desperate to get inside somewhere. The staff was extremely warm, friendly and accommodating, it was like visiting grandma. They have a great selection of wine and beer and AMAZING pizza with a lot of great and unexpected choices for toppings, which is a dream come true since it's so hard to find good pizza in this city. It has a cozy interior with decor that's hip but not too hip, and a good amount of seating with tables just the right size and none of them crammed too close to each other. This place is perfect. PERFECT.
Beautiful restaurant with wonderful staff. The charcuterie plate was amazing. The waitress Meghan is absolutely wonderful and the bar manager Rob is also wonderful. If you want a great cosmopolitan please go here. And if you want good food come here! Good night. Good people!
Since we live in town, Pisces has become our destination of choice. Sometime we start at the outside bar, have a drink and dine inside. Sometimes we eat something snacky at the bar,sometime we eat outside on the patio. My point is this place is always good and I can't figure out why some other reviewers have problems. This is the most laid back place in town with really good food. You can't beat the location and the patio bar at sunset beats anything Key West can offer. Service is always consistently good, drinks are great and the food is innovative and tasty. What else can you ask for?
Definitely worth going to if you're in the Orlando area.  Pollo de la casa was delicious and the margaritas were large.  Prices are super reasonable.  Me and my family really enjoyed it.
My boss prefers the "street meat" variety of burrito that permeate the DTX area.  I, however, love the Boloco burritos.  I love that you can get a "regular" burrito and it doesn't make you feel like you just ate all of Mexico and you have to go back to the office in a food coma.  The regular is the perfect size for lunch.  They do have a large size as well.    I love that you can get a burrito with tofu in it.  I love that they are socially and environmentally conscious.  I love that the staff is incredibly friendly and that actually got a personal response when I wrote an email with a complaint (they were testing out paper wrappers.  They were horrible and they have since gone back to the easy to peel foil).  I love the clean and convenient location.  And I love...oh I love...the Jimmy Carter smoothie.  It is like suckin' heaven through a straw.
Myers and Chang has been on my list of restaurants to go to for awhile, but because of the hard-to-get-to location, I didn't get there until last Saturday.  It was the week before I was moving back to Minnesota, so I knew that being a fan of Joanne Chang and Flour, I had to get to Myers and Chang before I moved.  I was not disappointed.  My friend and I ordered the mussels, fish tacos, pork lettuce wraps, and a steak and shrimp noodle dish.  Everything was good, but the mussels and pork lettuce wraps really stood out as being exceptional.  I can't remember what my cocktail was, but it wasn't very memorable, so maybe I ordered wrong.  Dessert was the chocolate terrine, which was delicious and tasted similar to the brownies from Flour, just a little bit more dense.  Overall, I enjoyed my meal at Myers and Chang and will go back when I am in Boston again.
Flavorful, fresh, authentic, artful, delicious Greek food, served up by friendly people who are actually Greek, in a cute, sunny, homey atmosphere. Just go here, you won't be disappointed.
Tucked away on a 2-block stretch of Vaughn St, in the middle of nowheresville NW Industrial area, sits Bedford Brown, an extraordinary amalgamation of luxe, high end furniture store and amazing plant store. Sort of like the best possible combination of Seattle's Palm Room and Portland's JD Madison. To be honest, I had no idea that such a store even existed, and had no reason to consider that one might, However, having been exposed to the owners' vision, I wonder why no one has thought of it before! Evidently they've been in their current location for almost 12 years, but changed their name and did a major re-branding 3 years ago. Overall, the space is amazing - the rear atrium and greenhouse really must be seen to be believed. Overall an inspiring place that is well worth a visit.
Bostonians. This is our chance. Our chance to compete against the incessant and unfortunately correct complaints of New Yorkers about our pizza. I love this place, I love the atmosphere, I LOVE the pizza! Prior to coming here, the list of pizza places in Boston that I was proud included Il Mondo's on Mission Hill, Ernesto's in the North End and nothing else. And no, I didn't "forget" to include the copy-cat NYC pizza joints. Nor did I "forget" to include Regina's Overhyped Grease Factory Chain.   Seriously, there isn't much to say here other than give it a try. It's delicious pizza that does its own thing without inspiration from the NY, New Haven, or Chicago pizza styles. My personal favorite is the hot peppers and sausage pizza, if you Yelpers were wondering!
My first option for a much needed hair cut was closed but found Salon Red via the Scoutmob app. I called up, got an appointment  with Cartez immediately and sat down within seconds of walking in. Got a great greeting, wasn't hit in the face with normal salon stuffiness and a cool cup of water to sip on while we talked about what kind of cut I was looking for. Cartez got it all sorted out and gave me the best haircut I've ever had. Nice work man! I'm not the type to have a trim up every four weeks but I know where to go when I'm in need of a cleanup now.
This place is so good ! Be ready to wait a little before getting a table or ordering. But it is definitely worth it ! Their chicken is pretty good and spicy enough. I highly recommend the pecan chocolate pie ! The only negative point would be the wait because the waiters are really nice.
got the French toast, yum! came with butter and syrup like the good old ways in Hong Kong. again, A+ for effort in keeping it the way it is!  beef/egg sandwich is good too per se. would be nice if they do a satay version like in Hong Kong.  eggy cake got slightly soggy this time due to sitting in the bag too long before it was eaten, but the flavor is still there and interestingly, i could still get a bit of a crunch underneath the softness. weird huh.  ordered hot lemon tea to go with the breakfast; was slightly on the bitter side - can't remember if the tea bag was left in or just the kind of brew they use. again, i'd be very much in awe of this place if they insist to brew their own instead of cheaping (or lazying) out and use tea bag.  would be happy to give them more business, just for the effort alone. well, i mean, food is pretty good too of course!
Amazing Mexican food and pretty authentic. The Cali Burrito is a must try as is the tres taco platter. If you are going for lunch plan on going early or late as there is a line out the door and no seating around the usual 12pm lunch rush. I usually call my order in for pickup since my office is right around the corner. Give it a try, you won't be sorry.
I've been seeing Dalit for about two months, mostly for pain in my joints and soft tissue related to chronic illness.   The results have been incredible so far, including total remission of painful elbow tendinitis and TMJ, and great improvement in lower back and leg pain. She has also been very helpful with some minor GI issues.  Dalit is thorough, gentle, professional, and caring, and the atmosphere in the clinic is very relaxing. I highly recommend giving her a try.
So Fish Daddy's has has a reno! The service is fantastic,  the decor is great and my maragarita..  right.on.time.  we ordered a sirloin , fish and chips, Daddy's Painkiller and a Daddy O Margarita that was lip smackin' good!
Try not to be spoiled with cineplex and their many theatres on one place.... The Park is a wonderfully HUGE single theatre offering a wide variety of movies including "Its a wonderful life" which my boyfriend and I watched in December 2016 (I had never seen it and he said he'd only seen parts of it over the years).  A gem of a place that I hope stays in business.
Outstanding in every way. A lot of the best yogurt places have gradually given up on adventurous flavors,  catering more and more to imitation ice cream taste. This one maintains a wide variety,  constantly changing,  with  exotica  and tart tastes for adults  and more ice creamy flavors for the kids.  in addition bonus points for all kinds of niceness:  high-quality free water ( thus no hard sell on the bottled water),  generous tasting cups,  pleasant decor,  nice staff.
Had a great experience. Brought in a total junker I needed to use for a few days at burning man. Paramount did a very basic tune up, just enough to work in the desert, and didn't charge much for the trouble.   Would definitely go back again!
Authentic Irish experience, and the duck couldn't get any better. Good vibes from friendly people in an awesome city.
Soooo good! Wife and I had chili dog, smokeshack burger, fries, Anita root beer and Apple Pie ala mode shake! Everything was so amazing. I'm stuffed and happy. Will be back soon.
Carlton is amazing.  Working out with him the time flies and I have fun.  He puts workouts together that engage my whole body and he's always there to inspire and make sure my form is correct.  I'm already stronger and feeling better after two months.  Strongly recommend!
This place by far has the best breakfast sandwich! The shop location is sketchy,I'm not gonna lie...but the sandwich is so worth coming here...the only thing that sux is it closes early sometimes even @ 2pm. But definitely a got to spot if you're craving a breakfast sandwich :)
This is not a place you go for great service. it's more of a cheers kinda feel. it's the place you go every Friday night with your friends for the best pizza in Columbus. so maybe not the most kid friendly at night because of a rougher crowd. but this is my favorite place in Columbus. you'll want the smokin joes crust.
my favorite place in all of atlanta.  get the regular wings (not boneless), a cold beer off draft, kick back and watch some sports.  what could be better in this world?
Prices are hard to beat and it is in a central location.  What more could you want from a liquor store?  The traffic around the location can be heavy, making your trip turn in a much longer one.  Also, the store is kept as clean as can be, but the dull smell of a liquor store is omnipresent.  You'll run into some interesting (?) people at Kappy's, just be prepared for it.  With the savings you'll get on your purchase, it is worth it.
This restaurant is fantastic. The atmosphere is delightful. The lady attending to me was cheerful & rapid. Everything I tasted was wonderful. The rice was flavourful & cooked to perfection. The curry was the best I've had in Orlando. You must try this restaurant. I'm pleasantly surprised. I'll be back.
This restaurant served very authentic and delicious Greek food, as well as great Tiramisu. However, the only thing that crossed my mind was that it was kind of overpriced for some of the items.
I don't know why I am so in love with this place!! I think of it at least once a day! Everytime I go I try to have something different but lately keep having the smoked salmon "burger" which is awesome. The fries are to die for with the smoked mayo (I wish I could make that at home) the burgers are a perfect size, they have a full bar and the place is cool looking. The only negative is when you order a shake it takes for freaking EVER!! 3 times my food got to my table before the shake did!
Very knowledgable staff. Everyone was very keen on explaining things to me in a way that I would understand. I really don't know much about cars and this past week my car needed a lot of love to pass Texas inspection and register my vehicle. I am very happy I found this shop. Everyone is so friendly. I will definitely be making the trip back up from south Austin just to get my car taken care of here! Thank you for the amazing service!
I'm not an expert in the authentic Chinese food field, but I would eat their pan fried pork buns (Shanghai style) every day.
Gone to their Happy hour twice once by myself and then with wife. They have about 6 items for 5 dollars for happy hour. Tried the crab cakes and a fried item that was similar to a french fry. Cant remember the name sorry.  Drink wise they had two 5 dollar cocktails and beer and wine discounted. I tried the Lebron (sugar can rum that tastes sort of lime tequila) contail. It reminded me of a margarita.  Service was fast. Server was attentive and friendly. We sat at the bar. They were fairly busy both time i went with though there were tables available. I would return and tey some of there other items.
Been here too many times to count and everything is always good.  Tried some new things today that's the purpose of this review.  Tried collard greens for the first time ever in life and they were amazing. Not sure why I waited this long to try them lol.   Also tried the potato salad...it wasn't my favorite...bland. They should totally salt their potato water first or something.   However...THE BIG WAYNE...a slice of Chocolate Chess Pie inverted on a slice of Pecan Pie A LA MODE...YES! All the yes sirs and ma'am's! So good!
Punjab Palace is approximately a 3 minute walk from my apartment and it's some of the best Indian food I've had (aside from my best friend's mom's home cooking...mmmmm!). The service is always very friendly and prompt, and the food is fresh and tasty. Tikka Masala is the best! Also love their saag paneer. The one thing I didn't enjoy was the shrimp curry - the shrimp was tough and the sauce was incredibly fishy.   Other than that, Punjab is always my first stop when I want something flavorful, inexpensive, and filling.
Omar was incredibly easy and delightful to work with. He found me exactly the car I wanted and gave me a pretty good trade. I'd work with him again.
Previously Underground Studio. Love the community feel where you can be as connected or as friendly but focused on your own practice as you like. All the teachers and staff are super helpful but must confess that I am a total Jules groupie!  Love the way her classes are scaffolded so that everything we do contributes to the final pose(s). Every class seems to offer exactly what I need to be centered. Tuesday Yin with Joanne have grown my practice in surprising ways. Vinyasa with Lauren makes Saturdays more productive or relaxing; it works both ways, it's kind of magical!   There is a wide variety of classes including Zumba, Pilates, MetCon, and Latin Dance. Now that summer vacation is almost here, I am signing up for everything!!!  Especially looking forward to the dance parties and workshops on Fridays!!!
Wonderful experience! Most pain free brow wax I've ever had and Lexie was wonderfully understanding with my pickiness in getting all the little hard to see white hairs!  And there's no tipping so what seems pricey is actually more affordable than you think. Will definitely be back!
Since I've tried out Fonda Rosa a few months ago, I have since been a regular here (hence my recent period of absence from Yelping other restaurants).  Every time I've been here I try to veer away from the fish tacos that I love so much to try different things but always sneakily order a couple halibut or pescado tacos anyway.  However, I must say that the Chile Rellano is really delicious as was the Ceviche.  My husband's new favorite is the Crab Enchilidas which came out piping hot.    Service is still friendly and I'm happy to see that business has picked up since the last few times we've been here.  Although our order took awhile to get to us (it was so busy that the exec chef/owner had to take our orders) I can definitely say that Fonda Rosa is worth the wait!
Clean bathrooms, lots of parking available. About 5-6 food options including one inside the connected gas station. I'll use this rest stop in the future when traveling north and coming back home.
Stopped here for Lunch and sat at the bar. Service was outstanding. Ordered the daily special of shishito peppers the second I heard it was on the menu. They were cooked perfectly and even came with a tortilla sauce on the side which was fantastic. Lobster Roll was perfect with a side of slaw and fries were as well. Can't wait to return!
If you're looking for a place for a drink (and some tasty food to go with it), or you just want to hang out and eat with friends after work then this may be a good place for you.  I came here with four friends in the evening, and we found a tight but comfortable table. I ordered the $12 bibimbap, which came shortly after a bit of conversation. My friends ordered the Japanese pork cutlets with a separate bowl of rice, which looked crispy and fresh from the fryer. I mixed my bibimbap and it was quite good! I have had the bibimbap in a stone bowl before, but the one in a normal bowl is also good.   I also want to mention that the rice was very tasty and purple. I don't know exactly why it was purple, but everyone's was, so perhaps with was due to red bean (or something ) mixed in with the rice?   I got the one for $12, but there were $11 and $13 alternatives, the latter which has a stone bowl. The service was decent as they were quite busy, but as long as we made eye contact and waved them down they took care of our orders quickly.  The restaurant had clean washrooms, a cozy and causal ambiance, and a noise level that was neither too loud nor too soft.  As for why I only gave 4 stars, my criterion is whether I would go there by myself, which I wouldn't.  I would go there again with my friends.
My favorite place to go for ramen. Really great broth and noodles but gets packed really fast and it's s small place so seating can be limited.
very simple and sweet is what i like about this place. It is because they service me really quick and short. they got it done only in 15 minutes... i would come back to there again for sure.
Came here for a friend's birthday dinner about a month ago and had a pretty good dining experience. I can comment on the couple dishes that I tried. From the tapas, I had the Patatas Bravas and Blistered Shishito Peppers which were both cooked and seasoned perfectly, and were absolutely delicious. Also tried their star attraction main plate, the vegetable paella, which was phenomenal. Even tasted so good microwaved the next day. :) Sangria was also good and the service was decent. Our waiters were very helpful and attentive to us throughout. Would definitely come here again, both for the food (definitely want to try more of their small plates) and the decor!
First time here, and it was during happy hour. Uptown has quite possibly the best Happy Hour menu I've ever seen, filled with healthy portions of upscale gourmet selections.   The happy hour items aren't scaled down versions of the real meal; they are the real meal, just for super cheap!  I had a wonderful burger with grilled onions and mushrooms, that came with a mound of seasoned potatoes.  My friends had the pizzas...which is actually a whole pizza...and was also delicious.   Beer selection is very good, and the happy hour prices takes another buck off the pint. The bar also appeared to have a nice selection of liquor, if you're into cocktails.   The service was excellent, with professional, friendly, and attentive staff.   Great atmosphere; like a dark old lounge where your grandfather may have hung out when he was young. Huge number of pool tables (it is called Uptown Billiards).   Will definitely come here again when I'm in NW.
Food was great!  Service was outstanding!  Our son has a peanut allergy and the chef came to our table to ensure that what he ordered was prepared safe. Great sports bar atmosphere but has enough local flare to remind you that you're not at home. We vacation to Orlando often and will definitely be back!!
Recently enjoyed a family feast at Comfort and all were pleased with the food, drink, service and venue overall.  The meats are prepared to perfection and creatively paired with tasty sides.
Just amazing food! It reminded us of the pizza we ate in Amalfi, Italy! We got the prosciutto pizza and mushroom risotto! Sooo yumm! I wish we could try more things here! Great service, the lady we had was so sweet and attentive! Great beer on draft!
Finally got a chance to check out this restaurant after driving by it daily. It was well worth the wait. Although the name of the dishes were unfamiliar, the taste was down home yumminess. The short ribs and potatoes were so good, the gomen(collards) were tangy and scrumptious. The service was quick, efficient, and polite. Will be back soon.
Really delicious every time we come here. Sometimes the wait is pretty long and not worth it, but if you're lucky you can find a spot at the bar to sit and eat and drink at.  The crab cakes are really tasty and the cocktails are refreshing. Would recommend, if you haven't tried it yet!
I finally made it here, and it was worth the wait. The arcade was not as big as I had been expecting, but there was still plenty in it to keep me busy...and I beat my two friends in the car racing game(so obviously I will like it). Then I did candle pin bowling...which was fun because it's bowling, and the night was worth it if for nothing else besides the look on my two New Yorker friends faces when we went to our lane with tiny bowling balls and candle pins. (They were just expecting 10 pin).   It was a nice relaxed night with the smell of beer all around. I didn't even get a chance to go upstairs(that's where the pool tables, 10 pin, and lounge are) because we got there sort of late and I didn't really want to leave the arcade. But I will definitely be back. And if you are taking the T like me, make sure you print off the directions before you go...it's a shady walk at night to get there and you will feel like the directions are a mean joke...but they aren't.
About to check out after a 3 night stay. Checked in Saturday morning at 9 am, and was so surprised to find that my room was ready for me. That was a huge perk to be able to go to the room directly after my flight and freshen up before heading out. The room was very clean, with an excellent view. Hotel staff was very helpful and friendly. Overall wonderful experience, and I will definitely stay here again for my next Orlando trip.
Bloc 11 if you're not aware is the newest coffee shop incarnation from the people who brought you Diesel in Davis Square.  Going into it, I kind of expected to see the token Somerville coffee shops elements: coffee (duh), people typing screenplays on macs, and you're archetypical hipster populous.  Not so with Bloc 11!  The atmosphere of the place alone sold me when I walked in.  Having been converted from an old bank from ye olde Somerville, they actually went for a really inventive ascetic and kept the original vault and infrastructure.  Not to mention the place is A LOT bigger inside than it seems meaning plenty of seating for one and all.  Looks and space aside, their sandwiches were surprisingly good and a lot more gourmet than you'd expect a coffee shop meal to be.  Their hot chocolate was actually good enough that my Venezuelan girlfriend ordered a second one... after finishing the first in 5 minutes.... on an 85 degree day.  Fo serious, Venezuelans are, for whatever reason, HARDCORE about their chocolate.  BELIEVE HER!  I'm damn impressed with this place and will definitely be going back.
Shrimp cocktail were nice portion. Especially enjoyed the dipping sauce. Dressed Maine lobster changed my husbands perspective on lobster all together. Not much for raw seafood so the bartender suggested the steamed clams which neither me or my husband had previously had, very similar to steamed mussels. Overall a very enjoyable experience, only down side was it was a bit pricey, but I would certainly return. Looking around at other selections people had the pan roasted lobster, and swordfish are the  next on my list of items to try.
Awesome foods, but parking is a little dicey. Strongly suggest uber.  Based on a Yelp review, I had the pork tenderloin medallions and am glad I did.  Definitely a repeat order.
We like Yak and Yeti a LOT; but, only had time for their quick serve outlet.  My wife was smart and saw the featured item was Korean BBQ Ribs.  Nearly boneless, very tender, very tasty; and, hardly Korean, the ribs served two of us!  Our daughter had vegetable fried rice; and, enjoyed it greatly.  I had a crispy egg roll, which was nice; and, we all split the fries that came with the ribs (does anything NOT come with fries at Disney?!?)  We had a great time sitting outside, enjoying the food; and, looking forward to the Rivers of Light Experience soon after supper.
I've been going to Harvard Square Community Acupuncture for a couple months now. Dalit is a great listener and always wants to make sure everyone is comfortable. I love the atmosphere of the clinic - it is very relaxing and cozy. Acupuncture has significantly helped me with my TMJ, as well as a range of other issues. Highly recommend!
The OJ was outstanding and worth the wait. The food was perfectly cooked and seasoned good portion size. In a weird way I almost wish they were smaller so I could've tried more in one trip. If I could change one thing it would be to make the indoor seating area a little quieter and that's definitely not a dealbreaker.
All time favorite while working in Atlanta. Great people, food and of course great vibe.  Mas hot chicas on Thursday and Sunday
I moved East earlier this year, and I recently discovered that I can get delivery from Green Basil!  Their web site is a little ambiguous about it, but they definitely do deliver and the food is every bit as good as in the restaurant.  :)  Their lunch specials are great, but if you really want to experience Green Basil you need to go for dinner and order off of the "real" menu - the lunch stuff is just a sample of what they can do.
I LOVE THIS PLACE!  Truly the best selection of beer in the Boston area, and the folks that work here are knowledgeable, friendly and FUN.  Make sure you check it out, and take your dog if you've got one, they're pet friendly!
This is a pretty standard american thai place that is amazing for take out, though not the greatest atmosphere for dining in. The pad thai was done well, relatively cheap and ready in 15 minutes, and comes in one of those cool plastic containers I hold on to bring lunch in the next few days.
Everything is delicious! The salad bar is great, everything tastes fresh. But don't fill up too much because the meat is the best part. My favorites are the flank steak and the house sirloin. And they have my favorite dessert in the world; the bananas foster pie! Soooo good!!!
I usually hit this place up when I'm near Gabriel Park. Service has always been good and the coffee has been even better. There's plenty of seating for kids, creaky old kneed people, and just about everyone else in between.   Update: just tried the tea today- it's also worthwhile. Love this place!
I bought my fiancées engagement ring here back in February and proposed in April. The amount of compliments she is still receiving on the ring is incredible. Kevin was extremely helpful, informative and courteous. I cannot say enough good things and am excited to go back for our wedding bands.
Convenient. Nice employees. But a little over-priced and slow if you're not chilling & enjoying the view which is what Alta's is all about
Everything about their fish and chips is wonderful! The batter, the fish, the YUMMY tartar, and tasty fries. We've been back several times.
Went to Loca Luna for a delayed Valentine's Day celebration.  Casual setting, good food, great drinks and nice band. The small plates (tapas) were substantial.  Red snapper with coconut haberno sauce was as delightful as a dish served at the best upscale seafood restaurant.  Grouper tacos were some of the best I've had.  As the guacamole queen (my family loves my homemade guac), I can say this was some of the best guac I've had.  My drink of choice was the Coco Loco, which did not disappoint.  Tasty, with just the right amount of mango rum. This will be my go to restaurant when friends come to town.
Have had the blessing to have eaten here a couple of times.  Really good food and service (by the owner and his wife is the cook).  Very pleasant dining at reasonable pricing.  We are going back!!!!
Want a healthy lunch with all you can eat? Come here for soup and salad for under $6 there are 3 kinds of soup you can choose from serving with soft bread stick. The sausage soup with potato is hit and fresh. The best part you can switch to the other soups any time you like.
Although we didn't buy anything because the credenza we loved had a sold sticker on it, this store has better quality "vintage" items than other stores we had checked out in the area. We went in when they were having a 20% off furniture sale and with that discount, the prices seemed very appropriate. The store has a nice flow to it and there is a mixture of different styles. The worker was very nice when we asked a question about a piece. I'm surprised to see people saying this place is pricey. I rather pay a little more for something that is clean and in good shape than something busted and dirty for a cheaper price. I appreciate the cleanliness of the items. This will definitely be on my list of check-out-often stores.
Fabulous.  One of my fav places for lunch or dinner in the back bay.  Not too pricy always great food and good service.  LOVE the hot and cold chicken salad.  Great salad and sandwich selection.  Worth the long wait!
I seriously love Belly. When I'm in town visiting family from Los Angeles i make a point to stop in a minimum of twice during a trip. The Rosemary bagels are fluffy and tasty and the fresh OJ is awesome!
My husband kept raving about the food trucks in Austin so he decided to take me there on Tuesday evening.  Let me tell you it was an amazing experience.  We ended up at the hummus cuisine austin food truck, I ordered the shawarma plate with tabouli and hummus.  The owner told me it would be he best I would ever have and I have to say that so far it is the best Mediterranean cuisine I've had!  You have to try it! I have been to several Mediterranean restaurants in the San Antonio area and they do not compare
Glenn is incredible! His approach is exactly what I was looking for. He focuses on getting to know you, yes the real you, and he helps you to understand your negative self talk. He encourages you, and gets you motivated, helping you to believe in yourself. After only two sessions I noticed a vast improvement in my overall wellbeing. I have a ways to go, but I know I can do this with Glenn's help! You are worthy of the very best and Glenn will help you become the best version of you!
My wife and I have been going there for 6 years now. He does great work. They see my tattoos they ask me who done it. So I send them his way
Came here for a double date and had a great time with my friends. I realize that if you wanna have fantastic brunch in Atlanta, you need to get up really early. It turned out that Egg Cafe is worth the sleepless pain. I like the lobster scrambler a lot! The porched eggs are amazing! Especially if you put it on English muffins, so yummy! The preserves are fresh too. Ground coffee is good too! And orange juice is so fresh. Not a big fun of the whole wheat pancakes, they are just normal.
I've been here twice now within the past week. My boyfriend and I have tried the peanut butter burger and the bender burger. Both were pretty good, but the PB was definitely the better one! We've tried the PB twice now, once with mayo and once without. It tasted a little too heavy with that extra mayo and it seemed to take away from the PB sauce. I thought it tasted good either way, but it made me feel a little bit better about myself to get it without mayo. One thing that I like is the bottomless fries! When I ordered my burger I asked for fries as well, but all of their burgers actually come with fries. The fries are really good, too. My favorite thing about their menu is that you can order a half-size burger, which they call making it "girlie." This miniature burger looked really small at first but it ended up being the perfect amount of food. The only reason why I'm giving 4 stars instead of 5 is because our wait was SO LONG. When we ordered our food, there was no line in front of us... we walked right up to the cashier. After we sat down to wait, we waited for at least 30 minutes for our burgers to come out! We did come during lunch time on a weekend, but the long wait will deter me from coming back here for a while. It's definitely worth a try, though!
This was my first visit to Babette's and it will not be the last.  A standout was the service.  John was exceptional and I will return to Babette's just because of his service.  The food was very good and the atmosphere was perfect.  Reservations were easy to make online and parking was valet.  Babette's does everything well.  I wouldn't change a thing.
Great service! Quick, free minor repair to glasses I didn't even buy from them. Great business development strategy! I'll give them business for sure.
Monica took care of us. My friend Darin loves to be finger fed and they aim to please. My wife tried to sneak a tequila in but got busted, but we don't hold it against the establishment. Did I just burb barley or swine? (quote of the night)
I was excited to try Colombian food! Glad we were recommended this place by the Hyatt Airport hotel valet - food has some really good flavor and portions were big! We had mofongo, arepas con queso, bandeja de paisa dish with their chicharron, skirt steak, chorizo/blood sausage, pechuga de pollo con camarones. We also had a big party coming in and luckily we were able to be seated right away. Service was very nice. Will be back when in Orlando again!
NCL is a great little oasis.  I don't usually like doing laundry but used to look forward to my hour of laudromat time at NCL.  The owners, Mustafa and Monica are wonderful, friendly people.  They do a great job with everything from dry cleaning, to comforters, to drop off laundry and the prices are very reasonable.  Everything is spotless, never broken and your dry cleaning is always back on time and when you need it.  Try them out, you won't be disappointed!  You may even look forward to laundry day...
I've been going to Billy's off and on for years now. The service is prompt, though if you're ordering in the middle of the day, call your order in. You're still going to have to wait 'bout 10-15 mins. for it, but it's the thought that counts, right? Hmmm...I've gone there for a slice, which is decent, the fish and chips were surprisingly good--not too saturated with grease, and the fries were crispy and not coated (yes!), and I've also had a burger. Again, don't try to get fancy with it--all burgers are cooked well done. The cold subs are also good (and they have smoked turkey, which is a nice option).  Super owners who have been there forever and who have the requisite sense of humor required to run a business in these parts.  This being Codman Square (and don't get me wrong--I have an affection for C.S. that grows by the day), you're going to get some sensational people watching: Billy's has a steady stream of locals, any of whom might hit you up for some change or something more scintillating (I'll leave that to your imagination).   Overall, if you're in the neighborhood and want a convenient sub shop, Billy's is it (and he actually works behind the counter).
I had a normal cleaning appointment a couple days ago and I had the nicest hygienist gal, nicest and charming doctor who came and chatted with me when I had a random question during. Then as I was checking out, the two gals at the front desk were helping me and they were just as nice and talkative. Everyone was professional and all were very attractive too! In a very clean cut kind of way :)    I said something about how this office was just fantastic and they kindly asked if I thought so if I would give a review so I did! I was reading some other reviews and they mentioned Dr. Slater, that was the charming doctor. Very nice, but everyone else was great too.     Not to mention the company itself has many locations and they are usually very clean. This location in particular seems newer and cleaner than more. It has a little kiureg for free coffee in the waiting room too.
Never been to Jillian's, really don't care enough to even walk down the stairs. I have gone bowling several times at Lucky Strikes and its a great place for a Saturday or Sunday afternoon of good clean fun and boozing.  They have about 26 lanes, and allow you to bowl as long as you want, unless the wait times on lanes get really long, and then back to kindergarten, you have to share...  Prices are very good for shoes and games, and the food is good. Nothing out of this world, you basic pub/sports bar food, the chicken fingers and fries are good, as is the combo platter.  I do have several issues, the service at times is not very good, and if you interested in drinking, I would suggest buying at the bar. Second, you can not get a red bull and vodka, they will sell you a full can of red bull for like 6 bucks and some vodka for like 7 or 8, and you can mix it your self... That doesn't work in my book, just mix it for me, and I will give you a tip. Finally, this really pissed me off, on my most recent trip, I was drinking more than bowling, and around 11 pm, I was approached by a Bus boy/security guy, saying I needed to take off my hat. I said excuse me, this is the bowling alley, he then tells me that after whatever time the place has a dress code through out the building... i repeatedly had run ins with this guy because I kept putting my hat on...  its just  plain stupid, Its a bowling alley, let me wear my hat....
A friend introduced me to Siddhartha's Kitchen not to long ago.  The owner is a great guy, friendly and knows how to treat customers with respect.    It took some time but I have tried almost every dish on the menu, now knowing that the food and atmosphere is amazing, I have since invited all my friends to his restaurant.  I have not been to a better Indian Restaurant in Vancouver; Siddhartha's Kitchen is my favorite place to go.
Looking to beat the heat and have fun? How about indoor glow-in-the-dark mini golf? Did I mention monsters? Bonus!  I took a group of friends to Monster Mini Golf this evening. It is off of 535 in Winter Garden, close to the large Winter Garden Village at Fowler Groves shopping center.   Monster Mini Golf is off of 535 in a small industrial office park...unless you were actively looking for it like we were you would never know it was there. When we pulled up at about 8:45 there was only a single car there, which belonged to an employee. We thought they were closed for a moment, but they just had no customers on a Friday night.   Once inside it was a nifty place - arcade games, skee ball, air hockey, crane machines, etc. Kids and kids at heart would love this place! The mini golf course is lit with black lights and all of the paint glows. The monster theme is cute and they have a couple of animatonic monsters that are fun. Even though the course is almost  completely flat it was still pretty challenging. A round of golf here will run you about $7.50.  We had a great time, but it was really HOT in there...so hot that by the time we finished playing everyone was either "dewy" (girls don't sweat!) or actively dripping with sweat. The A/C seemed to be on, but it was not keeping the place cool. I am not sure what was going on with that, but it definitely made us golf and leave quickly instead of lingering to play games and hang out.   The course was challenging and they did a great job painting and making the place look good. It is obvious that someone put a lot of effort into designing the course and the monsters. Ultimately, I still think Putting Edge in Festival Bay is a better and more interesting course...and best of all sufficiently air conditioned!   I would go to Monster Mini Golf again, because, with the exception of the heat I really enjoyed it...but based on their terrible location I will be surprised if they will be able to survive here. I hope that I am proven wrong!
The jerk wings omg !!!!!!! They were so delicious ! I got here at around 8 so there were plenty of tables. Once it got closer to 10 the club filled up and there was nowhere to sit for some people (boy was I happy I got here early !!!) service was a tad bit slow because their were only two servers for the whole place, prob not smart. There was a $10 minimum per person which is def understandable so don't expect to sit and chill all night without buying something. Great entertainment and the inside was decorated very nicely with urban artwork.
Amazing food! Had it delivered and it arrived so quickly. Flavored and seasoned so well. The Jerk chicken was amazing, the curry chicken, plantains, cabbage, peas and rice, and the oxtail dinner all cooked to perfection. Wow! If you Want a burst of great Flavor and fulfilling food. Try this place. Best Jamaican I've had in a long time! I give it more than 5 stars! 10 stars.
Ok... I love Ikea. I've never had a problem with any missing pieces or parts, and I've bought a lot of Ikea furniture over the past 6 years or so. I currently have 3 bookcases, a chair/footrest, and 3 different side tables. I used to have a very large, sturdy, and practical coffee table, but it was just too large for my new apartment so I had to get rid of it.   ONE problem, though, as far as quality of the furniture is concerned... I tried to be cheap and buy a cheap Ikea couch one time... Let's just say it's one of the reasons my motto is "You get what you pay for." ... It was okay at first, but after normal use over a few months, it quickly became more and more uncomfortable until it had to be replaced.   As far as the Ikea shopping experience... LOVE it!! I love walking around, getting ideas, picking up little things that I probably don't need but want anyway. Pillows, candles, picture frames, wrapping paper... Love it! The only thing I hate are strollers and people being slow and in my way... but I hate that anywhere I go, not just Ikea.   I finally tried their food for the first time last weekend, and YUM! I had a buffalo chicken wrap and some mac & cheese, and Colleen B. had the famous Swedish Meatballs with mac & cheese. Mine was very good, and I tasted her meatballs... super yum! I will get those next time!   And I might be a weirdo, but I actually really enjoy building the furniture... Plus, it gives me an excuse to skip the gym for that day!
I wish DAT FIRE much success, they are in the right spot at the right time. The jerk, the rice, everything is on point.  Blessings
Needed a pedicure asap and decided to stop here. This visit wasn't my first, was here a few years ago. They have a good variety of colors to choose from mostly OPI and China Glaze. Even though they were people here before me, the wait wasn't too long. Don't know the name of the lady who did my pedicure but she did a good job, and was pleasant. Also the price for a pedicure isn't bad. Will be back for my next pedicure when I'm in the area.
Finally they opened up a place in my neighborhood! Been wanting to try this place for a while, but was unwilling to make the trip.   Decided to check this place out on a Thursday night. Walked in, we ordered first at the counter and then found a place to sit. Service was friendly. Water and ketchup was self served. They do bring the food to you though. Food came out at a timely matter. Good vibe.  I ordered the slider-sized Hawthorne burger $4.50 because I wanted to taste what the strawberry preserves was like on a burger. It's a like it/hate it burger. Fortunately, I like. There's a sweet-salty taste to it. Friend ordered the full-sized Sellwood burger $9.50. Both were yummy burgers. The bacon hit the spot. Sliders are pretty dang small, you would need to order two to be full. We also ordered the PDX fries $3- not worth. Will skip this next time as it was nothing special. The loaded fries might seem worthwhile, but with that price, I'll just get another burger.  I'm hungry for another slider!
Tried the red velvet chicken and waffles and strawberry stuffed French toast. Both were great and delicious. The waffle didn't taste like red velvet but, the chicken was seasoned to perfection!! I think I may have to tell my mom I found someone that makes chicken better than her!
Always good food. Good beer.  Margherita pizza and Mariano pizza are delish.  Not badly priced either.
I'm the kind of person that hates going to the dentist. Something about people putting their hands (and sharp tools) in my mouth is just really unpleasant. I made an appointment at Inman Park Dentistry after getting recommendations from neighbors.   The staff was kind, gentle, and explained exactly what they were doing and why. It was the best dentist appointment I've ever had!  They also have email and text appointment reminders, which is really handy.
The salesperson was really helpful and they are able to give swatches of any in-stock fabric which is a huge help in deciding. They have a beautiful selection of neutrals and funky stuff and everything is high quality. They weren't able to definitively recommend an upholstery service but I can use Yelp for that. Def recommend.
This place rocks! Highly recommend the bacon wrapped dolmas. Seafood in the salads always cooked perfectly. Plenty of tasty food for s great price. Octopus is tender, tuna and salmon full of flavor and cooked just right. Always good to see a place where the employees are happy and the wait is short.
Went to this place for Lunch. The tacos were super good and so was the service. The rice was amazing too. I would def be back.
This is one of three locations! I absolutely love their coffee and their staff is always friendly. Parking can be difficult during peak hours though!
This place serves THE BEST Chinese style Ramen in town!  When you order the soup you can get it topped with a variety of meats, seafood, or veggies, and have a choice betwen egg noodles (ramen) or vermicelli rice noodles (Vietnamese cellophane noodles).  And the soups usually have various veggies in them, but alway have broccoli rabe, my fave!  Try the duck orthe BBQ sliced pork with your ramen...it is AMAZING and really hits the spot!  Also this locale serves boba smoothies and drinks, and iced milk tea, which I love to get for dessert!
Started shopping at Posh about 3 years ago when I was pregnant with my first child.  We purchased almost everything for the nursery from Posh plus stroller and car seat.  I loved the registry they had because I could add other website/links on the registry.  In addition we asked Posh to do something very complicated and they did it no questions asked....and then come to find out weeks later that it ended up costing them a lot to do what we had asked (thank you again Posh).  Now with our second child still going to Posh for outfits and those hard to find things like "the snot sucker".  Highly recommend this place, I LOVE IT!
This place is AMAZING! I walked in at 7:45pm on a Friday night (horrible, I know) and Susan was more than happy to do a manicure, eyebrow, and lip wax!! I was elated seeing as I have a big event for work tomorrow and no time to get this done. She was super friendly and did a wonderful job with everything! I will definitely be back. Not to mention that a mani is only $10 here compared to the $12 everywhere else in Boston. Also, be sure to get a little stamp card on your way out. You get a free mani after 10 visits. FYI: I posted a pic of my nails on here as well #veryhappycustomer
We had to give our Mini a two year checkup and when the serviceman told us it would be about three hours, I jumped onto Yelp to see where I could find some breakfast within a half mile of the Herb Chambers dealership.  Oh Yelp, you never let me down.  Steve's was exactly what I wanted.  The place was pretty full on a Saturday at 12:00pm but luckily there were still a few open tables.  The menu was awesome - I mean where else can you find a side of gyro for breakfast?  Husband ordered the blueberry pancakes with side sausage and I went with the bacon egg and cheese on a bagel (note:  they only have plain bagels).  The blueberry pancakes were enormous!  Enormous, delicious, and fresh.  My BEC was good, not punch you in the face good, but it was just a classic BEC.  It wasn't greasy at all either which made my belly happy.  The sausage wasn't anything more than regular sausage links and though the home fries looked like they would be delicious, they just tasted like potatoes.  But my meal was only like $3.95 so I seriously can't complain.  Like everyone else has said: Steve's is no-frills, extremely cheap, cash-only and very good.  I'm a fan.
Our second trip to the diner included my best friend and my daughter. Crystal, our waitress, was phenomenal. She was attentive, offered great suggestions and kept checking in with us. Our breakfast was exceptional. We ordered the Reece's Pieces Pancakes with bacon, the Jack Daniel's omelette and the Steak and Cheese Omelette. For sides we chose the fresh fruit cup, sweet potato hash and home fries. J & M is truly a hidden gem. You will not find a more welcoming diner with staff that is cheery in the early morning while offering exceptional and unique breakfast choices. We do not mind the 40 minute drive and definitely will be back. Thanks for starting this day off with a great breakfast and a smile
The Godfather was delicious and super unique! Staff was very friendly and helpful. Their organic sodas were also a lot of fun to try!
My heart beats a steady rhythm for this location in particular.  Not only because they serve some of the best ice cream in the world, but because it's a location that works with youth to give the their first work experience.  I'm completely and totally biased. So my review may not be helpful.  The ice cream is magic. Though I do wish there were more flavors. That would be real magic. Snap my fingers and BAM!  Get something from the Flavor Graveyard like Blueberry Cheesecake or Rainforest Crunch.
Ahlycea is amazing. I went in for the first time with an amazon deal/gift card thing. I've been back twice a month ever since. The prices are very affordable and you will not find better quality for the price in Boston, guaranteed. I have two different back injuries and I've gone from some days not being able to stand up or walk without pain, to being able to run and dance again and being completely pain free about half the time (within six months). She really listens to what you need and is very talented. She's also not afraid to ACTUALLY give a deep tissue massage when it is asked for.  It can be difficult to get the initial appointment because it's just Ahlycea there and she's incredibly busy, but once you're in, it is totally worth it. She mentioned to me recently that there is going to be online booking available so that will be nice too.
What a great resource! Constable Chris Waites is a landlord's best friend. First off, he's a pro, he knows his stuff better than a lot of lawyers, he's fast, very easy to work with, and he will take the time to walk you through what is undoubtedly a very trying and difficult process.  My wife and I used Massachusetts Constable Service to help us with what I can only describe as a "professional tenant" in our rental apartment in downtown Boston.  For a year, we always had trouble getting rent from this guy, but now we were faced with a tenant who was not planning to leave at the end of his lease. Luckily for us, we found Chris Waites. He explained what we were facing then walked us step by step through the process that was ahead of us. The  tenant gets all the breaks, Chris told us, so you have to be sure you dot all the i's and cross all the t's.   Perfect timing. I met Chris at Housing Court, he helped me file a Notice of Non-Renewal, then went right down to serve the documents on my tenant. Next, he helped me through my Notice to Quit Order, and eventually handled the Eviction service for me, complete with moving vans and a Do Not Trespass order. Everything happened exactly as he described. Chris kept me sane through a very frustrating tug of war with my tenant. He also worked seamlessly with my attorney. His rates are very reasonable ...and you can't put a price on a good night's sleep!
Great little cafe!  This cafe in the south end makes me want to move there!    The best spot to  people watch.. it's esp fun in South End bc of the fashionable gay community.  My waiters at the cafe were so fabulous with their nails painted, i loved it so much!  so much personality and fun there.  even the bathroom is clean and unique looking. ha  Can't wait to go back!
Really nice little hidden gem.  The servers are very attentive, the menu is extensive and the food is really good.  Great atmosphere and I like that the bar is tucked away from the restaurant.
Amazing place to chow down on something new, Fried Okras were AMAZING!, 3 Guidos AMAZING!, funky monkey with extra bacon AMAZING! and the chicken fried chicken with country gravy and habanero jam AMAZING!!!!!
I am wanting a facial right now but it is Sunday. Maybe you'll have something Tuesday or Wednesday this week. Yeah! I got one for Wednesday. Thank you Maison Esthetique Christiane Bourque Spa. I'll be dreaming of it the next three nights.
Mmmmm!! Very good food and fun atmosphere. This place is BUSY on Friday nights...we checked in at 7pm (after the usual dinner rush) and still had to wait 20 minutes...so make a reservation if you can! Also, their parking lot is tiny, so be prepared to walk a block or two once you find street parking. This place is definitely worth it though! I plan to come back many times.
Variety of food and timely service. A good spot for vegetarians too. They are situated in a great location that makes it easily accessible too.
We started out at the Rattle Inn to celebrate the bf's bday, and it was my first time going. The roof top has an amazing view of Austin's skyline. We were there pretty early in the night so there wasnt a lot of people, but the lay out can handle quite a few people. The bartenders were nice and the drinks were great for the price.  I'll def. Be back.
FIRST!  I've been waiting and waiting and waiting for this place to open. Everyday, on my trek from the bus stop to home, I'd stop and peer into the window to see how the refurbish job was progressing. Yesterday, I saw the "Grand Opening" sign up. Yay!  I love Liege waffles--my wife will make them for me on special occasions. The ones they make at  Waffle Window are a tasty, tasty, reasonable facsimile. I love the way those sugar bits caramelize when the waffle cooks. Delicious.  We stopped in for breakfast this morning. My wife went sweet and I went savory. Her's had pana cotta and strawberries on top. Mine had bacon and jalapenos. Good stuff! I wolfed my waffle down in seconds flat and was seriously thinking about getting a sweet one for dessert. My good judgement kicked in and I satisfied my sweet tooth by sneaking a couple of bites of my lady's waffle.  This isn't a food cart. There are a small number of seats inside and some tables out on the sidewalk. They have espresso drinks and gelato. A sign on the door boasts free wifi.  This place was recently the Kush Cafe, a coffee/gelato place that didn't last long. I'm sure Waffle Window will do much, much better at this locale--mainly because I'm thinking about going back for seconds as soon as I finish my review.  Unfortunately, most of the new businesses I love end up getting extremely popular, with lines out the door. Oh, well, I think it's awesome having this place in the neighborhood. We need more like it.
The Naked Dog is by far the best thing you can do to have a balanced, happy, healthy dog. Allegra has become my Goldendoodle, Bindi's, Aunt. I travel often for work and I know Bindi is under the best care with Allegra and her assistant Haley. Bindi gets to hike all of the beautiful trails around Austin, getting great exercise and learning proper pack behavior and manners. I hate leaving my pup for travel but feel great knowing how well she is cared for by The Naked Dog. Bindi spends the night with Allegra as well and always runs to the door in excitement. Allegra is a life saver.
I'm from NY and my boyfriend is European, so we are very picky gelato lovers. We do not buy it at the store. We stumbled upon a long line at Honeysuckle and figured the hype must be worth investigating.   We shared 2 scoops of the Nutella gelato....WOW. We both looked at each other, feeling a mutual love for this delicious cup of Heaven. I don't mean to be melodramatic.   There is a moment when hard, frozen ice cream is melting, but it hasn't melted yet. It's thin enough to kind of stretch with the spoon, but it's still a solid, scoopable consistency. This is what Honeysuckle has done somehow (?!)   It's buttery, it's -not- the kind of rich sweetness that makes your teeth fall out, and it's cold but not franchise frozen yogurt cold (you know what I mean?) It's really very good and worth trying. This is coming from two people who have had some of the best gelato in the Big Apple and in Euro countries known for the delicacy.   Also...great location. It's located inside Ponce City Market which boasts some fab shops like West Elm and lululemon. PCM connects to the Atlanta Beltline, so when it's no longer 3000 degrees outside, you can take your buttery gelato on a stroll. :)
Tried the red velvet tonight and it was very good. It was actually satisfying, and not overly sweet. Definitely check this truck out!
Been to this place 2-3 times already and each time I'm gotten the soft tofu soup. The broth is so good and there's so much tofu it's a very filling meal. I've seen some of the sizzling kalbi go by and it looks and smells amazing, but I can't seem to get myself to order anything other than the soup. I love it. I've had the kimchi soup and that was good. Lots of small bits of beef and enough kimchee to finish off the meal. The seafood soup was good, but pretty skimpy on the seafood. The head-on shrimp made for a great broth, but too much work to eat. I also love the fresh egg that comes along side the meal. Next time i'll have to ask for an extra.   There really is no ambiance. It's got a rather dull interior to be honest. But they're not here to give you a top-ranked hotel restaurant with damask printed silk and tuxedo waiters. It's freakin' next to Fubonn... on 82nd... in the middle of Felony Flats. They put their time and effort where it counts - in the food! What surprises me is that there's actually a GREAT Korean place in the middle of Chinaland. Definitely one of my favorite restaurants in Portland. And to top it off, the service is really friendly, too.
Patrick Star: Why don't we just take these people, and push them over there!  Again, this is another ride to categorize as a "get off your feet and out of the sun" ride. While it won't thrill you to wits end, you'll get a very nice tour of Tomorrowland and can even go in Space Mountain.
Tip - Make a reservation!! If you have a large group, make it a couple months in advance. Seriously!   If you live in Central Florida, Hollerbach's Willow Tree is a must! You aren't just going to dinner, you are going to have an experience. I have been to Hollerbach's a few times and each time is always a blast. The food is delicious, the staff is great, the show is amazing and the drinks can get you into trouble, lol.    Grab a group of friends and order das boot. What is das boot? There are a few different sizes but its a large glass boot filled with your beer of liking. What do you do with the boot? Rule #1 - do not put the boot on the table until it has emptied.  Pass the boot to friend to friend until it has been finished. I am sure there is a utube video available if you need further direction. Bonus, you may get a mini workout from holding das boot as it can be heavy at the beginning.  Food - A+. German food is heavy however, it's delicious. I have had combos of sausage, schnitzels, potato pancakes, the huge pretzel... it's all tasty! Honestly, the sides make the dish. I have tried a few of their sides and they do not disappoint.
I had the beef stew with the French bread and I don't know maybe I just really like bread but the French bread was awesome. Also they have so many more choices on the menu then pho which was refreshing to see. This place is huge.
omg- I love this store!  I love the amazeballs staff. I have been on a TWO year search- yes TWO years- for the "perfect" pair of jeans- and Shondra found them and *insisted* I try them on. I bought them in every style and hue- the girl knows her sh*t.  No matter how much I vow not to buy- I always end up with a bag in my hand.   Constantly and consistently a great experience every time I shop there.  highly recommend
My first Ethiopian food experience, and surely not my last. Absolutley loved it. I had no idea what I was doing, but the menu was very accessible to a rookie and the staff was happy to offer recommendations. I recommend the tibs (I had chicken, but it all looked great), with shiro (a sauce they pour over it) and injera.
Quick, efficient service.... awesome that it is within walking distance and they are open late-ish (6pm?)  cluttered, but hey, they got boxes, packing supplies, and friendly staff to help you with your packing/shipping needs.  ( | )
Healthy, fresh, flavorful combinations or make your own salads. Fresh real juice! Really friendly employees! Will be frequenting often.
Short, but nice course in Newton. Decent value, especially for residents. Accuracy is important and rewarded. I would suggest taking a cart the first time around - some of hte holes are hilly!
Love everything about bodega! This is a great place to come at the end of a night and have one last beer before heading home.  They are just cool guys who know beer and want to share their knowledge!
Nice surprise!  Was in drinking some great drink specials, decided to try the 2 for 1 entree special, was excellent!   Scallops were cooked perfectly, definitely fresh and at 1/2 price you can't get a deal like that I Boston!!!  Nice dinner, great prices and worth a visit
This park is pretty fun. It's all off leash which is great. The dogs love it here. However it's pretty small and the parking lot is tiny. Be prepared to wait in line for 30+ minutes for a parking spot on weekends. I wish Austin had more off leash areas so places like this didn't get so crowded.
So happy with the services of these ladies!  I had Kendal and Morgan do my and my bridal party's make-up for the big day.  The girls were so nice, and they were willing to accommodate last minute service requests from my family.  We all got so many compliments on our hair and make-up--I felt beautiful on our wedding day!  Kendal did my make-up exactly how I imagined it, and they both were able to do wonderful looks for family/friends that had a less clear idea about the "look" they wanted.  Would definitely recommend AJ's to any potential brides looking for pro services.
I love the FLiP concept AND I love their food. The burgers are consistent and VERY flavorful. Their fries are truly epic and of course, those shakes are a must.
A colleague gave me a gift card for this donut place and that was my first introduction to  the wonderful world of Blue Star Donuts. The Hard apple cider fritters were heavenly and so were the blueberry bourbon Basil .  My favorite donut place in the city !
We had a miscommunication with RDFiT regarding freezing our membership account.  Scott, the Founder and President, was very reasonable with us.  These are good people, doing good business. I recommend RDFiT.
Between Katz's and Bagel World, I think these are the two best local bagels. The Katz bagels are smaller and more what I have come to think of as "Boston-style." I grew up in NYC, but I think a good bagel is a good bagel no matter where you are. And Katz, he makes a good bagel. I haven't been there in a while, but now after reading all these reviews, I will just have to find an excuse to go into Chelsea!
THE place to get soul food in Atlanta.  Chitlins, giblets, ham hocks and neck bones, fried chicken, smothered chicken, pork chops and meatloaf.  Veggies include broccoli and cheese, lima beans, pinto beans, mac and cheese, green beans, and more.  Sorry vegetarians - pretty much everything here is cooked with meat - even the vegetables!  I love their fried chicken, and their cornbread muffins are delicious.  Don't forget to try their awesome desserts:  red velvet cake or banana pudding.    The only complaint about the Bee is that it's so popular and so small, so it's always busy.  It gets a little warm in there, too, with all those hungry people.
Bacco is good. Not the best food in the world, but certainly good. I came for restaurant week, so the prices that everyones complaining about didn't factor in. The service was a little slow, but the drinks were really good, so that made up for it.
I just finished an excellent lunch at Ming Court. The service by Joe was exceptional and the meal was delicious. I had the Chinese broccoli, shrimp dim sum and a tuna roll. All were amazing. I'd come back here anytime.
I have been passing by this place for years as my sister has a condo nearby and got a chance to try it when she suggested we do their 2-for-1 Tuesdays.  I got the Madison Square which is the cheese less vegetable pizza and it was absolutely delicious! The extra cheese pizza made it a great deal and I was able to give it away. I wish I had gotten larger than the 10" personal pizza because I ate it so fast and was craving more! My nephew got the barbecue chicken pizza and I was impressed at the large chunks of white chicken breast on it.   I'm so glad I tried this place finally. We called in the order and picked it up, there were a couple patrons inside and the waitresses there were friendly and told me to have a seat while I waited for my last pizza to finish up. Great place!
I'm jealous. Why Austin has more great food trucks and fabulous food truck parks than Houston?  I was introduced by Phillip B about his love with Stonehouse Wood Fire Grill's burgers. When I first arrived in Austin, I had to stop by to check out this place. Chase, the chef, was so friendly and easy to talk to. He gave me a quick introduction about the food. I was freezing cold and I didn't want to ruin my dinner with Tracey S. So, I ordered the 4" pecan pie ($5). It was so yummy and it was not as sweet as other pies I had before.   Next day, I had The Wake-Up Call Burger. It came with a sunny-side up and the yolk created a dripping mess as I bit to it. I wanted another pecan pie, but they were sold out. I chatted with Anna, owner/operator about how I found this place on Yelp (after the address corrected). She was appreciative.   I've never been to their previous location. After I saw the photos from last biz page, I like this location at Mueller Lake Park. In combination with other food trucks, Stonehouse Wood Fire Grill makes a perfect sense for meat-hungry folks after their workout in the park. I found more seating areas besides in front of the food trucks.   It looks like I'll be back to Austin more often. I bookmarked it on my GPS, I'll stop at Mueller Lake Park to relax, watch the ducks and enjoy another Chase's creative burger.
Needed an MRI.  The technician had great bedside manner, and made the experience as pleasurable as it could have been.  Scheduling was kept on time, and there was ample free parking.  Overall great experience, and professional staff.  Not that I want to go back  :)  but if I had to, I would return here!
I never thought I'd be at a point in my life where I was writing a Yelp review of a UPS store, but here I am. I mailed something last month from this location and, although I was only in the store for maybe 15 minutes, it was a very pleasant experience. The gentlemen behind the counter were not only helpful, but absolutely hilarious. I don't think I ever have, or will, get such a good laugh at a UPS store.   I should probably get some hobbies or something.
Solid joint with pretty excellent BBQ. They dont run out of things which is excellent. So if you want great BBQ without the line. This is your place.  Beef Rib is massive. Be ready to know what youre getting yourself into.  Sides you serve yourself and all of them are delightful.   Brisket is really solid here. Not amazing, but really darn good. Pork ribs are really solid. Sausage is a go-to as well.
this place is very nice.  the food was good, though they were busy so the service was a little slow.  but it was nice to sit inside and have a nice meal in the middle of an amusement park.  we also didn't have reservations, but we only had to wait a few minutes to be seated.  the green beans were yummy and the curry i had was delicious.  it's definitely good for park food, though a bit pricy.  i would eat here again.
Came here because of Yelp, was looking for a spot for lunch and didn't want to travel far from work and came across this little gem of a hole in a wall.  The viet/mexican cuisine is definitely and interesting combo but it works! I got the banh mi sandwich and it was awesome! Wish they had the more traditional deluxe one but it's ok it was still delicious!   Got some Kim Chi Fries and it was the bomb! (does anyone still say that) It definitely was loaded and it could have been a meal on it's own since it was so heavy with carbs and proteins (bulgogi was sprinkled all on top)  They also serve breakfast tacos all day!! ALL DAY I REPEAT ALL DAY BREAKFAST TACOS!!! I got one of those as well and it was glorious!   I would definitely recommend this place to come to if you want some good food for lunch or some breakfast tacos.   It is a hole in the wall kind of hard to find but worth the trip. Not a lot of room to move around with chairs and tables but this is definitely great lunch spot! Enjoy!
I recently stopped in here on Sunday while running errands with my kids and was pleasantly surprised by the whole experience. The restaurant was clean, the staff was friendly, the food was fresh and good and it was surprisingly affordable. We had a nice, filling meal of real food (beans, rice, vegetables, grilled chicken) for less than I would have paid at McDonalds. Bonus: they had TVs tuned to the Pats game so I even got to watch some football. Highly recommend this restaurant!
My wife and I swung by here late last night and were surprised by how great it was! I had the colorado lamb pasta dish preceded by a baby arugula salad. I was struck by how tasty the salad was and the pasta dish was just right (I recommend getting the 1/2 dish for something like this, as it's a very heavy meal).  Interestingly, my wife's reaction was exactly the same - she was surprised by how good her caesar salad was and her pasta dish (the maine crab, I think) was great!  Our server was very nice and it was, overall, a great experience. Minus one star for a mediocre martini and a not-as-cozy-as-the-menu-deserves atmosphere.
Wonderful food, great prices! Happy hour skinny drink with upside down beer was awesome!!!
Not only was the food top notch, Mia and Duncan provided superb service. Must try if you love hot pot. -Texas Girl
This has to be the coolest venue in Live Nation's portfolio! I'm not sure how old it is but it feels like an antique, just oozing character and charm. If these walls could talk, I bet they'd have some amazing stories.   We saw Ben Harper and the Innocent Criminals from the front row of the lower balcony. Our view was amazing and I enjoyed being able to sit or stand whenever I felt like it. I'm way too old for general admission, floor shenanigans.   They have a bar that serves some food in the basement. Bars on every floor seem to have a different beer selection, so if you don't see anything you love on one level, just meander up or down a floor to see what else they have on draft before investing $12 for a beer you're not crazy about.   My only complaint is that acoustics weren't the best -- I think because we were behind the speakers. It won't deter me from coming back for future shows, I'll just choose my seats a little more wisely now that I know. Looking forward to our next road trip to Atalanta for a show at the Tabernacle!!
Recently enjoyed a morning visit here. The ham and cheese omelet was delicious and better than I expected. Portions are good size with ought being obnoxiously too much. Hashbrowns were delicious and I enjoyed the little taste of fruit to go with my meal. It's a small space but would definitely be great to enjoy the patio during a nice day. My only complaint was there's no parking lot and it seems a lot of the neighborhood parks on the street, but definitely will be back!
This place is so great. We came here a couple days after moving to Hingham and could not have been more pleased to find this gem - casual, welcoming, and incredibly tasty. She had the burger special, I had the shepherd's pie. We both had Guinness (the rumors are true - it is indeed a fantastic pull), and we both left with huge smiles.  We'll be back again soon, and many times thereafter...
My rather spoiled cat just spent a week at Cats in the City. They took great care of him. I've never boarded a cat before and was extremely pleased with the service.
Had the fish sandwich and fish tacos.  They were excellent.  Hand made.  The staff was friendly and personable.  Will certainly be back.
I originally purchased a Groupon deal for a cleaning and X-rays. I understand some of the reviews that were dissatisfied with their Groupon exam. My cleaning was quick, and the exam itself was with Dr. V whom appeared rushed, frequently glanced at his watch, and was not personable. However, the staff was friendly enough so I decided to return to get my cavities filled, since I honestly just wasn't sure where else to go. But I'm glad I did!  After that initial cleaning, all of my other visits have been with the awesome Dr. Hura, whom I cannot gush over enough. He is personable, patient, understanding, and just a sweetheart. My cleaning ended up turning into a few cavities and a root canal, but I never dread my visits with Dr. Hura. His assistants are dolls, too.   And lastly, one quick note about the office manager, Jennifer. It seems not everyone has had a positive experience with her. However, she talked to me about a payment plan for my root canal, allowed me to pay it in parts, and was just a sweetie to deal with.   I'll definitely be returning to the office for my other dental work, and would recommend it to a friend. :)
Sunday, my friend and I wanted to get a tattoo done of the Boston skyline. We figured we were going to another tattoo shop to get it done, but they said that Saturday's were their only walk in day. It didn't say that anywhere on the website, but that's beside the point.  When we couldn't get our tattoos done at that one shop, I called around to see if any place had any availability. All the places I called said they weren't free. Regeneration was one of them.  We were about to go home, when Regeneration called us back! They squeezed us in, which was awesome! We were so excited to get our tattoos done!  I don't know what the artist's name was, but he did a hell of a job. It looks awesome and I'm in love with it.   I would totally go back to this place! All the guys there are so friendly. The place is wicked clean and it's very easy to find. The only downfall of the place is trying to find parking around the area. But that's it.
Veteran bartenders.  Quality food.  Staple beers.  I always have a down to earth time here.
First off, as others have said, it's the Waffle House of Korean food. It's open 24 hours. It's fast, and it's great at curing that late night Korean craving.  I almost always get the bibimbap, and sometimes with tofu soup, as well. The banchan is usually good. The service is decent. The ambiance is minimal.   I really do wish that other Korean food joints would go 24/7, but until then, 88 Tofu House will have my heart for late night eats.
FREE BEER  did you hear me?  21 OUNCES OF FREE BEER  yup, you read it right. FREE BEER. And they make you chant this a little bit during your tour here so get ready!! The tour is just plain awesome. Coming here made my trip to boston pretty much perfect. They ask for a donation for their charity when you go in, but for 21 ounces of beer and your own glass sampling glass to take home with you with one of the steps to tasting beer printed on it, how could a donation to a good cause not be worth it? And let's face it if you donate money to go on a drinking tour, it is kind of like donating to the cause of you drinking!  This place gets packed pretty quickly, so definitely get here earlier in the day to make sure you get into a tour group! You learn a lot about beer making and sam adams beer in particular, and the whole place is so well kept, even if it is a little randomly out of the way. TOTALLY WORTH THE TRIP!   Eventually you make it into the tasting room, where everyone sits at long drinking tables and pitchers just get passed out one-by-one and you get to try three different beers! We were lucky enough to try boston's own Boston Brick Red that was only being released on tap in boston! And being from CA that was pretty exciting to us!  CHEERS, to SAM ADAMS! and CHEERS, to FREE BEER!
This place is the great place to shop if you always wanted to get clothing, assesories, etc at a cheaper price. And I also love that the color featured for the week is 50% off, which beats the regular price.
Move over Burger Lounge and Eureka! in San Diego.  Flip has got the best upscale burger I've had yet.  I was a little skeptical.  My 93-year-old mom lives nearby and likes Flip. (She calls it Flippin' Burger.) But ATL Yelper Sarah M's ROTD for Flip convinced me.  No need to be so skeptical.  Flip was excellent.  We were five people ranging in age from 24 to 93.  Everyone liked it.    Beautiful place.  (Yelp buddy McRae nailed it: Flip is done out like Mimi from the Drew Carey Show.)  But it was fun.  Marissa, our waiter, was excellent.  She talked the newbies through the menu, even talked us into a "Southern Long Island Tea,' and came back regularly to ensure we had everything we needed.  (And Marissa didn't ask "how is everything tasting?" -- the dumb question that almost all waiters under 30 feel compelled to ask.)   I had the lamb burger medium rare.  Others tried various hamburgers, a trio of three sliders, fries (crispy), sweet potato tots (not as good as the fries) and salads.    The only disappointment was the Krispy Kreme milkshake which tasted like a vanilla milkshake with a KK donut thrown into the blender -- exactly what it was.  Now I need to go to Juniper & Ivey, Richard Blais's SD restaurant.
Delicious.   I live in Malden and am so happy to see another awesome place pop up (and next to the T, no less!) I've been twice and both times everything was excellent. I'm partial to the Monday night specials-OMG $1 oysters and they were incredible blue points that were so delicious and a sake flight for $12. Not to mention the fish tacos, kale caesar salad, etc. etc. It's so fun to see creative delicious tapas-style asian cuisine.   Highly recommend.   Only issue: SO EMPTY! Let's support a local business and get our butts in there. These people are locals living their dream and I think it would be great to support that as a community.  By the way, I absolutely DO NOT know them at all. This is purely a customer review.
The food is awesome. Probably one of the best sushi places for the price.  Quality is high, taste is delicious, size is smaller but I rather have quality over quantity.     The place is small and hidden. Seats about 18~20 ppl.  There is only the owner that is making the sushi and one waitress.   When it's packed, it can be a little slow but like other great places, there is a wait for the food.    I do recommend going up to get the bill and pay, as you would need to if you're paying with card.  The pocky you get after you pay is good too.
The place was very colorful when we walked in. They had amazing handmade guacamole that you could watch being made right by your table. They give you and needless stream of chips and salsa which was amazing. Our food plate was enormous and I couldn't even eat it all. My fajita was great and I liked the refried beans. Our waiter was really nice and very friendly.
Everything was amazing here. The veggies on my chicken pita were so good. The falafel was made right then and there and very tasty with the sauce it came with. The fries were so good I even ate the tiny pieces.   Last minute I decided to get a small hummus to go and I'm so glad I did! Next time I'll get it without the chopped jalapeños that I made the boyfriend eat off the top. It was so good though!
On my very first trip to Oregon as a tourist back in April, my friend, another Hawaii transplant, took me to Black Bear Diner for lunch. It was a Sunday afternoon and the place was bustling. The wait for a table was about 15 minutes because it was a lunch rush. I was tired, hungry, and getting grumpy because I needed to feed! I was thinking to myself that this place better be good. And because of this wait, I was going to be even more critical of their food than I already am.   We finally got seated and after looking through their big menu, I decided on the meat loaf. Now meat loaf is something that's either REALLY good or REALLY bad. There is no in-between. I took the chance and ordered it. The food came out fast considering how busy the place was. Suprisingly, the meat loaf was good! Actually, it was great! I couldn't believe my mouth because I've never tasted a meat loaf equivalent to my mom's meat loaf, yet here I was eating something that compares to it. It was that good.   Since moving here, I've eaten at Black Bear a few more times, trying different items from the menu. Their breakfast menu is my favorite. I get the meat lovers omelette with hash and pancakes. It's always as expected, and always fililng. They serve very large portions.   Black Bear Diner is your typical "All American" diner. It has everything from breakfast to dessert so you'll always find something to feed your hunger. The place is clean, prices fair, and service is good. Everything you'd expect from eating at a diner.
Wicked good pizza very friendly and cute staff, definitely coming back after stopping in on a whim
The visit to this establishment was one of the most rewarding experiences ever. We arrived to the brewery, parking was a bit hectic, and were able to get on a tour of the brewery within minutes of arriving. The waiting hall had lots of different information and historical references available in regards to the brewery. When the tour started, we were presently surprised. Not only was the tour free with the request of donations for local charities, but the tour was extremely educational. I felt like an experienced beer maker after the tour was over. They taught us about every aspect of the brewing process, how to taste and observe beer, and the technology of the glass that Sam Adams has invented. The tasting was amazing. One pitcher per table, and three different types of beers. Fantastic. Also, they offered an incentive to visit Doyle's, a local restaurant and pub, and receive two free glasses if we ordered a beer at the restaurant. Overall an amazing experience, I highly recommend it to anyone that is interested in beer.
It has been a while, probably since Istanbul, I've had real authentic Turkish food that doesn't get looped into the "Mediterranean" category. I'm not looking for standard kabobs and hummus when I step into a truly Turkish eatery.   Two of us decided to do a bit of a tasting menu and to-go any leftovers giving us the opportunity to try as many dishes as we could. Ordered the following:  Mandolin Pinot - 2015 Dip Trio - Hummus/Hipiti/Tzakiki Falafel  Kasseri Kofte Zataa'r Pide Side of Soujouk Pastrami Lamb kebab with bulgar Somon Kunefe  First off the service from Imran and hostess was great after a bit of a hiccup. The Mandolin Pinot was well recommended.   It was great to see they had Hipiti on the menu and it was terrific as was the hummus in the trio. The tzakiki was good but pretty standard and bit acidic. The falafel were seasoned well but were way too dry internally.   The Kasseri Kofte was spot on. The lamb meat was good quality and flavor of the Kasseri Cheese was similar to how it tasted when I tried it in Istanbul. To parallel this dish to an American dish, picture a Minnesota style Juicy Lucy burger with lamb instead of beef and Kasseri instead of Cheddar...BOOM!!  I was also glad to see Pide's on the menu and was hopeful they weren't bland and generic like most of the Pide's I've had in the States. I'd say it was better than average. Next time I'm going to try the standard Lahmacun Pide. The Soujouk Pastrami they had was also really authentic and will maybe try that Pide as well at some point.  The Lamb kebab was ordered medium but cooked medium well. The flavor was quite good and the meat was pretty tender for the level of doneness. The bulgar that accompanied this dish was surprisingly good as well. The Somon (Salmon) was pretty great as well and the portion size was more than generous. It was slightly overdone but my gf ordered it medium well.   To end this beast of a meal we ordered the Kunefe which was one of the main reasons I wanted to try this place. I used to cook this dish up with my Turkish friends in college and then got to try all their mother's/grandmother's renditions in Turkey. I have a pretty good idea of what a good Kunefe should taste like and this might have been the most authentic dishes they have. It was definitely the best I've had outside of Turkey. I recommend getting this every time.  Overall, there were a lot of things I liked about this place and a few things I didn't. I look forward to coming back here and trying some of the other authentic offerings.
Catherine was a sweet heart and welcoming. I got there Saturday afternoon around 8pm, NO LINE! Service was quick.
What makes Brian's Brew special? The moon milk? The coffee? The fresh beans that arrive Tuesday and Wednesday? Or is it Sam. I offer to you fellow Yelp fans this- all the above. When you meet someone with a passion for what they do, add fresh spin and approach to coffee making you can't help but rave about Brian's Brew. In the morning get there early and enjoy the breakfast tacos before the building employees take advantage of this first floor coffee stop. Enjoy your morning greeting from Sam who provides that special touch transforming your morning cup of joe to a delightful coffee experience. Never have I described coffee the way I describe wine.  This is an amazing stop and deserves to be shared and enjoyed. Take a walk over to the corner of 6th and Congress- enter into the mezzanine at the Bank of America building on the corner- put the Starbucks to your back and enjoy a coffee by Sam.  Make sure to provide an email address and earn your stars for that future cup. I guarantee you will be back.
I have used this for brakes, needed maintenance, and oil change. I have a high mileage car so i know maintenance may be needed. I am single mom trying to stretch my dollar and miles in my car.  These guys have been great. They always explain what and why it is needed. They have always helped prioritize the needed work. I appreciate their assistance and honesty. I hope they continue to provide good and honest service.
If you can read, you should take advantage of the VPL! I haven't used the VPL since I was in College many years ago, and had no idea how easy it has become since those years have passed!   If you know what book you are looking for, you can just log into the VPL website with your card number and pin number and put a hold on the book you are hoping to sign out. The library will send you an email to your account on their website, letting you know the book you are looking for is on hold for you. Then you go to the location you selected to pick up your book, in the downtown library there is a hold section and only the person who has put the book on hold can actually sign it out. I searched for the two books I put on hold and proceeded to the checkout.   You can sign out your own books now too! They have set up scanners where you scan through your card and then your books and it prints you a receipt which states when your books must be returned, but if you get lazy like me you can just log back into your account online and renew your books up to six times without even leaving your house! Ahhh... beer in one hand good book in the other, and I'm only a mouse-click away from renewing it before I pass out from drinking.
Server was awesome, prices a bit high but lovely variety of shrimp. Lobster tail was yummy! Corn fritters were a yummy hit and more of a dessert as not very corny lol
Excellent food and great service; shout out to our server Xavier; this is authentic Mexican food;  fajitas mixta was excellent.  This place is where local Mexicans go for Mexican food - that's got to be good.
Annette was very sweet and courteous and both my and my friend's Mango Fusion smoothies were delicious! Keep up the great work, Annette!
Metropolis has the best customer service - hands down.  Always willing to drop what they're working on to help diagnose and fix a problem and send you back out on the road as quickly as possible.  I'm pretty good at diagnosing and fixing problems as they arise, but whenever I'm stuck Metropolis comes to the rescue! Thanks, Metropolis!
I have stayed at this Marriott location at least 20 times.  My experiences are always positive!  The view of Cambridge is absolutely beautiful.  You can see the water and the sky line from your window.    The service is excellent.  The employees are responsive to your questions and requests.  The rooms are spacious and able to accommodate groups of travelers.  The beds are also quite comfortable.  The hotel is always quiet, relaxing and clean.  The location is very convenient. It is literally steps away from the Kendall stop on the T.  It is a free T ride from the airport to the hotel: (Silver Line to South Station, Get off at South Station and get on the Red Line towards Alewife, get off at Kendall)  The hotel is within walking distance of MIT, Harvard Square and Quincy Market.  There are also cabs lined up outside of the lobby, if you need them.  The employees are always happy to escort you to the cabs and get you where you need to go.  There is a Starbucks in the hotel lobby.  There is also a sports bar attached to the restaurant called "Champions."  They have an excellent breakfast buffet, lunch menu and dinner menu.  They also have a fully stocked bar.  It's a great place to watch a game.  This hotel consistently delivers quality service.  I have never once run into any issues during my stays.  I would definitely recommend it to anybody looking for an enjoyable stay in Cambridge/Boston.
What a delicious meal! We haven't been to Gallo Nero since it was renovated and the interior is so much nicer! There is a large bar with lots of seats, that was completely packed when we got there. Gallo Nero now has a full liquor license and an expanded menu that came along with the renovations, both pluses. Our waitress was super friendly and helped to make our dining experience positive. Initially, we were served dinner rolls which were toasted and nothing too special, except the house made garlic olive oil they serve with the bread is so delicious, you want to keep eating more and more! I started with the homemade chicken lemon rice soup ($2.50) which was nice and hearty, containing lots of rice and white meat chicken. There was a subtle lemon flavor, but not overpowering. It was very enjoyable on this cold night! For our meal, we ordered the Classsico Pizza ($10.79), which was a delicious pizza topped with a sweet tomato sauce, romano and mozzarella cheese. The crust was doughy and the cheese was gooey...the perfect way to eat a pizza. We also ordered the Roasted Eggplant Ravioli Alla Margarita ($13.29) which came with a salad of our choice. We ordered the Caesar salad which was your typical Caesar salad with romaine, parmesan and croutons and a nice creamy dressing. The ravioli was served to us steaming hot, fresh out of the kitchen! The pasta was perfectly al dente and the filling was a flavorful eggplant and cheese mixture, smothered in a sweet tomato sauce with melted balls of fresh mozzarella. It almost tasted like a lightened up eggplant parmesan in a way, with the eggplant, cheese and sauce- without the fried part. It was very enjoyable. The waitress was able to sell us on the cannoli for dessert as soon as she told us the filling is homemade. Again, another delicious item here at Gallo Nero. We were pleasantly stuffed, and will definitely be back!
So delicious! The deviled eggs are great, but the tacos really steal the show. Didn't try any large plates this trip since we wanted to make our meal more like tapas. We can't wait to go back and try even more!
Be warned: If you go during offpeak hours, there will be a line... but it's much shorter than during peak... trust me. A Sunday afternoon will leave you in a line extending the full length of the restaurant, out the front door, and along the sidewalk. You have been warned... so grab a pint while waiting in line.  It's that goooooddddd  The theme of this place is quite obvious: burgers and beer... not so strangely, this is definitely a national trend. The real appeal is the quality of ingredients... Black Angus beef ground daily, buns baked from scratch, and even freshly cut fries.. all done  each day (packs of day old buns are available for sale if you're interested)  I have to say, I like quite a few of the burgers on the menu. The Llano Poblano, El Diablo, and the Buffalo Bill (with "Sassy Sauce") are my favorites so far. The Greek isn't bad either... I've heard good things abotu hte Ahi Tuna, but for some reason it doesn't appeal to me. My next conquest will be the Primetime (is it new??).  The fries are really good, but I don't recommend the chile cheese fries.. It doesn't have enough "kick" for my tastes...   My only gripe is that they have a reservation / numbering system to ensure groups get a table... so you would think the food would come out quickly... but it's not... and worse still, (last time) for all of our burgers, "medium rare" and "well done" looked the same :(
Great service, friendly staff, ample and comfortable seating, food better than average although some items could use refinement. Maybe fewer menu items made more thoughtfully a good idea. Nice local establishment, party-friendly, and cool solar power on roof. Try the pizza bread bowl at lunch, great lunch specials at great prices. Twilight Zone calzone also gigantic and delicious.
I live in New York City, where we have an abundance of bakeries, cup cake shops, and fine restaurants and cafes.  But nothing I've tasted here (or anywhere, really) compares to White's strawberry and whipped cream cake that my family orders for birthdays throughout the year.  It is the BEST. CAKE. EVER. I plan my annual summer trip home around a birthday just so I know I'll have some!
The two girls working were so sweet and told me multiple times to let them know if I didn't like my drink because they knew I was trying something new, fast and friendly service at this location!!
If you are in Sandford,  this is a must place to eat. Excellent food and exceptional service.  The deluxe potato cakes were devine.
Nicely done! Kind of homey and very tasty. Yep I like it.
Great food, tastes very authentic. Friendly service. Good atmosphere. The pad thai is the best I've ever had. Easily affordable, a group of four people can walk out of there spending just over 10 bucks each and be completely stuffed.
Beeindruckend! I was told in advance to expect good things at Karl's. That began with the smell of the cooking sausages while still in the parking lot. The deli has everything I would want and expect, and the shelves in the middle aisles had all the confections my German co-workers used to bring back when they went home to visit their families. Those strudels in the pastry case looked delicious too, and of course Black Forest Cake!!!  So to go with the wursts we bought, we enhanced the meal with some really good mustard and some sauerkraut (I have no idea how the sodium content compares to US sauerkrauts, but it tasted slightly less salty). The wursts grilled perfectly, what a great meal we had! Next time I hope to sample more in their cafe before making purchases.
Located close to capitol makes is feasible to access.. Breakfast was very good, thier jalapeño cheddar bread was different and tasty, me and my husband loved it, gaining a Star for it.  I had the Diablo, combo of egg the bread and Chipotle sauce was very good.  Service was polite and fast, giving a star for it It is not a very big and fancy place, rather a small one. It is a very basic, just enough restaurant.
Great food and drinks.  Good atmosphere and friendly staff.  Had the French dip prime rib which was amazing.
Johns Fine Food was unbelievably good. I honestly was not expecting much from the look of the place outside, but once I went in I knew it would be some good classic southern food.   It is buffet style, where you walk up and select a meat and two sides. The meat options were Salisbury steak, ribs, fried chicken, baked chicken, and more.  The side options were the classic southern fare. Collard greens, fried okra, mac and cheese, corn bread, etc.   The price was also pretty good. Only 9.50 for a huge serving of ribs, mac and cheese, and fried okra. Add 1.50 for the delicious sweet tea, and it makes it a Great meal for the money.   Overall I highly recommend John's fine food if you are in the area.
Yes, the outside of the pink painted restaurant is deteriorating and the inside resembles a washed-up border town cafeteria but, appearances aside this place is AWESOME!  They offer an array of tacos (they're open for breakfast and lunch only) on a cash only basis (no debit cards). Prices are on the CHEAP at $1.30 to $1.89 per taco! Eat in and get served a basket of chips and salsa for FREE - and they're actually really yummy not just mindless munchables.  Piece of advice: Beware of the flies if you eat-in. At times, I kind of think it adds an authentic touch.
Went for lunch today. Wow! Best wings I ever had. Had the donkey flavor. Loved it. Nice atmosphere and a ton of tvs to watch games. They have good appetizer specials as well. Five stars.
When I was a child, I fantasized about eating in the supermarket. I daydreamt that I would open up boxes of cereal, packages of chicken, grilled them and cook them and eat them right there. Well, this fine establishment has made my dream a reality. The meat is succulent, and the Mediterranean spices tickle my fancy like watching Liz Taylor play Cleopatra. Everything is fresh, fresh, fresh. Plus, when I'm done eating I take a stroll down the aisles, looking for Exotic items, like Indiana Jones searching for treasure.
My husband and I stopped by for a 'nibble and sip' while window shopping on a Sunday afternoon and had a lovely time! Not to be Pollyanna but it was just one of those 'what a lovely afternoon to sit on a patio and doing a little people watching with a N&S?' and what did we find on the menu but a Patio Wines wine flight!?! We also had the classic cheese flight and the steam mussels, both were delish.
ZAZA's you are a delight!!   I came to Orlando for a family wedding, and I could not leave without u having some pastelito de guallava or cafecito. This place was close enough to my tia's house, so hoped in the car and sped over. To my eternal delight, this place made the meanest breakfast sandwich (turkey, cheese, veggies, eggs on Cuban baguette), and the cafecito went down like a dream. The atmosphere is lovely, the decor modern with a hit of classic, and cozy enough to feel at home. Thank you ZAZA's for such lovely service and food!!
Many of my friends come to this place on a weekly basis, and when the sun is shining and the weather calls for patio dining, Parish Cafe is a nice location. The monster sandwiches created by chefs around the Boston area are pricy and tasty, which means excellent leftovers for later that same afternoon.   The beer selection is decent, the salads are large and not-so-in-charge. The Zuni roll is definitely a craving that I get at least once a month so I basically just get the same thing whenever I visit.   While the food is nothing spectacular, I really like Parish for more nostalgic reasons. I've had some great memories there and their Zuni roll does the job.
Been here for lunch and dinner and love it!   Service was lacking one time but I think it was a fluke thing. Beautiful restaurant with a nice patio. Bustles and is a bit loud at peak times but the food is beautifully presented and delicious.
Damn good Sandwich (Porchetta) . We ordered it take-away for the Plane ride back to Honolulu. They put mustard inside which was really good.  We noticed Meat & Bread as we were walking back from Nuba where we had a really good lunch.
Best Mongolian beef in the town! Nice service, neat environment~ friendly staff! They also have tasty Boston cream cake, I like that one a lot! I  ordered masama curry shrimp, and it's surprisingly good, the sauce is mild, with cashew nuts and avocado*^_^*
Stopped in for lunch with 2 friends, and we were extremely satisfied with what we got.   As soon as we walked in we were greeted by a friendly worker, and promptly lead to our seats (we got to sit at the sushi bar!). Our server came right away and poured water for us while asking if we wanted anything else to drink. He kindly explained the menu and was very attentive for the duration of our meal. My friends and I ordered different variations of the lunch special, so we could share and try a bit of everything. There was no lag between dishes; we all got our appetizers, entree, and dessert at the same time. But nothing felt rushed, our server came with impeccable timing to bring our next dish/clean our plates.   At one point a manager, I believe Linchul, stopped by to check up on us and asked us how we were faring. I felt very welcomed by that gesture and would definitely stop by again.
Great breakfast sandwich at a great price!   If this is possible, more bacon than was needed. It quality of bacon was superb.  Cheese was high quality (gruyere or Swiss I believe).  Menu is diverse with lots of hidden treats.   I'm definitely coming back to explore other areas of their menu!   To top it off their espresso macchiato was perfectly prepared and served.
We were hesitant to try a Japanese fusion restaurant but so glad we did. Standouts for me were the uni sushi which was creamy and sublime and the fried milk dessert.  As other reviewers have stated the prices were hefty for what was served and this is with our NYC frame of reference.
I love hounddogs pizza. The staff are very polite and they have the biggest plate of nachos I uqve ever seen.
Pizza was really good, the environment was really dope! Good music and good people! Would even be a great place to take the kids out to!
Best burger ever. Try the GF bun, you won't regret it. We take all of our out of town friends to hop doddy, just to show off Austin. Great food, fast service, giant beers, perfect location.
Excellent place if you're in need of a  ramen fix, but don't want to stand in the lines at the other places.  Portion size is enormous and the Sprouting Ramen is delicious.
Great tap selection and huge bottled selection. The bartender always seems to be super knowledgeable about the offerings. I'm obsessed with the vanilla clove cider they've had for the last few weeks. Great little spot!
The Scala Lounge is a great place to watch ufc fights, nice big screens and not crowded at all.  I'm not big on casinos but its a good draw to watch events here. I'll admit the food wasn't that great but I wasn't here for the food, just entertainment and ambience.
My sister and I went on a weekday for dinner and we sat outside. We went around 6pm and there wasn't much people there. We got the sweet potato poutine, margarita pizza, Mac & cheese with pulled pork and molten brownie. The sweet potato poutine was pretty good. I liked the sweet potato fries. It was an appetizer and it was pretty big for one. My sister enjoyed her pizza but some parts were not fully cooked as it was soft. The mac and cheese was good and creamy. I like the crust on top. My sister really enjoyed the molten brownie and I thought the brownies were pretty good. The waitress was attentive and service was great.
I had the lamburger and sweet potato tots. The food was great and the service was as well. No one at the table left any food on their plates. The only thing we were all disappointed with was the fact that the sides were a separate charge. The server asked each of us if we wanted fries, chips or tots with our burgers which to us implied that it was a packaged meal; the bill stated otherwise. I just wish she would have made it clear and not have made it seem as if it all came together.
Excellent customers service. Great selection of bikes. Close to trails.  I highly recommend the activity.
If you are staying in the division or hawthorn neighborhood you must go here! The honey lavender latte is incredible and the dirty chai latte is outstanding! Perfectly balanced, not to sweet, and a prefect place to start your day! Staff is also very friendly.. I will be back every time I come to Portland! Thank you so much!
Lunch specials are good. Ample parking and the services was great. Looking for bento boxes and buttery Escobar this is your place.
Our favorite sushi spot!  The yellowtail jalapeno shots are mouth-watering! All of their rolls are innovative and delicious! The service is great and the past few times we have gone, we were seated immediately without reservations.
I love this place. The dim lighting and the dark furniture sets the perfect mood.  The drinks are delicious. I ordered a cucumber martini that was so potent and refreshing.  We went in and the place was packed.  My friend was in crutches and couldn't stand.  She didn't even have to ask for help, the hostess seated us promptly.  The calamari was good, but a small portion.    The bathroom was modern and clean.
We have been 2x for dinner and once with a friend for lunch, as another review stated there are not many options to choose from, I really only like pepperoni pizza but like feta added, they don't have that option nor do they have Parmesan cheese unless you ask and you pay for a small side of it to put on your pizza. We tried the Caesar salad and it was very good, big enough to share. The pumpkin pie concrete was amazeballs!! Also big enough to share one. I just wish they had a few more pizza options (BBQ chicken maybe and topping options) some sort of pasta dish might be nice too! Menu is just very limited. Service was excellent and good beer choices. I'm sure we'll be back as there are not many decent places to go in the area.
NeWorlDeli has become our family's standard go to for hiding from the world. They have good comfort food to escape from the bustle.   Tuna melt with tomato basil soup is the best. They have gluten-free breads which is a plus for my family. It is a must try if you haven't been there yet.
I have been dinning at Hale's for years! I've eaten in and have ordered to go. The service and food is always great! The servers are friendly and food comes out pretty fast. I've never had a bad meal here. My favorites to order our their club house, omelettes, and strawberry French Rollups! I definitely will be back for more!
Considered several merchants before deciding to go with Alliance Overhead. On introductory visit, Ismael came and explained the products, installation, and cost. They had the features that we wanted at reasonable prices. Install on subsequent date went smoothly. They were able to work within our schedule.  Chris and Ismael did a superb job installing. They were flexible and cooperative on the late add of a garage door opener.  Doors and opener look and work great!  Especially enjoying the plain panel windows that allow keeping the garage lights off!  Quality of garage doors and opener is just what we were looking for. Belt drive opener is very quiet!  We are very pleased with the results and would recommend them to anyone.
I like this place so much!! I think it's not the best bubble tea in town though, this place is my personal favorite in Vancouver.:3 I really like the cute dragon drawing on the container and the sign. I like they open until 11pm or 12pm, and I like the sweet milky flavor of bubble teas~ The taste is so simple and it's tasty enough for easy and comfy time with my people~ I also like they have a big menu! I'll definitely go back to feel my past memory when I visit Vancouver again~~
pretty good/cheap subs.  we still call it bhob even though its now technically bhorb.   chicken fingah dinnah! wicked bum-tuck ked!
I had been to this facility  approximately three years ago and was very pleased with the quality of care, that I received, so when my husband needed after hours care, I chose to drive him across town to this facility.   The nurses could not have been more helpful. I spoke with two nurses on the phone, Steve and Jackie, prior to bringing my husband to Oviedo Centra Care. Both nurses were terrific, answered my questions, and once there, Jackie, who was on duty, was just as caring in person as she was over the phone. The doctor, John Feenburg, an osteopath, had a very pleasant demeanor and zeroed in on the problem right away. He did not 'talk down' to either of us, and more importantly, he immediately honed in on the most probable reason for my husband's recurrent fever. He prescribed the appropriate medication for the problem and gave us a print out detailing his verbal instructions.   As an aside, I have found from past experience that osteopaths are very good diagnosticians. As an example, Dr. Feenburg did a urinalysis, but he also ordered a culture with sensitivity test. (to see which antibiotics the bacteria would be most suspectible to and those it would be resistant to).  Results for this test are usually received in 5-7 days after it is ordered. Because of the thorough nature of the tests that Dr. Feenburg ordered, it was discovered that the antibiotic needed to be changed when the results of the culture came back. In addition, Carol called me immediately with the results and faxed them to our home (after we signed the appropriate release and faxed it to them) so that we could take a copy to my husband's wonderful urologist, who then made the appropriate change in the medication.   Dr. Feenburg is to be commended for his attention to detail, which often times, can mean the difference between getting to the crux of the medical issue and just putting a 'bandaid' on it. We are so grateful to both Drs. Feenburg and Gundian  (my husband's urologist) for their consistently stellar care and diagnostics. I am very pleased with this facility, I highly recommend them, and I would not hesitate to use them in the future should the need arise.
This place is great!  The food is awesome and the service is great!  The food is prepared very quickly, and they were so kind to bring us dessert on the house, not once, but TWICE!  Well deserved 5 star review, I will definitely be back!
New location of the Grove (I think there are two others) on West Sixth. The location is great! And it has a gorgeous (and extremely large) patio overlooking Shoal Creek!   Lots of wines and reasonably priced flights! I had a delicious flight of sparkling roses for $15! They also have cocktails which looked great!   Great menu! Tons of vegetarian options, and their gluten free, vegan, and vegetarian options are clearly marked on the menu! Three of us shared six different types pf bruschetta - you can choose 3 for $10! (Don't miss the Brie, fig jam, and apple!) we also had the Brussels sprouts, which were awesome! We wanted to eat more-so much of the menu looks delicious!!   I'd love to go again for happy hour!!   Inside is a little upscale, but people sitting outside were dressed very casually!!
This is a great place never new it was here. Thanks yelp!. Great sunday brunch spot. They have music and you can bring your dogs. I had shrimp and grits and they were good I have had better but for a coffee shop can't go wrong. Also I heard the Benedict is good as well. The muffin is not huge so it does not take away from the dish. So all in all pretty cool place in the middle of cherrywood.
First visit to Buenos Aires for a date on a rainy night. They sat us right by the front window. [insert big sigh here], que romántico!  Food was delicious and so was the wine. Mmmpanadas! I've seen some Groupons for them lately, which kind of surprised me, but I say go for it.   Not that I've participated, but they have Tango Thursdays!
I'm a huge fan of ramen and Boston definitely lacks good places for a traditional ramen shop. Sapporo Ramen is by far my favorite. I always go for their Tan Tan broth. DELICIOUS!   Positives: wonderful ramen for a decent price.  Negatives: rude regular waitress and cash only.
it was my 1st time trying the salon. it's location is towards the back of Assembly Row. they offer regular manicure, gel and SNS. I selected the SNS for the 1st time and my nail technician was great. she explained what it was and what she was doing. SNS is a nail polish powder and doesnt use UV light and dries quick.They offer different nail colors which was awesome. my only comment is that removal of cuticle wasn't included in the SNS. it was a separate package. they take appointments which was a plus. overall highly recommend the place. but be sure to specify what service you want especially when making an appointment.
I love their 8.95$ lunch, and 13.95$ dinner specials!  This is great place to take a large group of people, and their tepenyaki menu is perfect for people who think they don't like Japanese food.  Also, if seated at the teppenyaki tables the chef that prepares ypour food is always very attentive to your needs (i.e shellfish allergies) and very entertaining!  This location was just remodeled and is beautifully decorated, has a huge bar area, large screen with popular sports games being broadcast, and a dining area for patrons that don't want teppenyaki (i.e. sushi, or la carte items).
Elliot and his partner were super fast and well worth what we paid. They got in and went right to it, moving us out and into our new house in only 2 hours! They are very affordable too, much more affordable than most popular moving companies in Austin.
Prompt; great customer service; and CHEAP tires. I was able to get two run flat tires for way under market value. Thank you Angel Tires!
With four people we tried four different appetizers and entrees. Each was fantastic and we're looking forward to another four. Definitely a fan.
I took my family to this restaurant for brunch on Mothers' Day and Wow, what a place! Their Dim Sum, being obviously by name what they specialize in, was excellent. It was all very good with a nice selection of traditional Dim Sum offerings as well as some more contemporary creations. The Thai tea that my wife and I had was also very fresh, well proportioned, and flavorful. The service was fast and friendly. The waiter even brought us some samplings of another dish that he had told us about through the course of our meal. They were also very kind and welcoming towards our 3 yr. old daughter and showed her special favor which meant a lot to us.    The food was extremely fresh, tasty and well presented. Good place and good people with an obviously loyal customer base which was evident on the morning of  this Sunday brunch. :-)
I bought a pair of Palladium boots here this week, and I'm really happy with my whole experience.  The gentleman who was working there was really helpful and friendly.  I had a couple of different ones that I wanted to try on, and he actually suggested that I start by trying on the least expensive ones - how about that for a salesperson!  I thought they had a nice selection, and I'll probably be back.
Uchiko delivered the most delicious meal I have ever eaten. Every single item we had was impeccable. I still dream about the avofry, ohhhh, the avofry. The lemony goodness is inexplicable. The first bite I had was so savory that I closed my eyes and told my husband to stop talking so I could completely concentrate on the flavor. Yeah, it was that good.  The yokai berry, kakiage, brussel sprouts, P-38...OMG.  Every little bite is a delight. Be prepared to drop some serious money, but it is so worth it. The customer service is top class as well. Just perfect.
Loved it! The food was spectacular. I got the Cajun chicken rigatoni dish, and it was phenomenal. I will definitely be back!
I like this place! Every time I visit Boulder, I make it a point to make breakfast/brunch reservations. My routine is pretty consistent - frisée salad, ham and cheese crepes, side of bacon, warm croissant and a salty dog (or two).   It's located across the street from the St. Julien Hotel. If visiting, check it out. There is a substantial selection of other French classics - I just listed my go to order.
I love this place!  Great sandwiches, spring rolls and soups. Their sandwiches are a little more expensive than in Chinatown at $4 instead of the usual $3 but I feel it's a better sandwich with more filling.  The guy behind the counter, the owner I think, is always very pleasant, easy to get to location with ample parking.  This is my go to stop for Bahn Mi.
I came in looking for a board game for my God Son, who's 9. A sales person helped me (a woman with curly hair and glasses) for over 15 min she made suggestions on games. I settled on Spooky Stairs and mailed it to my little guy that weekend.  Today I was video chatting Witt him when it arrived, he was so excited and opened it right away to play. Him (6) and his sister (3) plays two rounds screaming GHOOOOOOOST every time the dice landed on it. They had a wonderful time.   Thank you for your help! I'll be back in June.
Kenny and Jack both really helped me out. Jack was able to get me a really good price on tires and struts.   My car had really bad tires and my alignment was way off so the inside sounded like I was driving a train due to the tire noise. After the great work Kenny did, the ride feels a lot more smooth, the tire noises are gone and my cars handling is a lot better.   Thanks guys!
Look no further for a florist or decor vendor for your special day - Verna and her team were literally the highlight of my wedding with how impeccable my centerpieces and bouquets (among other floral arrangements) turned out! I haven't stopped receiving compliments on how beautiful the wedding was and I know this was in large part thanks to Verna. We had a very windy day for our outdoor ceremony and she went to her shop and made entirely new arrangements that would withstand the wind...all without my knowing this during my anxious and hectic wedding day! Don't even get me started on how celebrity worthy my wedding cake looked, all done after a few emails of asking Verna if she could "spruce" it up for me last minute! If you are looking for a very professional and customer focused florist, you have found it. You have found the perfect business partner to make your day look as amazing as possible but also she joins you throughout the process in the excitement of your big day. I think it speaks volumes when weeks after your wedding, you are looking for events to have where you can use Fuji Floral to help your accessorize...I feel like I have found a vendor I will use for many more occasions to come! Thank you Fuji Floral for making my wedding the fairytale I dreamed of!
Frito Pie with beans / brisket was great - big chunks of tender beef.  Enjoyed the variety of BBQ sauces and fixings they offer.
Tried this place for the first time today and I love it!!! Yummy fluffy perfect donuts that won't break the bank. It's directly across from chamblee charter high, btw, in an unassuming little strip center. Reminds me of a donut and sandwich place out in Vegas that was equally yummy. I got a selection of a dozen donuts - plus two fritters- and paid $12 and change. Can't beat that.  Wish these things were actually a health food because I know I'll be back.
I live near here and this place is great. The sandwiches are  great and so are the dinners / dishes you can order. It's quickly becoming my go to. The staff is friendly, they take pride in their food and the prices are very good for the portion sizes.  It's all quality stuff and you should give it a try.
It's funny how you go to a restaurant like this and you think in the beginning that there is no way you will be full when you are done but I was soo wrong. My boyfriend and I split almost everything on the menu. I can say there was only one thing I didn't really care for but everything else was perfect. They do not take reservations though so be prepared for a wait no matter what time or day of the week.
Really like this bar/restaurant. Inventive cocktails, really good wine options and great food! If you go for brunch order the biscuit. Happy hour fries are also super good!
These guys are wonderful, I've had my dogs shots and spay/neuter done with them and they are so caring to your needs as well as your pets. I get nervous when any of my dogs have to have surgery and they kept me updated through the whole process and made me feel at ease that my dog would be taken care of. They have great prices for shots and heart worm tests, spay and neuter   Is very affordable, the techs and vets are all very nice and I feel they go beyond the normal vet care experience. They are non profit so sometimes you have to wait for shots but I've never had to wait for very long. They also sell heartworm meds that's are affordable (like single dose) and always make sure to keep you informed on any medical needs your animal may face.  This place truly does care about the animals they see and I recommend anyone to go to then for shots or spay and neuter!
This place is the ONLY restaurant where each and every time, the food and service is exceptional. Harman (the owner) is so friendly and always takes time to come over and say hello. This facility is CLEAN, their meat is always cooked properly and the waiters and waitresses are nice. Best place for indian food by far...  I highly recommend the tandoori chicken tandoori prawns, butter chicken, Aloo-gobi (vegetarian dish) chick peas, garlic naan, paneer pakora, fish pakora, samosas and rice.
Like some of the previous reviews I would have never found this place if it wasn't for another reason.  A few nights back a hiring mixer for a company that I applied for was being hosted at Sherlocks.  It was a nice treat to see this place in such a glum run of the mill shopping plaza, although weird at first.  Plus the sign and lights for this store are pretty rad.  It plays on the movie and Hollywood theme of the name.  They have a ton of variety!  Anything from clothing, shoes, hats and hand bags from all eras, but they have vintage posters and magazines.  The owner is a lovely young woman that works along side her sister and collects merchandise for the store.  Some of the items are eclectics but many vintage lovers collect the odd.  The store itself is bigger than expected for a vintage store.  It was also a little unkempt, due to inventory and merchandising.  But these things should be taken care of prior to store hours not during business.  It made the place look really messy.  Also, if the owner ever reads this the gang of 30 something year-old guys hanging outside the store was a little weird.  The dog was cute but it made me a little uncomfortable to want to try on clothes knowing that a group of guys were outside and the store owner was running all over the place.
Best Chinese food ever!! So good! Fried rice was perfectly cooked not too dry. Orange chicken just spicy enough. Delivery accurate with time given.
My family and I ate at Tiffins in Disney's Animal Kingdom this afternoon. The place is beautiful and thoroughly relaxing, the service was excellent. We also liked the food as well. It's a good place to go for a nice meal. I would still prefer Jiko but this was a satisfying choice.
The savannah view was a unique and satisfying experience. The studio room was standard DVC although a bit darker because of the style and colors used to conform to the theme. I don't believe that it would be a comfortable walk from Kidani to Jambo House to take advantage of the amenities there.
A various kind of frozen yogurt flavors.  My favorites are Red Velvet chocolate, Vanilla, and sorbet kiwi strawberry. For the topping ? Tried mango boba and strawberry boba. That things pop in your mouth and let the juicy flavor run your tongue.  People work there are extremely friendly. They gave us complimentary cookies. Did not give us side eyes when we taste a lot of flavors before we bought it.  Anyway, it's good and i think you should treat yourself to this.
Very high quality and delicious food, thoughtfully and carefully prepared! I've had the falafel plate deconstructed (because I am GF) and the cauliflower bowl with chicken. You know how some falafel can be too dry and stick in your throat? Sam's falafel has the perfect texture/crunch and flavor and the pickled turnips in that dish were just the right amount of salty.  The cauliflower with chicken had tender, lightly browned cauliflower and beautifully seasoned (I think shawarma style) and tender chicken.  So psyched to have another "go to" place for lunch!
In my seemingly never-ending quest to find a hair salon during my three year stint here in Cambridge, I think I have finally found a new home! A love (Maria) to call my own! I found out about Bradley & Diegel through Gilt City and bought one of their specials to get a hair cut. I procrastinated for so long that instead of getting a pre-birthday haircut as I intended, I got a "God help me, I'm starting to look like Medusa!!!" haircut.   My appointment was set with Maria and from the consultation, I knew she was going to be outstanding. I plopped down in her chair, lifted a lank lock of my overgrown hair, and told her that I just celebrated my 30th birthday (*sob*) and wanted a change from the long hair that I've been sporting for the last 6 years. I just wanted something fresh and contemporary that wouldn't be a huge hassle. Maria suggested an a-line cut with the shortest pieces still at the base of my neck, so I went for it.  I was led to what I think was the world's most perfect shampoo chair which was all Star Trek-like and mechanized....and gave a pretty good massage, too! The shampoo assistant (Gabe?) had great hands and I felt myself relaxing under his head massage.   Normally I'm not a chatty salon person. I will bring a book and read and don't want to make small talk. However, Maria and I talked almost the entire time while she was cutting and blowdrying and flat-ironing and not once did I regret our conversation. She is so funny and spunky and cute. Maria gave me some tips on how to keep my hair from looking such a hot mess (like gee, get some mini highlights because the unintentional ombre look is passe). We talked about everything from hair to husbands.   I will ABSOLUTELY be back to see Maria!
Went here for lunch today with the Fam. It was good, prices were decent ($10 - $12).  Good drinks and nice sevice.  They have live music and a large bar.  The place is not large but it has very nice large windows which open to the street.    I order the Swordfish kebabs with Cesar salad.  Very fresh, tasty and good portions.  I would come back if I am looking for a good lunch downtown.
Cute little pizza place near Kendall Square, with friendly staff members. The place has cute pizza paddles that have been decorated by various guests that our waiter told us a little about. On their website, you can learn a little more about the artist of the paddle which brings nice sense of community to the restaurant. The place also has an option for pick up from a small window at the front of the restaurant in case you didn't want to eat in.  We got the #10 Huron Village with scallions, gorgonzola, mozzarella, and for someone who doesn't like cheese too much, I found it to be pretty good! All the pizzas are thin, two different sizes to choose from, and you can do half and half pizzas too. They have sandwiches and salads but it seemed like the majority of the customers were having pizza, which would make sense with the restaurant name.
i am normally not a fan of chain restaurants, but feel i have to make an exception here.   i have been here 4 times now, mostly out of convenience to my work.   i am now convinced that the "rebirth" of luby's may have been a good thing.   each time i have been,  the food has been very good, service was fast and staff were both helpful and friendly.  finally, they always have clean restrooms.   i am a little freaky about restaurants that have dirty bathrooms, seems hard for me to imagine the same establishment with a dirty bathroom but a clean kitchen.  on my most recent visit the bus \ waiter actually remembered me from over a month ago and greeted me with a 'welcome back' nothing better than alert employees.   lastly, as i was moving through line, a manager reached over and pulled chicken fried steak that had batter falling off, off of the platter and threw it away.      so far i am a fan!
Two steps through the front door and you realize the gods have pushed fast-forward on the cassette of Life. The usual slow pace of a winter afternoon in Medford becomes a scurry of cashiers, customers and cold cuts. Pasta, patrons and provolone. Slicers, Sicilians and spare change. Fettucini, fa... you get it.  Seriously, though. A deceptively bright and clean shop with three floor to ceiling shelves of imported Italian goods, surrounded by an L-shaped deli, butcher and fry station. Fry station? Isstrue, babaloo. In addition to the usual suspects on their sandwich board, Bob's throws a Greek diner twist by adding steak fries made to order in basket fryers. Somewhat out of place, yet not entirely undesirable, adding an unique nuance to the amalgam of airborne flavors I could easily become addicted to.  My Italian deli combo ($6 small, $7 jumbo) stacked a trio of cold cuts - salame, mortadella, soppresatta - on soft, chewy scali. I asked for the works sans onion, resulting in romaine lettuce, slightly firm tomatoes and thick slices of cherry peppers instead of traditional giardiniera. Salt, pepper and a splash of dressing to taste and we were off to the races.  Lesson 1: Get a small. - Why? It's fucking big. Sure, the large is 50c more and the jumbo is only a $1 extra. But you're not a cow with two empty stomachs. Get a small.  Lesson 2: Know what toppings you'd like - Nothing comes standard on the sub, but you can get it with anything they have behind the counter. "Yeah, could you top that proscuitto with marinated mozzarella, sliced Jordan's almonds and a splash of Italian wedding soup? Thanks boss."  Lesson 3: Stand in one place. - The frenetic motion of call-in customers picking up orders slung by three or four guys behind the counter can easily make you a human pinball. Pick a spot, hunker down and mind your drool.  Bob's will easily become a favorite, as it is to many a Medford resident and neighboring employees the staff addressed by name. A small but powerful and well-oiled machine, cranking out colorful, sumptuous sandwiches for pocket change. I will return and soon, knowing Dave's Fresh will understand - Bob's is that remarkable.
Visited on 1/14/17   I came to locale one afternoon with my in laws, sister in law plus my family. ( 5 adults -2 young children)   We wanted to take them out in the north end while they were in town visiting and I can't say enough good things about my experience .  We ordered : Meatballs , salad and couple of pizzas   Service :  The food came quickly and everything tasted fresh and delicious   Our waitress was AMAZING. She was super attentive and patient with the kids and our group.   The whole experience was great. Highly recommend this place. We'll be back
We had the shrimp w/lobster sauce, eggrolls, and dumplings...all were good and they provided the right amount of hot mustard on the side.
- its half wine tasting, half restaurant  - the place has a log cabin meets very high ceiling wine warehouse feel. - not a ton of tables. Probable doesnt seat more than 100  - good selection of wine by the glass and bear - food isnt bad, each plate is enough for a dinner as long as you stick to the big plates (pasta, pizza, etc) - overall for 2 glass of wine, 2 bear tasters, 2 dinner plates, and desert, it was $75 including tip. So pretty good - servers were good. Recommend.!
pretty tasty. we went for the sunday brunch. there was a live band playing jazz at a perfect background level.  the food was very good, used quality ingredients, and was moderately priced. the staff was extremely friendly and helpful.
Bipartisan is a cool coffee shop with a very Portland vibe. There is plenty of seating to lounge and enjoy some coffee and pie. The couches and armchairs look like they might have been curbside cast offs, but they're comfortable and seem clean enough.  The coffee is nice and strong, and the selection of cookies and pies is always fresh and delicious.   This is one of my favorite spots to hang out with a good book.
I had a nice little stay-cation a few days ago at the Intercontinental. The entire staff was very friendly. The common areas were very clean and nicely decorated. The bed and pillows are two things that I miss. I wish I could have taken them with me when I left. The food here was great. I had salmon for dinner and eggs, grits and bacon for breakfast the next morning. I sampled my bf's food and his was tasty as well. If I ever need a place to stay in town, I will highly consider the Intercontinental.
My two dogs have been customers for boarding and daycare for years.  We (four-legged and two-legged) are always addressed by our names, greeted with a friendly smile, and never have less than 100% confidence in long-term boarding over the holidays and special occasions.  If we ever return to Austin, without a doubt, Camp Bow Wow is who we'd return to for our daycare and boarding needs.   We all miss the gang there and wish them all well.
Very tasty chicken. There's a reason it's in a big bold box. The Chocolate Uprising is fantastic. Way more intricate and tasty than I was expecting. Also, one of our party members left his camera in the booth. A member of the wait staff ran all the way out and gave it to us. Exceptional service, good food... I recommend it.
Medici is my go to coffee spot. I recently moved to Austin from Seattle and was afraid I wouldn't be able to find a place that could replicate my beloved Stumptown and Caffe Vita, but Medici does, right down to the atmosphere. The lattes and cappuccinos are always done to perfection (perfect texture on the steamed milk) and the toddys and iced tea are refreshing on a warm day. As a plus, there are good quality pastries and breakfast tacos available in the morning, as delicious as you would find at a run of the mill bakery. If you get there earlier in the morning - between 7 and 9 - you'll usually be able to find a good seat with a laptop plugin, but outside of then it gets crowded, although the noise level is always reasonable. My only complaint with the place is that it's too cool for school and you might be embarrassed asking for skim milk or something froofy. However, all of the baristas are friendly, if quite hipster. Go to Medici and get your fix! Only place I like as well is JP's.  P.S. Don't be discouraged by the price, all the coffee here is expensive.
We drove over on a very cold Saturday morning just before 9 AM. The line wasn't terribly long, which we could tell was because service was fast and efficient - there was a steady stream of customers coming through! The space itself is well-designed, though in the dead of winter it can be hard to sit comfortably with the draft from the doors!  My husband and I split three donuts: maple bacon, bourbon salted caramel, and toasted coconut. We give the maple bacon and toasted coconut five stars, no contest. Generously sized and competitively priced at $3-4/each.   I'm picky about my coconut donuts - I liked the blend of both toasted and untoasted shreds, though the way it fell off the donut itself in a crust was somewhat disappointing - it needed to stick on there through bites! Hubby was very satisfied with his maple bacon one - only rivaled by our fave place in San Diego (Great Maple).   The bourbon salted caramel one fell quite short of our expectations: the salt was scant, couldn't taste the caramel, and overall it tasted as if they used cheap bourbon but neglected to burn off the alcohol flavor. Way too strong - and as someone preggers, I questioned the safety of it after just one bite!  Overall we will come back to try more flavors!
